THE BATTLE OF GERMANTOWN.
And when servile Fraud stalks through the land, and Genius starves in his cell,
while upstart Imbecility rides abroad in chariots; when man is degenerate, public
faith is broken, public honor violated, then will we wander forth into the awful shadows
of the Past, and from the skeletons of the battle-field evoke the spirits of that giant
time, calling upon their forms of unreal majesty for the mighty secret which made
them the man-gods of that era of high deeds and glorious purposes, THE
Ghostly Past
.
Part the First.
THE BATTLE EVE.
I.THE RED CROSS IN PHILADELPHIA.
Toll
tolltoll! The State House bell, that once rung the birth-day of
Freedom, now tolled its knell.
It was a sad day for Philadelphia, a sad day for the nation, when the
pomp of British banners and the gleam of British arms were in her streets
and along her avenues; when, as far as eye could reach, was seen the long
array of glaring red coats, with the sunbeams of a clear September day
falling
on helm and cuirass, shining like burnished gold.
It was a sad and gloomy day for the nation, when the Congress was
forced to flee the old provincial town of William Penn, when the tories
paraded the streets with loud hurrahs, with the British lion waving
overhead
,
while the whigs hung their heads in shame and in despair.
True, the day was calm and bright overhead; true, the sky was clear,
and the nipping air of autumn gave freshness to the mind and bloom to the
cheek; true it was, the city was all alive with the glitter of processions,
and the passing to and fro of vast crowds of people; but the processions
were a dishonor to our soil, the crowds hurried to and fro to gaze upon the
living monuments of the defeat of Brandywinethe armed and arrogant
British legions thronging the streets of Philadelphia.
They came marching along in front of the old State House, on their way
to their barracks in the Northern Liberties. The scene was full of strange
and startling interest. The roofs of the State House arose clearly in the
autumn air, each peak and cornice, each gable-end and corner, shown in full
and distinct outline, with the trees of Independence Square towering greenly
in the rear of the fabric, while up into the clear sky arose the State House
steeple, with its solemn bell of independence, that but a year ago sent forth
the news of liberty to all the land, swinging a welcome to the British host
a welcome that sounded like the funeral knell of new world freedom. The
columns of the army were passing in front of Independence Hall. Along
Chesnut street, as far as the eye could see, shone the glittering array of
sword and bayonet, with the bright sunshine falling over the stout forms of
the British troopers, mounted on gallant war steeds, and blazing with
burnished
cuirass and polished helm, while banner and pennon waived gaily
overhead. There, treading the streets in all the flush of victory, were the
regiments of British infantry, with the one bold front of their crimson attire
flashing in the light, with their bayonets rising overhead like a forest of steel,
and with marks of Brandywine written on many a whiskered face and
burly chest.
And at their head, mounted on a gallant steed, with the lordlings of his
staff around him, rode a tall and athletic man, with a sinewy frame, and a
calm, placid face, wearing an even smile and quiet look, seen from beneath
the shadow of his plumed chapeau, while his gaudy attire of crimson, with
epaulettes of gold on either shoulder, announced Lord Cornwallis, the second
general of the invading army.
And as the General glanced around, fixing his eye proudly upon the
British banner, waving from the State House steeple, as his glance was met
by the windows of Independence Hall, decorated by the flags of the British
King, a proud gleam lit up his calm blue eye; and with the thought of
Brandywine, came a vision of the future, speaking eloquently of provinces
subjugated, rebels overthrown and liberties crushed.
And then peals of music, uttered by an hundred bands, filled the street,
and startled the silence of the State House avenues, swelling up to the
heavens with notes of joy, the roll of drum, the shriek of bugle, and the
clash of cymbal mingling in grand chorus. The banners waved more
proudly overhead, the spears, the bayonets, and helmets shone brighter in
the light, and between the peals of music the loud huzzas of the crowd
blackening the sidewalks, looking from the windows, and clinging to the
trees, broke gladly upon the air.
Tolltolltollthe solemn notes of independence bell heralded, with an
iron tongue, the entrance of the invaders into the city; the possession of
Philadelphia by the British.
It was a grand sight to seethe windows crowded with the forms of
beauty, waving scarfs in the air, aged matrons lifting little children on high,
who clapped their hands with glee, as they beheld the glimmer of arms and
the glitter of steel, the streets below all crimson with British uniform, all
music and all joy, the side walks blackened by crowds of servile tories who
shouted till their loyal throats were tired Long life to King George
confusion
to Washington, and death to the rebels!
They trooped through the streets of Philadelphia on the 26th of
September
,
1777; just fifteen days after the battle-day of Brandywine, they took
possession with all the pomp of victory; and as the shades of twilight sank
down over the town, they marched proudly into their barracks, in the
Northern Liberties.
II.THE HAUNT OF THE REBEL.
And where was Washington?
Retreating from the forces of Sir William Howe, along the Schuylkill;
retreating with brave men under his command, men who had dared death in
a thousand shapes, and crimsoned their hands with the carnage of
Brandywine
;
retreating because his powder and ammunition were exhausted;
because
his soldiers wanted the necessary apparel, while their hands grasped
muskets without lock or flint.
The man of the American army retreated, but his soul was firm. The
American Congress had deserted Philadelphia, but Washington did not
despair. The British occupied the surrounding country, their arms shone
on every hill; their banners toyed in every breeze; yet had George
Washington
resolved to strike another blow for the freedom of this fair land.
The calm sunlight of an autumnal afternoon was falling over the quiet
valleys, the green plains, and the rich and rolling woodland of an undulating
tract of country, spreading from the broad bosom of the Delaware to the
hilly shores of the Schuylkill, about seven miles from Philadelphia.
The roofs of an ancient village, extending in one unbroken line along the
great northern road, arose grey and massive in the sunlight, as each corniced
gable and substantial chimney looked forth from the shelter of the
surrounding
trees. There was an air of quaint and rustic beauty about this village.
Its plan was plain and simple, burdened with no intricate crossings of streets,
no labyrinthine pathways, no complicated arrangement of houses. The
fabrics of the village were all situated on the line of the great northern road,
reaching from the fifth mile stone to the eighth, while a line of smaller
villages
extended this Indian file of houses to the tenth milestone from
the city.
The houses were all stamped with marks of the German origin of their
tenants. The high, sloping roof, the walls of dark grey stone, the porch
before the door, and the garden in the rear, blooming with all the freshness
of careful culture, marked the tenements of the village, while the heavy
gable-ends and the massive cornices of every roof, gave every house an
appearance
of rustic antiquity.
Around the village, on either side, spread fertile farms, each cultivated
like a garden, varied by orchards heavy with golden fruit, fields burdened
with the massive shocks of corn, or whitened with the ripe buckwheat, or
embrowned by the upturning plough.
The village looked calm and peaceful in the sunlight, but its plain and
simple people went not forth to the field to work on that calm autumnal
afternoon. The oxen stood idly in the barn-yard, cropping the fragrant hay,
the teams stood unused by the farmer, and the flail was silent within the
barn. A sudden spell seemed to have come strangely down upon the
peaceful denizens of Germantown, and that spell was the shadow of the
British banner flung over her fields of white buckwheat, surmounting the
dream-like steeps of the Wissakikon, waving from Mount Airy, and floating
in the freshning breeze of Chesnut Hill.
Had you ascended Chesnut Hill on that calm autumnal afternoon, and
gazed over the tract of country opened to your view, your eye would have
beheld a strange and stirring sight.
Above your head the clear and boundless sky, its calm azure giving no
tokens of the strife of the morrow; declining in the west, the gorgeous sun
pouring his golden light over the land; his beams of welcome having no
omen of the battle-smoke and mist that shall cloud their light on the morrow
morn.
Gaze on the valley below. Germantown, with its dark grey tenements,
sweeps away to the south, in one unbroken line; farther on you behold the
glitter of steeples, and the roofs of a large citythey are the steeples and
roofs of Philadelphia. Yon belt of blue is the broad Delaware, and yon
dim, dark object beyond the city, blackening the bosom of the waters, is
Fort Mifflin, recently erected by General Washington.
Gaze over the fields of Germantown near the centre of the village. In
every field there is the gleam of arms, on every hill-top there waves a royal
banner, and over hill and plain, toward the Schuylkill on the one side, and
the Delaware on the other, sweep the white tents of the British army.
Now turn your gaze to the north, and to the northwest. The valley
opens before you, and fairer valley never smiled beneath the sun.
Away it sweeps to the northwest, an image of rustic beauty, here a rich
copse of green woodland, just tinged by autumn, there a brown field, yonder
the Wissahikon, marking its way of light, by a winding line of silver, in
one green spot a village peeping out from among the trees; a little farther
on, a farmer's dwelling with the massive barn and the dark grey hay-stack;
on every side life, and verdure, and cultivation, mingled and crowded
together
,
as though the hand of God, had flung his richest blessings over the
valley, and clothed the land in verdure and in beauty.
Yonder the valley sweeps away to the northwest; the sun shines over a
dense mass of woodland rolling away to the blue of the horizon. Mark
that woodland well, try and discern the outline of every tree, and count the
miles as you gaze upon the prospect.
The distance from Chesnut Hill, is sixteen weary miles, and under that
mass of woodland, beneath the shadows of those rolling forests, beside the
streams hidden from your eye, in distress and in want, in defeat and in
danger, rendevouz the bands of a desperate, though gallant army.
2
It is the Continental army, and they encamp on the banks of the
Skippack
.
Their encampment is sad and still, no peals of music break upon the
woodland air, no loud hurrahs, no shouts of arrogant victory. The morrow
has a different tale to tell, for by the first flush of the coming morn, a meteor
will burst over the British Hosts at Germantown, and fighting for life, for
liberty, will advance the starved soldiers of the Continental host.
III.THE CAMP OF THE BRITISHER.
As
the sun went down on the 3d of October, 1777, his last beams flung
a veil of golden light over the verdure of a green lawn, that extended from
the road near the head of Germantown, bounded along the village street by
a massive wall of stone, spreading north and south, over a quarter of a mile,
while toward the east, it swept in all its greenness and beauty, for the
distance
of some two hundred yards.
A magnificent mansion arose towering on the air, a mansion built of grey
stone, with a steep roof, ornamented by heavy cornices, and varied massive
chimneys, with urns of brown stone, placed on pedestals of brick at each
corner of the building. This fabric was at once substantial, strikingly
adapted for defence in time of war, and neat and well-proportioned as regards
architectural beauty. The walls thick and massive, were well supplied
with windows, the hall door opened in the centre of the house, facing the
road, and the steps were decorated by two marble Lions placed on either
side, each holding an escutcheon in its grasp.
Here and there a green tree arose from the bosom of the lawn; in the
rear of the mansion were seen the brown-stone buildings of the barn, and to
the north the grounds were varied by the rustic enclosures of a cattle-pen.
This was the mansion of
Chew's House
, and that green lawn, spreading
bright and golden in the beams of the declining sun, was the
Battle-Field
of Germantown
.
One word with regard to the position of the British on the Eve of Battle.
The left wing of the British army extended from the centre of the village,
more than a mile below Chew's house, from a point near the old market
house, westward across the Wissahikon, and toward the Schuylkill. The
German chasseurs in their heavy uniform, the ponderous caps, defended by
bear-skin and steel, the massive sword, and the cumbrous ornaments of
silver
,
were stationed in the front and on the flank of the left wing.
The right wing swept away towards the Delaware, as far as the Old
York Road; each soldier well armed and accoutred, each dragoon supplied
with his stout war-steed, each cannon with its file of men, ready for action,
and every musket, with brilliant tube and glittering bayonet, prepared with
its man, for the keen chase of the rebel route, whenever the master of the
hounds might start the hunt.
This wing was defended in the front by a battalion of light infantry, and
the Queen's American Rangers, whose handsome accoutrements, uniform
of dark green, varied by ornaments of gold, and rifles mounted with silver,
gleamed gaily from amid the depths of the greenwood, presenting a brilliant
contrast to the course blue hunting shirt, the plain rifle, and uncouth
woodsman's
knife that characterised the American Rifleman.
In a green field, situated near the Germantown road, a mile above Chew's
house, the banner of the 40th regiment floated above the tent of Col.
Musgrave
,
its brave commander, while the canvass dwellings of the soldiers were
scattered around the flag, intermingled with the tents of another battalion
of light infantry.
Such was the British position at Germantowna picket at Allan's house,
Mount Airy, two miles above Chew's houseCol. Musgrave's command a
mile below Allen's housethe main body two miles below Chew's,
somewhere
near the old market houseand this force was backed by four
regiments
of British Grenadiers, stationed in the barracks in the Northern
Liberties, Philadelphia.
And this force, exceeding 18000 able-bodied regulars, the Patriot chieftian
had resolved to attack with 8000 Continental troops and 3000 militia,
inferior
in arms, in clothing, and in everything but the justice of their cause, to
the proud soldiers of the British host.
Night came down upon Germantown. The long shadows of the old
houses were flung across the village road, and along the fields; the moon
was up in the clear heavens, the dark grey roofs were tinted with silver,
and glimpses of moonlight were flung around the massive barns of the village,
yet its peaceful denizens had not yet retired to rest, after their good old
German
fashion, at early candle-light.
There was a strange fear upon the minds of the villagers. Each porch
contained its little circle; the hoary grandsire, who had suffered the
bright-cheeked
grandchild to glide from his knee, while he leaned forward, with
animated gesture, conversing with his son in a low whisperthe blooming
mother, the blue-eyed maiden, and the ruddy-cheeked, flaxen-haired boy, all
sharing the interest of the scene, and having but one topic of discoursethe
terror of war.
Could we go back to that quiet autumnal night on the 3d of October, in
the Year of the Three Sevens, and stroll along the village street of
Germantown
,
we would find much to interest the ear and attract the eye.
We would leave Chew's house behind us, and stroll along the village
street. We would note the old time costumes of the villagers, the men clad
in coarse linsey wolsey, voluminous vests with wide lappels, breeches of
buckskin, stockings and buckled shoes, while the head was defended by the
`skimming dish hat;' we would admire the picturesque costume of the dames
and damsels of Germantown, here and there a young lady of quality
mincing her way in all the glory of high-heeled shoes, intricate head-dress,
and fine silk gown, all hooped and frilled; there a stately dame in frock of
calico, newly bought and high-priced; but most would we admire the
blushing
damsel of the village, her full round cheeks peeping from beneath the
kerchief thrown lightly around her rich brown locks, her blue eyes glancing
mischievously hither and thither, her bust, full rounded and swelling with
youth and health, enclosed in the tight bodice, while the rustic petticoat of
brown linsey wolsey, short enough to disclose a neat ancle and a little foot,
would possess more attractions for our eyes, than the frock of calico or
gown of silk.
We would stroll along the street of the village, and listen to the
conversation
of the villagers. Every tongue speaks of war, the old man whispers
the word as his grey hairs wave in the moonlight, the mother murmurs the
syllable of terror as the babe seeks the shelter of her bosom, the boy gaily
shouts the word, as he brandishes the rusted fowling piece in the air, and
the village beau, seated beside his sweetheart, mutters that word as the
thought of the British ravis her flashes over his mind.
Strolling from Chew's House, we would pass the
Bringhursts
, seated
on their porch, the
Helligs
, the
Peters
, the
Unrods
just opposite the old
Grave Yard
, and the
Lippards
, and the
Johnsons
, below the grave yard,
at the opposite corners of the lane leading back to the township line; we
would stroll by the mansion of the
Keysers
, near the Mennonist grave yard;
further down we would pass the
Knoors
, the
Haines
, the
Pastorius
', the
Hergesimers
, the
Engles
, the
Cookes
, the
Conrads
, the
Schffers
, and
the hundred other families of Germantown, descendants of old German stock,
as seated on the porch in front of the mansion, each family circle discussed
the terrible topic of war, bloodshed, battle, and death.
Nor would we forget the various old time families, bearing the names of
NiceMoyerBowmanWeaverBockiusForrestBillmeyer
Leibert
Matthias.
These names may not figure brilliantly in history, but
their's was the heraldry of an honest life.
And at every step, we would meet a British soldier, strutting by in his
coat of crimson, on every side we would behold the gleam of British arms,
and our ears would be saluted by the roll of British drums, beating the tattoo,
and the signal cannon, announcing the hour of repose.
And as midnight gathered over the roofs of the town, as the baying of the
watchdog broke upon our ears, mingled with the challenge of the sentinel,
we would stroll over the lawn of Chew's House, note the grass growing
greenly and freshly, heavy with dew, and then gazing upon the heavens, our
hearts would ask the question, whether no omen of blood in the skies,
heralded the door and the death of the morrow?
Oh, there is something of horror in the anticipation of a certain death,
when we know as surely as we know our own existence, that a coming
battle will send scores of souls shrieking to their last account, when the
green lawn, now silvered by the moonlight, will be soddened with blood,
when the ancient mansion, now rising in the midnight air, like an emblem
of rural ease, with its chimneys and its roof sleeping in the moonbeams, will
be a scene of terrible contest with sword, and ball, and bayonet; when the
roof will smoke with the lodged cannon ball, when the windows will send
their volumes of flame across the lawn, when all around will be mist and
gloom, grappling foemen, heaps of dying mingled with the dead, charging
legions, and recoiling squadrons.
IV.THE NIGHT-MARCH.
And
as the sun went down, on that calm day of autumn, shooting his
level beams thro' the wilds of the rivulet of the Skippack, there gathered
within the woods, and along the shores of that stream, a gallant and
desperate
army, with every steed ready for the march, with the columns
marshalled
for the journey of death, every man with his knapsack on his
shoulder
,
and musket in his grasp, while the broad banner of the Continental
Host drooped heavily over head, its folds rent
and
torn by the fight of
Brandywine, waving solemnly in the twilight.
[1]
[1]
The Skippack, the reader will remember, was some 16 miles from Germantown.
The tents were struck, the camp fires where had been prepared the hasty
supper of the soldier, were still burning; the neighing of steeds, and the
suppressed
rattle of arms, rang thro' the grove startling the night-bird of the
Skippack, when the uncertain light of a decaying flame, glowing around the
stump of a giant oak, revealed a scene of strange interest.
The flame-light fell upon the features of a gallant band of heroes, circling
round the fire, each with his war cloak, drooping over his shoulder, half
concealing the uniform of blue and buff; each with sword by his side,
chapeau
in hand, ready to spring upon his war-steed neighing in the grove hard
by, at a moments warning, while every eye was fixed upon the face of the
chieftain who stood in their midst.
By the soul of Mad Anthony it was a sight that would have stirred a
man's blood to look uponthat sight of the gallant chieftains of a gallant
band, clustering round the camp fire, in the last and most solemn council of
war, ere they spurred their steeds forward in the march of death.
The man with the form of majesty, and that calm, impenetrable face,
lighted by the hidden fire of soul, bursting forth ever and again in the glance
of his eye! Had you listened to the murmurs of the dying on the field of
Brandywine you would have heard the name, that has long since become a
sound of prayer and blessing on the tongues of nationsthe name of
Washington
.
And by his side was
Greene
, his fine countenance wearing a
shade of serious thought; and there listlessly thrusting his glittering sword
in the embers of the decaying fire, with his fierce eyes fixed upon the earth,
while his mustachioed lip gave a stern expression to his face, was the man
of Poland and the Patriot of Brandywine,
Pulaski
, whom it were tautology
to call the brave; there was the towering form of
Sullivan
, there was
Conway
, with his fine face and expressive features, there was
Armstrong
and
Nash
and
Maxwell
and
Stirling
and
Stephens
, all brave men and
true, side by side with the gallant
Smallwood
of Maryland, and the stalwart
Forman
of Jersey.
And there with his muscular chest, clad in the close buttoned blue coat,
with his fatigue cloak thrown over his left shoulder, with his hand resting
on the hilt of his sword, was the hero of Chadd's Ford, the Commander of
the Massacred of Paoli, the future avenger of Stony Point,
Anthony Wayne
,
whom the soldiers loved in their delight to name
Mad Anthony
; shouting
that name in the hour of the charge and in the moment of death like a
watch-word
of terror to the British Army.
Clustered around their Chief, were the aids-de-camp of Washington,
John
Marshall
, afterwards Chief Justice of the States,
Alexander Hamilton
,
gifted, gallant, and brave, Washington's counsellor in the hour of peril, his
bosom friend and confidant, all standing in the same circle with
Pickering
and
Lee
, the Captain of the Partizan Band, with his slight form and swarthy
face, who was on that eventful night detailed for duty near the
Commander-in-chief
.
And as they stood there clustered round the person of Washington, in a
mild yet decided voice, the chieftain spoke to them of the plan of the
contemplated
surprise and battle.
It was his object to take the British by surprise. He intended for the
accomplishment of this object, to attack them at once on the front of the
centre; and on the front, flank and rear of each wing. This plan of
operation
would force the American commander to extend the continental army
over a surface of from five to seven miles.
In order to make this plan of attack effective, it would be necessary for
the American army to seperate near Skippack, and advance to Germantown
in four divisions, marching along as many roads.
General Armstrong with the Pennsylvania militia, 3000 strong, was to
march down the
Manatawny road
(now Ridge road,) and traversing the
shores of the Schuylkill, until the beautiful Wissahikon poured into its
bosom, he was to turn the left flank of the enemy at
Vandurings
(now
Robinson's
Mill,) and then advance eastward, along the bye roads, until two
miles distance between this mill and the Germantown market-house were
accomplished.
Meanwhile the Militia of Maryland and New Jersey, were to take up
their line of march some seven or eight miles to the eastward of Armstrong's
position, and over three miles distance from Germantown. They were to
march down the Old York Road, turn the right flank of the enemy, and
attack it in the rear, also entering the town at the market-house, which was
the central point of operation for all the divisions.
Between Germantown and Old York Road, at the distance of near two
miles from the village, extends a road, called Limekiln road. The divisions
of Greene and Stephens flanked by McDougal's Brigade were to take a
circuit by this road, and attack the front of the enemy's right wing. They
also were to enter the town by the market-house.
The main body, with which was Washington, Wayne, and Sullivan, were
to advance toward Germantown by the Great Northern Road, entering the
town by way of Chesnut Hill, some four miles distant from the Market-house.
A column of this body was led on by Sullivan, another by Wayne, and
Convay's Brigade flanked the entire division.
While these four divisions advanced, the division of Lord Stirling,
combined
with the brigades of Maxwell and Nash were to form a corps de
reserve.
The reader, and the student of American History, has now the plan of
battle spread out before him. In order to take in the full particulars of this
magnificent plan of battle, it may be necessary to remember the exact nature
of the ground around Germantown.
In some places plain and level, in others broken by ravines, rendered
intricate
by woods, tangled by thickets, or traversed by streams, it was in its
most accessible points, and most favorable aspects, broken by enclosures,
difficult fences, massive stone walls, or other boundary marks of land,
rendering
the operation of calvary at all times hazardous, and often impassible.
In the vicinage of the town, for near a mile on either side, the land spread
greenly away, in level fields, still broken by enclosures, and then came thick
woods, steep hills and dark ravines.
The base line of operations was the country around Skippack Creek,
from which point, Washington, like a mighty giant, spread forth the four
arms of his force, clutching the enemy in front, on his wings and on the
rear, all at the same moment.
It was a magnificent plan of battle, and success already seemed to hover
round the American banner, followed by a defeat of the British, as terrible
as that of Yorktown, when the red-coat heroes of Germantown struck their
own Lion from his rock.
As Washington went over the details of battle, each brave officer and
scarred chieftain leaned forward, taking in every word, with absorbing
interest
,
and then receiving the orders of his commander, with the utmost
attention and consideration.
All was now planned, everything was ready for the march, each General
mounted on his war-steed, rode to the head of his division, and with a low
solemn peal of music, the night-march of Germantown commenced.
And through the solemn hours of that night, along the whole valley, on
every side, was heard the half suppressed sound of marching legions,
mingled
with the low muttered word of command, the clank of arms and the
neighing of war-steedsall dim and indistinct, yet terrible to hear.The
farmer sleeping on his humble couch, rushed to the window of his rustic
mansion at the sound, and while his wife stood beside him, all tremor and
affright, and his little ones clung to his knees, he saw with a mingled look
of surprise and fear, the forms of an armed band, some on horse and some
on foot, sweeping through his green fields, as the dim moonbeams gleaming
through the gathering mist and gloom, shone over glittering arms, and dusky
banners, all gliding past, like phantoms of the Spectre Land.
Part the Second.
THE BATTLE MORN.
Ghastly and white,
Through the gloom of the night,
From plain and from heath,
Like a shroud of death,
The mist all slowly and sullenly sweeps
A shroud of death for the myriad brave,
Who to-morrow shall find the tombless
grave
In mid heaven now a bright spirit weeps;
While sullenly, slowly rises that pall,
Crimson tears for the brave who shall
fall,
Crimson tears for the dead without tomb,
Crimson tears for the death and the
doom
Crimson tears for an angel's sorrow,
For the havoc, the bloodshed, the carnage
and gloom,
That shall startle the field on the morrow;
And up to the heavens now whitens the
mist,
Shrouding the moon with a fiery glare;
Solemn voices now startle the air,
To their sounds of omen you are fain to
list:
To listen and tremble, and hold your
breath;
While the air is thronging with shapes of
death.
On, on over valley and plain the legions
tramp,
Scenting the foemen who sleep in their
camp;
Now bare the sword from its sheath blood-red,
Now dig the pits for the unwept dead;
Now let the cannon give light to the hour
And carnage stalk forth in his crimson
power,
Lo! on the plain lay myriads gasping for
breath
While the mist it is rising
the Shroud
of Death
!
I.THE DAYBREAK WATCH.
Along
the porch of an ancient mansion, surmounting the height of Mount
Airy, strode the sentinel of the British picket, his tall form looming like the
figure of a giant in the gathering mist, while the musquet on his shoulder
was grasped by a hand red with American blood.
He strode slowly along the porch, keeping his lonely watch; now
turning
to gaze at the dark shadow of the mansion towering above him, now
fixing his eye along the Germantown road, as it wound down the hill, on its
northward course; and again he gazed upon the landscape around him,
wrapt in a gathering mist, which chilled his blood, and rendered all objects
around him dim and indistinct.
All around was vague and shadowy. The mist, with its white wreaths
and snowy columns, came sweeping up on every side, from the bosom of
the Wissahikon, from the depths of a thousand brooklets, over hill and over
valley, circled that dense and gathering exhalation; covering the woods with
its ghastly pall, rolling over the plains, and winding upward around the
height of Mount Airy, enveloping the cottages opposite the sentinel, in its
folds of gloom, and confining the view to a space of twenty paces from the
porch, where he kept his solitary watchto him, a watch of death.
It is now daybreak, and a strange sound meets that soldier's ear. It is
now daybreak, and his comrades sleep within the walls of Allen's house, and
a strange, low, murmuring noise, heard from a great distance, causes him to
incline his ear with attention, and to listen with hushed breath and parted lips.
He listens. The night wore on. The blood-red moon was there in the
sky, looking out from the mist, like a funeral torch shining through a shroud.
The Sentinel bent his head down upon the porch, and with that musquet,
red with the carnage of Brandywine, in his hand, he listens. It is a distant
soundvery distant; like the rush of waters, or the moaning of the young
August storm, bursting into life amid the ravines of the far-off mountains.
It swells on the earit spreads to the east and to the west: it strikes the
sentinel's heart with a strange fear, and he shoulders his musquet with a
firmer grasp; and now a merry smile wreathes his lips.
That soundit is the rush of waters
:
the Wissahikon has flooded its
banks, and is pouring its torrents over the meadows, while it rolls onward
towards the Schuylkill. The sentinel smiles at his discovery, and resumes
his measured stride. He is rightand yet not altogether right. A stream
has burst its banks, but not the Wissahikon. A stream of vengeancedark,
wild, and terrible, vexed by passion, aroused by revenge, boiling and
seething
from its unfathomable deepsis flowing from the north, and on its bosom
are borne men with strong arms and stout hearts, swelling the turbulence of
the waters; while the gleam of sword and bayonet flashes over the dark
waves.
The day is breakingsadly and slowly breaking, along the veil of mist,
that whitens over the face of nature like a
Shroud of Death for millions
.
The sentinel leans idly upon the bannisters of the porch, relaxes the grasp
of his musquet, inclines his head to one side, and no longer looks upon the
face of nature covered by mist. He sleeps. The sound not long ago far
off, is now near and mighty in its volume, the tramp of steeds startles the
silence of the road, suppressed tones are heard, and there is a noise like the
moving of legions.
II.THE FIRST CORSE OF GERMANTOWN.
And yet he sleepshe dreams! Shall we guess his dream? That home,
hidden away yonder in the shadows of an English dellhe is approaching
its threshhold.
3
Yes, down the old path by the millhe sees his native cottagehis aged
father stands in the doorhis sister, whom he left a young girl, now grown
into a blooming woman, beckons him on. He reaches her sidepresses
her lips, and in that kiss hushes her welcomeBrother, have you come
at last!
But, ah! That horrid sound crashing through his dream!
He wakes,wakes there on the porch of the old mansionhe sees that
rifle-blaze flashing through the misthe feels the death-shot, and then falls
dead to wake in Eternity.
That rifle-blaze, flashing through the mist, is the first shot of the Battle-day
of Germantown.
And that dead man, flung along the porch in all the ghastliness of sudden
deathcold and stiff there, while his Sister awakes from her sinless sleep
to pray for him, three thousand miles awayis the first dead man of that
day of horror!
And could we wander yonder, up through the mists of this fearful morning,
even to the Throne of Heaven, we might behold the Prayer of the Sister,
the Soul of the Brother, meet face to face before Almighty God.
And now listen to that sound, thundering yonder to the North, and now
stand here on the porch of Allen's house, and see the Legions come!
They break from the folds of the mist, the Men of Brandywine
foot-soldiers
and troopers come thundering up the hill.
The blood-red moon, shining from yonder sky, like a funeral torch through
a shroud, now glares upon the advancing legionsover the musquets
glittering
in long lines, over the war-horses, over the drawn swords, over the
flags rent with bullet and bayonet, over the broad Banner of Stars.
Allen's house is surrounded. The soldiers of the picket guard rush wildly
from their beds, from the scene of their late carousal by the fire, they rush
and seize their armsbut in vain! A blaze streams in every window,
soldier after soldier falls heavily to the floor, the picket guard are with the
Dead Sentinel. Allen's house is secured, and the hunt is up!
God of Battles, what a scene! The whole road, farther than the eye
could see, farther than the ear could hear, crowded by armed men, hurrying
over Chesnut Hill, hurrying along the valley between Chesnut Hill and
Mount Airy, sweeping up the hill of Allen's house, rushing onward in one
dense column, with the tall form of Sullivan at their head, while the war
shout of Anthony Wayne is borne along by the morning breeze. There,
riding from rank to rank, speeding from battalion to battalion, from column
to column, a form of majesty sweeps by, mounted on a steed of iron grey,
waving encouragement to the men, while every lip repeats the whisper, and
every heart beats at the sound, echoed like a word of magic along the lines
There he rideshow grandly his form towers in the mist; it's
Washington
it's
Washington! and the whole army take up the soundIt is
Washington!
Allen's house was passed, and now the path of the central body of the
army lay along the descent of the road from Mount Airy, for the space of a
mile, until the quarters of Colonel Musgrave's regiment were reached.
The descent was like the path of a hurricane. The light of the
breaking
day, streaming dimly through mist and gloom, fell over the forms of the
patriot band as they swept down the hill, every man with his musquet ready
for the charge, every trooper with his sword drawn, every eye fixed upon
the shroud of mist in front of their path, in the vain effort to gaze upon the
position of the advance post of the enemy a mile below, every heart
throbbing
wildly with the excitement of the coming contest, and all prepared for
the keen encounter,the fight, hand to hand, foot to foot, the charge of
death, and the sweeping hail of the iron cannon ball and the leaden bullet.
How it would have made your heart throb, and beat and throb again, to
have stood on that hill of Mount Airy, and looked upon the legions as they
rushed by.
Sullivan's men have passed, they are down the hill, and you see them
below,rank after rank disappearing in the pall of the enveloping mist.
Here they comea band brave and true, a band with scarred faces and
sunburnt visages, with rusted musquets and tattered apparel, yet with true
hearts and stout hands. These are the men of Paoli!
And there, riding in their midst, as though his steed and himself were but
one animalso well he backs that steed, so like is the battle-fever of
horse, with the waving mane and glaring eye, to the wild rage that stamps
the warrior's facethere in the midst of the Men of Paoli, rides their
leaderMad Anthony Wayne!
And then his voicehow it rings out upon the morning air, rising above
the clatter of arms and the tramp of steeds, rising in a mighty shoutOn,
boys, on! In a moment we'll have them. On, comrades, onand
remember
Paoli
!
And then comes the band with the gallant Frenchman at their head; the
brave Conway, brave though unfortunate, also rushing wildly on, in the train
of the hunt. Your eye sickens as you gaze over file after file of brave men,
with mean apparel and meaner arms, some half clad, others well nigh
bare-foot
,
yet treading gaily over the flinty ground; some with fragments of a
coat on their backs, others without covering for their heads, all marked by
wounds, all thinned by hunger and disease, yet every man of them is firm,
every hand is true, as it clutches the musquet with an eager grasp.
Ha! That gallant band who come trooping on, spurring their stout steeds,
with wide haunches and chests of iron, hastily forward, that band with every
face seemed by scars, and darkened by the thick mustachio, every eye
gleaming beneath a knit brow, every swarthy hand raising the iron sword on
high. They wear the look of foreigners, the manner of men trained to fight
in the exterminating wars of Europe.
And their leader is tall and well-proportioned, with a dark-hued face,
marked by a compressed lip, rendered fierce by the overhanging mustachio;
his brow is shaded by the trooper's plume, and his hand grasps the trooper's
sword. He speaks to his men in a foreign tongue, he reminds them of the
well-fought field on the plain of Poland, he whispers a quick, terrible
memento
of Brandywine and Paoli, and the clear word rings from his lips:
Forwarts,brudern,forwarts!
It is the band of Pulaski sweeping past, eager for the hunt of death, and
as they spur their steeds forward, a terrible confusion arises far ahead.
There is flashing of strange fires through the folds of mist, lifting the
snow-white pall for a momentthere is rolling of musquetry, rattling like
the thunderbolt ere it strikesthere is the tramp of hurrying legions, the
far-off shout of the charging continentals, and the yells and shouts of the
surprised foemen.
Sullivan is upon the camp of the enemy, upon them with the terror of
ball and bayonet. They rush from their camp, they form hastily across the
road, in front of their baggage, each red-coated trooper seeks his steed, each
footman grasps his musquet, and the loud voice of Musgrave, echoing wildly
along the line of crimson attire and flashing bayonets, is heard above all other
sounds,Formlads, formfall in thereto your arms, lads, to your
arms.Form, comrades, form!
In vain his shouting, in vain the haste of his men rushing from their beds,
into the very path of the advancing continentals! The men of Sullivan are
upon them! They sweep on with one bold frontthe forms of the
troopers
,
mounted on their war-steeds, looming through the mist, as with sword
upraised, and battle-shout pealing to the skies, they lead on the charge of
death!
A moment of terror, a moment made an age by suspense! The troopers
meet, mid-way in their charge, horse to horse, sword mingled with sword,
eye glaring in eye, they meet. The ground quivers with an earthquake
shock. Steeds recoil on their haunches, the British strew the road-side,
flooding the dust with their blood, and the music of battle, the fierce music
of dying groans and cries of death, rises up with the fog, startling the very
heavens with its discord!
The hunt is up!
Onboysonrings the voice of Mad Anthonyoncomrades
onand Remember Paoli!
Charge!
sounds the voice of Washington, shrieking along the line,
like the voice of a mighty spiritupon themover them! Conway
re-echoes the sound, Sullivan has already made the air ring with his shout,
and now Pulaski takes up the cry
ForwartsbrudernForwarts!
The hunt is up!
The British face the bayonets of the advancing Americans, but in vain!
Each bold backwoodsman sends his volley of death along the British line,
and then clubbing his musquet, rushes wildly forward, beating the red-coat
to the sod with a blow that cannot be stayed. The British troopers rush
forward in the charge, but ere half the distance between them and the
Amercan
host is measured, Mad Anthony comes thundering on, with his Legion
of Iron, and as his war-shout swells on the air, the red-coats are driven back
by the hurricane force of his charge, the ground is strewn with the dying,
and the red hoofs of the horse trample madly over the faces of the dead.
Wayne charges, Pulaski charges, Conway brings up his men, and
Washington
is there, in front of the battle, his sword gleaming like a meteor
through the gloom.
The fire of the infantry, spreading a sheeted flame thro' the folds of the
mist, lights up the scene. The never-ceasing clang of sword against sword,
the low muttered shriek of the fallen, vainly trying to stop the flow of
blood, the wild yell of the soldier, gazing madly round as he receives his
death wound, the shout of the charge, and the involuntary cry of `quarter,'
all furnish a music most dread and horrible, as tho' an infernal band were
urging on the work of slaughter, with their notes of fiendish mockery.
That flash of musquetry! What a light it gives the scene! Above,
clouds of white mist and lurid smoke; around, all hurry, and tramp, and
motion; faces darkened by all the passions of a demon, glaring madly in the
light, blood red hands upraised, foemen grappling in contest, swords rising
and falling, circling and glittering, the forms of the wounded, with their faces
buried in the earth, the ghastly dead, all heaped up in positions of ludicrous
mockery of death, along the roadside!
That flash of musquetry!
The form of Washington is in the centre of the fight, the battle-glare
lighting up his face of majesty; the stalwart form of Wayne is seen riding
hither and thither, waving a dripping sword in his good right hand; the
figure of Pulaski, dark as the form of an earth-riven spirit of some German
story, breaks on your eye, as enveloped in mist, he seems rushing every
where at the same moment, fighting in all points of the contest, hurrying his
men onward, and driving the affrighted British before him with the terror
of his charge.
And Col. Musgravewhere is he?
He shouts the charge to his men, he hurries hither and thither, he shouts
till he is hoarse, he fights till his person is red with the blood of his own
men, slain before his very eyes, but all in vain!
He shouts the word of retreat along his lineAway, my men, away to
Chew's Houseaway!
The retreat commences, and then indeed, the hunt of death is up in good
earnest.
The British wheel down the Germantown road, they turn their backs to
their foes, they flee wildly toward Germantown, leaving their dead and
dying in their wake, man and horse, they flee, some scattering their arms by
the roadside, others weakened by loss of blood, feebly endeavoring to join
the retreat, and then falling dead in the path of the pursuers, who with one
bold front, with one firm step rush after the British in their flight, ride down
the fleeing ranks, and scatter death along the hurrying columns.
The fever of bloodshed grows hotter, the chase grows fearful in interest,
the hounds who so often have worried down the starved Americans, are
now hunted in their turn.
And in the very van of pursuit, his tall form seen by every soldier, rode
George Washington, his mind strained to a pitch of agony, as the crisis of
the contest approached, and by his side rode Mad Anthony Wayne, now
Mad Anthony indeed, for his whole appearance was changed, his eye
seemed turned to a thing of living flame, his face was begrimed with
powder, his sword was red with blood, and his battle-shout rung fiercer on
the air
Over them boysupon themover them, and
Remember Paoli
!
Now Wayne,
now
shouted Washingtonone charge more and we
have them!
Forwartsbrdernforwarts! shouted Pulaski, as his iron band came
thundering onForwartsfor WashingtonForwarts!
The British leader wheeled his steed for a moment, and gazed upon his
pursuers. All around was bloodshed, gloom, and death; mist and smoke
above; flame around, and mangled corses below.With one hoarse shout,
he again bade his men make for Chew's House, and again the dying
scattered
along the path looked up, and beheld the British sweeping madly
down the road.
The vanguard of the pursuers had gained the upper end of Chew's wall,
when the remnant of the British force disappeared in the fog; file after file
of the crimson-coated British were lost to sight in the mist, and in the very
heat and flush of the chase, the American army was brought to a halt in
front of Chew's wall, each soldier falling back on his comrade with a
sudden
movement, while the officers gazed on each other's faces in vain inquiry
for the cause of this unexpected delay.
The fog gathered in dense folds over the heads of the soldiers, thicker
and more dense it gathered every instant; the enemy was lost to sight in
the direction of Chew's lawn, and a fearful pause of silence, from the din
and tumult of bloodshed, ensued for a single moment.
Bending from his steed in front of the gate that led into Chew's lawn,
Washington gazed round upon the faces of his staff, who circled him on
every side, with every horse recoiling on his haunches from the sudden
effect
of the halt.
Washington was about to speak as he leaned from his steed, with his
sword half lowered in the misty air, he was about to speak, and ask the
meaning of this sudden disappearance of the British, when a lurid flash
lifted up the fog from the lawn, and the thunder of musquetry boomed along
the air, echoing among the nooks and corners of the ancient houses on the
opposite side of the street.
Another moment, and a soldier with face all crimsoned with blood and
darkened by battle smoke, rushed thro' the group clustering around the horse
of Washington, and in a hurried voice announced that the remnant of the
British Regiment had thrown themselves into the substantial stone mansion
on the left, and seemed determined to make good, a desperate defence.
What say you, gentlemencried Washingtonshall we press
onward
into the town, and attack the main body of the enemy at once, or shall
we first drive the enemy from their strong hold, at this mansion on our left?
The answer of Wayne was short and to the point. Onward!he
shouted, and his sword rose in the air, all dripping with bloodOnward
into the townour soldiers are warmed with the chaseonward, and with
another blow, we have them!
And the gallant Hamilton, the brave Pickering, the gifted Marshall, echoed
the cryOnward while the hoarse shout of Pulaski rang out in the
airForwartsbrdernForwarts!
It is against every rule of military science exclaimed General Knox,
whose opinion in council was ever valuable with WashingtonIt is
against every rule of military science, to leave a fortified stronghold in the
rear of an advancing army. Let us first reduce the mansion on our left,
and then move forward into the centre of the town!
There was another moment of solemn council; the older officers of the
staff united in opinion with Knox, and with one quick anxious glance
around the scene of fog and mist, Washington gave the orders to storm the
house.
And at the word, while a steady volume of flame was flashing from Chew's
House, every window pouring forth its blaze, glaring over the wreath of
mist, the continentals, horse and foot, formed across the road, to the north
of the house, eager for the signal which would bid them advance into the
very jaws of death.
The artillery were ranged some three hundred yards from the mansion
their cannon being placed on a slight elevation, and pointed at the north-west
corner of the house. This was one of the grand mistakes of the battle,
occasioned
by the density of the fog. Had the cannon been placed in a
proper position, the house would have been reduced ere the first warm flush
of pursuit was cold on the cheeks of the soldiers.
But the fog gathered thicker and more densely around, the soldiers
moved like men moving in the dark, and all was vague, dim, undefined and
uncertain.
All was ready for the storm. Here were men with firebrands, ready to
rush forward under the cover of the first volley of musquetry and fire the
house; here were long lines of soldiers grasping their guns with a quick
nervous movement, one foot advanced in the act of springing forward;
yonder were the cannoniers, their pieces loaded, the linstock in the hand
of one soldier, while another stood ready with the next charge of
ammunition
;
on every side was intense suspense and expectation, and heard above
all other sounds, the rattle of the British musquetry rose like thunder over
Chew's lawn, and seen the brightest of all other sights, the light of the
British guns, streamed red and lurid over the field, giving a strange
brilliancy
to the wreaths of mist above, and columns of armed men below.
III.THE FLAG OF TRUCE.
Tradition
states that at this moment, when every thing was ready for
the storm of death, an expression of the most intense thought passed over
the impenetrable countenance of Washington. Every line of his features
was marked by thought, his lip was sternly compressed, and his eye
gathered a strange fire.
He turned to the east, and bent one long anxious look over the white
folds of mist, as though he would pierce the fog with his glance, and gaze
upon the advancing columns of Greene and Stephen. He inclined his head
to one side of his steed, and listened for the tramp of their war-horses, but
in vain. He turned towards Germantown; all was silent in that direction,
the main body of the enemy were not yet in motion.
And then in a calm voice, he asked for an officer who would consent to
bear a flag of truce to the enemy. A young and gallant officer of Lee's
Rangers, sprang from his horse, his name Lieut. Smith; he assumed the
snow-white flag, held sacred by all nations, and with a single glance at the
Continental array, he advanced to Chew's House.
In a moment he was lost to sight amid the folds of the fog, and his way
lay over the green lawn for some two hundred yards. All was still and
silent around him. Tradition states that the fire from the house ceased for
a moment, while Musgrave's band were silently maturing their plan of
desperate
defence. The young soldier advanced along his lonely path,
speeding
through the bosom of the fog, all objects lost to his sight, save the green
verdure of the sod, yet uncrimsoned by blood, and here and there the trunk
of a giant tree looming blackly through the mist.
The outline of a noble mansion began to dawn on his eye, first the
sloping
roof, then the massive chimneys, then the front of the edifice, and then
its windows, all crowded with soldiers in their crimson attire, whiskered
face appearing above face, with grisly musquet and glittering bayonet, thrust
out upon the air, while with fierce glances, the hirelings looked forth into
the bosom of that fearful mist, which still like a death-shroud for millions,
hung over the lawn, and over the chimneys of the house.
The young officer came steadily on, and now he stood some thirty paces
from the house, waving his white flag on high, and then with an even step
he advanced toward the hall door. He advanced, but he never reached
that hall door. He was within the scope of the British soldiers' vision,
they could have almost touched him with an extended flag staff, when the
loud word of command rang through the house, a volley of fire blazed from
every window, and the whole American army saw the fog lifted from the
surface of the lawn, like a vast curtain from the scenes of a magnificent
theatre.
Slowly and heavily that curtain uprose, and a hail storm of bullets
whistled across the plain, when the soldiers of the Continental host looked
for their messenger of peace.
They beheld a gallant form in front of the mansion. He seemed making
an effort to advance, and then he tottered to and fro, and his white flag
disappeared
for a moment; and the next instant he fell down like a heavy
weight upon the sod, and a hand trembling with the pulse of death was
raised above his head, waving a white flag in the air. That flag was
stained with blood: it was the warm blood flowing from the young
Virginian's
heart.
Along the whole American line there rang one wild yell of horror. Old
men raised their musquets on high, while the tears gathered in their eyes;
the young soldiers all moved forward with one sudden step; a wild light
blazed in the eye of Washington; Wayne waved his dripping sword on
high; Pulaski raised his proud form in the stirrups, and gave one meaning
glance to his men; and then, through every rank and file, through every
column and solid square, rang the terrible words of command, and high
above all other sounds was heard the voice of Washington
Charge
, for your country and for vengeanceCHARGE!
Part the Third.
CHEW'S HOUSE.
Now bare the sword from its sheath blood-red,
'Tis wet with the gore of the massacred dead;
Now raise the sword in the cause most holy
And while the whispers of ghosts break on your ear,
Oh! strike without mercy, or pity, or fear;
Oh! strike for the massacred dead of Paoli!
Revolutionary Song
.
I.THE FORLORN HOPE.
And
while the mist gathered thicker and darker above, while the lurid
columns of battle smoke waved like a banner overhead, while all around
was dim and indistinct,all objects rendered larger and swelled to gigantic
4
proportions by the action of the fog,along that green lawn arose the
sound of charging legions, and the blaze of musquetry flashing from the
windows of Chew's house, gave a terrible light to the theatre of death.
Again, like a vast curtain, the mist uprose,again were seen armed men
brandishing swords aloft, or presenting fixed bayonets, or holding the sure
rifle in their unfailing grasp, or yet again waving torches on high, all rushing
madly forward, still in regular columns, file after file, squadron after
squadron
a
fierce array of battle and of death.
It was a sight worth a score of peaceful years to see! The dark and
heavy pall of battle smoke overhead, mingled with curling wreaths of
snow-white
mistthe curtain of this theatre of deaththe mansion of dark, grey
stone, rising massive and ponderous from the lawn, each peak and corner,
each buttress and each angle, shown clearly by the light of the musquet
flashthe green lawn spreading away from the housethe stage of the
dread theatrecrowded by bands of advancing men, with arms glittering in
the fearful light, with fierce faces stamped with looks of vengeance,
sweeping
forward with one steady step, their eyes fixed upon the fatal honse;
while over their heads, and among their ranks, swept and fell the leaden
bullets of their foes, hissing through the air with the sound of serpents, or
pattering on the sod like a hailstorm of death.
And while a single brigade, with which was Washington and Sullivan
and Wayne, swept onward toward the house, the other troops of the
central
division, extending east and west along the fields, were forced to remain
inactive spectators of this scene of death, while each man vainly endeavored
to pierce the gloom of the mist and smoke, and observe the course of the
darkening fight.
Some thirty yards of green lawn now lay between the forlorn hope of
the advancing Americans and Chew's house; all became suddenly still and
hushed, and the continentals could hear their own foot tramp breaking upon
the air with a deadened sound, as they swept onward toward the mansion.
A moment of terrible stillness, and then a moment of bloodshed and
horror
!
Like the crash of thunderbolts meeting in the zenith from distant
points of the heavens, the sound of musquetry broke over the lawn, and
from every window of Chew's house, from the hall door, and from behind
the chimneys on the roof, rolled the dense columns of musquet smoke;
while on every side, overhead, around, and beneath, the musquet flash of
the British glared like earth-riven lightning in the faces of the Americans,
and then the mist and smoke came down like a pall, and for a moment all
was dark as midnight.
A wild yell broke along the American line, and then the voice of Wayne
rung out through the darkness and the gloomSweep forward under the
cover of the smokesweep forward and storm the house!
They came rushing on, the gallant band of rangers, bearing torches in
their handsthey came rushing on, and their path lay over the mangled
bodies of the forlorn hope, scattered along the sod, in all the ghastliness of
wounds and death, and at their backs advanced with measured step the firm
columns of the continental army, while the air was heavy with the shriek
of wounded men, and burdened with cries of agony.
On they swept, trampling over the face of the dead in the darkness and
gloom, and then the terrible words of command rung out upon the air
Advance and fireadvance and storm the house!
A volley of sheeted flame arose from the bosom of the fog along the
lawn, the thunder of the American musquetry broke upon the air, and the
balls were heard pattering against the walls of the house, and tearing
splinters
from the roof.
Another moment, and the pall of mist and battle smoke is swept aside,
revealing a scene that a thousand words might not describea scene whose
hurry, and motion, and glare, and horror, the pencil of the artist might in
vain essay to picture.
There were glittering bayonets thrust from the windows of the house,
there were fierce faces, with stout forms robed in crimson attire, thrust from
every casement,there were bold men waving torches on high, rushing
around the house; here a party were piling up combustible brush-wood;
there a gallant band were affixing their scaling ladder to a second story
window, yonder another band were thundering away at the hall door, with
musquet and battle axe; while along the whole sweep of the wide lawn
poured the fire of the continental host, with a flash like lightning, yet with
uncertain and ineffectual aim.
The hand of the soldier with the hand gathered near the combustible pile
under a windowthe hand of the soldier was extended with the blazing
torch, he was about to fire the heap of faggots, when his shattered arm fell
to his side, and a dead comrade came toppling over his chest.
A soldier near the hall door had been foremost among that gallant band,
the barricades were torn away, all obstructions well nigh cleared, and he
raised his battle axe to hew the door in fragments, when the axe fell with a
clanging sound upon the threshold stone, and his comrades caught his falling
body in their arms, while his severed jaw hung loosely on his breast.
The party who rushed forward in the endeavor to scale the window!
The ladder was fixedacross the trench dug around Chew's house it was
fixedthe hands of two sturdy continentals held it firm, and a file of
desperate
men, headed by a stalwart backwoodsman, in rough blue shirt and
fur cap, with buck-tail plume, began the ascent of death.
The foot of the backwoodsman touched the second round of the scaling
ladder, when he sprang wildly in the air, over the heads of his comrades,
and fell dead in the narrow trench, with a death shriek that rang in the ears
of all who heard it for life. A musquet ball had penetrated his skull, and
the red torrent was already streaming over his forehead, and along his
swarthy features.
The Americans again rushed forward to the house, but it was like
rushing
into the embrace of death; again they scaled the windows, again were
they driven back, while the dead bodies of their comrades littered the trench;
again they strode boldly up to the hall door, and again did soldier after
soldier crimson the threshold-stone with his blood.
II.THE HORSEMAN AND HIS MESSAGE.
And while the battle swelled fiercest, and the flame flashing from the
windows of Chew's house was answered by the volley of the continental
brigade, two sounds came sweeping along the air, one from the south, and
the other from the northwest. They were the sounds of marching men
the tread of hurrying legions.
On the summit of a gentle knoll, surrounded by the officers of his staff,
Washington had watched the progress of the fight around Chew's mansion,
not more than two hundred yards distant.
With his calm and impenetrable face, wearing an unmoved expression,
he had seen the continentals disappear in the folds of the fog, he had seen
file after file marching on their way of death, he had heard the roar of
contest
,
the shrieks of the wounded and the yells of the dying had startled his
ear, but not a muscle of his countenance moved, not a feature trembled.
But when those mingling sounds of marching men came pealing on his
ear, he inclined slightly to one side of his steed and then to the other, as if
in the effort to catch the slightest sound, his lips were fixedly compressed
and his eye flashed and flashed again, until it seemed turning to a thing of
living flame.
The sounds grew near, and nearer! A horseman approached from the
direction of Germantown, his steed was well nigh exhausted and the rider
swayed heavily to and fro in the saddle. The horse came thundering up
the knoll, and a man with a ghastly face, spotted with blood, leaned from
the saddle and shrieked forth, as he panted for breath
Generalthey are in motionthey are marching through Germantown
Kniphausen, Agnew, and Grey, they will be on you in a moment, and
CornwallisCornwallis is sweeping from Philadelphia.
The word had not passed his lips, when he fell from his steed a ghastly
corpse.
Another messenger stood by the side of Washingtonhis steed was also
exhausted, and his face was covered with dust, but not with blood. He
panted for breath as he shrieked forth an exclamation of joy:
Greene is marching from the northwestattracted by the fire in this
quarter, he has deviated from his path, and will be with you in a moment?
And as he spoke, the forms of a vast body of men began to more, dim
and indistinctly, from the folds of the fog on the northwest, and then the
glare of crimson was seen appearing from the bosom of the mist on the
south, as a long column of red coated soldiers, began to break slowly on the
vision of Washington and his men.
III.THE BRITISH GENERAL.
Turn we for a moment to Germantown.
The first glimpse of day, flung a grey and solemn light over the tenements
of Germantown, when the sound of distant thunder, aroused the startled
inhabitants from their beds, and sent them hurriedly into the street. There
they crowded in small groups, each one asking his neighbor for the
explanation
of this sudden alarm, and every man inclining his ear to the north,
listening intently to those faint yet terrible sounds, thundering along the
northern horizon.
The crowded moments of that eventful morn, wore slowly on. Ere the
day was yet light, the streets of Germantown were all in motion, crowds
of anxious men were hurrying hither and thither, mothers stood on the rustic
porch, gathering their babes in a closer embrace, and old men, risen in haste
from their beds, clasped their withered hands and lifted their eyes to heaven
in muttered prayer, as their ears were startled by the sounds of omen
pealing
from the north.
The British leaders were yet asleep; the soldiers of the camp, it is true,
had risen hastily from their couches, and along the entire line of the British
encampment, ran a vague, yet terrible rumor of coming battle and of sudden
death; yet the generals in command slept soundly in their beds, visited, it
may be, with pleasant dreams of massacred rebels, fancy pictures of the
night of Paoli, mingled with a graphic sketch of the head of Washington
adorning one of the gates of London, while the grim visage of mad Anthony
Wayne figured on another.
The footstep of a booted soldier rang along the village street, near the
market-house, in the centre of the village, and presently a tall grenadier
strode up the stone steps of an ancient mansion, spoke a hurried word to
the sentinel at the door, and then hastily entered the house. In a moment
he stood beside the couch of General Grey, he roused him with a rude
shake of his vigorous hands, and the startled `Britisher' sprang up as hastily
from his bed as though he had been dreaming a dream of the terrible night
of Paoli.
Your Excellencythe Rebels are upon us! cried the grenadier
they have driven in our outposts, they surround us on every side
We must fight it outaway to Kniphausenaway to Agnew
They are already in the field, and the men are about advancing to
Chew's House.
But a moment elapsed, and the British general with his attire hung hastily
over his person, rode to the head of his command, and while Kniphausen,
gay with the laurels of Brandywine, rode from rank to rank, speaking
encouragement to his soldiers in his broken dialect, the British army moved
forward over the fields and along the solitary street of Germantown towards
Chew's House.
The brilliant front of the British extended in a flashing array of crimson,
over the fields, along the street; and through the wreaths of mist on every
side shone the glitter of bayonets, on every hand was heard the terrible
tramp of 16,000 men sweeping onward, toward the field of battle, their
swords eager for American blood.
As the column under command of General Agnew swept through the
village street, every man noted the strange silence that seemed to have
come down upon the village like a spell. The houses were all carefully
closed, as though they had not been inhabited for years, the windows were
barricaded; the earthquake tramp of the vast body of soldiers was the
only sound that disturbed the silence of the town.
Not a single inhabitant was seen. Some had fled wildly to the fields,
others had hastened with the strange and fearful curiosity of our nature to
the very verge of the battle of Chew's House, and in the cellars of the
houses gathered many a wild and affrighted group, mothers holding their
little children to their breasts, old men whose eyes were vacant with
enfeebled
intellect, asking wildly the cause of all this alarm, while many a
fair-cheeked
maiden turned pale with horror, as the thunder of the cannon seemed
to shake the very earth.
IV.THE LEGEND OF GENERAL AGNEW.
A singular legend is told in relation to General Agnew. Tradition states,
that on the eventful morn, as he led the troops onward through the town, a
singular change was noted in his appearance. His cheeks were pale as
death, his compressed lip trembled with a nervous movement, and his eyes
glared hither and thither with a strange wild glance.
He turned to the aid-de-camp at his side, and said with a ghastly smile,
that this day's work would be his last on earth, that this battle-field would
be the last he should fight, that it became him to look well at the gallant
array of war, and share in the thickest of the fight, for in war and in fight
should his hand this day strike its last and dying blow.
And tradition states that as his column neared the Mennonist
grave-yard
,
[2]
[2]
Adjoining the dwelling of Mr. Samuel Keyser, about three fourths of a mile
below
Chew's House.
a man of strange and wild aspect, clad in the skins of wild beasts,
with scarred face and unshaven beard, came leaping over the grave-yard
wall, and asked a soldier of the British column, with an idiotic smile whether
that gallant officer, riding at the head of the men, was the brave General
Grey, who had so nobly routed the rebels at Paoli?
The soldier replied with a peevish oath that yonder officer was General
Grey, and he pointed to General Agnew as he spoke.
The strange man said never a word, but smiled with a satisfied look and
sprang over the grave-yard wall, and as he sprang, a bullet whistled past the
ear of General Agnew, and a thin column of blue smoke wound upward
from the grave-yard wall.
The General turned and smiled. His officers would have searched the
grave-yard for the author of the shot, but a sound broke on their ears from
the road above, and presently the clatter of hoofs and the clamor of swords
came thundering through the mist.
V.THE CONTEST IN THE VILLAGE STREET.
And in a moment the voice of Sullivan was heard
Charge
upon the
`Britishers'
charge them home!
And the steeds of the American cavalry came thundering on, sweeping
down the hill with one wild movement, rushing into the very centre of the
enemy's column, each trooper unhorsing his man, while a thousand fierce
shouts mingled in chorus, and the infantry advanced with fixed
bayonets
,
speeding steadily onward until they had driven back their foes with
the force of their solid charge.
And along that solitary street of Germantown swelled the din and terror
of battle, there grappled with the fierce grasp of vengeance and of death the
columns of contending foemen, there rode the troopers of the opposite
armies, their swords mingling, their horses meeting breast to breast in the
shock of this fierce tournament; there shrieked the wounded and dying,
while above the heads of the combatants waved the white folds of mist,
mingled with the murky battle smoke.
Sullivan charged bravely, Wayne came nobly to his rescue, Pulaski
scattered confusion into the ranks of the enemy, and the Americans had
been masters of the field were it not for a fresh disaster at Chew's House,
combined with the mistakes of the various bodies of the Continentals, who
were unable to discern friend from foe in the density of the fog.
VI.CHEW'S HOUSE AGAIN.
Meanwhile the contest thickened around Chew's house; the division of
Greene, united with the central body of the American army, were engaged
with the left wing of the British army, under Kniphausen, Grant, and Grey,
while Sullivan led forward into the town, a portion of the advance column
of his division.
Tradition has brought down to our times a fearful account of the carnage
and bloodshed of the fight, around Chew's house at this moment, when the
British army to the south, and the Americans to the north, advanced in the
terrible charge, under the cover of the mist and gloom.
It was like fighting in the dark. The Americans advanced column after
column; they drove back the British columns with a line of bristling
bayonets, while the fire of the backwoodsmen rattled a death-hail over the
field; but it was all in vain! That gloomy mist hung over their heads,
concealing their foes from sight, or investing the forms of their friends with
a doubtful gloom, that caused them to be mistaken for British; in the
fierce mell; all was dim, undefined and indistinct.
VII.THE ADVENTURE OF WASHINGTON.
It
was at this moment that a strange resolution came over the mind of
Washington. All around him was mist and gloom, he saw his men
disappear
within the fog, toward Chew's house, but he knew not whether their
charge met with defeat or victory. He heard the tread of hurrying
legions, the thunder of the cannon, the rattle of the musquetry broke on his
ear, mingled with the shrieks of the wounded and the groans of the dying.
The terrible panorama of a battle field, passed vividly before his eyes,
but still he knew not the cause of the impregnability of Chew's house.
He determined to advance toward the house, and examine its position in
person.
He turned to the officers of his staffFollow me who will! he cried,
and in a moment, his steed of iron grey was careering over the sod, littered
with ghastly corses, while the air overhead was alive with the music of
bullets
,
and earth beneath was flung against the war steed's flanks by the
cannon
ball.
Followed by Hamilton, by Pickering, by Marshall, and by Lee, of the
gallant legion, Washington rode forward, and speeding between the fires of
the opposing armies, approached the house.
At every step, a dead man with a livid face turned upward; little pools
of blood crimsoning the lawn, torn fragments of attire scattered over the
sod; on every side hurrying bodies of the foemen, while terrible and
unremitting
,
the fire flashing from the windows of Chew's House, flung a lurid
glare over the battle-field.
Washington dashed over the lawn; he approached the house, and every
man of his train held his breath. Bullets were whistling over their heads,
cannon balls playing round their horses' feet, yet their leader kept on his
way of terror. A single glance at the house, with its vollies of flame
flashing
from every window, and he turned to the north to regain the American
lines, but the fog and smoke gathered round him, and he found his horse
entangled amid the enclosures of the cattle-pen to the north of the mansion.
Leap your horses cried Washington to the brave men around him
Leap your horses and save yourselves!
And in a moment, amid the mist and gloom his officers leaped the
northern
enclosure of the cattle-pen, and rode forward to the American line,
scarcely able to discover their path in the dense gloom that gathered around
them. They reached the American lines, and to their horror, discovered
that Washington was not among their band. He had not leaped the fence
of the cattle-pen; with the feeling of a true warrior, he was afraid of
injuring
his gallant steed, by this leap in the dark.
While the officers of the staff were speeding to the American line,
Washington
turned his steed to the south, he determined to re-pass the house,
strike to the north-east, and then facing the fires of both armies, regain the
Continental lines.
He rose proudly in the stirrups, he placed his hand gently on the neck
of his steed, he glanced proudly around him, and then the noble horse
sprang forward with a sudden leap, and the mist rising for a moment
disclosed
the form of Washington, to the vision of the opposing armies.
Part the Fourth.
THE FALL OF THE BANNER OF THE STARS.
What seest thou now, comrade?
I look from the oriel windowI see a forest of glittering steel, rising in the
light, with the snow-flakes of waving plumes flaunting with the sunbeams! Our
men advancethe banner of the stars is borne aloft, onward and on it sweeps, like a
mighty bird; and now the foemen waver, they recoilthey
They fly!they fly!
Nono!oh, moment of horror!the banner of the stars is lost!the flag of
blood-red hue rises in the lightthe foemen advanceI dare not look upon the
scene
Look again, good comradelook, I beseech theewhat seest thou now?
I see a desolated field, strewn with dead carcases and broken armsthe banner
of the stars is trampled in the dustall is lost, and yet not ALL!
Mss. Revolution
I.WASHINGTON IN DANGER.
The
form of the Chieftain rose through the smoke and gloom of battle,
in all its magnificence of proportion, and majesty of bearing, as speeding
between two opposing fireshis proud glance surveying the battle-fieldhe
retraced his path of death, and rode toward the American army.
He was now in front of Chew's House, he was passing through the very
sweep of the fires, belching from every window; the bullets whistled
around him; on every hand was confusion, and darkness, made more
fearful by the glare of musquetry, and the lightning flash of cannon.
He is now in front of Chew's House! Another moment and the Man
of the Army may fall from his steed riddled by a thousand bullets, a single
moment and his corse may be added to the heaps of dead piled along the
5
lawn in all the ghastliness of death; another moment and the Continentals
may be without a leader, the British without their most determined foe.
His form is enrapt in mist, he is lost to sight, he again emerges into
light, he passes the house and sweeps away toward the Continental army.
He passes the house, and as he speeds onward toward the American
lines, a proud gleam lights up his eye, and a prouder smile wreaths his
determined
lips. The American army is yet safe, they are in the path to
victory he exclaims, as he rejoins the officers of his staff, within the
American linesHad I but intelligence of Armstrong in the Westof
Smallwood and Forman in the East, with one bold effort, we might carry
the field!
But no intelligence of Smallwood or Forman cameArmstrong's
movements
were all unknownStephens, who flanked the right wing of Greene,
was not heard from, nor could any one give information concerning his
position.
And as the battle draws to a crisis around Chew's house, as the British
and Americans are disputing the possession of the lawn now flooded with
blood, let me for a moment turn aside from the path of regular history, and
notice some of the legends of the battle field, brought down to our times by
the hoary survivors of the Revolution.
II.THE UNKNOWN FORM.
Let
us survey Chew's house in the midst of the fight.
It is the centre of a whirpool of flame.
Above is the mist, spreading its death shroud over the field. Now it is
darkened into a pall by the battle smoke, and now a vivid cannon flash lays
bare the awful theatre.
Still in the centre you may see Chew's house, still from every window
flashes the blaze of musquetry, and all around it columns of jet black smoke
curl slowly upward, their forms clearly defined against the shroud of white
mist.
It is a terrible thing to stand in the shadows of the daybreak hour, by the
bedside of a dying father, and watch that ashy face, rendered more ghastly
by the rays of a lurid taperit is a terrible thing to clasp the hand of a
sister
,
and feel it grow cold, and colder, until it stiffens to ice in your grasp
a fearful thing to gather the wife, dearest and most beloved of all, to your
breast, and learn the fatal truth, that the heart is pulseless, the bosom clay,
the eyes fixed and glassy.
Yes, Death in any shape, in the times of Peace by the fireside, and in
the Home, is a fearful thing, talk of it as you will.
And in the hour when Riot howls through the streets of a wide city, its
ten thousand faces crimsoned by the glare of a burning church, Death looks
not only horrible but grotesque. For those dead men laid stiffly along the
streets, their cold faces turned to scarlet by the same glare that reveals the
cross of the tottering temple, have been murdered by theirbrothers.
Like wild beasts, hunted and torn by the hounds, they have yielded up their
lives, the warm blood of their hearts mingling with the filth of the gutter.
This indeed is horrible, but Death in the Battle, who shall dare paint its
pictures?
What pencil snatched from the hands of a Devil, shall delineate its colors
of blood?
Look upon Chew's house and behold it!
Thereunder the cover of the mist, thirty thousand men are hurrying to
and fro, shooting and stabbing and murdering as they go! Look! The
lawn is canopied by one vast undulating sheet of flame!
Hark! To the terrible tramp of the horses' hoofs, as they crash on over
heaps of dead.
Here, you behold long columns of blue uniformed soldiers; there dense
masses of scarlet. Hark! Yes, listen and hear the horrid howl of
slaughter, the bubbling groan of death, the low toned pitiful note of pain.
Pain? What manner of pain? Why, the pain of arms torn off at the
shoulder, limbs hacked into pieces by chain shot, eyes darkened forever.
Not much poetry in this, you say. No. Nothing but truthtruth that
rises from the depths of a bloody well.
From those heaps of dying and dead, I beseech you select only one corse,
and gaze upon it in silenceIs
he
dead? The young man yonder with the
pale face, the curling black hair, the dark eyes wide open, glaring upon that
shroud aboveis
he
dead?
Even if he is dead, stay, O, stay yon wild horse that comes rushing on
without a rider; do not let him trample that young face, with his red hoofs.
For it may be that the swimming eyes of a sister have looked upon that
faceperchance some fair girl, beloved of the heart, has kissed those red
lipsdo not let the riderless steed come on; do not let him trample into
the sod that face, which has been wet with a Mother's tears!
And yet this face is only one among a thousand, which now pave the
battle
field, crushed by the footsteps of the hurrying soldiers, trampled by the
horses' hoofs.
And while the battle swelled fiercest, while the armies traversed that
green lawn in the hurry of contest, along the blood stained sward, with
calm manner and even step, strode an unknown form, passing over the
field, amid smoke and mist and gloom, while the wounded fell shrieking at
his feet, and the faces of the dead met his gaze on every side.
It was the form of an aged man, with grey hairs streaming over his
shoulders, an aged man with a mild yet fearless countenance, with a tall
and muscular figure, clad neither in the glaring dress of the `Britisher,' or the
hunting shirt of the Continental, but in the plain attire of drab cloth, the
simple coat, vest with wide lappels, small clothes and stockings, that mark
the believers of the Quaker faith.
He was a Friend. Who he was, or what was his name, whence he
came, or whither he went, no one could tell, and tradition still remains
silent.
But along that field, he was seen gliding amid the heat and glare of
battle
.
Did the wounded soldier shriek for a cup of water? It was his hand
that brought it from the well, on the verge of Chew's wall. Extended
along the sward, with their ghastly faces quivering with the spasmodic throe
of insupportable pain, the dying raised themselves piteously on their
trembling
hands, and in broken tones asked for relief, or in the wildness of
delirium
spoke of their far off homes, whispered a message to their wives or
little ones, or besought the blessing of their grey haired sires.
It was the Quaker, the unknown and mysterious Friend, who was seen
unarmed save with the Faith of God, undefended save by the Armour of
Heaven, kneeling on the sod, whispering words of comfort to the dying, and
pointing with his uplifted hand to a home beyond the skies, where battle
nor wrong nor death ever came.
Around Chew's house and over the lawn he sped on his message of
mercy. There was fear and terror around him, the earth beneath his
measured
footsteps quivered, and the air was heavy with death, but he trembled
not, nor qualied, nor turned back from his errand of mercy.
Now seen in the thickest of the fight, the soldiers rushing on their paths
of blood, started back as they beheld his mild and peaceful figure. Some
deemed him a thing of air, some thought they beheld a spirit, not one offered
to molest or harm the Messenger of Peace.
It was a sight worth all the ages of controversial Divinity to seethis
plain Quaker going forth with the faith of that Saviour, whose name has
ever been most foully blasphemed by those who called themselves his
friends, going forth with the faith of Jesus in his heart, speaking comfort to
the dying, binding up the gashes of the wounded, or yet again striding
boldly into the fight and rescuing with his own unarmed hands the prostrate
soldier from the attack of his maddened foe.
Blessings on his name, the humble Quaker, for this deed which sanctifies
humanity, and makes us dream of men of mortal mould raised to the majesty
of Gods. His name is not written down, his history is all unknown, but
when the books of the unknown world are bared to the eyes of a
congregated universe, then will that name shine brighter and lighter with a
holier gleam, than the name of any Controversial Divine or loud-mouthed
hireling, that ever disgraced Christianity or blasphemed the name of Jesus.
Ah, methinks, even amid the carnage of Germantown, I see the face of
the Redeemer, bending from the battle-mist, and smiling upon the peaceful
Quaker, as he never smiled upon learned priest or mitred prelate.
III.THE REVEL OF DEATH.
Within
Chew's house this was the scene:
Every room crowded with soldiers in their glaring crimson attire, the old
hall thronged by armed men, all stained with blood and begrimed with battle
smoke, the stair-way trembling beneath the tread of soldiers bearing
ammunition
to the upper rooms, while every board of the floor, every step of the
stair-case bore its ghastly burden of dying and dead. The air was pestilent
with the smell of powder, the walls trembled with the shock of battle; thick
volumes of smoke rolling from the lower rooms, wound through the doors,
into the old hall, and up the stairway, enveloping all objects in a pall of
gloom, that now shifted aside, and again came down upon the forms of the
British soldiers like dark night.
Let us ascend the stairway. Tread carefully, or your foot will trample
on the face of that dead soldier; ascend the staircase with a cautious step,
or you will lose your way in the battle smoke.
The house trembles to its foundation, one volley of musquetry after
another breaks on your ear, and all around is noise and confusion; nothing
seen but armed men hurrying to and fro, nothing heard but the thunder of
the fight.
We gain the top of the stairwaywe have mounted over the piles of
deadwe pass along the entrywe enter the room on the right, facing
toward
the lawn.
A scene of startling interest opens to our sight. At each window are
arranged files of men, who, with faces all blood stained and begrimed, are
sending their musquet shots along the lawn; at each window the floor is
stained with a pool of blood, and the bodies of the dead are dragged away
by the strong hands of their comrades, who fill their places almost as soon
as they receive their death wound. The walls are rent by cannon balls,
and torn by bullets, and the very air seems ringing with the carnival shouts
of old Death, rejoicing in the midst of demons.
Near a window in this room clustered a gallant band of British officers,
who gave the word to the men, directed the dead to be taken from the floor,
or gazed out upon the lawn in the endeavor to pierce the gloom of the
contest.
Some were young and handsome officers, others were veterans who had
mowed their way through many a fight, and all were begrimed with the
blood and smoke of battle. Their gaudy coats were rent, the epaulette was
torn from one shoulder by the bullet, the plume from the helm of another,
and a third fell in his comrades' arms, as he received the ball in his heart.
While they stood gazing from the window, a singular incident occurred.
A young officer, standing in the midst of his comrades, felt something
drop from the ceiling, and trickle down his cheek.
The fight was fierce and bloody in the attic overhead. They could hear
the cannon balls tearing shingles from the roofthey could hear the low,
deep groans of the dying.
Another drop fell from the ceilinganother and another.
It is blood! cried his comrades, and a laugh went round the group.
Drop after drop fell from the ceiling; and in a moment a thin liquid
stream came trickling down, and pattered upon the blood-stained floor.
The young officer reached forth his hand, he held it extended beneath the
falling stream: he applied it to his lips.
Not blood, but wine! he shouted. Good old Madeira wine!
The group gathered round the young officer in wonder. It was wine
good old winethat was dripping from the ceiling. In a few moments the
young officer, rushing through the gloom and confusion of the stairway, had
ransacked the attic, and discovered under the eaves of the roof, between the
rafters and the floor, some three dozen bottles of old Madeira wine, placed
there for safe-keeping some score of years before the battle. These bottles
were soon drawn from their resting-place, and the eyes of the group in the
room below were presently astonished by the vision of the ancient bottles,
all hung with cobwebs, their sealed corks covered with dust.
In a moment the necks were struck off some half-dozen bottles, and while
the fire poured from the window along the lawn, while cries and shrieks,
and groans, broke on the air; while the smoke came rolling in the window,
now in folds of midnight blackness, and now turned to lurid red by the
glare of cannon; while the terror and gloom of battle arose around them,
the group of officers poured the wine in an ancient goblet, discovered in a
closet of the mansion,they filled it brimming full with wine, and drank a
royal health to the good King George!
They drank and drank again, until their eyes sparkled, and their lips
grew wild with loyal words, and their thirst for bloodthe blood of the
rebelswas excited to madness. Again and again were the soldiers shot
down at the window, again were their places filled, and once more the
goblet
went round from lip to lip, and the old wine was poured forth like water,
in healths to the good King George!
And as they drank, one by one, the soldiers were swept away from the
windows, until at the last the officers stood exposed to the blaze of the
American fire, flashing from the green lawn.
Health to King GeorgeDeath to the rebels!
The shout arose from the lips of a grey-haired veteran, and he fell to the
floor, a mangled corse. The arm that raised the goblet was shattered at
the elbow by one musket ball, as another penetrated his brain.
The goblet was seized by another hand, and the revel grew loud and
wild. The sparkling wine was poured forth like water, healths were drank,
hurrahs were shouted, andanother officer measured his length on the floor.
He had received his ball of death.
There was something of ludicrous horror in the scene.
Those sounds of revel and bacchanalian uproar, breaking on the air, amid
the intervalsthe short and terrible intervals of battlethose faces flushed
by wine, and agitated by all the madness of the moment, turned from one
side to another, every lip wearing a ghastly smile, every eye glaring from
its socket, while every voice echoed the drunken shout and the fierce
hurrah.
Another officer fell wounded, and another, and yet another. The young
officer who had first discovered the wine alone remained.
Even in this moment of horror, we cannot turn our eyes away, from his
young countenance, with its hazel eyes and thickly clustered hair!
He glanced round upon his wounded and dying comrades, he looked
vacantly in the faces of the dead, he gazed upon the terror and confusion
of the scene, and then he seized the goblet, filled it brimming-full with wine,
and raised it to his lips.
His lip touched the edge of the goblet, his face was reflected in the
quivering wavelets of the wine, his eyes rolled wildly to and fro, and then
a musket shot pealed through the window. The officer glared around with
a maddened glance, and then the warm blood, spouting from the wound
between his eyebrows, fell drop by drop into the goblet, and mingled with
the wavelets of the ruby wine.
And then there was a wild shout; a heavy body toppled to the floor;
and the young soldier with a curse on his lips went drunken to his God.
Let us for a moment notice the movements of the divisions of
Washington's
army, and then return to the principal battle ground at Chew's house.
The movements of the divisions of Smallwood and Forman are, to this
day, enveloped in mystery. They came in view of the enemy, but the
density of the mist, prevented them from effectually engaging with the
British.
Armstrong came marching down the Manatawny road, until the quiet
Wissahikon dawned on the eyes of his men; but after this moment, his
march is also wrapt in mystery.Some reports state that he actually
engaged with the Hessian division of the enemy, others state that the alarm
of the American retreating from Chew's house reached his ear, as the
vanguard
of his command entered Germantown, near the market-house, and
commenced firing upon the chasseurs who flanked the left wing of the
British army.
However this may be, yet tradition has brought down to our times a
terrible
legend connected with the retreat of Armstrong's division. The
theatre of this legend was the quiet Wissahikon, and this is the story of
ancient tradition.
IV.THE WISSAHIKON.
It is a poem of everlasting beautya dream of magnificencethe
world-hidden, wood-embowered Wissahikon. Its pure waters break
forever
in ripples of silver around the base of colossal rocks, or sweep
murmuringly
on, over beds of pebbled flints, or spread into calm and
mirror-like
lakes, with shores of verdure, surmounted by green hills, rolling away
in waves of forest trees, or spreading quietly in the fierce light of the
summer
sun, with the tired cattle grouped beneath the lofty oaks.
It is a poem of beautywhere the breeze mourns its anthem through the
tall pines; where the silver waters send up their voices of joy; where
calmness, and quiet, and intense solitude awe the soul, and fill the heart
with bright thoughts and golden dreams, woven in the luxury of the
summer
hour.
From the moment your eyes first drink in the gladness of its waters, as
they pour into the Schuylkill, seven miles from Philadelphia, until you
behold
it winding its thread of silver along the meadows of Whitemarsh, many
miles above, it is all beauty, all dream, all magnificence.
It breaks on your eye, pouring into the Schuylkill, a calm lake, with an
ancient and picturesque mill
[3]
[3]
Formerly Vanduring's, now Robinson's mill.
in the foreground. A calm lake, buried in
the depths of towering steeps, that rise almost perpendicularly on either
side, casting a shadow of gloom over the water, while every steep is green
with brushwood, every rocky cleft magnificent with the towering oak, the
sombre pine, or the leafy chesnut.
This glen is passed; then you behold hilly shores, sloping away to the
south in pleasant undulations, while on the north arise frowning steeps.
Then your mind is awed by tremendous hills on either side, creating one
immense solitude; rugged steepsall precipice and perpendicular rock
covered and crowded with giant pines, and then calm and rippleless lakes,
shadowy glens, deep ravines and twilight dells of strange and dreamy
beauty.
There is, in sooth, a stamp of strange and dreamy beauty impressed
upon every ripple of the Wissahikon, every grassy bank extending greenly
along its waters, on every forest-tree towering beside its shores.
On the calm summer's day, when the sun is declining in the west, you
may look from the height of some grey, rugged steep, down upon the depths
of the world-hidden waters. Wild legends wander across your fancy as
you gaze; every scene around you seems but the fitting location for a wild
and dreamy tradition, every rock bears its old time story, every nook of the
wild wood has its tale of the ancient days. The waters, deep, calm, and
well-like, buried amidst overhanging hills, have a strange and mysterious
clearness. The long shadows of the hills, broken by golden belts of
sunshine
,
clothe the waters in sable and gold, in glitter and in shadow. All
around is quiet and still; silence seems to have assumed a positive existence
amid these vallies of romance and of dreams.
It was along the borders of this quiet stream, that an ancient fabric arose,
towering through the verdure of the trees, with its tottering chimneys
enveloped in folds of mist. The walls were severed by many a fissure, the
windows were crumbling to decay; the halls of the ancient mansion were
silent as the tomb.
It was wearing toward noon, when a body of soldiers, wearing the blue
hunting-shirt and fur cap with bucktail plume, came rushing from the woods
on the opposite side of the rivulet, came rushing through the waters of the
lonely stream, and hurried with hasty steps toward the deserted house.
In a moment they had entered its tottering doorway, and disappeared
within its aged walls. Another instant, and a body of soldiers broke from
the woods on the opposite side of the stream, clad in the Hessian costume,
with ponderous bearskin caps, heavy accroutements, and massive muskets.
They crossed the stream, and rushed into the house in pursuit of the
flying continentals. They searched the rooms on the first floor; they
hurried
along the tottering timbers, but not a single Continental was to be seen.
They ascended the crumbling stairway with loud shouts and boisterous
oaths, and reached the rooms of the second story. Every door was flung
hastily aside, every closet was broken open, the boards were even torn from
the floor, every nook was searched, every corner ransacked, and yet no
vision of a blue shirted backwoodsman, met the eye of the eager Hessians.
All was silent as death.
Their own footfalls were returned in a thousand echoes, their own shouts
alone disturbed the silence of the house, but no sound or sight, could be
obtained
of the fleeing Continentals. Every room was now searched, save
the garret, and the Hessians, some twenty men, able bodied and stout, were
about rushing up the stairway of the attic in pursuit of the ten Continental
soldiers, when the attention of one of their number was arrested by a
singular
spectacle.
The Hessian soldier beheld through a crumbling window frame, the
figure of a woman, standing on the height of an abrupt steep, overhanging
the opposite side of the stream. She waved her hands to the soldier,
shouted and waved her hands again. He heeded her not, but rushed up the
stairway after his companions.
The shout of that unknown woman was the warning of death.
While the Hessians were busily engaged in searching the attic, while
their shouts and execrations awoke the echoes of the roof, while they were
thrusting sword and bayonet into the dark corners of the apartment, that
shout of the woman on the rock, arose, echoing over the stream again and
again.
6
The Hessians rushed to the window, they suddenly remembered that
they had neglected to search the cellar, and looking far below, they beheld
thin wreaths of light blue smoke, winding upward from the cellar window.
A fearful suspicion crept over the minds of the soldiers.
They rushed from the attic, in a moment they might reach the lower
floor and escape. With that feeling of unimaginable terror creeping round
each heart and paling every face, they rushed tremblingly on, they gained
the second floor, their footsteps already resounded along the stairway when
the boards trembled beneath their feet, a horrid combination of sounds assailed
their ears, aud the walls rocked to and fro like a frantic bacchanal.
Another moment! And along that green wood rang a fearful sound,
louder and more terrible than thunder, shaking the very rocks with an
earth-quake
motion, while the fragments of the ancient fabric arose blackening
into the heavens, mingled with human bodies torn and scattered into
innumerable
pieces, and the air was filled with a dense smoke, that hung over
the forest, in one thick and blackening pall.
In a few moments the scene was clear, but the ancient house had
disappeared
as if by magic, while the shouts of the Continental soldiers were
heard in the woods, far beyond the scene.
The house had been used by the British as a temporary
depot
of powder.
When the American Continentals rushed into the cellar, they beheld the
kegs standing in one corner, they piled up combustible matter in its vicinity
and then made their escape from the house by a subterranean passage
known only to themselves. They emerged into open air some hundred
yards beyond, and beheld the result of this signal vengeance on their foes.
V.THE CRISIS OF THE FIGHT.
Again
we return to the field of Chew's House.
Washington determined to make one last and desperate effort. The
Corps de Reserve under Stirling, and Maxwell, and Nash, came thundering
along the field; each sword unsheathed, every bayonet firm; every man
eager and ready for the encounter.
It was now near nine o'clock in the morning.The enemy still retained
Chew's house. The division under Greene, the main body commanded
by Wayne, by Sullivan and Conway, composed the American force engaged
in actual contest.To this force was now added the Corps de Reserve,
under Lord Stirling, Generals Maxwell and Nash.
The British force, under command of General Howe, who had arrived
on the field soon after the onslaught at Chew's House, were led to battle by
Kniphausen, Agnew, Grant, and Grey, who now rode from troop to troop,
from rank to rank, hurrying the men around toward the main point of the flight.
There was a pause in the horror of the battle.
The Americans rested on their arms, the troopers reined in their steeds
in sight of Chew's House, and amid the bodies of the dead. The
Continental
ranks were terribly thinned by the desolating fire from the house;
every file was diminished, and in some instances, whole companies were
swept away.
The British were fresh in vigor, and ably armed and equipped. They
impatiently rushed forward, eager to steep their arms in American blood.
And amid the folds of mist and battle-smokewhile the whole field
resembled
some fearful phantasmagoria of fancy, with its shadowy figures
flitting
to and fro, while the echo of the cannon, the rattle of the musquetry,
and the shrieks of the wounded yet rung on the soldiers' earsthey eagerly
awaited the signal for the re-commencement of the fight.
The signal rang along the lines! In an instant the cannons opened their
fire on Chew's house, the troopers came thundering on in their hurricane
charge. All around were charging legions, armed bodies of men hurrying
toward the house, heaps of the wounded strown over the sod. That
terrible
cry which had for three long hours gone shrieking up to heaven from
that lawn, now rose above the tumult of battlethe quick piercing cry of
the strong man, smitten suddenly down by his death-wound.
The American soldiers fought like men who fight for everything that man
needs for sustenance, or holds dear in honor, or sacred in religion. Step by
step the veteran continentals drove the Britishers over the field, trampling
down the faces of their dead comrades in the action; step by step were
they driven back in their turn, musquets were clubbed in the madness of the
strife, and the cry for quarter, fell on deafened ears.
Then it was that the chieftains of the American host displayed acts of
superhuman courage!
In the thickest of the fight, where swords flashed most vivedly, where
death-groans shrieked most terribly upon the air, where the steeds of
contending
squadrons rushed madly against each other in the wild encounter of
the charge, there might you see mad Anthony Wayne; his imposing form
towering over the heads of the combatants, his eye blazing with excitement,
and his sword, all red with blood, rising and falling like a mighty hammer
in the hands of a giant blacksmith.
How gallantly the warrior-drover rides! Mounted on his gallant
war-steed
,
he comes once more to battle, his sword gleaming like a meteor,
around his head. On and on, without fear, without a thought save his
country's
honor and the vengeance of Paolion and on he rides, and as he
speeds, his shout rings out clear and lustily upon the air
On, comrades, onand
Remember Paoli!
Forwarts, brudern, forwarts!
Ha! The gallant Pulaski! How like a king he rides at the head of his
iron band, how firmly he sits in his stirrups, how gallantly he beckons his
men onward, how like a sunbeam playing on glittering ice, his sword flits to
and fro, along the darkened air!
Like one solid battle-bolt, his gallant band speed onward, carrying terror
and confusion into the very centre of Kniphausen's columns, leaving a line
of dead men in their rear, and driving the discomfitted Hessians before them,
while the well-known battle-shout of Pulaski halloos these war-hounds on
to the slaughter
Forwartsbrdernforwarts!
And there
he
rides, known to all the men as their commander, seen by
every eye in the interval of the battle-smoke, hailed by a thousand voices
Washington
!
Hark! How the cheer of his deep-toned voice swells through the
confusion
of battle!
A calm and mild-faced man, leading on a column of Continentals, rides
up to his side, and is pushing forward into the terror of the mist-hidden
mele, when the voice of Washington rings in his ear
Greenewhy is Stephens not here? Why does he delay his
division
?
General, we have no intelligence of his movements. He has not yet
appeared upon the field
Washington's lip quivered. A world seemed pent up in his heart, and
for once in his entire life, his agitation was visible and apparent.
He raised his clenched hand on high, and as Napoleon cursed Grouchy
at Waterloo, in after times, so Washington at Germantown cursed Stephens,
from his very heart of hearts. The glittering game of battle was being
played around him. Stephens alone was wanting to strike terror into the
ranks of the enemy around Chew's house, the crisis had comeand
Stephens
was not there, one of the most important divisions of the army was
powerless.
And now the gallant Stirling, the brave Nash, and the laurelled Maxwell,
came riding on, at the head of the corps de reserve, every man with his
sword and bayonet, yet unstained with blood, eager to join the current of the
fight.
Nashthe brave General of the North Carolina Division, was rushing
into the midst of the mele with his men, leading them on to deeds of
courage
and renown, when he received his death-wound, and fell insensible in
the arms of one of his aids-de-camp.
The mist gathering thicker and denser over the battle field, caused a
terrible
mistake on the part of the American divisions. They charged against
their own friends, shot down their own comrades, and even bayonetted the
very soldiers who had shared their mess, ere they discovered the fatal
mistake
.
The mist and battle-smoke rendered all objects dim and indistinct
the event of this battle will show, that it was no vain fancy of the author,
which induced him to name this mist of Germantown
the Shroud of
Death
. It proved a shroud of death, in good sooth, for hundreds who laid
down their lives on the sod of the battle field.
The gallant Colonel Matthews, at the head of a Virginia regiment,
penetrated
into the centre of the town, driving the British before him at pleasure,
and after this glorious effort, he was returning to the American lines with
some three hundred prisoners, when he encountered a body of troops in the
mist, whom he supposed to be Continentals. He rode unfearingly into their
midst, and found himself a prisoner in the heart of the British army! The
mist had foiled his gallant effort; his prisoners were recaptured, himself and
his men were captives to the fortune of war.
VI.RETREAT.
Now it was that Washington beheld his soldiers shrink and give way on
every side! On every hand they began to waver, from line to line, from
column to column ran terrible rumors of the approach of Cornwallis, with
a reinforcement of grenadiers; the American soldiers were struck with despair.
They had fought while there was hope, they had paved their way to
victory
with heaps of dead, they had fought against superior discipline, superior
force, superior fortune, but the mist that overhung the battle field, blasted all
their hopes, and along the American columns rang one word, that struck
like a knell of death on the heart of Washington
retreat
RETREAT!
It was all in vain that the American chieftain threw himself in the way
of the retreating ranks and besought them to stand firmfor the sake of
their honor, for the sake of their country, for the sake of their God.
It was all in vain! In vain was it that Pulaski threw his troopers in the
path chosen by the fugitives; in vain did he wave his sword on high, and
beseech them in his broken dialect, with a flushed cheek and a maddening
eye, implore them to turn and face the well-nigh conquered foe! It was in
vain!
In vain did Mad Anthony Wayne, the hero of Pennsylvania, ride from
rank to rank, and with his towering form raised to its full height, hold his
hand aloft, and in the familiar tones of brotherly intimacy, beckon the
soldiers
once again to the field of battle.
All was in vain!
And while Chew's house still belched forth its fires of death, while all
through Germantown were marching men, hot-foot from Philadelphia, while
over the fatal lawn rushed hurried bands of the Continentals, seeking for
their comrades among the dead, Washington gazed to the north and beheld
the columns of Continentals, their array all thinned and scattered, their
numbers
diminished, taking their way along the northern road, calmly it is true,
and in remarkable order, but still in the order of a retreat, though the enemy
showed no disposition to annoy or pursue them.
And while his heart swelled to bursting, and his lip was pressed between
his teeth in anguish, Washington bowed his head to the mane of his gallant
grey and veiled his face in his hands, and then his muscular chest
throbbed
as though a tempest were pent up within its confines.
In a moment ne raised his face. All was calm and immoveable, all
traces of emotion had passed away from the stern and commanding features,
like the waves rolling from the rock.
He whispered a few brief words to his aids-de-camp, and then raising his
form proudly in the stirrups, he rode along the Continental columns, while
with a confused and half-suppressed murmuring sound, the
Retreat of Germantown
commenced.
Part the fifth.
THE LAST SHOT OF THE BATTLE.
Look forth upon the scene of fight, comrade.
The moon is up in the heavensher beams glimmer on the cold faces of the dead
Over dead carcase and over fallen banner, in the midst of the lawn, arises one fell
and ghastly form, towering in the moonbeams
The form, comrade?
It is the form of Death, brooding and chuckling over the carnage of the field; he
shakes his arms of bone aloft, his skeleton hands wave in the moonlight, he holds
HIGH FESTIVAL OVER THE BODIES OF THE DEAD.
Mss. of the Revolution
.
I.THE SOLDIER AND HIS BURDEN.
A PAUSE in the din of battle!
The denizens of Mount Airy and Chesnut Hill came crowding to their
doors and windows; the hilly street was occupied by anxious groups of
people, who conversed in low and whispered tones, with hurried gestures
and looks of surprise and fear. Yonder group who stand clustered in the
roadside!
A grey haired man with his ear inclined intently toward Germantown,
his hands outspread, and his trembling form bent with age. The maiden,
fair cheeked, red lipped, and blooming, clad in the peasant costume, the
tight boddice, the linsey skirt, the light 'kerchief thrown over the bosom.
Her ear is also inclined toward Germantown, and her small hands are
involuntarily
crossed over her bosom, that heaves and throbs into view.
The matron, calm, self possessed, and placid, little children clinging to
the skirt of her dress, her wifely cap flung carelessly on her head, with
hair slightly touched with grey, while the sleeping babe nestles in her
bosom.
The boy, with the light flaxen hair, the ruddy cheeks, the merry blue
eye! He stands silent and motionlesshe also listens!
You stand upon the height of Mount Airy, it is wearing towards noon,
yet gaze around you.
Above the mist is rising. Here and there an occasional sun gleam lights
the rolling clouds of mist, but the atmosphere wears a dull leaden hue, and
the vast horizon a look of solemnity and gloom.
Beneath and around sweep field and plain, buckwheat field, and sombre
woods, luxuriant orchards and fertile vallies, all seen in the intervals of the
white columns of the uprising mist.
The group clustered along the roadside of Mount Airy are still and silent.
Each heart is full, every ear absorbed in the effort of catching the slightest
sound from Germantown.
There is a strange silence upon the air. A moment ago, and far off
shouts broke on the ear, mingled with the thunder of cannon and the
shrieks of musquetry, the earth seemed to tremble, and far around the wide
horizon was agitated by a thousand echoes.
Now the scene is still as midnight. Not a sound, not a shout, not a
distant
hurrah. The anxiety of the group upon the hill becomes absorbing
and painful. Looks of wonder at the sudden pause in the battle, flit from
face to face, and then low whispers are heard, and then comes another
moment
of fearful suspense.
It is followed by a wild rushing sound to the south, like the shrieks of
the ocean waves, as they fill the hold of the foundering ship, while it sinks
far in the loneliness of the seas.
Then a pause, and again that unknown sound, and then the tramp of ten
thousand footsteps, mingled with a wild and indistinct murmur.Tramp,
tramp, tramp, the air is filled with the sound, and then distinct voices break
upon the air, and the clatter of arms is borne on the breeze.
The boy turns to his mother, and asks her who has gained the day?
Every heart feels vividly that the battle is now over, that the account of
blood is near its close, that the appeal to the God of battles has been made.
The mother turns her tearful eyes to the southshe cannot answer the
question. The old man, awaking from a reverie, turns suddenly to the
maiden, and clasps her arm with his trembling hands. His lips move, but
his tongue is unable to syllable a sound. His suspense is fearful. He
flings a trembling hand southward, and speaks his question with the gesture
of age.
The battle, the battle, how goes the battle?
And as he makes the gesture, the figure of a soldier is seen rushing from
the mist in the valley below, he comes speeding round the bend of the road,
he ascends the hill, but his steps totter, and he staggers to and fro like a
drunken man.
He bears a burden on his shouldersis it the plunder of the fight, is it
spoil gathered from the ranks of the dead?
Nono. He bears an aged man on his shoulders, he grasps the aged
form with his trembling arms, and with an unsteady step nears the group
on the hill top.
The old man's grey hairs are waving in the breeze, and his extended
hand grasps a broken bayonet, which he raises on high with a maniac
gesture.
The soldier and the veteran he bears upon his shoulders, are clad in the
blue hunting shirt, torn and tattered and stained with blood, it is true, but
still you can recognize the uniform of the Revolution.
The tottering soldier nears the group, he lays the aged veteran down by
the roadside, and then looks around with a ghastly face and a rolling eye.
There is blood dripping from his attire, his face is begrimed with powder,
and spotted with crimson drops. He glances wildly around, and then
kneeling on the sod he takes the hands of the aged man in his own, and
raises his head upon his knee.
The battle, the battle, how goes the battle?
The group cluster round as they shriek the question.
The young Continental makes no reply, but gazing upon the face of the
dying veteran, wipes the beaded drops of blood from his forehead.
Comrade, shrieks the veteran, raise me on my feet, and wipe the
blood from my eyes. I would see him once again!
He is raised upon his feet, the blood is wiped from his eyes.
I seeI seeit is heit is Washington! YonderyonderI see
his swordand Antony Wayne,raise me higher, comrade,all is getting
darkI would seeMad Antony!
Did you ever see a picture that made your heart throb, and your eyes
grow blind with tears?
Here is one.
The roadside, the group clustered in front of Allen's house, which rises
massive and solemn in the background. The young soldier, all weak and
trembling from loss of blood, raising the grey haired veteran in his arms,
placing his face toward Germantown, while the wrinkled features light up
with a sudden gleam, and waving his broken bayonet before his eyes, he
looks toward the scene of the late fight.
The bystanders, spectators of this scene. The matron gazing anxiously
upon the old man's face, her eyes swimming in tears, the ruddy cheeked
boy holding one hand of the dying veteran, the youthful maiden, all blossom
and innocence, standing slightly apart, with the ancient man in peasant's
attire, gazing vacantly around as he grasps her arm.
Lift me, comradehigher, higher I see himI see Mad Antony!
Wipe the blood from my eyes, comrade, for it darkens my sightit is dark,
it is dark!
And the young soldier held in his arms a lifeless corse. The old veteran
was dead. He had fought his last fight, fired his last shot, shouted the
name of Mad Antony for the last time, and yet his withered hand clenched,
with the tightness of death, the broken bayonet.
The battle, the battle, how goes the battle?
As the thrilling question again rung in his ears, the young Continental
turned to the group, smiled ghastily and then flung his wounded arm to the
south.
Lost!
he shrieked, and rushed on his way like one bereft of his
senses. He had not gone ten steps, when he bit the dust of the roadside,
and lay extended in the face of day a lifeless corse.
The eyes of the group were now fixed upon the valley below.
II.HOW THE LEGIONS CAME BACK FROM THE BATTLE.
Tramp
, tramp, echoed the sound of hoofs, and then a steed, caparisoned
in battle array, came sweeping up the hill, with his wounded rider hanging
helpless and faint by the saddle-bow.Then came another steed, speeding
up the hill, with bloodshot eye and quivering nostril, while his rider fell
dying to the earth, shouting his wild hurrah as he fell.
Then came baggage wagons, then bodies of flying troops in continental
attire, turned to the bend of the road in the valley below, and like a flash the
hillside of Mount Airy was all alive with disordered masses of armed men,
rushing onward with hurried steps and broken arms.
Another moment! The whole array of the continental army comes
sweeping round the bend of the road, file after file, rank after rank, and
now, a column breaks into sight.
Alone the whole column, no vision meets the eyes of the group, but the
spectacle of broken arms, tarnished array, men wearied with toil and thirst,
fainting with wounds, and tottering with the loss of blood.
On and on, along the ascent of the hill they rush, some looking hastily
around with their pallid faces stained with blood, some holding their
shattered
arms high overhead, others aiding their wounded comrades as they
hurry on in the current of the retreat, while waving in the air, the blue
banner of the continental host, with its array of thirteen stars, droops
heavily from the flagstaff, as its torn folds come sweeping into light.
And from file to file, with a wild movement and a reckless air, rode a tall
and muscular soldier, clad in the uniform of a general officer, his sword
waving aloft, and his voice heard above the hurry and confusion of the
retreat
Turn, comrades, turn, and face the Britisherturn, and the day is ours!
Mad Anthony cried in vain! The panic had gone like a lightning flash
through the army, and every man hurried on, without a thought, save the
thought of retreat; without a motion, save the escape from the fatal field
of Chew's House.
Then came Pulaski and his veterans, their costumes of white extending
along the road, in glaring relief against the background of blue-shirted
continentals
;
7
then came the columns of Sullivan, the division of Greene, and
then huddled together in a confused crowd, came the disordered bands of
the army, who had broken their ranks, and were marching beside the
baggage
wains loaded to the very sides with wounded and dying.
It was a sad and ghastly spectacle to see that train of death-cars, rolling
heavily on, with the carcases of the wounded hanging over their sides, with
broken arms and limbs protruding from their confines, with pallid faces
upturned
to the sky, while amid the hurry and motion of the retreat, piteous
moans, fierce cries, and convulsive death-shrieks broke terribly on the air.
Yon gallant officer leaning from his steed, yon gallant officer, with the
bared forehead, the disordered dress, the ruffle spotted with blood, the coat
torn by sword thrusts, and dripping with the crimson current flowing from
the heart, while an aid-de-camp riding by his side supports his fainting form
on his steed, urging the noble animal forward in the path of the retreat.
It is the brave General Nash. He has fought his last fight, led his gallant
North Carolinians on to the field for the last time, his heart is fluttering
with the trembling pulsation of death, and his eyes swimming in the
dimness
of coming dissolution.
In the rear, casting fierce glances toward Germantown, rides the tall form
of Washington, with Pickering and Hamilton and Marshall, clustering round
their chieftain, while the sound of the retreating legions is heard far in the
distance, along the heights of Chesnut Hill.
Washington reaches the summit of Mount Airy, he beholds his gallant
though unfortunate army sweeping far ahead, he reins his steed for a
moment
on the height of the mount, and looks toward the field of
Germantown
!
One long look toward the scene of the hard fought fight, one quick and
fearful memory of the unburied dead, one half-smothered exclamation of
anguish, and the chieftain's steed springs forward, and thus progresses the
retreat of Germantown.
In the town the scene is wild and varied. The mist has not yet arisen,
the startled inhabitants have not crept from their places of concealment, and
through the village ride scattered bands and regiments of the British army.
Here a party of gaudily-clad German troopers of Walbeck break on your
eye, yonder the solemn and ponderous Hessian in his heavy accoutrements
crosses your path, here a company of plaid-kilted Highlanders came
marching
on, with claymore and bagpipe, and yonder, far in the distance sweep
the troopers of Anspack, in their costume of midnight darkness, relieved by
ornaments of gold, with the skull and cross-bones engraven on each sable cap.
III.CAPTAIN LEE.
In
the centre of the village extended a level piece of ground, surrounded
by dwelling houses, stretching from the eastern side of the road, with the
market-house, a massive and picturesque structure, arising on one side,
while the German Reformed Church, with its venerable front and steeple,
arose on the other.
The gallant Captain Lee, of the Partizan Rangers, had penetrated thus
far into the town, in common with many other companies of the army, but
soon all others retreated, and he was left alone in the heart of the British
army, while the continentals were retreating over Mount Airy and Chesnut
Hill.
Lee had pursued a Hanoverian troop as far as the market house, when
he suddenly perceived the red-coated soldiers of Cornwallis breaking from
the gloom of the mist on the south, while a body of troopers came rushing
from the school house lane on one side, and another corps came thundering
from the church lane on the opposite side.
Lee was surrounded. The sable-coated troopers whom he had been
pursuing
,
now turned on their pursuers, and escape seemed impossible. The
brave Partizan turned to his men. Each swarthy face gleamed with
delighteach sunburnt hand flung aloft the battle-dented sword. The
confusion
and havoc of the day had left the Partizan but forty troopers, but
every manly form was marked by wide shoulders, muscular chest, and lofty
bearing, and their uniform of green, their caps of fur, with bucktail plume,
gave a striking and effective appearance to the band.
Comrades, now for a chase! shouted Lee, glancing gaily over his men.
Let us give these scare-crow hirelings a chase! Up the Germantown
road, advance, boysforward!
And as they galloped along the Germantown road, riding gallantly four
abreast, in all a warrior's port and pride, the Hanoverians, now two hundred
strong, came thundering in their rear, each dark-coated trooper leaning over
the neck of his steed, with sword upraised, and with fierce battle-shout
echoing from lip to lip.
Only twenty paces lay between the Rangers and their foes. The
monotonous
sound of the pattering hoof, the clank of the scabbard against the
soldier's booted leg, the deep, hard breathing of the horses, urged by boot
and spur to their utmost speed, the fierce looks of the Hanoverians, their
bending figures, their dress of deep black, with relief of gold, the
ponderous
caps, ornamented with the fearful insignia of skull and cross-bones, the
Rangers sweeping gallantly in front, square and compact in their solid
column, each manly form in costume of green and gold, disclosed in the light,
in all its muscular ability and imposing proportions, as they moved forward
with the same quick impulse, all combined, form a scene of strange and
varying interest, peculiar to those times of Revolutionary peril and
bloodshed
.
The chase became exciting. The advance company of sable-coated
troopers gained on Lee's gallant band at every step, and at every step they
left their comrades further in the rear.
Lee's men spurred their steeds merrily forward, ringing their boisterous
shouts tauntingly upon the air, while their exasperated foes replied with
curses and execrations.
And all along through the streets of Germantown lay the scene of this
exciting chase, the clatter of the horses' hoofs awake the echoes of the an
cienthouses, bringing the frightened denizens suddenly to the doors and
windows
,
and the pursuers and pursued began to near the hill of the
Mennonist
graveyard, while the peril of Lee became more imminent and apparent.
The Hanoverians were at the horses' heels of the Rangersthey were
gaining upon them at every step; in a moment they would be surrounded
and cut to pieces.
Lee glanced over his shoulder. He saw his danger at a glance; they
were now riding up the hill, the advance company of the enemy were in
his rear, the main division were some hundred yards behind. In a moment
the quick word of command rung from his lips, and at the instant, as the
whole corps attained the summit of the hill, his men wheeled suddenly
round, faced the pursuing enemy, and came thundering upon their ranks like
an earth-riven thunderbolt!
Another moment! and the discomfitted Hanoverians lay scattered and
bleeding along the roadside; here a steed was thrown back upon its
haunches, crushing its rider as it fell; here was a trooper clinging with the
grasp of death to his horse's neck; yonder reared another horse without its
rider, and the ground was littered with the overthrown and wounded
troopers.
They swept over the black-coated troopers like a thunderbolt, and in
another
instant the gallant Rangers wheeled about, returning in their charge of
terror with the fleetness of the wind, each man sabreing an enemy as he
rode, and then, with a wild hurrah, they regained the summit of the hill.
Lee drew his trooper's cap from his head, his men did the same, and then,
with their eyes fixed upon the main body of the enemy advancing along the
foot of the hill, the gallant Rangers sent up a wild hurrah of triumph,
waving
their caps above their heads, and brandishing their swords.
The enemy returned a yell of execration, but ere they reached the
summit
of the hill, Lee's company were some hundred yards ahead, and all
pursuit was vain. The Rangers rode fearlessly forward, and, ere an
half-hour
was passed, regained the columns of the retreating army.
IV.SUNSET UPON THE BATTLE FIELD.
It was sunset upon the field of battlesolemn and quiet sunset. The
rich, golden light fell over the grassy lawn, over the venerable fabric of
Chew's house, and over the trees scattered along the field, turning their
autumnal foliage to quivering gold.
The scene was full of the spirit of desolation, steeped in death, and
crimsoned
in blood. The green lawnwith the soil turned up by the cannon
wheels, by the tramp of war steeds, by the rush of the foemenwas all
heaped with ghastly piles of dead, whose cold upturned faces shone with a
terrible lustre in the last beams of the declining sun.
There were senseless carcasses, with the arms rent from the shattered
body, with the eyes scooped from the hollow sockets, with foreheads severed
by the sword thrust, with hair dabbled in blood, with sunken jaws fallen on
the gory chest; there was all the horror, all the bloodshed, all the butchery
of war, without a single gleam of its romance or chivalry.
Here a plaid-kilted Highlander, a dark-coated Hanoverian, were huddled
together in the ghastliness of sudden death; each with that fearful red wound
denting the forehead, each with that same repulsive expression of convulsive
pain, while their unclosed eyes, cold, dead, and lustreless, glared on the blue
heavens with the glassy look of death.
Yonder, at the foot of a giant elm, an old Continental, sunk down in the
grasp of death. His head is sunken on his breast, his white hair all
blood-bedabbled
,
his blue hunting shirt spotted with clotted drops of purple. The
sunburnt hand extended, grasps the unfailing riflethe old warrior is merry
even in death, for his lip wears a cold and unmoving smile.
A little farther on a peasant boy bites the sod, with his sunburnt face
half buried in the blood-soddened earth, his rustic attire of linsey tinted by
the last beams of the declining sun; one arm convulsively gathered under
his head, the long brown hair all stiffened with blood, while the other grasps
the well-used fowling piece, with which he rushed to the field, fought bravely,
and died like a hero. The fowling piece is with him in death; the fowling
piececompanion of many a boyish ramble beside the Wissahikon, many
a hunting excursion on the wild and dreamy hills that frown around that
rivuletis now beside him, but the hand that encloses its stock is colder
than the iron of its rusted tube.
Let us pass over the field, with a soft and solemn footstep, for our path
is yet stamped with the tread of death; the ghosts of the heroes are
thronging
in the air.
Chew's house is silent and desolate. The shattered windows, the broken
hall door, the splintered roof, the battered chimneys, and the walls of the
house stained with blood: all are silent, yet terrible proofs of the havoc and
ruin of the fight.
Silence is within Chew's house. No death-shriek, no groan of agony,
no voice shrieking to the uplifted sword to spare and pity, breaks upon the
air. All is still and solemn, and the eye of human vision may not pierce
the gloom of the unknown, and behold the ghosts of the slain crowding
before
the throne of God.
The sun is setting over Chew's lawn and house, the soldiers of the
British army have deserted the place, and as the last beams of day quiver
over the field, deathterrible and fearful deathbroods over the scene, in
all its ghastiliness and horror.
V.THE LEGEND OF GENERAL AGNEW AGAIN.
Along
the solitary streets of Germantown, as the sun went down, rang
the echo of horses' hoofs, and the form of the rider of a gallant war steed
was seen, disclosed in the last beams of the dying day, as he took his way
along the village road.
The horseman was tall, well-formed, and muscular in proportion; his
hair was slightly touched with the frost of age, and his eye was wild and
wandering in its glance. The compressed lip, the hollow cheek, the
flashing
eye, all told a story of powerful, through suppressed emotion, stirring
the warrior's heart to bitter thoughts and gloomy memories.
It was General Agnew, of the British army. He had fought bravely in
the fight of Chew's house, though the presentiment sat heavy on his soul;
he had fought bravely, escaped without a wound, and now was riding alone,
along the solitary street, toward the Mennonist grave-yard.
There was an expression on his commanding face that it would have
chilled your heart to see. It was an expression which stamped his features
with a look of doom and fate, which revealed the inward throbbings of his
soul, as the dark presentiment of the morning, moved over its shadowy
depths.
He may have been thinking of his home, away in the fair valleys of
England
of
the blooming daughter, the bright-eyed boy, or the matronly wife
and then a thought of the terrible wrong involved in the British cause may
have crossed his soul, for the carnage of Chew's lawn had been most
fearful
,
and it is not well to slay hundreds of living beings like ourselves, for
the shadow of a right.
He reached the point where the road sweeps down the hill, in front of
the grave-yard, and as he rode slowly down the ascent, his attention was
arrested by a singular spectacle.
The head of a man, grey-bearded and white haired, appeared above the
grave-yard wall, and a fierce, malignant eye met the gaze of General Agnew.
It was the strange old man who, in the morning, had asked whether that
was General Grey? pointing to the person of Agnew as he spoke, and
being answered, by mistake or design, in the affirmative, fired a rifle at the
officer from the shelter of the wall.
No sooner had the wild face rose above the wall than it suddenly
disappeared
,
and, scarce noting the circumstance, the General reined his steed for
a moment, on the descent of the hill, and gazed toward the western sky,
where the setting sun was sinking behind a rainbow hued pile of clouds, all
brilliant with a thousand contrasted lights.
The last beams of the sun trembled over the high forehead of General
Agnew, as, with his back turned to the grave-yard wall, he gazed upon the
prospect, and his eye lit up with a sudden brilliancy, when the quick
and piercing report of a rifle broke on the air, and echoed around the
scene.
A small cloud of light blue smoke wound upward from the grave-yard
wall, a ghastly smile overspread the face of Agnew, he looked wildly round
for a single instant, and then fell heavily to the dust of the road-side, a
lifeless corse.
His gallant steed of ebon darkness of skin, lowered his proud crest, and
thrust his nostrils in his master's face, his large eyes dilating, as he snuffed
the scent of blood upon the air; and at the very moment that same wild
and ghastly face appeared once more above the stones of the grave-yard
wall, and a shriek of triumph, wilder and ghastlier than the face, arose
shrieking above the graves.
That rifle shot, pealing from the grave-yard wall, was the LAST SHOT of
the battle-day of Germantown; and that corse flung along the roadside, with
those cold eyes glaring on the blue sunset sky, with the death-wound near
the heart, was the LAST DEAD MAN of that day of horror.
As the sun went down, the dark horse lowered his head, and with
quivering
nostrils, inhaled the last breath of his dying master.
Part the Sixth.
THE FUNERAL OF THE DEAD.
Blessed are the dead which die in the Lord,they rest from their labors, and
their works do follow them.
I.THE ANCIENT CHURCH.
In
the township of Towamensing, some twenty-six miles from
Philadelphia
,
from the green sward of a quiet grave-yard, arises the venerable walls
of an ancient church, under whose peaceful roof worship the believers in
the Mennonist faith, as their fathers worshipped before them.
The grave-yard, with its mounds of green sod, is encircled by a massive
wall of stone, overshadowed by a grove of primitive oaks, whose giant
trunks and gnarled branches, as they tower in the blue summer sky, seem
to share in the sacred stillness and ancient grandeur which rests like a holy
spell upon the temple and the hamlet of the dead.
Come back with me, reader, once more come back to the ancient
revolutionary
time. Come back to the solemnity and gloom of the funeral of the
dead; and in the quiet grave-yard we will behold the scene.
Bands of armed men throng the place of graves; on every side you behold
figures of stout men, clad in the uniform of war; on every side you behold
stern and scarred visages, and all along the green sward, with its encircling
grove of oaks, the pomp of banners wave flauntingly in the evening air, but
no glittering bayonet gleams in the light of the declining day. The banners
are heavy with folds of crape, the bayonets are unfixed from each musquet,
and every soldier carries his arms reversed.
Near the centre of the ground, hard by the roadside, are dug four graves,
the upturned earth forming a mound beside each grave, and the sunbeams
shine upon four coffins, hewn out of rough pine wood, and laid upon
trussels
,
with the faces of the dead cold and colorless, tinted with a ghastly
gleam of the golden sunlight.
Around the graves are grouped the chieftians of the American army, each
manly brow uncovered, each manly arm wearing the solemn scarf of crape,
while an expression of deep and overwhelming grief is stamped upon the
lines of each expressive face.
Washington stands near the coffins: his eyes are downcast, and his lip
is compressed. Wayne is by his side, his bluff countenance marked by
infeigned sorrow; and there stands Greene and Sullivan, and Maxwell and
Armstrong, clustered in the same group with Stirling and Forman, with
Smallwood and Knox. Standing near the coffin's head, a tall and imposing
form, clad in a white hued uniform, is disclosed in the full light of the
sunbeams
.
The face, with the whiskered lip and the eagle eye, wears the
same expression of sorrow that you behold on the faces of all around. It
is the Count Pulaski.
These are the pall-bearers of the dead.
And in the rear of this imposing group sweep the columns of the
American
army, each officer with his sword reversed, each musquet also reversed,
while all around is sad and still.
A grey-haired man, tall and imposing in stature, advances from the group
of pall-bearers. He is clad in the robes of the minister of heaven, his face
is marked by lines of care and thought, and his calm eye is expressive of a
mind at peace with God and man. He stands disclosed in the full glow of
the sunbeams, and while his long grey hairs wave in the evening air, he
gazes upon the faces of the dead.
The first corse, resting in the pine coffin, with the banner of blue and
stars sweeping over its rough surface, and bearing upon its folds the sword
and chapeau of a general officer, is the corse of General Nash. The noble
features are white as marble, the eyes are closed, and the lip wears the
smile of death.
The next corse, with the sword and chapeau of the commanding officer
of a regiment, is the corse of the brave Colonel Boyd.
Then comes the corse of Major White, handsome and dignified even in
death. The finely chisseled features, the arched brows, the Roman nose,
and compressed lip, look like the marble of a statue.
The last corse, the corse of a young man, with a lieutenant's sword and
cap placed on the coffin, is all that remains of the gallant Virginian, who
bore the flag of truce to Chew's house, and was shot down in the act.
Lieutenant Smith rests in death, and the blood-stained flag of truce is placed
over his heart.
The venerable minister advances, he gazes upon the faces of the dead,
his clear and solemn voice breaks out in tones of impassioned eloquence
in this.
II.FUNERAL SERMON OVER THE DEAD.
[4]
[4]
Note
. The author deems it necessary to state, once for all, that all the legends
given in this chronicle, are derived from substantial fact or oral tradition. The legend
of the Debauch of Deaththe old Quakerthe House on the Wissahikonthe escape
of Washingtonthe presentiment and death of General Agnewthe feat of Captain
Leeas well as all other incidents are derived from oral tradition. In other points,
the history of the Battle is followed as laid down by Marshall and his contemporaries.
There is some doubt concerning the name of the preacher who delivered the funeral
sermon. But with regard to the funeral ceremonies at the Mennonist church at
Toyamensing
,
there can be no doubt. General Nash and his companions in death, were
buried with the honors of war, in presence of the whole army the day after the battle.
General Nash, Colonel Boyd, Major White, and Lieutenant Smith: buried in
Towamensing
Mennonist Grave-yard, the day after the Battle of Germantown
.
Blessed are the dead which die in the Lord,they rest from their
labors, and their works do follow them.
Soldiers and Countrymen:Our brethren lie before us in all the
solemnity
of death. Their eyes are closed, their lips are voiceless; life, with its
hurry and turmoil, its hopes and its fears, with them is over forever. They
have passed from among us, amid the smoke and glare of battle they passed
away; and now, in this solemn grove, amid the silence and quiet of the
evening hour, we have assembled to celebrate their funeral obsequies.
Brethren, look well upon the corses of the dead, mark the eyes hollowed
by decay, the cheeks sunken, and the lips livid with the touch of death;
look upon these forms, but one short day ago moving and throbbing with
the warm blood of life, and now cold, clammy, dead, senseless remains of
clay.
But this is not all, brethren; for as we look upon these corses, the
solemn
words of the book break on our ear, through the silence of the
evening
air:
Blessed are the dead that die in the Lord, for they rest from their
labors
,
and their works do follow them
.
For they did die in the Lord, my brethren. Fighting in the holiest cause,
fighting against wrong, and might, and violence, the brave Nash rode into
the ranks of battle, and while the bullets of the hirelings whistled around
8
him, while all was terror and gloom, he fell at the head of his men, bravely
flashing his sword for his fatherland.
So fell White, and so fell Boyd; you have all heard how Lieutenant
Smith met his death. You have heard how he went forth on the battle
morn with the flag of truce in his hand. You have heard how he
approached
the fatal mansion on the battle-field; you have heard how these
merciless men pointed their musquets at his heart, and he fell, bathing the
flag of truce with the warm blood of his heart.
They fell, but their blood shall not fall unheeded. George of
Brunswick
,
may augur success to his cause from the result of this fight, but the
weak and mistaken man shall soon know his delusion false.
From every drop of patriot blood sinking in the sod of Germantown, a
hero shall arise! From the darkness and death of that terrible fight, I see
the angel of our country's freedom springing into birth; beyond the clouds
and smoke of battle, I behold the dawning of a brighter and more glorious
day.
They rest from their labors. From the toilsome labor of the night march,
from the fierce labor of the battle charge, from the labor of bloodshed and
death they rest.
They will no more share the stern joy of the meeting of congregated
armies; no more ride the steed to battle; no more feel their hearts throb at
the sound of the trumpet. All is over.
They rest from their labors! Aye, in the solemn courts of heaven they
rest from their labors, and the immortal great of the past greet them with
smiles and beckonings of joy, their hearts are soothed by the hymnings of
angels, and the voice of the Eternal bids them welcome.
From the dead let me turn to the living.
Let me speak for a moment to the men of the gallant band; let me tell
them that God will fight for them; that though the battle may be fierce and
bloody, still the sword of the Unknown will glisten on the side of the
freemen-brothers
;
that though the battle clouds may roll their shadows of gloom
over heaps of dying and dead, yet from those very clouds will spring the
day of Freedom, from the very carnage of the battle-field, will bloom the
fruits of a peaceful land.
Man, chosen among men, as the leader of freemen, I speak to thee! And
as the prophets of old, standing on the ramparts of Israel, raised their hands,
and blessed the Hebrew chieftains as they went forth to battle, so now I
bless thee, and bless thy doings; by the graves of the slain, and by the
corses of the patriot dead, I sanctify thy arms, in the name of that God who
never yet beheld fearful wrong without sudden vengeancein the name of
that Redeemer, whose mission was joy to the captive, freedom to the slave,
I bless thee,
Washington
.
On, on, in thy career of glory!
Not the glory of bloodshed, not the halo that is born of the
phosphorescent
light hovering around the carcasses of the dead, not the empty fame of
human slaughter. Nono.
The glory of a pure soul, actuated by one motive of good, straining every
purpose of heart to accomplish that motive; neither heeding the threats of
the merciless tyrant, on the one hand, or the calls of ambition on the other,
but speeding forward, with sure and steady steps, to the goal of all thy
hopesthe freedom of this land of the new world.
Such is thy glory, Washington.
On, then, ye gallant men, on, in your career of glory. To day all may
be dark, all may be sad, all may be steeped in gloom. You may be driven
from one battle-field, you may behold your comrades fall wounded and dying
in the path of your retreat. Carnage may thin your ranks, disease walk
through your tents, death track your footsteps.
But the bright day will come at last. The treasure of blood will find its
recompense, the courage, the self-denial and daring of this time will work
out the certain reward of the country's freedom.
Then behold the fruits of your labors.
A land of mighty rivers, colossal mountains, a land of luxurious vallies,
fertile plains, a land of freemen, peopled by happy multitudes of millions,
whose temples echo with hosannas to God, whose oraises repeat your
names, gallant survivors of the battle-field of Germantown.
THEIR WORKS DO FOLLOW THEM!
Yesyes. From the Eternal world, our departed friends shall look
down upon the fruit of their works. From the Vast Unseen they shall look
down upon your banner of blue as the sun gleam of victory glitters on its
stars. They shall behold the skeletons of the invader strewing our shores,
his banners trailed in the dust, his armies annihilated, his strong men
over-thrown
,
and the temple of his power, toppled from its strong foundations.
They rest from their labors.
Oh, glorious is their resting place, oh, most glorious is their home! As
they flee on spirit-wings to their eternal abode, the ghosts of the
mighty-head
,
come crowding to the portals of the Unknown, and hail them welcome
home! Brutus of old is there, shaking his gory dagger aloft, Hampden and
Sidney are there, and there are the patriot martyrs from all the scaffolds of
oppressed Europe, each mighty spirit sounding a welcome to the martyrs
of New World freedom.
The dead of Bunker Hill are there, the form of Warren is among the first
in the mighty crowd, and there, raising their gory hands on high, a band of
the martyred men of Brandywine, press forward, and hail their compeers
of Germantown a welcome home.
Blessed are the dead who die in the Lord.
Oh! thrice blessed, oh! blessed on the tongues of nations, blessed in the
hymns of little children, blessed in the tears of woman, shed for their
martyrdom
;
blessed in the world beyond, forever and forever blessed.
Farewell to ye, mighty dead, on earth! The kind hands of wife or child
were not passed over your brows, when the big drops of the death-dew
announced
the approach of the last enemy of man! No blooming child, no
soft-voiced wife, no fair-haired boy was near ye.
Alone ye died. Alone amid the ranks of battle, or ere the battle shout
had yet ceased to echo on your ear. Alone, with fever in your brain, with
fever in your hearts, with maddening throes of pain, forcing from your
manly lips the involuntary cry of agony, yet, with your native land
uppermost
in your thoughts, ye died.
And now, brethren, the sun sinking in the west, warns me to close. The
bright golden beams tint the tops of the trees, and fling a shower of light
over the roof of the ancient church. The sky above arches calm and azure,
as though the spirits of the dead smiled from yon clime upon our solemn
ceremonies. The hour is still and solemn, and all nature invites us to the
offering of prayer. Let us pray.
III.PRAYER FOR THE DEAD.
Father of Heaven, we bow before thee, under the temple of the clear
blue sky and within the shadow of yon oaken grove, we bow beside the
corses of the dead. Our hearts are sad, our souls are awed. Up to thy
throne we send our earnest prayers for this, our much-afflicted land. Turn,
oh! God, turn the burning sword from between us and the sun of thy
countenance
.
Lift the shadow of death from our land. And, as in the olden
times, thou didst save the oppressed, even when the blood-stained grasp of
wrong was at their throats, so save thou us, nowoh, most merciful God!
And if the voice of prayer is ever heard in thy courts, for the spirits of
the dead, then let our voices now plead with thee, for the ghosts of the
slain, as they crowd around the portals of the Unseen world.
Oh! Lord God, look into our hearts, and there behold every pulse
throbbing
,
every vein filling with one desire, which we now send up to thee,
with hands and soul upraisedthe desire of freedom for this fair land.
Give us success in this our most holy cause. In the name of the
martyred
dead of the past, in the name of that shadowy band, whose life-blood
dyes a thousand scaffolds, give us freedom.
In the name of Jesus give us peace! Make strong the hands of thy
servant
even George Washington. Make strong the hearts of his counsellors,
stir them up to greater deeds even than the deeds they have already done,
let thy presence be with our host, a pillar of cloud by day and a pillar of
fire by night.
And at last, when our calling shall have been fulfilled, when we have
done and suffered thy will here below, receive us into the Rest of the
Blessed.
So shall it be said of us
Blessed are the dead which die in the Lord,they rest from their
labors
,
and their works do follow them
!
The last words of the preacher, sank into the hearts of his hearers.
Every man felt awed, every soul was thrilled.
The preacher made a sign to the group of war-worn soldiers in
attendance
at the head of the graves. The coffins were lowered in their
receptacles
of death. The man of God advanced, and took a handful of earth,
from one of the uprising mounds.
There was universal silence around the graves, and thro' the grave-yard.
Earth to earth, ashes to ashes, dust to dust
.
The sound of the earth rattling on the coffin of General Nash, broke with
a strange echo on the air.
Slowly along the sod, passed the minister of heaven speaking the solemn
words of the last ceremony, as he flung the handful of earth upon each
coffin.
A single moment passed, and a file of soldiers, with upraised muscuets,
extended along the graves. The word of command rang out upon the air,
and the shot after shot, the alternating reports of the musquets, broke like
thunder over the graves of the laurelled dead.
The soldiers suddenly swept aside, and in a moment, a glittering cannon
was wheeled near the graves, with the cannonier standing with the lighted
linstock, by its side. The subdued word of command again was heard, the
earthquake thunder of the cannon shook the graveyard, and like a pall for
the mighty dead, the thick folds of smoke, waved heavily above the grave.
Again did the file of musquetry pour forth the fire, again did the cannons
send forth their flame, flashing down into the very graves of the dead, while
the old church walls gave back the echo.Again was the ceremony
repeated
,
and as the thick folds of cannon-smoke waved overhead, the
soldiers
opened to the right and left, and the pall-bearers of the dead advanced.
They advanced, and one by one looked into the graves of the slain.
This was the scene when Washington looked for the last time into the
grave of Nash and his death-mates.
The sun setting behind the grove of oaks threw a veil of sunshine over
the masses of armed men thronging the grave-yard, over the reversed arms,
and craped banner of blue and stars. The form of Washington, standing at
the head of the grave, was disclosed in all its majesty of proportion, his face
impressed with an expression of sorrow, and his right hand reversing
his craped sword; Waynethe gallant, the noble, the fearless Wayne
stood at his right shoulder, and then sweeping in a line along the graves,
extended the chieftains of the army, each face stamped with grief, each right
arm holding the reversed sword; there was the sagacious face of Greene,
the bluff visage of Knox, the commanding features of Sullivan, the manly
countenances of Maxwell, Stirling, Forman, Conway, and the other officers
of the continental host. All were grouped there beside the graves of the
slain, and as every eye was fixed upon the coffins sprinkled with earth, a
low, solemn peal of music floated along the air, and a veteran advancing to
the grave, flung to the wind the broad banner of blue and stars, and the last
glimpse of sun-light fell upon this solemn relic of the
Battle=Day of Germantown.
BOOK SECOND
WISSAHIKON.
9
THE WISSAHIKON.
Wissahikon
!
That name, soft as the wind of May, breathing its perfume over the
brow of the way-worn wanderermelodious as a burst of music, swelling
from afar, over the bosom of still waterssad and wild, as the last groan of
a dying warrior, who conquering all vain regrets by one strong impulse of
his passing soul, sternly gives up his life to GodWissahikon!
That name speaks to our hearts with a pathos all its own. Yes, it
speaks to our hearts with a strange and mingled meaning, whether written
Wissahickon, or Wissahiccon, or pronounced as it fell from the lips of the
Indian maidens in the olden time, who bathed their forms in its waters, and
adorned their raven hair with the lilies and wild roses that grow in its deep
woods
Wissahikone
!
That word speaks of rocks, piled up in colossal grandeur, with waves
murmuring at their feet, and dark green pines blooming forever on their
brows.
That name tells me of a tranquil stream, that flows from the fertile
meadows of White marsh, and then cleaves its way for eight miles, through
rocks of eternal granite, now reflecting on its waves the dark grey walls and
steep roof of some forest hidden mill, now burying itself beneath the
shadows of overhanging trees, and then comes laughing into the sun, like a
maiden smiling at the danger that is past.
We will go down to Wissahikon.
You have been there; some of you in the still summer afternoon, when
the light laugh of girlhood rang through the woodssome of you perchance
in the early dawn, or in the purple twilight when the shadows came darkly
over the waters.
But to go down into its glens at midnight, when silence like death is
brooding there! Then the storm-cloud gathers like a pallthen, clinging
to yon awful cliff that yawns above the blackness, you hear the Thunder
speak to the still woods, and the deeps far below, speak back again their
Thunder. Then at dead of night, you see the red lightning flashing down
over the tall pines, down over the dark waters, quivering and trembling with
its arrows of wrath, far into the shadows of the glen.
At last the storm-cloud rolls back its pall. The silver moon comes
shining out, smiling from her window in the sky. The Eagle too, lord of
the wild domain, starts from his perch, and wheels through the deep azure,
circling round the moon, bathing his pinions in her light as he looks for the
coming of his God, the sun.
Had you been there at dead of night, as I have been, you would know
something of the supernatural grandeur, the awful beauty of the
Wissahikon
;
then, even though you were an Atheist, you would have knelt down
and felt the existence of a God.
The Wissahikon wears a beauty all its own. True, the Hudson is
magnificent
with her mingled panorama of mountain and valley, tumultuous
river and tranquil bay. To me she seems a Queen, who reposes in strange
majesty, a crown of snow upon her forehead of granite, the leaf of the
Indian
corn, the spear of wheat, mingled in the girdle which binds her waist,
the murmur of rippling water ascending from the valley beneath her feet.
The Susquehanna is awfully sublime; a warrior who rushes from his
home in the forest, hews his way through primeval mountains, and howls
in his wrath as he hurries to the ocean. Ever and anon, like a Conqueror
overladened with the spoils of battle, he scatters a green island in his path,
or like the same Conqueror relenting from the fury of the fight, smiles like
Heaven in the wavelets of some tranquil bay.
Neither Queen, nor Warrior is the Wissahikon.
Let us look at its Image, as it rises before us.
A Prophetess, who with her cheek embrowned by the sun, and her dark
hairnot gathered in clusters or curling in ringletsfalling straightly to her
white shoulders, comes forth from her cavern in the woods, and speaks to
us in a low soft tone, that awes and wins our hearts, and looks at us with
eyes whose steady light and supernatural brightness bewilders our soul.
Yes, whenever I hear the wordWissahikonI fancy its woods and
waves, embodied in the form of an Indian Prophetess, of the far gone time.
Oh, there are strange legends hovering around those wild rocks and dells
legends of those Monks who dwelt there long ago, and worshipped God
without a creedlegends of that far gone time, when the white robed
Indian
priests came up the dell at dead of night, leading the victim to the altar
to the altar of bloody sacrificethat victim a beautiful and trembling girl.
Now let us listen to the Prophetess as she speaks, and while her voice
thrills, her eyes fire us, let us hear from her lips the Legends of the olden
times.
I.THE CONSECRATION OF THE DELIVERER.
It
stood in the shadows of the Wissahikon woods, that ancient
Monastery
,
its dark walls canopied by the boughs of the gloomy pine,
interwoven
with leaves of grand old oaks.
From the waters of the wood-hidden stream, a winding road led up to its
gates; a winding road overgrown with tall rank grass, and sheltered from
the light by the thick branches above.
A Monastery? Yes, a Monastery, here amid the wilds of Wissahikon,
in the year of Grace 1773, a Monastery built upon the soil of William
Penn!
Let me paint it for you, at the close of this calm summer day.
The beams of the sun, declining far in the west, shoot between the thickly
gathered leaves, and light up the green sward, around those massive gates,
and stream with sudden glory over the dark old walls. It is a Monastery,
yet here we behold no swelling dome, no Gothic turrets, no walls of
massive
stone. A huge square edifice, built one hundred years ago of the
trunks of giant oaks and pines, it rises amid the woods, like the temple of
some long forgotten religion. The roof is broken into many fantastic
forms;here it rises in a steep gable, yonder the heavy logs are laid
prostrate
;
again they swell into a shapeless mass, as though stricken by a
hurricane.
Not many windows are there in the dark old walls, but to the west four
large square spaces framed in heavy pieces of timber, break on your eye,
while on the other sides the old house presents one blank mass of logs,
rising
on logs.
No: not one blank mass, for at this time of year, when the breath of
June hides the Wissahikon in a world of leaves, the old Monastery looks
like a grim soldier, who scathed by time and battle, wears yet thick wreaths
of laurel over his armour, and about his brow.
Green vines girdle the ancient house on every side. From the squares
of the dark windows, from the intervals of the massive logs, they hang in
luxuriant festoons, while the shapeless roof is all one mass of leaves.
Nay, even the wall of logs which extends around the old house, with a
ponderous gate to the west, is green with the touch of June. Not a trunk
but blooms with some drooping vine; even the gateposts, each a solid
column of oak, seem to wave to and fro, as the summer breeze plays with
their drapery of green leaves.
It is a sad, still hour. The beams of the sun stream with fitful splendor
over the green sward. That strange old mansion seems as sad and
desolate
as the tomb. But suddenlyhark! Do you hear the clanking of
those bolts, the crashing of the unclosing gates?
The gates creak slowly aside!let us steal behind this cluster of pines,
and gaze upon the inhabitants of the Monastery, as they come forth for
their evening walk
Three figures issue from the opened gates, an old man whose withered
features and white hairs are thrown strongly into the fading light, by his
long robe of dark velvet. On one arm, leans a young girl, also dressed in
black, her golden hair fallingnot in ringletsbut in rich masses, to her
shoulders. She bends upon his arm, and with that living smile upon her
lips, and in her eyes, look up into his face.
On the other arm, a young man, whose form, swelling with the proud
outlines of early manhood, is attired in a robe or gown, dark as his father's
while his bronzed face, shaded by curling brown hair, seems to reflect the
silent thought, written upon the old man's brow.
They pace slowly along the sod. Not a word is spoken. The old man
raises his eyes, and lifts the square cap from his browlook! how that
golden beam plays along his brow, while the evening breeze tosses his
white hairs. There is much suffering, many deep traces of the Past,
written
on his wrinkled face, but the light of a wild enthusiasm beams from his
blue eyes.
The young manhis dark eyes wildly glaring fixed upon the sodmoves
by the old man's side, but speaks no word.
The girl, that image of maidenly grace, nurtured into beauty, within an
hour's journey of the city, and yet afar from the world, still bends over that
aged arm, and looks smilingly into that withered face, her glossy hair
waving
in the summer wind.
Who are these, that come hither, pacing, at the evening hour, along the
wild moss? The father and his children!
What means that deep strange light, flashing not only from the blue eyes
of the father, but from the dark eyes of his son?
Does it need a second glance to tell you, that it is the light of Fanaticism,
that distortion of Faith, the wild glare of Superstition, that deformity of
Religion
?
The night comes slowly down. Still the Father and son pace the ground
in silence, while the breeze freshens and makes low music among the
leaves.Still the young girl, bending over the old man's arm, smiles
tenderly
in his face, as though she would drive the sadness from his brow with
one gleam of her mild blue eyes.
At lastwithin the shadows of the gate, their faces lighted by the last
gleam of the setting sunthe old man and his son stand like figures of
stone, while each grasps a hand of the young girl.
Is it not a strange yet beautiful picture? The old Monastery forms one
dense mass of shade; on either side extends the darkening forest, yet here,
within the portals of the gate, the three figures are grouped, while a warm,
soft mass of tufted moss, spreads before them. The proud manhood of the
son, contrasted with the white locks of the father, the tender yet voluptuous
beauty of the girl relieving the thought and sadness, which glooms over
each brow.
Holdthe Father presses the wrist of his Son with a convulsive grasp
hush! Do you hear that low deep whisper?
At last, it comes to my soul, the Fulfilment of Prophecy! he whispers
and is silent again, but his lip trembles and his eye glares.
But the timeFather
the time?
the Son replies in the same deep
voice, while his eye dilating, fires with the same feeling that swells his
Father's heart.
The last day of this yearthe third hour after midnight
THE
Deliverer
will come
!
These words may seem lame and meaningless, when spoken again, but
had you seen the look that kindled over the old man's face, his white hand
raised above his head, had you heard his deep voice swelling through the
silence of the woods, each word would ring on your ear, as though it
quivered
from a spirit's tongue.
Then the old man and his son knelt on the sod, while the young girl
looking in their faces with wonder and awesank silently beside them.
The tones of Prayer broke upon the stillness of the darkening woods.
Tell us the meaning of this scene. Wherefore call this huge edifice,
where dark logs are clothed in green leaves, by the old world name of
Monastery
?
Who are thesefather, son, and daughterthat dwell within its
walls?
Seventeen years agofrom this year of Grace, 1773,there came to the
wilds of the Wissahikon, a man in the prime of mature manhood, clad in a
long, dark robe, with a cross of silver gleaming on his breast. With one
arm he gathered to his heart a smiling babe, a little girl, whose golden hair
floated over his dark dress like sunshine over a pall; by the other hand he
led a dark haired boy.
His name, his origin, his object in the wilderness, no one knew, but
purchasing
the ruined Block-House, which bore on its walls and timbers the
marks of many an Indian fight, he shut himself out from all the world. His
son, his daughter, grew up together in this wild solitude. The voice of
prayer was often heard at dead of night, by the belated huntsman, swelling
from the silence of the lonely house.
By slow degrees, whether from the cross which the old stranger wore
upon his breast, or from the sculptured images which had been seen within
the walls of his forest home, the place was calledthe Monasteryand its
occupant the Priest.
Had he been drawn from his native home by crime? Was his name
enrolled among the titled and the great of his Father-land, Germany? Or,
perchance, he was one of those stern visionaries, the Pietists of Germany,
who, lashed alike by Catholic and Protestant persecutors, brought to the
wilds of Wissahikon their beautiful Fanaticism?
For that Fanaticism, professed by a band of brothers, who years before,
driven from Germany, came here to Wissahikon, built their Monastery, and
worshipped God, without a written creed, was beautiful.
It was a wild belief, tinctured with the dreams of Alchemists, it may be,
yet still full of faith in God, and love to man. Persecuted by the
Protestants
of Germany, as it was by the Catholics of France, it still treasured
the Bible as its rule and the Cross as its symbol.
The Monastery, in which the brothers of the faith lived for long years,
was situated on the brow of a hill, not a mile from the old Block-House.
Here the Brothers had dwelt, in the deep serenity of their own hearts, until
one evening they gathered in their garden, around the form of their dying
father, who yielded his soul to God in their midst, while the setting sun
and the calm silence of universal nature gave a strange grandeur to the
scene.
But it was not with this Brotherhood that the stranger of the Block-House
held communion.
His communion was with the dark-eyed son, who grew up, drinking the
fanaticism of his father, in many a midnight watch with the golden-haired
daughter, whose smile was wont to drive the gloom from his brow, the
wearing anxiety from his heart.
Who was the stranger? No one knew. The farmer of the Wissahikon
had often seen his dark-robed form, passing like a ghost under the solemn
pines; the wandering huntsman had many a time, on his midnight ramble,
heard the sounds of prayer breaking along the silence of the woods from
the Block-House walls: yet still the life, origin, objects of the stranger were
wrapt in impenetrable mystery.
Would you know more of his life? Would you penetrate the mystery
of this dim old Monastery, shadowed by the thickly-clustered oaks and
pines, shut out from the world by the barrier of impenetrable forests?
Would you know the meaning of those strange words, uttered by the old
man, on the calm summer evening?
Come with me, thenat midnighton the last day of 1773. We will
enter the Block-House together, and behold a scene, which, derived from a
tradition of the past, is well calculated to thrill the heart with a deep awe.
It is midnight: there is snow on the ground: the leafless trees fling their
bared limbs against the cold blue of the starlit sky.
The old Block-House rises dark and gloomy from the snow, with the
heavy trees extending all around.
The wind sweeps through the woods, not with a boisterous roar, but the
strange sad cadence of an organ, whose notes swell away through the arches
of a dim cathedral aisle.
Who would dream that living beings tenanted this dark mansion, arising
in one black mass from the bed of snow, its huge timbers, revealed in
various indistinct forms, by the cold clear light of the stars? Centred in
the midst of the desolate woods, it looks like the abode of spirits, or yet like
some strange sepulchre, in which the dead of long-past ages lie entombed.
There is no foot-track on the winding roadthe snow presents one
smooth white surfaceyet the gates are thrown wide open, as if ready for
the coming of a welcome guest.
Through this low, narrow dooralso flung wide openalong this dark
corridor, we will enter the Monastery.
In the centre of this room, illumined by the light of two tall white candles,
sits the old man, his slender form clad in dark velvet, with the silver cross
gleaming on his bosom, buried in the cushions of an oaken chair.
His slender hands are laid upon his kneeshe sways slowly to and fro
while his large blue eye, dilating with a wild stare, is fixed upon the
opposite wall.
Hush! Not a wordnot even the creaking of a footstepfor this old
man, wrapped in his thoughts, sitting alone in the centre of this strangely
furnished room, fills us with involuntary reverence.
Strangely furnished room? Yes, circular in form, with a single doorway,
huge panels of dark oaken wainscot, rise from the bared floor to the gloomy
ceiling. Near the old man arises a white altar, on which the candles are
placed, its spotless curtain floating down to the floor. Between the candles,
you behold, a long, slender flagon of silver, a wreath of laurel leaves, fresh
gathered from the Wissahikon hills, and a Holy Bible, bound in velvet, with
antique clasps of gold.
Behind the altar, gloomy and sullen, as if struggling with the shadows of
the room, arises a cross of Iron.
On yonder small fire-place, rude logs of oak and hickory send up their
mingled smoke and flame.
The old man sits there, his eyes growing wilder in their gaze every
moment, fixed upon the solitary door. Still he sways to and fro, and now
his thin lips move, and a faint murmur fills the room.
He will come!
mutters the Priest of the Wissahikon, as common
rumor named him.
At the third hour after midnight, the Deliverer will
come!
These words acquire a singular interest from the tone and look which
accompany their utterance.
Harkthe door opensthe young man with the bronzed face and deep
dark eyes, appearsadvances to his father's side.
Fatherwhispers the young manMay it not be a vain fancy after
all! This Hope that the Deliverer will come ere the rising of the sun?
You can see the old man turn suddenly roundhis eye blazes as he
grasps his son by the wrist.
Seventeen years ago, I left my father-land, became an exile and an
out-cast
!
Seventeen years ago, I forsook the towers of my race, that even
now, darken over the bosom of the RhineI, whose name was ennobled
by the ancestral glories of thirteen centuries, turned my back at once on
pomp, power,all that is worshipped by the herd of mankind! In my
native land, they have believed me dead for many yearsthe castle, the
broad domains that by the world's law, are yours, my son, now own
another's ruleand here we are, side by side, in this rude temple of the
Wissahikon! Why is this, my son?Speak, Paul, and answer me, why
do we dwell together, the father and his children, in this wild forest of a
strange land?
The sun veiled his eyes with his clasped hands: the emotion of his
father's look, thrilled him to the soul.
I will tell you why! Seventeen years ago, as I bent over the body of
my dead wife, even in the death-vault of our castle, on the Rhine, the
Voice of God, spake to my soulbade me resign all the world and its toys
bade me take my children, and go forth to a strange land!
And there await the Fulfilment of Prophecy! whispered Paul, raising
his hand from the clasped hands.
For seventeen years I have buried my soul, in the pages of that book
I have shared your studies, father! Reared afar from the toll and the
vanity of worldly life, I have made my home with you in this hermitage.
Together we have weptprayedwatched over the pages of Revelation!
You have become part of my soul, said the Priest of Wissahikon, in a
softened voice, as he laid his withered hand upon the white forehead of his
son: you might have been noble in your native land; yes, your sword
might have carved for you a gory renown from the corses of dead men,
butchered in battle; or the triumphs of poetry and art, might have clothed
your brow in laurel, and yet you have chosen your lot with me; with me,
devoted life and soul to the perusal of God's solemn book!
The dark eye of the son began to burn, with the same wild light that
blazed over his father's face.
And our studies, our long and painful search into the awful world, which
the Bible opens to our view, has ended in a knowledge of these great truths
The Old World is sunk in all manner of crime, as was the Ante-Deluvian
World;
THE
New World
is given to man as a refuge, even as the Ark
was given to Noah and his children
.
The New World is the last altar of human freedom left on the surface
of the Globe. Never shall the footsteps of Kings pollute its soil. It is
the last hope of man
, God has spoken, and it is soAmen!
The old man's voice rung, in deep, solemn tones, through the lonely
room, while his eye seemed to burn as with the fire of Prophecy.
The voice of God has spoken to me, in my thoughts by day, in my
dreams by night
I will send a
Deliverer
to this land of the New World,
who shall save my people from physical bondage, even as my Son saved
them from the bondage of spiritual death!
And to-night he will come, at the third hour after midnight, he will
come through yonder door, and take upon himself his great Mission, to free
the New World from the yoke of the Tyrant!
Yes, my son, six months ago, on that calm summer evening, as with
Catherine leaning on one arm, you on the other, I strolled forth along the
woods, that voice whispered a message to my soul! To-night the
Deliverer
will come!
10
All is ready for his coming! exclaimed Paul, advancing to the altar.
Behold the Crown, the Flagon of Anointing Oil, the Bible and the Cross!
The old man arose, lifting his withered hands above his head, while the
light streamed over his silver hairs.
Even as the Prophets of old anointed the brows of men, chosen by
God to do great deeds in His name, so will I,purified by the toil and
prayer, and self-denial of seventeen long years,anoint the forehead of the
Deliverer!
Hark! As the voice of the aged enthusiast, tremulous with emotion,
quivers on the air, the clock in the hall without, tells the hour of twelve!
As the tones of that bell ring through the lonely Block House, like a voice
from the other worlddeep, sad and echoingthe last minute of 1773 sank
in the glass of Time, and 1774 was born.
Then they knelt, silently beside the altar, the old man and his son. The
white hairs of the Priest, mingled with the brown locks of Paul; their hands
clasped together rested upon the Bible, which was opened at the Book of
Revelations.
Their separate prayers breathed in low whispers from each lip, mingled
together, and went up to Heaven in ONE.
An hour passed. Hark! Do you hear the old clock again? How that
sullen
One
! swells through the silent halls!
Still they kneel together therestill the voice of the prayer quivers from
each tongue.
Another hour, spent in silent prayer, with bowed head and bended knees.
As the clock speaks out the hour of two, the old man rises and paces the
floor.
Place your hand upon my heart, my son! Can you feel its
throbbings
?
Upon my browah! it burns like living fire! The hour draws
nighhe comes! Yes, my heart throbs, my brain fires, but my faith in
God is firmthe Deliverer will come!
Vain were the attempt to picture the silent agony of that old man's face!
Call him dreamercall him fanaticwhat you will, you must still admit
that a great soul throbbed within his brainstill you must reverence the
strong heart which beats within his shrunken chest.
Still must you remember that this old man was once a renowned lord;
that he forsook all that the world holds dear, buried himself for seventeen
years in the wilds of this forest, his days and nights spent amid the dark
pages of the Revelations of Saint John.
Up and down the oaken floor, now by the altar, where the light shone
over his brow, now in the darkness where the writhings of his countenance
were lost in shadows, the old man hurried along, his eye blazing with a
wilder light, his withered cheek with a warmer glow.
Meanwhile the son remained kneeling in prayer. The lights burned
dimlythe room was covered with a twilight gloom. Still the Iron Cross
was seenthe whole altar still broke through the darkness, with its silver
Flagon and Laurel Crown.
Hark! That soundthe clock is on the hour of three! The old man
starts, quivers, listens!
One
! rings through the desolate mansion.
I hear no sound! mutters the enthusiast. But the words had not
passed on his lips, when Two! swells on the air.
He comes not! cries Paul darting to his feet, his features quivering
with suspense. They clasp their hands togetherthey listen with frenzied
intensity.
Still no footstep! Not a sound! gasped Paul.
But he
will
come! and the old man, sublime in the energy of
fanaticism
,
towered erect, one hand to his heart, while the other quivered in
the air.
Three
! The last stroke of the bell swelledechoedand died away.
He comes not! gasped the son, in agonyBut yes! Is there not a
footstep on the frozen snow? Hark! Father, father! do you hear that
footstep? It is on the threshold nowit advances
He
comes! whispered the old man, while the sweat stood out in
beads from his withered brow.
It advances, father! Yes, along the hallhark! There is a hand
on the doorhah! All is silent again! It is but a delusionno! He is
come at last!
At last he is come! gasped the old man, and with one impulse they
sank on their knees. Hark! You hear the old door creak on its hinges,
as it swings slowly opena strange voice breaks the silence.
Friends, I have lost my way in the forest, said the voice, speaking in
a calm, manly tone. Can you direct me to the right way?
The old man looked up; a cry of wonder trembled from his lips. As
for the son, he gazed in silence on the Stranger, while his features were
stamped with inexpressible surprise.
The Stranger stood on the threshold, his face to the light, his form thrown
boldly forward, by the darkness at his back.
He stood there, not as a Conqueror on the battle field, with the spoils of
many nations trampled under his feet.
Towering above the stature of common men, his form was clad in the
dress of a plain gentleman of that time, fashioned of black velvet, with
ruffles
on the bosom and around the wrist, diamond buckles gleaming from his
shoes.
Broad in the shoulders, beautiful in the sinewy proportions of each limb,
he stood there, extending his hat in one hand, while the other gathered his
heavy cloak around the arm.
His white forehead, large, overarched eyes, which gleamed even through
the darkness of the room with a calm, clear light; his lips were firm; his
chin round and full; the general contour of his face stamped with the settled
beauty of mature manhood, mingled with the fire of chivalry.
In one word, he was a man whom you would single out among a crowd
of ten thousand, for his grandeur of bearing, his calm, collected dignity of
expression and manner.
Friends, he again began, as he started back, surprised at the sight of
the kneeling enthusiasts, I have lost my way
Thou hast not lost thy way, spoke the voice of the old man, as he
arose and confronted the stranger; thou hast found thy way to usefulness
and immortal renown!
The Stranger advanced a footstep, while a warm glow overspread his
commanding face. Paul stood as if spell-bound by the calm gaze of his
clear, deep eyes.
Naydo not start, nor gaze upon me in such wonder! I tell thee the
voice that speaks from my lips, is the voice of Revelation. Thou art called
to a great work; kneel before the altar and receive thy mission!
Nearer to the altar drew the Stranger.
This is but follyyou make a mock of me! he began; but the wild
gaze of the old man thrilled his heart, as with magnetic fire. He paused,
and stood silent and wondering.
Nay, doubt me not! To-night, filled with strange thoughts on your
country's Future, you laid yourself down to sleep within your habitation in
yonder city. But sleep fled from your eyesa feeling of restlessness drove
you forth into the cold air of night
This is true! muttered the Stranger in a musing tone, while his face
expressed surprise.
As you dashed along, mounted on the steed which soon will bear your
form in the ranks of battle, the cold air of night fanned your hot brow, but
could not drive from your soul the Thought of your Country!
`How knew you this? and the Stranger started forward, grasping the
old man suddenly by the wrist.
Deeper and bolder thrilled the tones of the old Enthusiast.
The rein fell loosely on your horse's neckyou let him wander, you
cared not whither! Still the thought that oppressed your soul was the
future
of your country. Still great hopesdim visions of
what is to come
floating panoramas of battle and armed legionsdarted one by one over
your soul. Even as you stood on the threshold of yonder door, asking, in
calm tones, the way through the forest, another and a deeper question rose
to your lips
I confess it! said the Stranger, his tone catching the deep emotion of
the old man's voice. As I stood upon the threshold, the question that
rose to my lips was
Is it lawful for a
SUBJECT
to draw sword against his
King
?
Man! You read the heart! and this strange man of commanding
form and thoughtful brow, gazed fixedly in the eyes of the Enthusiast,
while his face expressed every conflicting emotion of doubt, suspicion,
surprise
and awe.
Nay, do not gaze upon me in such wonder! I tell thee a great work
has been allotted unto thee, by the
Father
of all souls! Kneel by this
altarand here, in the silence of night, amid the depths of these wild woods
will I anoint thee Deliverer of this great land, even as the men of Judah,
in the far-gone time, anointed the brows of the chosen David!
It may have been a sudden impulse, or perchance, some conviction of the
future flashed over the Stranger's soul, but as the gloom of that chamber
gathered round him, as the voice of the old man thrilled in his ear, he felt
those knees, which never yielded to man, sink beneath him, he bowed
before
the altar, his brow bared, and his hands laid upon the Book of God.
The light flashed over his bold features, glowing with the beauty of
manhood
in its prime, over his proud form, dilating with a feeling of
inexpressible
agitation.
On one side of the altar stood the old manthe Priest of the Wissahikon
his silver hair waving aside from his flushed browon the other, his son,
bronzed in face, but thoughtful in the steady gaze of his large full eyes.
Around this strange group all was gloom: the cold wintry air poured
through the open door, but they heeded it not.
Thou art called to the great work of a Champion and Deliverer!
Soon thou wilt ride to battle at the head of legionssoon thou wilt lead a
people on to freedomsoon thy sword will gleam like a meteor over the
ranks of war!
As the voice of the old man in the dark robe, with the silver cross
flashing
on his heart, thrills through the chamberas the Stranger bows his
head as if in reverence, while the dark-browed son looks silently onlook
yonder, in the dark shadows of the doorway!
A young form, with a dark mantle floating round her white robes, stands
trembling there. As you look, her blue eye dilates with fear, her hair
streams in a golden shower, down to the uncovered shoulders. Her finger
is pressed against her lip; she stands doubting, fearing, trembling on the
threshold.
Unseen by all, she fears that her father may work harm to the kneeling
Stranger. What knows she of his wild dreams of enthusiasm? The
picture which she beholds terrifies her. This small and gloomy chamber,
lighted by the white candlesthe altar rising in the gloomthe Iron Cross
confronting the kneeling man, like a thing of evil omenher brother, mute
and wonderingher father, with white hairs floating aside from his flushed
forehead. The picture was singular and impressive: the winter wind,
moaning sullenly without, imparted a sad and organ-like music to the scene.
Dost thou promise, that when the appointed time arrives, thou wilt be
found ready, sword in hand, to fight for thy country and thy God?
It was in tones broken by emotion, that the Stranger simply answered
I do!
Dost thou promise, in the hour of thy glorywhen a nation shall bow
before theeas in the fierce moment of adversity,when thou shalt
behold
thy soldiers starving for want of breadto remember the great truth,
written in these words`
I am but the Minister of God in the great work
of a nation's freedom
.'
Again the bowed head, again the tremulousI do promise!
Then, in
His
name, who gave the New World to the millions of the
human race, as the last altar of their rights, I do consecrate thee its
Deliverer
!
With the finger of his extended hand, touched with the anointing oil, he
described the figure of a Cross on the white forehead of the Stranger, who
raised his eyes, while his lips murmured as if in prayer.
Never was nobler King anointed beneath the shadow of Cathedral arch
never did holier Priest administer the solemn vow! A poor Cathedral,
this rude Block House of the Wissahikona plainly-clad gentleman, this
kneeling Strangera wild Enthusiast, the old man! I grant it all. And
yet, had you seen the Enthusiasm of the white-haired Minister, reflected in
the Stranger's brow, and cheek, and eyes, had you marked the contrast
between
the shrunken form of the Priest, and the proud figure of the
Anointed,both quivering with the same agitation,you would confess
with me, that this Consecration was full as holy, in the sight of Heaven, as
that of Good King George.
And all the while that young man stood gazing on the stranger in silent
awe, while the girl, trembling on the threshold, a warm glow lightens up
her face, as she beheld the scene.
When the time comes, go forth to victory! On thy brow, no
conqueror's
blood-red wreath, but this crown of fadeless laurel!
He extends his hand, as if to wreath the Stranger's brow, with the leafy
crownyet look! A young form steals up to his side, seizes the crown
from his hand, and, ere you can look again, it falls upon the bared brow of
the kneeling man.
He looks up and beholds that young girl, with the dark mantle gathered
over her white robes, stand blushing and trembling before the altar, as
though frightened at the boldness of the deed.
It is well! said the aged man, regarding his daughter with a kindly
smile. From whom should the Deliverer of a Nation receive his crown
of laurel, but from the hands of a stainless woman!
Rise! The Champion and Leader of a People! spoke the deep voice
of the son, as he stood before the altar, surveying, with one glance, the face
of his fatherthe countenance of the blushing girl, and the bowed head of
the Stranger. Rise, sir, and take this hand, which was never yet given
to man! I know not thy name, yet, on this book, I swear to be faithful to
thee, even to the death!
The Stranger rose, proudly he stood there, as with the consciousness of
his commanding look and form. The laurel-wreath encircled his white
forehead; the cross, formed by the anointing oil, glistened in the light.
Paul, the son, buckled a sword to his side; the old man extended his
hands as if in blessing, while the young girl looked up silently into his face.
They all beheld the form of this strange man shake with emotion; while
that face, whose calm beauty had won their hearts, now quivered in every
fibre.
The wind moaned sadly over the frozen snow, yet these words, uttered
by the stranger, were heard distinctly by all
From you, old man, I take the vow! From you, fair girl, the laurel!
From you, brave friend, the sword! On this book I swear to be faithful
unto all!
And as the light flashed over his quivering features, he laid his hand upon
the Book and kissed the hilt of the sword.
Years passed.
The memory of that New Year's night of 1774, perchance, had passed
with years, and lost all place in the memory of living being.
America was a nationWashington was President.
Through the intervals of the trees shine the beams of the declining sun,
but the Block-House was a mass of ruins. Burned one night by the British,
in the darkest hour of the war, its blackened timbers were yet encircled by
green leaves.
Still the smiling summer sun shone over the soft sward and among the
thickly clustered trees of Wissahikon.
But FatherSonDaughterwhere are they?
Yonder, a square enclosure of stone shuts three green mounds out from
the world.
The sad story of their lives may not be told in few words. The terrors
of that night when the Block-House was fired, andbut we must not speak
of it! All we can say islook yonder, and behold their graves!
Hark! The sound of horses' hoofs! A man of noble presence appears,
guiding his gallant grey steed, along the winding road. He dismounts; the
horse wanders idly over the sod, cropping the fragrant wild grass.
This man of noble presence, dressed in plain black velvet, with a star
gleaming on his breast, with a face, magnificent in its wrinkled age, as it was
beautiful in its chivalric manhoodthis man of noble presence, before whom
kings may stand uncovered, approaches the ruin of the Block-House.
Do you see his eye light up again with youthful fire, his lip quiver with
an agitation deeper than battle-rage?
There he stands, while the long shadows of the trees darken far over the
swardthere, while the twilight deepens into night, gazing with a heaving
chest and quivering lip, upon the Ruins of the old Block-House.
Perchance he thinks of the dead, or it may be his thoughts are with
scenes of the Pastperchance, even now, a strange picture rises before him!
That picture a darkened chamber, with a white altar rising in its
centre
,
while an old man, and his brave son, and virgin daughter, all gather
round a warrior form, hailing him with one voice
THE DELIVERER.
[5]
[5]
Note by the Author
In this Legend, I have endeavored to compress an old-time
tradition of the Wissahikon, which, related with justice to all its details, would fill a
volume. There is no spot in the landnot even on the storied hills of the Santee, or
the beautiful wilds of the Kenebecmore hallowed of poetry and romance, than this
same Wissahikon, which, attainable by half an hour's journey from the city, yet
preserves
its rugged grandeur of rock, and stream, and tree; and is to-day what it was
two hundred years ago. It was here that the Protestant Monks made their home,
more than a hundred years gone by; here, driven from their father-land, by the
united
persecutions of Protestant and Catholic, they reared their Monastery, and
worshipped
God, in the deep silence of primeval forests. The man who sneers at the
first settlers of Pennsylvania, terming them in derision, (as little minds are wont,)
the
ignorant Germans
, etc. etc., should come here to the wilds of Wissahikon, and
learn something of the philosophy, the religion, and toleration of these German
colonists
.
The Legend will be more clearly understood when it is known that the belief
was prevalent among these Pietists of the
Coming of a Great Man
, who was to
appear in the wilderness, in fulfilment of a Prophecy in the Book of Revelations.
II.THE MIDNIGHT DEATH.
Let
me tell you a legend of the Revolutiona legend that even now
makes my blood run cold to think upon.
You all have seen the massive rock that projects out into the roadside
near the Red Bridge. You have seen the level space, that spreads from
this rock to that ancient buttonwood tree; you have seen that cluster of
mills, and cottages and barns, nestling there, in the embrace of the wild
Wissahikon, with the dark rocks and the darker trees frowning far above.
It was here along this open spaceabout the time of the Battle of
Germantown
it
was here at dead of night, when the moon was shining down
through a wilderness of floating clouds, that there came an old man and his
four sons, all armed with rifle, powder-horn and knife.
They came stealing down that rockthey stood in the centre of that
level spacea passing ray of moonlight shone over the tall form of that old
man, with his long white hairs floating on the breezeover the manly
figures of his sons.
And why came that old farmer from the woods at dead of night, stealing
toward the Wissahikon, with his four tall sons around him, armed with rifle
and with knife?
To-night there is a meeting at you lonely house far up the Wissahikon
a meeting of all the farmers of Germantown, who wish to join the army
of Mister Washington, now hiding away in the wilds of the Skippack.
The old farmer and his children go to join that meeting. Old as he is,
there is yet fiery blood in his veinsold as he is, he will yet strike a blow
for George Washington.
Suddenly he turnshe flings the blaze of a lantern full in the faces of
his sons.
You are all here, my children, he said, and yet not all. A gleam
of deep sorrow shot from the calm blue eye.
In that moment he remembered that missing sonhis youngest boy with
those laughing locks of golden hair, with that eye of summer blue.
One year ago from this night that youth, George Derwent, had
disappeared
no
one knew whither. There was a deep mystery about it all.
It was true that this young man, at the time of his disappearance, was
betrothed
to a beautiful girlan orphan childwho had been reared in the
family of an old Tory down the Wissahikon, an old Tory named Isaac
Warden, who was in the pay of the British. It was true that there was
some strange connection between this Tory and young Derwent; yet old
Michael his father, had heard no tidings of his son for a yearthere was a
dark mystery about the whole affair.
And while the old man stood there, surveying the faces of his sons, there
came stealing along the narrow road, from the shadows of the cottage and
mill, the form of a young and beautiful girl, with a dark mantle thrown
loosely over her white dress, with her long black hair waving in free tresses
about her shoulders.
It was Ellen, the betrothed of George Derwent, who had now been
missing
from the wilds of Wissahikon for a year.
And why comes this orphan girl, with her full dark eye, with her long
black hair waving on the breeze, with her lovely form veiled in a loose
mantle? Why came she hither so lonely at dead of night?
This night, one year ago, George Derwent bade her good-bye under the
shade of that buttonwood treetold her that some dark mysterious cause
would lead him from the valley for a yearand then, pressing the last
good-bye on her lips, swore to meet her under this same tree, after the
lapse of a year, at this very hour.
And now she comes to meet her loverand now she comes to keep
her tryst.
And the moon, beaming from the parted clouds, fell over her form, as she
came in all her beauty toward that buttonwood tree, looking for all the
world like the spirit of that lonely dell.
With a muttered shriek she beheld old Michael standing there. Then,
rushing forward, she seized his withered hand, and bade him beware of the
lonely house of the Wissahikon.
That night, at the old Tory's house, she had overheard the plot of some
11
British troopers to surprise the meeting of the patriot farmersto surprise
them and crush them at a blow.
Even as she spoke, grasping that old man's withered hand, there to the
south, was heard the tramp of steeds. Already the British troopers came
on to the work of massacre.
A cloud passed over the moonit was darkin a moment it was light
again.
That level space between the rock and the tree was vacantthe maiden
was gone into the shade of the forest treesand there on that bold rock,
half hidden by the thick foliage, there stood Michael Derwent and his four
sons, waiting for the assassin-band.
Hark! The tramp of steeds! Nearand near and nearer yet it grows!
Look! They emerge from the shadow of the mill, ten British troopers,
mounted on stout steeds, with massy cap upon each brow, pistols in each
holster, swords by each side.
For a moment the moon shone over their glittering array, and then all is
dark. Hark to that old man's whisper
My boys, do you see them Britishers? Mark each one of you his
man; and when they cross the line between this rock and that Buttonwood
treethen fire!
And they came on.
The captain of the band waved his sword boastingly in the air.
In a moment, he cried, we will bein the midst of the rebelshe would
have said; but the words died on his lips.
He fell from his steedwith a horrid curse he fellhe was dead!
Did you see that flash from the trees? Did you hear that shout of old
Michael? Did you hear the crack of the rifles?
Look, as the smoke goes up to Heavenlook, as the moon shines out
from a cloud!
Where, a moment ago, were ten bold troopers riding forward at their
ease, now are but six. There are four dead men upon the groundyonder
through the Wissahikon dash four riderless steeds.
With a wild yell the six troopers spur their horses to the fatal rockthey
rear their hoofs against its breastthere is a moment of murder and death.
Look! That trooper with the slouching hatthe dark plume drooping
over his browhe breasts his steed against the rockthat jet black horse
flings his hoof high against the flinty barrier. While the moon hides her
face behind that cloud, that trooper with the plume drooping over his brow,
leans over the neck of his steedhe seizes old Michael by the throat, he
drags him from the rock, he spurs his horse toward the stream, and that old
man hangs there, quivering at the saddle-bow.
Then it was that old Michael made a bold struggle for his life. He drew
his hunting knife from his belthe raised it in the darkened air; but look
the trooper snatches it from his grasp.
Die, Rebel! he shouts. Bending over his steed, he strikes it deep
into the old man's neck down to his heart.
Then the moon shone out. Then, as the old man fell, the moon shone
over his face, convulsed in death, over his glaring eyes, over his long white
hair, dabbled in blood.
He fell with the knife sticking in his throat.
Then the trooper slowly dismounted from his steedhe kneels beside
the corsehis long dark plume falls over the face of the dead man.
And there he kneels, while the people of the valley, aroused by the
sound of conflict, come hastening on with torchesthere, while that other
band of British troopers, sweeping from the north, surprise the lonely house
of the Wissahikon, and come over the stream with their prisoner in their
graspthere while the sons of Michael Derwentthere are only two now
stood pinioned beside the corse of their father, there kneels that trooper,
with his long plume drooping over the dead man's face.
Lookthat old man with those hawk-like eyes, the sharp nose and thin
lipsthat is the old Tory, Isaac Warden.
Lookthat fair girl, stealing from the shade of that tree it is Ellen, the
orphan girl, the betrothed of the missing George Derwent.
Look! The trees towering above are reddened by the light of torches.
Harkthe Wissahikon rolls murmuringly onstill that trooper kneels
there, bending down with that long dark plume drooping over the dead
man's face.
A strange shudderan unknown fear thrills through the hearts of all
around. No one dared to arouse the kneeling man.
At last that burly trooper advanceshe lays his hand upon the shoulder
of the kneeling manhe bids him look up. And he does look up!
Ah, what a shudder ran through the groupah, what a groan was heard
from the white lips of those two sons of Michael Derwent! Even that
British captain starts back in horror of that face.
The trooper looked upthe light shone upon a young face with light
blue eyes, and locks of golden hair waving all around it,but there was a
horror written on that face, worse than death, a horror like that which
stamps the face of a soul forever lost.
It was the face of George Derwenthe knelt beside the dead body of
his fatherwith that knife sticking in his throat.
For a moment there was an awful silence. The Parricide slowly rose,
turned his face from the dead, and folded his arms.
Then a light footstep broke the deep silence of this scenea fair form
came softly through the crowdit was Ellen, the Orphan Girl.
GeorgeGeorge, I see you once more. You are come, she cried, in
her wild joy, rushing to his arms. But the cry of joy died away in a
groan of horror. She beheld that awful faceone of her dark tresses swept
his clenched right hand. That hand was wet with blood.
Then like a crushed reed, she cowered back upon the ground. Her
lover spoke not, but he slowly raised that blood-red hand in the light, and
thenhe pointed to the corse of Michael Derwent, with the reeking knife
standing out from the gash along the throat.
Then the full horror of that hour burst upon the maiden's heart. Then
she slowly rose, then she laid her quivering hand upon the arm of that
hoary TraitorIsaac Warden.
Old man! she whispered, in that low deep tone that came from her
bursting heart.
It is now one year since you told George Derwent that he could not
win my handthe hand of your son's childunless he engaged in your
service as a British spy, (this night, and this night only did I learn the
mystery of that foul bargain.) For one year you have reaped the gains of
his degradationand now, after that year is past, he, George Derwent, who
loved your son's daughter, with as true a love as ever throbbed beneath the
blue heavenshe returns to reap his harvest, andoh, Godbehold that
harvest!
And with her dark eyes starting from their sockets, she pointed to the
ghastly son, and the dead father. Then in low, deep tones, a curse trembled
from her white lipsthe orphan's curse upon that hoary traitor. And he
trembled. Yes, grown grey in guilt, he trembled, for there is something so
dark, so dread in that curse of a wronged orphan, as it quivers up there,
that methinks the angels around the Throne of God turn pale and weep at
the sound.
And then while this scene froze the bystanders with awe, George
Derwent
slowly opened his vesthe unstrung a chain of slender gold from his
neck, he took the locket from the place where it had hung for one year;
moved by each throbbing of his hearthe gave it to the maiden.
He then pointed to her formand then to Heaven. To his ownand
then downward. That gesture spoke volumes.
You to HeavenIthere.
Then with that blood-stained hand he tore the British Lion from his
breasthe trampled it under foot. Then gathering the strength of his
strong arm for the effort, he tore that British uniformthat scarlet tainted
uniformfrom his manly chesthe rent it into rags.
Then without a word, he mounted his steedhe rode toward the stream
he turned that ghastly face over his shoulder.
Ellen!' he shrieked, and then he was gone.
Ellen! he shrieked, and then there was the sound of a steed dashing
through the water, crashing through the woods.
Then a shriek so wild, so dread, rang on the airstill the Parricide
thundered on.
Not more than a quarter of a mile from the scene of this legend, there is
a steep rock, rising one hundred feet above the dark waters of the
Wissahikon
rising
with a robe of gnarled pines all about it, rising like a huge
wreck of some primeval world.
The Parricide thundered on and onat last his steed tottered on the
verge of this rock.
For a moment the noble horse refused to take the leap.
But there, there is a dark mist before the eyes of the Parricidethere
was the figure of an old mannot a phantom; ah, no! ah, no! It was too
real for thatthere was the figure of an old man, that knife protruding from
the fatal wound, that white hair waving in dribbled blood.
And there was a crashthen an awful pausethen far, far down the
dell the yell of the dying horse and his rider mingled in one, and went
quivering up to God.
III THE BIBLE LEGEND OF THE WISSAHIKON.
It
was here in these wilds of the Wissahikon, on the day of the battle,
as the noonday sun came shining through the thickly clustered leaves, that
two men met in deadly combat. They grappled in deadly conflict near a
rock, that roselike the huge wreck of some primeval worldat least one
hundred feet above the dark waters of the Wissahikon.
That man with the dark brow, and the darker grey eye, flashing, with
deadly light, with the muscular form, clad in the blue hunting frock of the
Revolution, is a Continental named Warner. His brother was murdered
the other night at the Massacre of Paoli. That other man, with long black
hair, drooping along his cadaverous face, is clad in the half-military costume
of a Tory refugee. That is the murderer of Paoli, named Dabney.
They had met there in the woods by accident, and now they fought, not
with sword or rifle, but with long and deadly hunting knives, that flash in
the light, as they go turning and twining and twisting over the green sward.
At last the Tory was down! Down on the green sward with the knee
of the Continental upon his breastthat upraised knife quivering in the
light, that dark grey eye flashing death into his face!
QuarterI yield! gasped the Tory, as the knee was pressed upon
his breastSpare meI yield!
My brother! said the Patriot soldier, in that low deep tone of deadly
hateMy brother cried for `quarter' on the night of Paoli, and, even as
he clung to your knees, you struck that knife into his heart! Oh! I will
give you the quarter of Paoli!
And his hand was raised for the blow, and his teeth were clenched in
deadly hate. He paused for a moment, and then pinioned the Tory's arms,
and with one rapid stride dragged him to the verge of the rock, and held
him quivering over the abyss.
Mercy! gasped the Tory, turning black and ashy by turns, as that
awful gulf yawned below. Mercy! I have a wifea childspare me!
Then the Continental, with his muscular strength gathered for the effort,
shook the murderer once more over the abyss, and then hissed this bitter
sneer between his teeth:
My brother had a wife and two children!The morning after the night
of Paoli, that wife was a widow, those children were orphans!Wouldn't
you like to go and beg your life of that widow and her children?
This proposal, made by the Continental in the mere mockery of hate,
was taken in serious earnest by the horror-stricken Tory. He begged to
be taken to the widow and her children, to have the pitiful privilege of
begging
his life. After a moment's serious thought, the patriot soldier
consented
;
he bound the Tory's arms yet tighter; placed him on the rock
againled him up to the woods.A quiet cottage, embosomed among trees,
broke on their eyes.
They entered that cottage. There, beside the desolate hearth-stone, sat
the widow and her children. She sat there a matronly woman of thirty
years, with a face faded by care, a deep dark eye, and long black hair
hanging
in dishevelled flakes about her shoulders.
On one side was a dark-haired boy, of some six yearson the other a
little girl, one year younger, with light hair and blue eyes. The Biblean
old and venerable volumelay open on that mother's knee.
And then that pale-faced Tory flung himself upon his knees, confessed
that he had butchered her husband on the night of Paoli, but begged his life
at her hands!
Spare me, for the sake of my wife, my child!
He had expected that his pitiful moan would touch the widow's heart
but not one relenting gleam softened her pale face.
The Lord shall judge between us! she said in a cold icy tone, that
froze the murderer's heart.Look! The Bible lays open upon my knee. I
will close that volume, and then this boy shall open it, and place his finger
at random upon a line, and by that line you shall live or die!
This was a strange proposal, made in full faith of a wild and dark
superstition
of the olden time.
For a moment the Tory kneeling there, livid as ashes, was wrapt in
thought. Then in a faltering voice, he signified his consent.
Raising her dark eyes to Heaven, the mother prayed the
Great Father
to direct the finger of her sonshe closed the Bibleshe handed it to that
boy, whose young cheek reddened with loathing as he gazed upon his
father's murderer!
He took the Bibleopened its holy pages at randomplaced his finger
on a verse.
Then there was silence!
Then that Continental soldier, who had sworn to avenge his brother's
death, stood there with dilating eyes and parted lips.
Then the culprit kneeling on the floor, with a face like discolored clay,
felt his heart leap to his throat.
Then in a clear, bold voice, the widow read this line from the Old
Testament
;it
was short, yet terrible:
That man shall die
!
Look! The brother springs forward to plunge a knife into the
murderer's
heart, but the Tory, pinioned as he is, clings to the widow's knees!
He begs that one more trial may be made by the little girl, that child of five
years, with golden hair and laughing eyes.
The widow consents; there is an awful pause.
With a smile in her eye, without knowing what she does, that little girl
opens the Bible as it lays on her mother's kneeshe turns her laughing face
awayshe places her finger upon a line.
That awful silence grows deeper!
The deep-drawn breath of the brother, the broken gasps of the murderer,
alone disturb the silence.The widow and dark-eyed boy are breathless.
That little girl, unconscious as she was, caught a feeling of awe from the
horror of the countenances around her, and stood breathless, her face turned
aside, her tiny fingers resting on that line of life or death.
At last gathering courage, the widow bent her eyes to the page, and read.
It was a line from the New Testament.
Love your enemies
.
Ah! that moment was sublime!
Oh! awful Book of God, in whose dread pages we see Job talking face
to face with Jehovah, or Jesus waiting by Samaria's well, or wandering by
the waves of dark Galilee. Oh! awful Book, shining to-night, as I speak,
the light of that widow's home, the glory of that mechanic's shop, shining
where the world comes not, to look on the last night of the convict in his
cell, lightening the way to God, even over that dread gibbet. Oh! book
of terrible majesty and child-like love, of sublimity that crushes the soul into
awe, of beauty that melts the heart with rapture:you never shone more
strangely beautiful than there, in the lonely cot of the Wissahikon, when
you saved that murderer's life!
Forneed I tell youthat murderer's life was saved! That widow
recognised
the finger of Godeven the stern brother was awed into silence.
The murderer went his way.
Now look ye, how wonderful are the ways of Heaven!
That very night, as the widow sate by her lonely hearthher orphans
by her sidesate there with crushed heart and hot eye-balls, thinking of
her husband, who now lay mouldering on the blood-drenched sod of Paoli
there was a tap at the door.
She opened the door, andthat husband living, though covered with
many wounds, was in her arms!
He had fallen at Paolibut not in death. He was alive; his wife lay
panting on his breast.
That night there was prayer in that wood-embowered Cot of the
Wissahikon
!
IV.THE TEMPTATION OF WASHINGTON.
There
are days in winter when the air is very soft and balmy as the
early days of summer, when, in fact, that glad maiden May seems to blow
her warm breath in the grim face of February, until the rough old warrior
laughs again.
It was a day like this that the morning sunshine was streaming over a
high rock, that frowns there, far above the Wissahikon.
A high rockattainable only by a long, winding pathfenced in by the
trunks of giant pines, whose boughs, on the coldest day of winter, form a
canopy overhead.
This rock is covered with a carpet of evergreen moss.
And near this nookthis chamber in the forest, for it was nothing less
sate an old man, separated from it by the trunks of the pines, whose boughs
concealed his form.
That old man had come here, alone, to think over his two sons, now
freezing at Valley Forgefor, though the father was a Tory, yet his
children were Continentals. He was a well-meaning man, but some
half-crazy
idea about the Divine Right of the British Pope, George the Third,
to rule this Continent, and murder and burn as he pleasedlurked in his
brain, and kept him back from the camp of Washington.
And now, in this bright morning in February, he had come here, alone, to
think the matter over.
And while he was pondering this deep matter over, whether George the
Pope or George the Rebel was in the righthe heard the tramp of a
war-steed
not far off, and, looking between the trunks of the pines, he saw a
man, of noble presence, dismount from his grey horse, and then advance
into the quiet nook of moss-carpeted rocks, encircled by giant pines.
And now, leaving that aged Tory, to look upon this man for himself,
let us also look on him, with our own eyes.
As he comes through those thick boughs, you behold a man, more than
six feet high, with his kingly form enveloped in a coarse grey overcoat; a
chapean on his bold foreheadand beneath the skirts of that grey coat, you
may see the military boots and the end of a scabbard.
And who is this man of kingly presence, who comes here alone, to pace
this moss-covered rock, with drooped head and folded arms?
Come, my friends, and look upon himlet me show younot this figure
of mist and frost-work, which some historians have called
Washington
but Washington, the living, throbbing, flesh and blood, Washington!Yes,
Washington the man
.
Look upon him, as he paces that moss-covered rocksee that eye burn,
that muscular chest heave under the folded arms.
Ah, he is thinking of Valley Forge! Of the bloody foot-prints in the
snowof those three hideous figures that sit down in the huts of Valley
Forge togetherDisease, Starvation, and Nakedness!
Look, as those dark thoughts crowd on his soul, he falls on his knees, he
prays the God of Heaven to take his life, as an offering for the freedom of
his native land!
And as that prayer startles the still woods, that grey coat falls open, and
discloses the blue and gold uniformthe epaulette and the sword-hilt.
Then the agony of that man, praying there in the silent woodspraying
for his country, now bleeding in her chainsspeaks out, in the flashing of
the eye, in the beaded sweat, dripping from the brow!
Ah, kings of the world, planning so cooly your schemes of murder,
come here, and look at George Washington, as he offers his life, a sacrifice
for his country!
Ah, George of England, British Pope, and good-natured Idiot, that you
are, now counting, in your royal halls how many more men it will take to
murder a few thousand peaceful farmers, and make a nation drink your tea,
come here to this rock of the Wissahikon, and see, King and Pope as you
are, George Washington in council with his God!
My friends, I can never think of that man in the wilds of Wissahikon
praying there, alone: praying for his country, with the deep agony in his
heart and on his brow, without also thinking of that dark night in
Gethsemane
,
when the blood-drops startled from the brow of Jesus, the Blessed
Redeemer, as he plead for the salvation of the world!
Now look! As Washington kneels there, on that moss-covered rock,
from those green boughs steps forth another formtall as his ownclad in
a coarse grey coat, with the boots and scabbard seen below its skirts, with
the chapeau upon his brow.
That stranger emerges from the boughsstands there unperceived, gazing
in silence upon the kneeling warrior.
A moment passes!
Look! Washington has risen to his feethe confronts the stranger.
Now, as that stranger, with a slight bow, uncovers his forehead, tell me,
did you ever see a stronger or stranger resemblance between two men than
between these two, who now confront each other in silence, under the shade
of those dark pines?
The same heighth, breadth of chest, sinewy limbs, nay, almost the same
faces,save that the face of the stranger, sharper in outline, lacks that calm
consciousness of a great soul, which stamps the countenance of Washington.
That resemblance is most strangetheir muscular forms are clad in the
same coarse grey coattheir costume is alikeyet hold
The stranger throws open his overcoatyou behold that hangman's
12
dress, that British uniform, flashing with gold and stars! Washington starts
back, and lays his hand upon his sword.
And as these two men, so strangely alike, meet there by accident, under
that canopy of boughs,one wandering from Valley Forge, one from
Philadelphia
let
me tell you at once, that the stranger is none other than the
Master Butcher of the Idiot-kingSir William Howe.
Yes, there they meet, the one the impersonation of Freedomthe other
the tinselled lacquey of a Tyrant's Will!
We will listen to their conversation: it is brief, but important.
For a moment, the British General stood spell-bound before the man
whom he had crossed the ocean to entrap, and bring home; the Rebel, who
had lifted his hand against the Right Divine of the British Pope! To that
British General there was something awful about the soldier who could talk
with his God, as Washington had talked a moment ago.
I cannot be mistaken, at last said Sir William Howe; I behold
before
me the chieftain of the Rebel army, Mister Washington?
Washington coldly bowed his head.
Then this is a happy hour! For we together can give peace and
freedom
to this land!
At this word Washington started with surpriseadvanced a stepand
then exclaimed
And who, sir, are you that thus boldly promise peace and freedom to
my country?
The commander of his Majesty's forces in America! said Howe,
advancing
along that wood-hidden rock towards Washington. And oh, sir,
let me tell you that the king, my master, has heard of your virtues, which
alone dignifies the revolt with the name of a war, and it is to you he looks
for the termination of this most disastrous contest.
Then Washington, whose pulse had never quickened before all the
panoply
of British arms, felt his heart flutter in his bosom, as that great boon was
before his eyespeace and freedom to his native land!
Yes, continued Howe, advancing another step, my king looks to you
for the termination of this unnatural war. Let rebellion once be crushed
let the royal name be finally established by your influences, and then, sir,
behold the gratitude of King George to Mister Washington.
As he spoke, he placed in the hands of Washington a massive
parchment
sealed
with the broad seal of England, signed with the manuel of
King George.
Washington took the parchmentopened itreadhis face did not
change a muscle.
And yet that parchment named Mister George Washington
George
Duke Washington, of Mount Vernon
,
our well-beloved servant
,
Viceroy
of America
!
Here was a boon for the Virginia planterhere was a title and here a
power for the young man, who was one day struggling for his life away
there amid floating ice on the dark Allegheny river.
For a moment, the face of Washington was buried in that parchment,
and then, in a low, deep voice, he spoke
I have been thinking, he said, of the ten thousand brave men who
have been massacred in this quarrel. I have been thinking of the dead of
Bunker HillLexingtonQuebecTrentonYes, the dead of Saratoga
Brandy wineGermantown
And, cried Howe, startling forward, you will put an end to this
unhappy quarrel?
And yor king, continued Washington, with a look and tone that would
have cut into a heart of marble, would have me barter the bones of the
dead for a ribbon and a title!
And thenwhile Howe shrunk cowering backthat Virginia planter,
Washington, crushed that parchment into the sod, with the heel of his
warrior
bootYes, trampled that title, that royal name, into one mass of
rags and dust.
That is my answer to your king!
And then he stood with scorn on his brow, and in his eye, his outstretched
arm pointing at that minion of King George.
Wasn't that a picture for the pencil of an angel? And now, that British
General, recovering from his first surprise, grew red as his uniform with
rage.
Your head! he gasped, clenching his hand, your head will yet
redden
the Traitor's block!
Then Washington's hand sought his swordthen his fierce spirit awoke
within himit was his first impulse to strike that braggart quivering into
the dust.
But in a moment he grew calm.
Yours is a good and great king, he said, with his usual stern tone.
At first he is determined to sweep a whole Continent with but five
thousand
men, but he soon finds that his five thousand men must swell to
twenty-five
thousand before he can ever begin his work of murder. Then he
sacrifices his own subjects by thousandsand butchers peaceful farmers by
tens of thousandsand yet his march of victory is not even begun. Then,
if he conquers the capital city of the Continent, victory is sure! Behold!
the city is in his grasp, yet still the hosts of freedom defy him, even from
the huts of Valley Forge!
And now, as a last resource, your king comes to the man whose head
yesterday was sought, with a high reward, to grace the gates of London
he offers that Rebel a Dukedoma vice regal sceptre! And yet that Rebel
tramples the Dukedom into the dustthat Rebel crushes into atoms the
name of such a king.
Ah, never spaniel skulked from the kick of his master as that General
Howe cringed away from the presence of Washingtonmounted his horse
was gone!
One word with regard to the aged Tory, who beheld this scene from
yonder bushes, with alternate wonder, admiration, and fear.
That Tory went homeI have seen George Washington at prayer,
he said to his wife: the man who can trample upon the name of a king,
as he didpray to God as he prayed, that man cannot be a Rebel or a bad
man. To-morrow, I will join my sons at Valley Forge!
[6]
[6]
This tradition, prevails not only among the rock-bound cliffs of the Wissahikon,
but amid the pastoral glades of Brandywine. A different version, states that the
incident
occurred, in the darkest hour of the Battle of Brandywine, on a beautiful knoll,
which arises from the bosom of the meadow, crowned with grand old trees. In this
shape, I have incorporated it, in the pages of my novelBianche of Brandywine.
In the present work, I have given it, with the locality of the Wissahikon, and the
dark time of Valley Forge. Nothing is more common, in the history of the
Revolution
,
than to hear the same tradition, recited by five different persons, with as many
changes of time and place. Even the precise spot, on which La Fayette, received his
wound at Brandywine, is a matter of doubt. Two aged men pointed out to me, in the
course of my pilgrimage over the field, two localities, for this incident, with the
emphatic
remarkHere's where La Layette received his wound. He said so,
himself
,
when he visited the place in 1824. These localities, were only four miles
apart.
V.WASHINGTON AS DUKE, KING AND REBEL.
We
have seen Washington and Howe stand face to face on the cliff of
Wissahikon; we have seen the British General offer the American leader a
ducal title, a vice-regal sway as the reward of treason.
Now let us behold four scenes which arise to our minds from the
contemplation
of this Legend. These scenes are fraught with a deep mystery,
a sublime and holy moral.
The first scene!
We stand in the streets of a magnificent city. A dense crowd darkens
the avenues leading to yonder palace. That palace, which rises over the
heads of the living mass, like a solitary mountain amid ocean waves.
There are bands of armed men around that palacelook! How the
sun glitters over the red uniforms, over the lines of bayonets, over the
thousand flags, that wave in the summer air.
And there, high over all, from the loftiest dome of that palace, one single
broad banner tosses slowly and lazily upon the breezelook, its wide
shadow is cast upon the multitude below. That is the Red Cross Banner
of England.
And now every eye is fixed upon that palace doora great potentate
will shortly come forththe mob are anxious to look upon him, to shout
his name.
And now, as the drums roll out their thunder, as the voice of cannon bids
him welcomehe comes!
Yes, as women press forward, lifting their babes on high, eager to
behold
him; as old men climb those trees, mad with anxiety, to catch but one
glimpse of his form, he comes, the Viceroy of America!
Yes, from that palace door, environed by guards and courtiers, fine
gentlemen
and gay ladies, he comes, that man of kingly presence; he stands
there, for the moment, with the sun playing over his noble brow, glittering
along his vice-regal robes. How the thunder of the cannon, the clang of
drum and bugle, the hurrahs of the mob, go mingling up to Heaven in one
mad chorus. And that great prince standing there under the shadow of the
British banner; that is George, Duke Washington, Viceroy of America.
Yes, that is what Washington might have been, had he betrayed his
country.
Now we will change the scene:
We stand in the ante-chamber of the British King.
Here, in this lofty hall, adorned with trophies from all the world
trophies
from plundered Irelandfrom ravaged Hindoostanfrom
down-trodden
Americahere, under that Red Cross Banner, which like a canopy,
reddens over that ceiling; here are gathered a glittering party of noble lords
and ladies, anxious to behold a strange scene; the meeting between King
George and Duke Washington, that man who yesterday was a rebel, but
now having returned to his duty as a loyal subject, is about to be presented
to his master.
While all is suspense, two doors at opposite ends of that wide hall, are
flung open by gentlemen ushers; one announces His Majesty!
And a decrepit man with a vacant eyea hanging lipa gouty form,
mocked with purple robes, hobbles slowly forth.
That other gentleman in livery announces:His Grace, Washington,
Duke of Mount Vernon, Viceroy of America!
And from that door comes a man of magnificent form, high bearing,
kingly look. He is cladoh, shame!in the scarlet uniformhis breast
waving with ribbons and glittering with stars.
And that noble man kneels in the centre of that crowd, kisses the gouty
hand of that King. The good-humored idiot murmurs something about
forgiving
the rebel Washington, because that rebel has become a loyal subject,
and brought back a nation to the feet of the British King.
And there kneels Duke Washington, and there stands the Protestant
Pope of Britain.
Had Washington accepted the parchment from General Howe,
something
like this scene would have been the presentation at Court.
Or change the scene again:
What see you now? Independence Hall transformed into a monarch's
reception room, and there, surrounded by his courtiers, the crown on his
brow, stands George the First, King of America.
The glitter of arms flashes o'er Independence Square; the huzzas of the
mob burst into the sky; there is joy to-day in Philadelphiathe aristocracy
are gladfor George Washington, forsaking the fact of republican truth, has
yielded to the wishes of servile friends, yielded to the huzzas of the mob,
and while Independence Bell tolls the death of freedom, has taken to
himself
a crown and a throne.
So, my friends, would one dark page in history have read, had not George
Washington been George Washington all his life.
And now let us look for a moment at the other side of the picture.
Suppose instead of the cry uttered by the watchman one night as the
State House struck oneOne o'clock and Cornwallis is taken!he had
shrieked forth
One o'clock, and George Washington is taken!
Then would history have chronicled a scene like this:
One summer day an immense crowd gathered on Tyburn Hill. Yes,
that immense crowd spread far along the street, over the house tops, clung
to the trees, or darkened over the church steeples. That day London had
given forth its livery and its ragsits nobility and its rabble. St. Giles,
that foul haunt of pollution, sent its thieves and its beggarsSt. James, the
home of royalty, sent its princes and its lords, to swell the numbers of this
vast crowd which now darkened far and wide over Tyburn Hill.
And in the centre of this wide theatrewhose canopy is yonder blue
heavenwhose walls are human facesthere glooms a scaffold covered
with drooping folds of black.
There, on that scaffold, stand three persons:That grim figure, with
face muffled in crape, and the axe in his hand, that is the executioner.
There is a block by his side, and around that block is scattered a heap
of saw dust.
That saw dust has drunk the blood of men like Algernon Sidneybut
to-day will drink the blood of a greater rebel than he!
By the side of that executioner stands another figure in black, not a
hangman
,
but a priest, come to pray for the traitor.
And the third figure?
See, how he towers above priest and hangman, his blue uniform still
enrobing
his proud figurea calm resolution still sitting like a glory upon his
brow!
Can you tell me the name of this traitor?
Why you must be a stranger in London not to know his story. Why
the rabble in the street have it at their tongues' endand those noble ladies,
looking from yonder windowsthey shed some tears when they speak it.
That man standing on the scaffold is the great rebel, who was captured at
Yorktownbrought home in chainstried in Parliamentsentenced to
deathand to-day he dies.
And now look, the priest approaches; he begs that calm-faced traitor to
repent of his treason before he dies,to be reconciled to his King, the good
King George; to repent of his wicked deeds at Trenton, Monmouth,
Germantown
,
Brandy wine, and Valley Forge.
And as the priest doles out his store of set-phrases, look how that
noble-looking
rebel pushes him aside with a quiet scorn.
Then, with one prayer to God, with one thought of his country, now
bleeding in her chains, he kneelshis head on the block.
How awfully still that crowd has become. The executioner draws near.
Look! he strips that blue coat from the rebel's shouldersepaulettes,
sword-belt
and swordhe tears them all from his manly form. With his vile
hands he breaks that sword in twainfor it is a rebel's sword.
Look! he feels the edge of the axestill that noble rebel, but half dressed,
is kneeling there, in the light of the summer sun.
That axe glimmers into light.
Now hold your breathoh, horror!it falls.There is a stream of
blood pouring down into the saw dustthere is a human head rolling on the
scaffold!
And now look again!
As that vast crowd breathe in gasps, the executioner, with crape over his
face, raises the head into lightand while the features yet quiver, while the
blood falls pattering down upon the mangled corse
Harkdo you hear his brutal shout?
Behold the head of George Washington, the rebel and traitor!
Thank God! that page was never written in history!
And who will
dare to say that this picture is too strongly drawn? Ah, my friends, had
my Lord Cornwallis been the victor at Yorktown, had the Continental
armies been crushed, then these streets would have been too narrow to
contain
the gibbets erected by the British King.
Ah! those English lords and ladiesthese English bards are now too
glad to lisp the praises of Washington.
But had the American armies been crushed, then would the head of
Washington have been nailed to the door-post of Independence Hall.
And now that you have seen what Washington might have been as the
Duke, the Viceroy, the Kingor how dark would have been his fate as the
rebel, the crushed and convicted traitorlet us look at HIM AS HE IS.
Is. For he is not dead! For he will never die! For he liveslives
at this hour, in a fuller and bolder life than ever.
Where'er there is a hearthstone in our land, there Washington shines its
patron saint.
Wherever a mother can teach her child some name, to write in its heart
and wear there forever next to the name of the Redeemer, that name is
Washington.
Yes, we are like those men who dig in the deep mines of Norway
there in the centre of the earth forever burns one bright undying flameno
one asks who first built the firebut all know that it has burned for ages
all, from father to son, make it a holy duty to heap fuel on that fire, and
watch it as though it were a god.
The name of Washington is that eternal fire built in every American
heart, and burning on when the night is darkest, and blazing brightest when
the gloom is most terrible.
So let that altar of flame burn and burn on forever, a living testimonial
of that man who too proud to be a Duke, or Viceroy, or King,struck
higher and bolder in his ambition, struck at that place in the American heart
second in glory, and only second, be it spoken with awful reverenceto the
eternal
Majesty of God
.
VI.THE HERO WOMAN.
In
the shadows of the Wissahikon woods, not more than half a mile
from the Schuylkill, there stood in the time of the Revolution, a quaint old
fabric, built of mingled logs and stone, and encircled by a palisaded wall. It
had been erected in the earlier days of William Penn,perhaps some years
before the great apostle of peace first trod our shores,as a block-house,
intended
for defence against the Indians.
And now it stood with its many roofs, its numerous chimneys, its massive
square windows, its varied front of logs and stone, its encircling wall,
through which admittance was gained by a large and stoutly-built gate: it
stood in the midst of the wood, with age-worn trees enclosing its veteran
outline on every side.
From its western window you might obtain a glimpse of the Schuylkill
waves, while a large casement in the southern front, commanded a view of
the winding road, as it sunk out of view, under the shade of thickly-clustered
boughs, into a deep hollow, not more than one hundred yards from the
mansion.
Here, from the southern casement, on one of those balmy summer days
which look in upon the dreary autumn, toward the close of November, a
farmer's daughter was gazing with dilating eyes and half-clasped hands.
Well might she gaze earnestly to the south, and listen with painful
intensity
for the slightest sound! Her brothers were away with the army of
Washington, and her father, a grim old veteranhe stood six feet and three
inches in his stockingswho had manifested his love for the red-coat
invaders
,
in many a desperate contest, had that morning left her alone in the
old mansion, alone in this small chamber, in charge of some ammunition
intended
for a band of brave farmers, about to join the hosts of freedom.
Even as she stood there, gazing out of the southern window, a faint glimpse
of sunlight from the faded leaves above, pouring over her mild face, shaded
by clustering brown hair, there, not ten paces from her side, were seven
loaded rifles and a keg of powder.
Leaning from the casement, she listened with every nerve quivering with
suspense, to the shouts of combatants, the hurried tread of armed men
echoing
from the south.
There was something very beautiful in that picture! The form of the
young girl, framed by the square massive window, the contrast between the
rough timbers, that enclosed her, and that rounded face, the lips parting, the
hazel eye dilating, and the cheek warming and flushing with hope and fear;
there was something very beautiful in that picture, a young girl leaning from
the window of an old mansion, with her brown hair waving in glossy
masses around her face!
Suddenly the shouts to the south grew nearer, and then, emerging from
the deep hollow, there came an old man, running at full speed, yet every
few paces, turning round to fire the rifle, which he loaded as he ran. He
was pursued by a party of ten or more British soldiers, who came rushing
on, their bayonets fixed, as if to strike their victim down, ere he advanced
ten paces nearer the house.
On and on the old man came, while his daughter, quivering with
suspense
,
hung leaning from the window;he reaches the block-house gate
look! He is surrounded, their muskets are levelled at his head; he is
down, down at their feet, grappling for his life! But look again!He
dashes his foes aside, with one bold movement he springs through the gate;
an instant, and it is locked; the British soldiers, mad with rage, gaze upon
the high wall of logs and stone, and vent their anger in drunken curses.
Now look to yonder window! Where the young girl stood a moment
ago, quivering with suspense, as she beheld her father struggling for his life,
now stands that old man himself, his brow bared, his arm grasping the rifle,
while his grey hairs wave back from his wrinkled and blood-dabbled face!
That was a fine picture of an old veteran, nerved for his last fight; a stout
warrior, preparing for his death-struggle.
Death-struggle? Yes!for the old man, Isaac Wampole, had dealt too
many hard blows among the British soldiers, tricked, foiled, cheated them
too often to escape now! A few moments longer, and they would be
reinforced
by a strong party of refugees; the powder, the arms, in the old
block-house, perhaps that daughter herself, was to be their reward. There
was scarcely a hope for the old man, and yet he had determined to make a
desperate fight.
We must bluff off these rascals! he said, with a grim smile, turning to
his child. Now, Bess, my girl, when I fire this rifle, do you hand me
another, and so on, until the whole eight shots are fired! That will keep
them on the other side of the wall, for a few moments at least, and then we
will have to trust to God for the rest!
Look down there, and see, a hand stealing over the edge of the wall!
The old man levels his piecethat British trooper falls back with a crushed
hand upon his comrades' heads!
13
No longer quivering with suspense, but grown suddenly firm, that young
girl passes a loaded rifle to the veteran's grasp, and silently awaits the
result.
For a moment all is silent below; the British bravoes are somewhat
loath to try that wall, when a stout old Rebel, rifle in hand, is looking
from yonder window! There is a pauselow, deep murmursthey are
holding a council!
A moment is gone, and nine heads are thrust above the wall at once
hark! Onetwothree!The old veteran has fired three shots, there are
three dying men, grovelling in the yard, beneath the shadow of the wall!
Quick, Bess, the rifles!'
And the brave girl passes the rifles to her father's grasp; there are four
shots, one after the other; three more soldiers fell back, like weights of lead
upon the ground, and a single red-coat is seen, slowly mounting to the top of
the wall, his eye fixed upon the hall door, which he will force ere a moment
is gone!
Now the last ball is fired, the old man stands there, in that second-story
window, his hands vainly grasping for another loaded rifle! At this
moment
,
the wounded and dying band below, are joined by a party of some
twenty refugees, who, clad in their half-robber uniform, came rushing from
the woods, and with one bound are leaping for the summit of the wall!
Quick, Bess, my rifle!
And look thereeven while the veteran stood looking out upon his foes,
the brave girlfor, slender in form, and wildly beautiful in face, she is a
brave girl, a Hero-Womanhad managed, as if by instinctive impulse, to
load a rifle. She handed it to her father, and then loaded another, and
another
!Wasn't
that a beautiful sight? A fair young girl, grasping powder
and ball, with the ramrod rising and falling in her slender fingers!
Now look down to the wall again! The refugees are clambering over
its summitagain that fatal aimagain a horrid cry, and another wounded
man toppling down upon his dead and dying comrades!
But now look!A smoke rises there, a fire blazes up around the wall;
they have fired the gate. A moment, and the bolt and the lock will be
burnt from its socketsthe passage will be free! Now is the fiery moment
of the old man's trial! While his brave daughter loads, he continues to
fire, with that deadly aim, but nowoh horror! He falls, he falls, with a
musquet ball driven into his breast  the daughter's outstretched arms
receive the father, as with the blood spouting from his wound, he topples
back from the window.
Ah, it is a sad and terrible picture!
That old man, writhing there, on the oaken floor, the young daughter
bending over him, the light from the window streaming over her face, over
her father's grey hairs, while the ancient furniture of the small chamber
affords a dim back-ground to the scene!
Now hark!The sound of axes, at the hall doorshoutshurrahs
curses!
We have the old rebel, at last!
The old man raises his head at that sound; makes an effort to rise;
clutches for a rifle, and then falls back again, his eyes glaring, as the fierce
pain of that wound quivers through his heart.
Now watch the movements of that daughter. Silently she loads a rifle,
silently she rests its barrel against the head of that powder keg, and then,
placing her finger on the trigger, stands over her father's form, while the
shouts of the enraged soldiers come thundering from the stairs. Yes, they
have broken the hall door to fragments, they are in possession of the old
block-house, they are rushing toward that chamber, with murder in their
hearts, and in their glaring eyes! Had the old man a thousand lives, they
were not worth a farthing's purchase now.
Still that girlgrown suddenly white as the 'kerchief round her neck
stands there, trembling from head to foot, the rifle in her hand, its dark
tube laid against the powder-keg.
The door is burst openlook there! Stout forms are in the doorway,
with musquets in their hands, grim faces stained with blood, glare into the
room.
Now, as if her very soul was coined into the words, that young girl with
her face pale as ashes, her hazel eye glaring with deathly light, utters this
short yet meaning speech
Advance one step into the room, and I will fire this rifle into the powder
there!
No oath quivers from the lips of that girl, to confirm her resolution, but
there she stands, alone with her wounded father, and yet not a soldier dare
cross the threshold! Embrued as they are in deeds of blood, there is
something
terrible to these men in the simple words of that young girl, who
stands there, with the rifle laid against the powder-keg.
They stood as if spell-bound, on the threshold of that chamber!
At last one bolder than the rest, a bravo, whose face is half-concealed in
a thick red beard, grasps his musquet, and levels it at the young girl's
breast!
Stand back, or by , I will fire!
Still the girl is firm; the bravo advances a step, and then starts back.
The sharp
click
of that rifle falls with an unpleasant emphasis upon
his ear.
Bess, I am dying, gasps the old man, faintly extending his arms.
Ha, ha, we foiled the Britishers! Comedaughterkneel here; kneel
and say a prayer for me, and let me feel your warm breath upon my face,
for I am getting cold  O, dark and cold!
Look!As those trembling accents fall from the old man's tongue,
those fingers unloose their hold of the riflealready the troopers are secure
of one victim, at least, a young and beautiful girl; for affection for her father,
is mastering the heroism of the momentlook! She is about to spring
into his arms! But now she sees her danger! again she clutches the rifle;
againalthough her father's dying accents are in her earsstands there,
prepared to scatter that house in ruins, if a single rough hand assails that
veteran form.
There are a few brief terrible moments of suspense. Then a hurried
sound, far down the mansion; then a contest on the stairs; then the echo
of rifle shot and the light of rifle blaze; then those ruffians in the doorway,
fall crushed before the strong arms of Continental soldiers. Then a wild
shriek quivers through the room, and that young girlthat Hero-Woman,
with one bound, springs forward into her brothers' arms, and nestles there,
while her dead fatherhis form yet warmlays with fixed eyeballs upon
the floor.
VII.KING GEORGE IN WESTMINSTER ABBEY.
One
fine summer afternoon, in the year 1780, King George the Third,
of Great Britain, defender of the faith, as well as owner of a string of other
titles, as long as a hypocrite's prayer, took a quiet stroll through the dim
cloisters of Westminster Abbey.
It does not become me to picture that magnificent House of the Dead,
where Royalty sleeps its last slumber, as soundly as though it had never
butchered the innocent freeman, or robbed the orphan of her bread, while
poor Genius, starved and kicked while living, skulks into some corner, with
a marble monument above its tired head.
No! We will leave the description of Westminster Abbey to any one of
the ten thousand travellers, who depart from their own countryscarce
knowing whether Niagara is in New York or Georgiaand write us home
such delightful long letters about Kings and Queens, and other grand folks.
No! All we have to do is to relate a most singular incident, which
happened
to George the Third, etc., etc., etc.on this fine summer afternoon,
in the year of our Lord, 1780.
Do you see that long, gloomy aisle, walled in on either side by gorgeous
tombs, with the fretted roof above, and a mass of red, blue, purple and gold
pouring in on the marble pavement, through the discolored window-panes,
yonder? Does not the silence of this lonely aisle make you afraid? Do
you not feel that the dead are around, about, beneath, abovenay, in
the air?
After you have looked well at this aisle, with its splendid tombs, its
marble
floor, its heavy masses of shade and discolored patches of light, let me
ask you to look upon the figure, which, at this moment, turns the corner
of yonder monument.
He stands aside from the light, yet you behold every outline of his face
and form. He is clad in a coat of dark purple velvet, faced with gold lace.
His breeches are of a pale blue satin; his stockings flesh-colored, and of
the finest silk. There is a jewelled garter around his right leg. His white
satin vest gleams with a single star. His shoes glitter with diamonds buckles,
he carries a richly-faced hat under his right arm. This is a very pretty
dress: and I am sure you will excuse me for being so minute, as I have
the greatest respect for grand folks.
This manif it is not blasphemous to call such a great being a
man
seems prematurely old. His face does not strike you with its majesty; for
his forehead is low, the pale blue eyes bulge out from their sockets, the
lower lip hangs down upon the chin. Indeed, if this man was not so great
a being, you would call him an
Idiot
.
This, in fact, is George the Third, King of Great Britain, Ireland and
France; and owner of a string of other titles, who rules by divine right.
As he stands near yonder monument, a womandressed in faded black
starts from behind that big piece of sculptured marble, on which
Mercy
appears, in the act of bending from the skies, and flings herself at the feet
of the King.
Mercy! she cries, with uplifted hands.
Whatwhatwhat? stammers the good King. What's all this?
My son committed robbery, some two months ago. He robbed on the
highway to give me bread. I was sickfamisheddying. He has been
condemned to death, and to-morrow he dies. Mercy for the widow's son?
Whatwhatwhat? Eh? What's this? How much did he steal?
Only ten shillings! Only ten shillings! For the love of God, mercy?
The good King looked upon the wan face and pleading eyes of that poor
woman, and said, hurriedly
I cannot pardon your son. If I pardon the thief, I may as well pardon
the forger and murderer.Therego, good woman: I can do nothing
for you.
The good King turned away, leaving the insensible form of the widow
stretched out upon the marble floor. He would have pardoned her boy,
but there were some two or three hundred crimes punishable with death,
from the petty offence of killing a man up to the enormous blasphemy of
shooting a rabbit on a rich man's estate. Therefore, King George could not
pardon one of these crimes, for, do you mark, the hangman once put down,
there is an end of all law.
The King, I like to call grand people by their titles, the good KingI
also like to call him good, because, do you see, the Archbishop of
Canterbury
called him so, in his sermon, every Sunday morningthe good King
turned away, leaving the poor widow insensible on the floor.
This little incident had somewhat excited him, so he sank down upon the
corner of a marble slab, and bent his head upon his hand, and began to think.
All at once, he felt seized by invisible hands, and borne, with the speed
of light, through the air and over a long sweep of ocean waves. His journey
was but for a moment, yet, it seemed to him, that he had traversed thousands
of miles. When he opened his eyes again, he found himself standing by a
road-side, opposite a beautiful little cottage, which, with a garden in front,
smiled upon the view from a grove of orchard trees. A young woman with
a little boy by her side and a baby in her arms, stood in the cottage door.
The King could not admire that cottage too much, with its trees and
flowers, and, as for that rosy-cheeked woman, in the linsey gown, he was
forced to admit to himself that he had never seen anything half so beautiful,
even in the
Royal
family.
While the King was looking upon the young woman and her children, he
heard a strange noise, and, turning his head, he beheld a man in a plain
farmer's coat, with a gun in his hand, tottering up the highway. His face
was very pale, and as he walked tremblingly along, the blood fell, drop by
drop, from a wound near his heart, upon the highway dust.
The man stumbled along, reached the garden gate, and sprang forward,
with a bound, towards the young woman and her children.
Husband! shrieked the young woman.
Father! cried the little boy.
Even the baby lifted its little hands, and greeted in its infant tones that
wounded man.
Yet the poor farmer lay there at the feet of his wife, bleeding slowly to
death. The young woman knelt by his side, kissing him on the forehead,
and placing her hand over the wound, as if to stop the blood, but it was in
vain. The red current started from his mouth.
The good King lifted his eyes. The groans of the dying man, the shrieks
of the wife, the screams of the little children, sounded like voices from the
dead. At last his feelings overcome him
Who, he shouted, who has done this murder?
As he spokeas if in answer to his questiona stout, muscular man
came running along the road, in the very path lately stained with the blood
of the wounded man. He was dressed in a red coat, and in his right hand
he grasped a musquet, with a bayonet dripping blood.
I killed that fellow, he said in a rude tone, and what have you got
to say to it?
Did he ever harm you? said the King.
NoI never saw him before this hour!
Then why did you kill him?
I killed him for eight-pence, said the man, with a brutal sneer.
The good King raised his hands in horror, and called on his God to pity
the wretch!
Killed a man for eight-pence! Ah, you wretch! Don't you hear the
groans of his wife?the screams of his children?
Why, that hain't nothin', said the man in the red coat. I've killed
many a one to-day, beside him. I'm quite used to it, though burnin' 'em
alive in their houses is much better fun.
The King now foamed with righteous scorn.
`Wretch! he screamed, where is your master, this devil in human
shape, who gives you eight-pence for killing an innocent man?
Oh, he's a good ways over the water, said the man. His name is
George the Third
. He's my King. He
The good King groaned.
Whywhy, said he, slowly, I must be in America. That dying
man must be aRebel. You must be one of my soldiers
Yes, said the man in the red coat, with a brutal grin; you took me
out o' Newgate, and put this pretty dress on my back. That man whom I
killed was a farmer: he sometimes killed sheep for a dollar a day. I'm
not quite so well off as him, for I kill men, and only get eight-pence a day.
I say, old gentleman, couldn't you raise my wages?
But the King did not behold the brute any longer. He only saw that
the young woman and her children, kneeling around the body of the dead
man.
Suddenly those invisible hands again grasped his Royal person, and bore
him through the air.
When he again opened his eyes, he beheld a wide lawn, extending in the
light of the December moon. That lawn was white with snow. From its
centre arose an old-time mansion, with grotesque ornaments about its roof,
a hall door defended by pillars, and steps of stone, surmounted by two lions
in marble. All around the mansion, like sentinels on their midnight watch,
stood scattered trees, their bare limbs rising clearly and distinctly into the
midnight sky.
While the King was wrapped in wonder at the sightbehold! A band
of women, a long and solemn train, came walking over the lawn, their long
black gowns trailing in the winter snow.
It was a terrible sight to see those wan faces, upturned to the cold moon,
but oh! the chaunt they sung, those spectral women, as they slowly wound
around the lawn: it chilled the King's blood.
For that chaunt implored Almighty God to curse King George of
England
for the murder of their husbandsfathersbrothers!
Then came a band of little children, walking two by two, and raising
their tiny hands in the light of the moon. They also rent the air with a
low, deep chaunt, sung in their infantile tones.
George, the King, listened to that chaunt with freezing blood, with
trembling
limbs. He knew not why, but he joined in that song in spite of
himself
,
he sung their hymn of woe.
George of England, we curse thee in the sight of God, for the murder
of our fathers! We curse thee with the orphan's curse!
This was their chaunt. No other words they sung. But this simple
hymn they sung again and again, raising their little hands to God.
Oh, this is hard! shrieked King George. I could bear the curse of
warriorsnay, even the curse of the Priest at the Altar! But to be cursed
by widowsto be cursed by little childrenah
The good King fell on his knees.
Where am I! he shriekedand who are these?
A voice from the still winter air answered
You are on the battle-field. These are the widows and orphans of the
dead of Germantown
.
But did I murder their fathers? Their husbands?
The voice replied
You did! Too cowardly or too weak to kill them with your own hand,
you hired your starving peasants, your condemned felons to do it for you!
The King grovelled in the snow and beat his head against the frozen
ground. He felt that he was a murderer: he could feel the brand of Cain
blistering upon his brow.
Again he was taken upagain borne through the air.
Where was he now? He looked around, and by the light of that
December
moon, struggling among thick clouds, he beheld a scattered village of
huts, extending along wintry hills. The cold wind cut his cheek and froze
his blood
An object at his feet arrested his eye. He stooped down: examined it
with a shudder. It was a man's footsteps, printed in blood.
The King was chilled to the heart by the cold; stupified with horror at
the sight of this strange footstep. He said to himself, I will hasten to yonder
hut; I will escape from the wind and cold, and the sight of that horrid
footstep.
He started toward the village of huts, but all around him those bloody
footsteps in the snow seemed to gather and increase at every inch of his
way.
At last he reached the first hut, a rude structure of logs and mud. He
looked in the door, and beheld a naked man, worn to a skeleton, stretched
prostrate on a heap of straw.
Ho! my friend, said the King, as though a voice spoke in him,
without
his will, why do you lie here, freezing to death, when my General,
Sir William Howe, at Philadelphia yonder, will give you such fine clothes
and rich food?
The freezing man looked up, and muttered a few brief words, and then
fell backdead!
Washington is here! was all he said, ere he died.
In another hut, in search of shelter, peeped the cold and hungry King.
A rude fellow sate warming his hands by a miserable fire, over which an
old kettle was suspended. His face was lean and his cheeks hollow, nay,
the hands which he held out towards the light, looked like the hands of a
skeleton.
Ho! my friendwhat cheer? said the King. I am hungryhave
you any thing to eat?
Not much of any account, replied the rude fellow; yesterday I eat
the last of my dog, and to-day I'm goin' to dine on these mocassins: don't
you hear 'em bilin'?
But, said the King, there's fine living at Philadelphia, in the camp of
Sir William. Why do you stay here to starve?
Was you ever to school? said the starved Rebel. Do you know
how to spell
L-i-b-e-r-t-y
?
The good King passed on. In the next hut lay a poor wretch dying of
that loathsome plaguesmall-pox.
Come, said the King, or rather the voice in him spoke, away to
Philadelphia!
These hills are free! cried the poor wretch, lifting his loathsome face
into light; then, without a moan, he laid down to his fever and starvation
again.
At last, his Royal brain confounded by the words of these strange men
the King entered a two-story stone house, which arose in the glen, between
the hills, near the brink of a dark river. Slowly entered the King, attracted
by the sound of a voice at prayer along a dark passage, into a small chamber,
in which a light was burning.
A man of noble visage was on his knees, praying to God in earnest
tones
We will endure disease, starvation, death, but, in thy name, oh, God!
we will never give up our arms! The tyrant, with murder in his heart,
may darken our plains with his hirelings, possess our cities, but still we
thank thee, oh, God! that the mountains are free, that where the panther
howls, we may yet find a home for the brave.
Hold, hold! shouted the voice within the King, as the terror-stricken
Monarch rushed into the room. Washington do not pray against me! I
can bear to be called a murderera butcher of orphans, but that youyou,
so calm amid starvation, nakedness, diseaseyou whom I thought hunted
long ago, like a wolf before the houndsthat you should call God's
vengeance
on my headthat I cannot bear! Washington, do not pray
against me!
And he flung himself at the feet of the Hunted Rebel, and besought his
mercy with trembling hands, extended in a gesture of supplication.
It was I that butchered your farmers! It was I that tore the husband
from the wife, the father from his child! It was I that drove these freemen
to the huts of Valley Forge, where they endure the want of bread, fire, the
freezing cold, the loathsome small-pox, rather than take my goldit was I!
14
Rebel I am at your feet! Have mercy! I, George by the Grace of God,
Defender of the Faith, Head of the Church, fling myself at your feet, and
beg your pity! For I am a murdererthe murderer of thousands and tens
of thousands!
He started tremblingly forward, but in the action, that room, that solemn
face and warrior form of the Rebel, passed away.
George the King awoke: he had been dreaming. He woke with the
cold sweat on his brow; a tremor like the ague upon his limbs.
The sun was setting, and his red light streamed in one gaudy blaze
through yonder stained window.All was terribly still in Westminster
Abbey.
The King arose, he rushed along the aisles, seeking with starting eyes
for the form of the poor widow. At last he beheld her, shrouded in her
faded garments, leaning for support against a marble figure of Mercy.
The King rushed to her, with outspread hands.
Woman, woman! he shrieked, I pardon your son!
He said nothing more, he did not even wait to receive her blessings, but
rushing with trembling steps toward the door, he seized the withered old
Porter, who waited there, by the hand
Do you see it in my face? he whispereddon't you see the brand
Murder
here?
He sadly laid his hand against his forehead, and passed through the door,
on his way.
The poor King's gone mad! said the old Porter. God bless his
Majesty!
In front of that dim old Abbey, with its outlines of grandeur and gloom,
waited the Royal carriage, environed by guards. Two men advanced to
meet the Kingone clad in the attire of a nobleman, with a heavy face and
dull eye; and the other in the garb of a Prelate, with mild blue eyes and
snow-white hair.
I hope your Majesty's prayers, for the defeat of the Rebels, will be
smiled upon by Heaven!
Thus with a smile and gently-waving hand, spoke my Lord, the
Archbishop
of Canterbury.
O, by Christmas next, we'll have this Washington brought home in
chains!
Thus with a gruff chuckle spoke my Lord North, Prime Minister of
England.
The good King looked at them both with a silly smile, and then pressed
his finger against his forehead.
Whatwhatwhat? Do you see it here? Do, you see it? It burns!
Eh?
Murderer
!
With that silly smile the King leaped in the carriage. Hurrah! How
the mob shoutedhow the swords of the guards gleamed on highhow
gaily the chariot wheels dashed along the streetshurrah!
Let us swell the shout, but
That night a rumor crept through all London, that
King George was
mad again
!
VIII.VALLEY FORGE.
Hidden
away there in a deep glen, not many miles from Valley Forge, a
quaint old farm house rose darkly over a wide waste of snow.
It was a cold dark winter night, and the snow began to fallwhen from
the broad fireplace of the old farm house, the cheerful blaze of massive logs
flashed around a wide and spacious room.
Two persons sat there by that fire, a father and child. The father, who
sits yonder, with a soldier's belt thrown over his farmer's dress, is a man
of some fifty years, his eyes bloodshot, his hair changed to an untimely grey,
his face wrinkled and hallowed by care, and by dissipation more than care.
And the daughter who sits in the full light of the blaze opposite her father
a slenderly formed girl of some seventeen years, clad in the coarse linsey
skirt and kerchief, which made up the costume of a farmer's daughter, in
the days of the Revolution.
She is not beautifulah, no!
Careperhaps that disease, consumption, which makes the heart grow
cold to namehas been busy with that young face, sharpened its outlines,
and stamped it with a deathly paleness.
There is no bloom on that young cheek. The brown hair is laid plainly
aside from her pale brow. Then tell me, what is it you see, when you gaze
in her face?
You look at that young girl, you see nothing but the gleam of two large
dark eyes, that burn into your soul.
Yes, those eyes are unnaturally large and dark and brightperhaps
consumption
is feeding their flame.
And now as the father sits there, so moody and sullen, as the daughter
sits yonder, so sad and silent and pale, tell me, I pray you, the story of
their lives.
That farmer, Jacob Manheim, was a peaceful, a happy man, before the
Revolution. Since the war, he has become drunken and idledriven his
wife broken-hearted to the graveand worse than all, joined a band of Tory
refugees, who scour the land as dead of night, burning and murdering as
they go.
To-night, at the hour of two, this Tory band will lie in wait, in a
neighboring
pass, to attack and murder the
Rebel
Washington, whose starving
soldiers are yonder in the huts of Valley Forge.
Washington on his lonely journeys is wont to pass this farm house;
the cut-throats are there in the next chamber, drinking and feasting, as they
wait for two o clock at night.
And the daughter, Maryfor her name was Mary; they loved that name
in the good old timeswhat is the story of her brief young life?
She had been reared by her mother, now dead and
gone home
, to revere
this man Washington, who to-night will be attacked and murderedto revere
him next to God. Nay, more: that mother on her death-bed joined the
hands of this daughter, in solemn betrothal with the hands of a young
partisan
leader, Harry Williams, who now shares the crust and the cold of
Valley Forge.
Well may that maiden's eye flash with unnatural brightness, well may
her pale face gather a single burning flush, in the centre of each cheek!
For yesterday afternoon, she went four miles, over roads of ice and snow,
to tell Captain Williams the plot of the refugees. She did not reach Valley
Forge until Washington had left on one of his lonely journeys; so this night,
at twelve, the partizan captain will occupy the rocks above the neighboring
pass, to trap the trappers of George Washington.
Yes, that pale slender girl, remembering the words of her dying mother,
had broken through her obedience to her father, after a long and bitter
struggle
.
How dark that struggle in a faithful daughter's heart! She had
betrayed his plots to his enemiesstipulating first for the life, the safety of
her traitor-father.
And now as father and child are sitting there, as the shouts of the Tory
refugees echo from the next chamberas the hand of the old clock is on the
hour of elevenhark! There is the sound of horses' hoofs without the
farm housethere is a pausethe door opensa tall stranger, wrapped in
a thick cloak, white with snow, enters, advances to the fire, and in brief
words solicits some refreshment and an hour's repose.
Why does the Tory Manheim start aghast at the sight of that stranger's
blue and gold uniformthen mumbling something to his daughter about
getting food for the traveller, rush wildly into the next room, where his
brother Tories are feasting?
Tell me, why does that young girl stand trembling before the tall stranger,
veiling her eyes from that calm face, with its blue eye and kindly smile?
Ahif we may believe the legends of that time, few men, few warriors,
who dared the terror of battle with a smile, could stand unabashed before
the solemn presence of Washington.
For it was Washington, exhausted, with a long journeyhis limbs
stiffened
and his face numbed with coldit was the great Rebel of Valley
Forge, who returning to camp sooner than his usual hour, was forced by
the storm to take refuge in the farmer's house, and claim a little food and
an hour's repose at his hands.
In a few moments, behold the Soldier, with his cloak thrown off, sitting
at that oaken table, partaking of the food, spread out there by the hands of
the girl, who now stands trembling at his shoulder.
And look! Her hand is extended as if to grasp him by the armher lips
move as if to warn him of his danger, but make no sound. Why all this
silent agony for the man who sits so calmly there?
One moment ago, as the girl, in preparing the hasty supper, opened
yonder closet door, adjoining the next room, she heard the low whispers of
her father and the Tories;
she heard the dice box rattle, as they were
casting
lots, who should stab George Washington in his sleep!
And now, the words:
Beware, or this night you die!
trembles
half-formed
upon her lips, when the father comes hastily from that room and
hushes her with a look.
Show the gentleman to his chamber, Mary!(how calmly polite a
murderer can be!)that chamber at the head of the stairs, on the
left
. On
the left, you mind!
Mary takes the light, trembling and pale. She leads the soldier up the
oaken stairs. They stand on the landing, in this wing of the farm-house,
composed of two rooms, divided by thick walls from the main body of the
mansion. On one side, the
right
, is the door of Mary's chamber; on the
other, the
left
, the chamber of the soldierto him a chamber of death.
For a moment, Mary stands there trembling and confused. Washington
gazes upon that pale girl with a look of surprise. Look! She is about to
warn him of his danger, when, see there!her father's rough face appears
above the head of the stairs.
Mary, show the gentleman into the chamber on the left. And look ye,
girlit's lateyou'd better go into your own room and go to sleep.
While the Tory watches them from the head of the stairs, Washington
enters the chamber on the left, Mary the chamber on the right.
An hour passes. Still the storm beats on the roofstill the snow drifts
on the hills. Before the fire, in the dim old hall of that farm-house, are
seven half-drunken men, with that tall Tory, Jacob Manheim, sitting in their
midst; the murderer's knife in his hand. For the lot had fallen upon him.
He is to go up stairs and stab the sleeping man.
Even this half-drunken murderer is pale at the thoughthow the knife
trembles in his handtrembles against the pistol barrel. The jeers of his
comrades rouse him to the work,the light in one hand, the knife in the
other, he goes up the stairshe listens!first at the door of his daughter's
chamber on the right, then at the door of the soldier's chamber on the left.
All is still. Then he places the light on the floorhe enters the chamber
on the lefthe is gone a momentsilence!there is a faint groan! He
comes forth again, rushes down the stairs, and stands there before the fire,
with the bloody knife in his hand.
Look! he shrieks, as he scatters the red drops over his comrades'
faces, over the hearth, into the fireLook! it is his bloodthe traitor
Washington!
His comrades gather round him with yells of joy: already, in fancy, they
count the gold which will be paid for this deed, when lo! that stair door
opens, and there, without a wound, without even the stain of a drop of blood,
stands George Washington, asking calmly for his horse.
What! shrieked the Tory Manheim, can neither steel nor bullet
harm you? Are you a living man? Is there no wound about your heart?
no blood upon your uniform?
That apparition drives him mad. He starts forwardhe places his hands
tremblingly upon the arms, upon the breast of Washington! Still no wound.
Then he looks at the bloody knife, still clutched in his right hand, and stands
there quivering as with a death spasm.
While Washington looks on in silent wonder, the door is flung open, the
bold troopers from Valley Forge throng the room, with the gallant form and
bronzed visage of Captain Williams in their midst. At this moment the
clock struck twelve. Then a horrid thought crashes like a thunderbolt upon
the brain of the Tory Manheim. He seizes the lightrushes up stairs
rushes into the room of his daughter on the right. Some one had just risen
from the bed, but the chamber was vacant. Then towards that room on
the left, with steps of leaden heaviness.Look! how the light quivers in
his hand! He pauses at the door; he listens! Not a sounda stillness
like the grave. His blood curdles in his veins! Gathering courage, he
pushes open the door. He enters. Towards that bed through whose
curtains
he struck so blindly a moment ago! Again he pausesnot a sound
a stillness more terrible than the grave. He flings aside the curtains
There, in the full light of the lamp, her young form but half covered,
bathed in her own bloodthere lay his daughter, Mary!
Ah, do not look upon the face of the father, as he starts silently back,
frozen to stone; but in this pause of horror listen to the mystery of this
deed!
After her father had gone down stairs, an hour ago, Mary silently stole
from the chamber on the right. Her soul shaken by a thousand fears, she
opened the door on the left, and beheld Washington sitting by a table on
which were spread a chart and a Bible. Then, though her existence was
wound up in the act, she asked him, in a tone of calm politeness to take the
chamber on the opposite side. Mary entered the chamber which he left.
Can you imagine the agony of that girl's soul, as lying on the bed
intended
for the death-couch of Washington, she silently awaited the knife,
although that knife might be clenched in a father's hand.
And now that father, frozen to stone, stood there, holding the light in one
hand, the other still clutching the red knife.
There lay his child, the blood streaming from that wound in her arm
her eyes covered with a glassy film.
Mary! shrieked the guilty fatherfor robber and Tory as he was, he
was still a father. Mary! he called to her, but that word was all he
could say.
Suddenly, she seemed to wake from that stupor. She sat up in the bed
with her glassy eyes. The strong hand of death was upon her. As she
sat there, erect and ghastly, the room was thronged with soldiers. Her
lover rushed forward, and called her by name. No answer. Called again
spoke to her in the familiar tones of olden timestill no answer. She
knew him not.
Yes, it was truethe strong hand of death was upon her.
Has
he
escaped? she said, in that husky voice.
Yes! shrieked the father. Live, Mary, only live, and to-morrow I
will join the camp at Valley Forge.
Then that girlthat Hero-Womandying as she was, not so much from
the wound in her arm, as from the deep agony which had broken the last
chord of life, spread forth her arms, as though she beheld a form floating
there above her bed, beckoning her away. She spread forth her arms as
if to enclose that Angel form.
Mother! she whisperedwhile there grouped the soldiersthere,
with a speechless agony on his brow stood the loverthere, hiding his face
with one hand, while the other grasped the light crouched the fatherthat
light flashing over the dark bed, with the white form in its centre
Mother, thank God! For with my life I have saved him
Look, even as starting up on that bloody couch, she speaks the
half-formed
word, her arms stiffen, her eyes wide open, set in death,glare in her
father's face!
She is dead! From that dark room her spirit has gone home!
That half-formed word, still quivering on the white lips of the
Hero-Woman
that
word uttered in a husky whisper, choked by the death-rattle
that word was
Washington
!
[7]
[7]
Will you pardon me, reader, that I have made the Prophetess of Wissahikon,
relate various Legends, which do not directly spring from her own soil? The
legends
of Valley Forge, King George, the Mansion on the Schuylkill, with others
included under the general head of Wissahikon, do not, it is true, relate especially
to the soil of this romantic dell, but they are impregnated with the same spirit, which
distinguishes her traditions, and illustrate and develope the idea of the previous
sketches. I have taken Wissahikon, as the centre of a circle of old-time Romance,
whose circumference is described by the storied ground of Paoli, the hills of Valley
Forge, the fields of Germantown.They were written on the banks of the
Wissahikon
,
with her wild scenery before the author's eye, the music of her stream in his
ears. It has been his object, to embody in every line, that spirit of mingled light and
shade, which is stamped on every rock and tree of the Wissahikon.
IX.THE MANSION ON THE SCHUYLKILL.
Gliding
one summer day over the smooth bosom of the Schuylkill, with
the white sail of my boat, swelling with the same breeze that ruffled the
pines of Laurel Hill, I slowly emerged from the shadow of an old bridge,
and all at once, a prospect of singular beauty lay before me, in the beams
of the setting sun.
A fine old mansion crowned the summit of a green hill, which arose on
the eastern shore, its grassy breast bared to the sunset glow. A fine old
mansion of dark grey stone, with its white pillars looking out from among
green trees. From the grassy bosom of the hill, many a white statue arose,
many a fountain dashed its glittering drops into light. There was an air
of old-time elegance and ease about that mansion, with its green lawn sloping
gently downalmost to the river's brink, its encircling grove of magnificent
trees, its statues and fountains. It broke on your eye, as you emerged from
the arches of the old bridge, like a picture from Italy.
Yet from the porch of that old-time mansion, a fairer view bursts upon
your eye. The arches of the bridgesone spanning the river in all the
paint and show of modern fancy, the other gloomy as night and the grave
the sombre shades of Laurel Hill, hallowed by the white tombs of the dead,
with the Gothic Chapel rising among dark green treesthe Schuylkill,
extending
far beyond bridge and Cemetry, its broad bosom enclosed on every
side by hills and trees, resting like some mountain lake in the last glow of
the setting suna fairer view does not bless the traveller's eye from the
Aroostook to the Rio Grande.
There is a freshness in the verdurea beauty in that still sheet of water,
a grandeur in yonder sombre pines, waving above the rocks of Laurel Hill
a rural magnificence in the opposite shore of the river, rising in one
massive
hill, green with woods and gay with cottage and mansion,a beauty, a
grandeur, a magnificence that at once marks the Falls of Schuylkill with an
ever-renewing novelty, an unfading charm.
The view is beautiful in the morning, when the pillars of the bridge, fling
their heavy shadows over the water; when the tree tops of Laurel Hill,
undulate
to the breeze in masses of green and gold, while the Schuylkill rests
in the shade.
Beautiful at noon, when from the thick foliage on the opposite shore,
half-way up the massive hill, arises the blue smoke of the hidden God of
Steam, winding slowly upward to the cloudless sky.
Beautiful at twilight, when flashes of purple and gold change the view
every moment, and impart a gorgeous beauty, which does not cease when
the spires of Laurel Hill glow in the first beam of the uprising moon.
Ah, night, deep and solemnthe great vault abovebelow, and around,
the river glistening in the moonbeam, the bridges one mingled mass of light
and darknessLaurel Hill a home for the dead in truth, with its white
monuments
glaring fitfully into light, between the branches of the trees. There
is a sad and solemn beauty, resting on this scene at night.
It was at night, that a Legend of this old-time mansion, rushed upon my
soul.
I stood on the porch; and the bridge, the Cemetry melted all at once
away. I was with the pastback sixty years and more, into the dim
arcades of time. Nor bridge, nor cemetry were there, but in place of the
cemetry, one sombre mass of wild wood; where the bridge now spans the
river, a water-fall dashed and howled among rugged rocks. No blue smoke
of steam engine, then wound up from the green trees. A man who would
have dreamed of such a thing, would have been imprisoned as a
madman
.
Yet a strange wild beauty, rested upon this mansion, this river, these
hills in the days of the Revolution. A beauty that was born of luxuriant
forests, a river dashing tumultuously over its bed of rocks, hills lifting their
colossal forms into the sky. A beauty whose fields and flowers were not
crushed by the Juggernaut, Improvement; whose river all untramelled,
went singing on its way until it kissed the Delaware.
It was a night in the olden-time, when Washington held the huts and hills
of Valley Forge, while Sir William Howe enjoyed the balls and banquets
of Philadelphia.
A solitary light burned in the mansiona tall, formal wax candle
casting
its rays around a quaint old fashioned room. A quaint, old fashioned
room, not so much remarkable for its dimensions, as for the air of honest
comfort, which hung about the high-backed mahogany chairs, the oaken
wainscot, the antique desk, standing in one corner; a look of honest comfort
which glowed brightly from the spacious fire-place, where portly logs of
hickory sent up their mingled smoke and flame.
In front of that fire were three persons, whose attitude and gestures
presented
a strange, an effective picture. On the right, in a spacious
arm-chair
,
lined with cushions, sat a man of some seventy years, his spare form
wrapped in a silk dressing gown, his grey hair waving over his prominent
brow to his shoulders, while his blue eyes, far sunken in their sockets,
lighted up a wan and withered face.
At his feet, knelt a beautiful woman, whose form swelling with the full
outlines of mature womanhood, was enveloped in a flowing habit of easy
folds and snow-white hue. Around that face, glowing with red on the
cheek and lip, and marble-white on the brow, locks of golden hair fell
in soft undulations, until they floated around the neck and bosom. Her
blue eyesbeaming with all a woman's love for a trembling old man, that
man her fatherwere fixed upon his face with a silent anxiety and
tenderness.
15
The old man's gaze was rivetted to the countenance of the third figure in
this scene, who sat opposite, on the left side of the fire.
A man of some fifty years, with strongly marked features, thick grey
eye-brows
,
hooked nose like an eagle's beak, thin lips and prominent chin.
His head was closely enveloped in a black silk cap, which concealing his
hair, threw his wrinkled forehead boldly into the light. A gown or tunic
of faded dark velvet, fell from his shoulders to his knees. His head was
bent down, while his eyes rested upon the uncouth print of an old volume,
which lay open across his knees.
That volume was intituledYe
Laste Secret of Cornelius Agrippa
,
now first translated into English. Anno. Dom.
1516.
The man who perused its pages, was none other than the
Astrologer
or
Conjurer
who at this time of witchcraft and superstition, held a
wonderful influence over the minds of the people, in all the country, about
Philadelphia.
He had been summoned hither to decide a strange question. Many
years ago, while dwelling in the backwoods of Pennsylvania, with his
young wife, Gerald Mortonso the old man of seventy was namedhad
been deprived of his only son, a boy of four years, by some unaccountable
accident. The child had suddenly disappeared. Years passeda daughter
was bornthe wife died, but no tidings reached the father's ears of his
lost son.
To night a strange infatuation had taken possession of his brain.
His son was living! He was assured of this, by a voice that whispered
to his soul.
He was doomed to die, ere morning dawned. Ere he gave up the
Ghost, he wished to learn something of his child, and sowith a
superstition
shared by the intelligent as well as the illiterate of that timehe had
summoned the Astrologer.
The child was born before midnight January 12, 1740? said the
Astrologer. Four years from the night of his birth, he disappeared?
The old man bowed his head in assent.
I have cast his Horoscope, said the Astrologer. By this paper, I
know that your son lives, for it threatens his life, with three eras of
danger
.
The first, Jan. 12, 1744. The second, Jan. 12, 1778. The third
a date unknown
He is in danger, then to night, said Mr. Morton; For to night is the
Twelfth of January, 1778?
The Astrologer rose and placed a chafing dish on the carpet, near the
antique desk, which was surmounted by an oval mirror. Scattering spices
and various unknown compounds upon the dish, the Astrologer applied a
light, and in a moment, one portion of the room, was enveloped in rolling
clouds of fragrant smoke.
Now Amable, said he, in a meaning tone, This charm can be tried
by a pure virgin and by her alone. Would'st thou see thy brother, at this
moment? Enter this smoke and look within the mirror: thou shalt behold
him!
A deep silence prevailed. Gerald Morton leaned forward with parted
lips. Amable arose; clasping her hands across her bosom, she passed
toward
the mirror, and her form was lost in the fragrant smoke.
A strange smile passed over the Astrologer's face. Was it of scorn or
malice, or merely an expression of no meaning?
What dost thou see?
A tremulous voice, from the bosom of the smoke-cloud, gave answer.
A river! A rock! A mansion!
Look againwhat seest thou now?
The old man half-rose from his arm-chair. That strange smile deepened
over the Astrologer's face.
A moment passedno answer!
All was still as the grave.
Amable did not answer, for the sight which she beheld, took from her,
for a moment, the power of utterance. She beheld her father's mansion,
rising above the Schuylkill, the river and the rocks of Laurel Hill white
with snow. The silver moon from a clear cold sky shone over all. Along
the ascent to the mansion, came a man of strange costume, with a dark eye
and bold countenance. A voice whisperedthis is your brother, maiden.
This vision, spreading before, in the smoke-darkened glass, filled the
maiden with wonder with awe.
Was it a trick of the Conjurer's art? Or did some Angel of God, lift
the veil of flesh, from that pure woman's eyes, enabling her to beheld a
sight denied to mortal vision? Did some strange impulse of that
angellike
instinct, which in woman, supplies the place of man's boasted, reason,
warn Amable of approaching danger?
The sequel of the legend will tell us.
Still the old man, starting from his seat, awaited an answer.
At last the maiden's voice was heard
I behold she began, but her voice was broken by a shriek.
There was the sound of a hurried struggle, a shriek, a confused tread. In
a moment from the clouds of smoke, appeared a man of some thirty years,
whose muscular form was clad in the scarlet uniform of a British officer.
One arm held Amable by the waist, while the other wound around her neck.
The old man started aghast from his seat. That face, swollen with
debauchery
,
those disclosed eyeballs starting from the purple lids, those lips,
stamped with a brutal smilehe knew it well, and knew that it was not the
face of his son.
He beheld him, Captain Marcham, a bravo who had persecuted Amable
with his addresses and been repulsed with scorn.
He stood there, his laugh of derision, ringing through the chamber, while
Amable looked up in his brutal face, with a terror that hushed her
breath.
The Astrologer stood near the hearth, the strange smile which had crossed
his face, once or twice before, now deepening into a sneering laugh. One
hand, placed within his breast, fondled the heavy purse which he had
received
for his treachery from the British Captain. He had despatched his
servants from the mansion on various errands, left the hall-door unclosed so
as to afford secure entrance to the Captain and his bravoes. Amable
was lost.
In a moment Gerald Morton, instinctively became aware that his child
was in the bravo's power.
Spare my girl, he said, in a quivering voice. She never harmed
you!
O, I will spare the lovely lass, sneered Marcham, Trust me for that!
Old man you need not fear! You old rebels with pretty daughters, should
not make your country mansions places of rendezvous for rebels and traitors.
Indeed you should'nt. That is, if you wish to keep your pretty girls safe.
When was my house a rendezvous for a rebel or a traitor? said the
old man, rising with a trembling dignity.
Have you not given aid, succor, money, provisions, to those rebels who
now skulk somewhere about in the fields of White Marsh? Did not the
rebel officers meet here for council, not more than a month ago? Has not
Mister Washington himself rested here, and received information at your
hands? Old manto be plain with youSir William thinks the air of
Walnut Street gaol would benefit your health. I am commanded to arrest
you as aSPY!
The old man buried his face in his white hands.
There is a way, however, said the Captain, leering at Amable, Let
me marry this pretty girl, and
presto vesto
! The order for your arrest
will disappear!
With a sudden bound Amable sprang from his arms, and sank crouching
near the hearth, her blue eyes fixed on her father, with a look of speechless
agony.
The danger, in all its terrible details stared her in the face. On one side,
dishonor or the pollution of that coward's embraceon the other, death to
her father by the fever and confinement of Walnut Street gaol.
It is very pretty now-a-days for certain perfumed writers and orators, to
prate about the magnanimity of Britain, but could the victims who were
murdered within the walls of the old Gaol by British power, rise some fine
moonlight night, they would form a ghastly band of witnesses, extending
from the prison gate to the doors of Independence Hall.
The old man, Amable, the bravo and Astrologer, all felt the importance
of this truth:
British power
,
means cruelty to the fallen, murder to the
unarmed brave
. They all remembered, that Paoli was yet red with the
blood of massacre, while Walnut Street goal, every morning sent its
disfigured
dead to Potter's field.
Therefore the old man buried his face in his hands, therefore Amable
terrified to the heart, sank crouching by the fireplace, while the bravo looked
with his brutal sneer, upon both father and child.
Come girlno trifling, exclaimed Marcham, as he approached the
crouching maiden. You must go with me, or your good father rests in gaol
before daybreak. Take your choice my pretty lass?
The father raised his face from his hands. He was lividly pale, yet his
blue eyes shone with unusual light. His lip quivered, while his teeth,
closely clenched, gave a wild and unearthly aspect to his countenance.
All hope was over!
The intellect of the old man was, for a moment, threatened with ruin,
utter and withering, as the dark consciousness of his helplessness pressed
like lead upon his brain.
At this moment a footstep was heard, and lo! A man of singular
costume
came through the feathery clouds of smoke, and stood between the
bravo and the father.
A man of almost giant height, with a war-blanket folded over his breast,
a wampum belt about his waist, glittering with tomahawk and knife, while
his folded arms enclosed a rifle.
The aquiline nose, the bold brow, the head destitute of hair, with a single
plume rising from the crown, the eagle-nose and clear full eyethere was
quiet majesty in the stranger's look. He was an Indian, yet his skin was
bronzed, not copper-colored; his eye was sharp and piercing, yet blue as a
summer sky.
For a moment he surveyed the scene. The Captain shrank back from
his gaze. The old man felt a sudden hope dawning over his soul. The
young woman looked up, and gazed upon the Indian's stern visage without
a fear.
There was a pause like the silence of the grave.
At last advancing a step, the Indian handed a paper to Gerald Morton.
He spoke, not in the forest-tongue, but in clear bold English, with a deep,
gutteral accent.
The American Chief sends this to his father. He bade me deliver it,
and I have done his bidding.
Then wheeling on his heel, he confronted the Captain:
Give me that sword. The sword is for the brave man, not for the
coward. A brave man seeks warriors to display his courage: a coward
frightens old men and weak women. Will the coward in a red coat give
me the sword, or must I take it?
There was a withering scorn in the Red-Man's tone. The British officer
stood as if appalled by a ghost.
Your brothers are tied, as cowards should be tied, who put on the
warrior's
dress to do a coward's work, exclaimed the Indian. My warriors
came on them, captured them and tied them together like wolves in a pack.
Come! We are waiting for you. To-night you must go to Valley Forge.
There was something so strange in the clear English of this stern Indian,
that the bravo stood spell-bound, as though it was but the voice of a dream.
At this moment, two savage forms drew near, through the smoke, which
rolling away from the door, now hung coiled in wreaths near the ceiling.
Without a word, the Briton was led from the room. He made no resistance,
for the tomahawk of an Indian has an unpleasant glitter. As he disappeared,
his face gathered one impotent scowl of malice, like a snake that hisses
when your foot is on its head. The Astrologer skulked slowly at his heels.
The Indian was alone with father and daughter.
He looked from one to the other, while an expression of deep emotion
came over his bronzed face.
At last flinging down his rifle, he extended one hand to the old man, one
to the crouching woman.
Father! he groaned in a husky voice: Sister! I have come at last!
As though a strange electric impulse throbbed from their hearts and joined
them all together, in a moment the old man, his daughter and the Indian
lay clasped in each other's arms.
For some few moments, sobs, tears, broken ejaculations! At last the
old man bent back the Indian's head, and with flashing eyes, perused his
image in his face. The daughter too, without a fear, clung to his manly
arm, and looked tenderly up into his blue eyes.
Father, sister! It is a long story, but I will tell it in a few words. A
white man, whom you had done wrong, stole me from your house
thirty-three
years ago. He was an outcast from his kind and made his home in
the wigwam of the Indian. While the warriors taught me to bend the bow
and act a warrior's part, he learned me the tongue of my father. I grew up
at once a white man and an Indian. But, two moons ago, the white man,
whose name we never knew, but who was called the Grey-hawk, told me
the secret of my father's name. Then, he died. I was a warrior; a chief
among warriors. I came toward the rising of the sun to see my father and
my sister. One day I beheld the huts of Valley ForgeI am now a warrior
under the American chief. My band have done him service for many a day;
he is a Man. Father, I see you! Sister, I love you! But ask no more!
for never will the White Indian forsake his forest to dwell within wallsnever
will the Chief lay down his blanket, to put on the dress of the white race!
The Sister looked tenderly into her brother's face. The old man, as if
his only wish had been fulfilled, gazed long and earnestly on the bronzed
countenance of his child. He murmured the name of the man whom he
had darkly, terribly wronged. Then with a prayer on his lips, he sank
back in the arm chair.
He was dead.
On his glassy eye and fallen jaw streamed the warmth of the fire, while
at his feet knelt the white-Indian, his bronzed face glowing in the same
beam, that revealed his sister's face, pale as marble and bathed in tears.
Months passed away. Winter with its ice and snow was gone. Laurel
Hill was green and shadowy with summer. The deer browsed quietly
along the lawn of the old mansion, and the river, which the Indian called
Manayong, went laughing and shouting over its rocky bed.
It was summer, and Sir William Howe had deserted Philadelphia, when
one day, there came a messenger to Congress, in the old State House, that
a battle had been fought near Monmouth. A battle in which Sir William
learned, that Freedom had survived the disease and nakedness and starvation
of Valley Forge.
On that summer day, a young woman sat alone in the chamber of the old
mansion, where her father had died six months before. Alone by the
window
,
the breeze playing with her golden hair, the sunlightstealing ray by
ray through thick vinesfalling in occasional gleams over her young face.
Her blue eye was fixed upon a miniature, which pictured a manly face,
with dark eyes and raven hair, relieved by the breast of a manly form, clad
in the blue uniform of the Continental Army. It was the Betrothed of
Amable; the war once over, freedom won, they were to be married. He
was far away with the army, but her voiceless prayers invoked blessings on
his head.
While the maiden sat there, contemplating her lover's picture, a form
came stealing from the shadows of the room: a face looked over her
shoulder.
It was the White-Indian in his war-blanket.
His face became terribly agitated as he beheld that picture.
At last the maiden heard his hard-drawn breath. She turned her head
and greeted him at first with a smile, but when she beheld the horror,
glooming over his face, she felt her heart grow cold.
Whence come you, brother?
Monmouth!
Have you no message for me? No word from
The Brother extended his hand, and laid the hilt of a broken sword gently
on her bosom.
He said no word, but she knew it all. She saw the blood upon the hilt;
she saw her brother's face, she knew that she was Widow and Virgin at
once.
It was a dark hour in that old Mansion on the Schuylkill.
A graveyard among the hills, a small space of green earth separated from
the forest by a stone wall. In the midst, a wild cherry tree, flinging its
shadow over a white tombstone and a new made grave.
Sunset steals through these branches, over the white tombstone, down
into the recesses of the new-made grave. What is this we see beside the
grave? A man in Indian attire, bending over a coffin, on whose plate is
inscried a single word
AMABLE.
Ah, do not lift the lid, ah, do not uncover that cold face to the light! Ah,
do not lift the lid, for then the breeze will play with her tresses; then the
air will kiss her cheek. Her marble cheek, now colorless forever.
The White-Indian knelt there, the last of his race, bending over the corse
of that fair girl. No tear in his eye, no sob in his bosom. All calm as
stone, he bent there above
his
dead. Soon the coffin was lowered; anon
the grave was filled. The star-beams looked solemnly down through the
trees, upon the grave of that fair girl.
The Indian broke a few leaves from the wild cherry tree, and went on
his way.
He was never seen on the banks of the Manayong again.
Long years afterward, in the far wilds of the forest, a brave General who
had won a battle over the Indian race, stood beside an oaken tree,
contemplating
with deep sorrow, the corse of a friendly savage. He lay there,
stiff and cold, the wreck of a giant man, his bronzed face, lighter in hue
than the visages of his brother Indians. He lay there, with blanket and
wampum belt and tomahawk about him, the rifle in his grasp, the plume
drooping over his bared brow.
He had died, shielding the brave General from the tomahawk. Yes,
with one sudden bound, he sprang before him, receiving on his breast, the
blow intended for Mad Antony Wayne.
And Wayne stood over himhis eyes wet with a soldier's tears
sorrowing
for him as for a rude Indian.
Little did he think that a white man lay there at his feet!
Ah, who can tell the magic of those forests, the wild enchantment of the
chase, the savage witchery of the Indian's life? Here was a man, a white
man, who, bred to Indian life, had in his mature manhood, rejected wealth
and civilization, for the deep joy of the wigwam and the prairie, and now
lay stretcheda cold corse, yet a warrior corseon the banks of the Miami;
AN
Indian to the last
.
[8]
[8]
Note
.This fine old mansion, at the Falls of the Schuylkill, was formerly the
residence of General Mifflin. It is now the country seat of Andrew M'Mackin,
Esq., (Editor of the Courier.) The view from the porch of this mansion, is renowned
for its beauty. It is proper to mention, that the old bridge was consumed by fire
a year or two since. The railroad bridgea structure in modern stylegives
additional
beauty to the prospect. The supernatural part of this legend, is not to be
laid to the author's invention, but to the superstition of the Era, in which it occurred.
This groundaround the Falls, on the shores of the Schuylkillis rich in legends of
the most picturesque and romantic character.
X.THE GRAVEYARD OF GERMANTOWN.
In
Germantown there is an old-time graveyard. No gravelled walks,
no delicate sculpturings of marble, no hot-beds planted over corruption are
there. It is an old-time graveyard, defended from the highway and
encircling
fields by a thick stone wall. On the north and west it is shadowed by
a range of trees, the sombre verdure of the pine, the leafy magnificence of
the maple and horse-chesnut, mingling in one rich mass of foliage. Wild
flowers are in that graveyard, and tangled vines. It is white with
tomb-stones
.
They spring up, like a host of spirits from the green graves; they
seem to struggle with each other for space, for room. The lettering on these
tombstones, is in itself, a rude history. Some are marked with rude words
in Dutch, some in German, one or more in Latin, one in Indian; others in
English. Some bend down, as if hiding their rugged faces from the light,
some start to one side; here and there, rank grass chokes them from the
light and air.
You may talk to me of your
fashionable
graveyards, where Death is
made to look pretty and silly and fanciful, but for me, this one old
graveyard
,
with its rank grass and crowded tombstones, has more of God and
Immortality in it, than all your elegant cemetries together. I love its soil:
its stray wild flowers are omens to me, of a pleasant sleep, taken by weary
ones, who were faint with living too long.
It is to me, a holy thought, that here my bones will one day repose. For
here, in a lengthening line, extend the tombstones, sacred to the memory of
my fathers, far back in to time. They sleep here. The summer day may
dawn, the winter storm may howl, and still they sleep on. No careless
eye looks over these walls. There is no gaudiness of sculpture to invite
the lounger. As for a pic nic party, in an old graveyard like this, it would
be blasphemy. None come save those who have friends here. Sisters
come to talk quietly with the ghost of sisters; children to invoke the spirit
of that Mother
gone home;
I, too sometimes, panting to get free from the
city, come here to talk with my sistersfor two of mine are herewith my
fatherfor that clover blooms above his grave.
It seems to me, too, when bending over that grave, that the Mother's
form, awakened from her distant grave, beneath the sod of Delaware, is also
here!Here, to commune with the dead, whom she loved while living;
here, with the spirits of my fathers!
I cannot get rid of the thought that good spirits love that graveyard. For
all at once, when you enter its walls, you feel sadder, better; more satisfied
with life, yet less reluctant to die. It is such a pleasant spot, to take a long
repose. I have seen it in winter, when there was snow upon the graves,
and the sleigh-bells tinkled in the street. Then calmly and tenderly upon
the white tombstones, played and lingered the cold moon.
16
In summer, too, when the leaves were on the trees, and the grass upon
the sod, when the chirp of the cricket and katy-did broke shrilly over the
graves through the silence of night. In early spring, when there was scarce
a blade of grass to struggle against the north wind, and late in fall when
November baptizes you with her cloud of gloom, I have been there.
And in winter and summer, in fall and spring, in calm or storm, in
sickness
or health, in every change of this great play, called life, does my heart
go out to that graveyard, as though part of it was already there.
Nor do I love it the less, because on every blade of grass, in every flower,
that wildly blooms there, you find written:This soil is sacred from
creeds. Here rests the Indian and the white man; here sleep in one sod,
the Catholic, Presbyterian, Quaker, Methodist, Lutheran, Mennonist, Diest,
Infidel. Here, creeds forgotten, all are men and women again, and not one
but is a simple child of God.
This graveyard was established by men of all creeds, more than a century
ago. May that day be darkness, when creeds shall enter this rude gate.
Better had that man never been born, who shall dare pollute this soil with
the earthly clamor of sect. But on the man, who shall repair this wall, or
keep this graveyard sacred from the hoofs of improvement, who shall do his
best to keep our old graveyard what it is, on that man, be the blessings of
God; may his daughters be virtuous and beautiful, his sons gifted and brave.
In his last hour, may the voices of angels sing hymns to his passing soul.
If there was but one flower in the world, I would plant it on that man's
grave.
It was in November, not in chill, gloomy November, but in golden
November
,
when Paradise opens her windows to us, and wafts the Indian
Summer over the land, that I came to the graveyard.
There was a mellow softness in the air, a golden glow upon the sky,
glossy, gorgeous richness of foliage on the trees, when I went in. It was
in the afternoon. The sun was half-way down the sky. Everything was
still. A religious silence dwelt all about the graveyard.
An aged man, with a rosy countenance, and snow-white hair, sat on a
grave. His coat was strait and collarless, his hat broad in the rim. At
once I knew him for a Disciple of Saint William, the Patron Saint of
Pennsylvania
.
His eyes were fixed upon something at his feet. I drew nigh,
and beheld two skeletons resting on the grass near a new-made grave.
The old Quaker greeted me kindly, and I sat down opposite on a grassy
mound. The skeletons presented a strange, a meaning sight. Around
their crumbling bones were fluttering the remnants of soldiers' uniform.
Buttons, stamped with an eagle, pieces of the breast-belt, fragments of
military
bootsah, sad relics of the fight of Germantown! The sunlight
streamed slowly over their skulls, lighting up the hollow orbits, where once
shone the eyes; and over the bones of the hand, protruding from the
crumbling
uniform.
We sat for a long while in silence.
At last the Quaker spoke.
I am trying to remember which is John and which is Jacob? said he.
John?Jacob?
Truly so. For I knew them well. I was but a youth thenon the
day of the battle, thee minds? The fourth of the tenth month, 1777!
Jacob was a fine young man, with light curly hair; he was married. John
was dark-haired, something younger than Jacob, but quite as good looking.
They were both with Washington at Skippack; with him they came to the
battle
Ah, you remember the battle?
As well as if it happened last week. Did thee ever see a small, one
story house, about half-way down Germantown, with 1713 on its gable?
Jacob's wife lived there. On the morning of the battle, about ten o'clock,
she was standing in the door, her babe resting on her bosom. There was
a thick fog in the air. She was listening to the firing. I stood on the
opposite side, thinking what a fine-looking wife she was, for does thee mind,
she was comely. Her hair was glossy and brown; her eyes dark. She
was not very tall, but a wondrous pleasant woman to look upon. As I
stood looking at her, who should come running down the road, but Jacob
there, with this same uniform on, and a gun in his hand. I can see him
yet; and hear his voice, as plain as I now hear my own.
`Hannah! Hannah!' he cried, `we've beat 'em!' And he ran towards
her, and she held the babe out to him, but just at that moment, he fell in the
middle of the road, torn almost in two by a cannon ball, or some
devil'swork
of that kind. Young man, it was a very sad sight! To see that
poor Jacob, running to kiss his wife and child, and just as the wife calls and
the babe holds out its little handsah!
The Quaker rubbed his eye, blaming the road side dust for the tear that
glimmered there.
And John?
Poor John! We found him after the battle in Chew's field. He was
quite deadlook! Thee can see the bnllet hole in his brain.
And with his cane, he pointed to the scull of the soldier.
We buried them together. They were fine-looking young men, and
many of us shed tears, when we put the sod upon their brows.
Sod? Had you no coffins?
The old man opened his eyes.
Had thee seen the village people, taking their barn-doors off their hinges,
so that they might carry away the dead bodies by dozens at a time, and
bury them in the fields, whenever a big hole was dughad thee seen this,
thee would'nt ask such a question!
Was there not a great deal of glory on that day?
If thee means, that it was like an election parade, or a fourth of July
gathering, I can tell thee, there was not much glory of that kind. If thee
means that it made my blood boil to see the bodies of my neighbors carried
by, some dead, some groaning yet, some howling mad with pain; others
with legs torn off, others with arms rent at the very shoulder, here one with
his jaw broken, there another with his eyes put out;if thee means that
boiling of the blood, caused by sights like these, then I can tell thee, there
was plenty of
glory!
The battle was bloody then?
Did thee ever see how rich the grass grows on Chew's lawn? How
many hearts spent their last blood to fatten that soil?
You helped to bury the dead?
I remember well, that thy grandfatherhe is buried yondertook hold
of one corner of a barn-door, while I and two friends took the others. There
were some six or seven bodies piled crosswise, and huddled together on that
barn-door. We took them to the fields and buried them in a big pit. I
remember one fair-faced British officer; his ruffled shirt was red with blood.
He was a fine-looking young man, and doubtless had a wife or sister in
England
.
I pitied him very much.
Were you near the scene of conflict? I do not wish to imply that you
bore arms, for your principles forbid the thought.
I can remember standing in my father's door, when a wounded soldier
pursued by another, fell at my feet crying `quarter!' I remember that I
seized the pursuer's musket, and rapped him over the head, after which he
let the wounded soldier be.
Did you hurt him much?
He did'nt move afterward. Some evil people wished to make it
appear
,
that I killed him. But thee sees that was false, for he may have been
very tired running and died from the heat. However, I hit him with all
my strength.
The Quaker held out his right arm, which was an arm of iron, even in
its withered old age.
What was he? British or American?
He was dressed in red, meekly responded the Quaker.
Did you see General Washington during the fight?
I saw a tall man of majestic presence riding a grey horse. I saw him
now go in the mist; now come out again; now here, now there. One
time I saw him, when he reigned his horse in front of Chew's wallhe
looked terrible, for his eyes seemed to frown, his lips were clenched; his
forehead was disfigured by a big vein that seemed bursting from the skin.
He was covered with dust and bloodhis saddle-cloth was torn by bullets.
I never forgot the look of that man, nor shall I, to the hour of my death.
That man they told me was George Washington.
Why was he thus moved?
An aid-de.camp had just told him that one of his Generals was drunk
under a hedge.
Did you see Cornwallis?
That I did. He was riding up the street, as fast as his horse could go
a handsome man, but when I saw him, his face was white as a meal-bag.
Thee sees he was a brave man, but friend Washington came on him before
day, without
timely notice
.
There was a curious twitch about the Quaker's mouth. He did not smile,
but still it was a suspicious shape for a Quaker's mouth.
XI.REMEMBER PAOLI.
Hist
!It is still night; the clear sky arches above; the dim woods are
all around the field; and in the centre of the meadow, resting on the grass
crisped by the autumnal frosts, sleep the worn veterans of the war,
disheartened
by want, and wearied by the day's march.
It is still night; and the light of the scanty fire falls on wan faces,
hollow
eyes, and sunken cheeks; on tattered apparel, muskets unfit for use,
and broken arms.
It is still night; and they snatch a feverish sleep beside the scanty fire,
and lay them down to dream of a time when the ripe harvest shall no more
be trodden down by the blood-stained hoofwhen the valley shall no more
be haunted by the Traitor-Refugeewhen Liberty and Freedom shall walk
in broadcloth, instead of wandering about with the unshodden feet, and the
tattered rags of want.
It is still night; and Mad Anthony Wayne watches while his soldiers
sleep.
He watches beside the camp-fire. You can mark his towering form, his
breadth of shoulders, and his prominence of chest. You can see his face
by the red light of the firethat manly face, with the broad forehead, the
marked eye-brows, over-arching the deep hazel eye, that lightens and gleams
as he gazes upon the men of his band.
You can note the uniform of the Revolutionthe wide coat of blue,
varied by the buckskin sword-belt, from which depends the sword that
Wayne alone can wield,the facings of buff, the buttons rusted by the dews
of night, and the march-worn trooper's boots, reaching above his knees,
with the stout iron spurs standing out from each heel.
Hist! The night is still, but there is a sound in yonder thicket.
Look! can you see nothing?
No. The night is stillthe defenceless Continentals sleep in the centre
of the meadowall around is dark. The sky above is clear, but the stars
give forth no light. The wind sweeps around the meadowdim and
indistinct
it sweeps, and is silent and still. I can see nothing.
Place your ear to the earth. Hear you nothing?
Yesyes. A slight sounda distant rumbling. There is thunder
growling
in the bosom of the earth, but it is distant. It is like the murmur on
the ocean, ere the terrible white squall sweeps away the commerce of a
nation
but
it is distant, very distant.
Now look forth on the night. Cast your eye to the thicketsee you
nothing?
Yesthere is a gleam like the light of the fire-fly. Ha! It lightens on
the nightthat quivering gleam! It is the flash of swordsthe glittering
of arms!
Charge upon the Rebels! Upon themover themno quarterno
quarter!
Watcher of the night, watcher over the land of the New World, watching
over the fortunes of the starved children of Freedomwhat see you now?
A band of armed men, mounted on stout steeds, with swords in their
uplifted
hands. They sweep from the thicket; they encompass the meadow;
they surround the Rebel host!
The
gallant
Lord Grey rides at their head. His voice rings out clear
and loud upon the frosty air.
Root and branch, hip and thigh, cut them down. Spare not a man
heed never a cry for quarter. Cut them down! Charge for England and
St. George!
And then there was uplifting of swords, and butchery of defenceless men,
and there was a riding over the wounded, and a trampling over the faces of
the dying. And then there was a cry for quarter, and the response
To your throats take that! We give you quarter, the quarter of the
sword, accursed Rebels!
There was a moment, whose history was written with good sharp
swords, on the visages of dying men.
It was the moment when the defenceless Continental sprang up from his
hasty sleep, into the arms of the merciless death! It was the moment
when Wayne groaned aloud with agony, as the sod of Paoli was flooded
with a pool of blood that poured from the corses of the slaughtered soldiers
of his band. It was the moment when the cry for quarter was mocked
when the Rebel clung in his despair to the stirrup of the Britisher, and
clung in vain; it was the moment when the gallant Lord Greythat
gentleman
,
nobleman,
Christian
whose heart only throbbed with generous
impulses
;
who from his boyhood, was schooled in the doctrines of mercy,
halloed his war-dogs on to the slaughter, and shouted up to the star-lit
Heavens, until the angels might grow sick of the scene
Over themover themheed never a cryheed never a voice! Root
and branch cut them down!No quarter!
It is dark and troubled night; and the Voice of Blood goes up to God,
shrieking for vengeance!
It is morning; sad and ghastly morning; and the first sunbeams shine
over the field, which was yesternight a green meadowthe field that is now
an Aceldemaa field of blood, strewn with heaps of the dead, arms torn
from the body, eyes hollowed from the sockets, faces turned to the earth,
and buried in blood, ghastly pictures of death and pain, painted by the hand
of the Briton, for the bright sun to shine down upon, for men to applaud,
for the King to approve, for God to avenge.
It is a sad and ghastly morning; and Wayne stands looking over the
slaughtered heaps, surrounded by the little band of survivors, and as he
gazes on this scene of horror, the Voice of Blood goes shrieking up to God
for vengeance, and the ghosts of the slain darken the portals of Heaven,
with their forms of woe, and their voices mingle with the Voice of Blood.
Was the Voice of Blood answered?
A year passed, and the ghosts of the murdered looked down from the
portals of the Unseen, upon the ramparts of Stony Point.
It is still night; the stars look calmly down upon the broad Hudson; and
in the dim air of night towers the rock and fort of Stony Point.
The Britishers have retired to rest. They sleep in their warm, quiet
beds. They sleep with pleasant dreams of American maidens dishonored,
and American fathers, with grey hairs dabbled in blood. They shall have
merrier dreams anon, I trow. Aye, aye!
All is quiet around Stony Point: the sentinel leans idly over the wall
that bounds his lonely walk; he gazes down the void of darkness, until his
glance falls upon the broad and magnificent Hudson. He hears nothing
he sees nothing.
It is a pity for that sentinel, that his eyes are not keen, and his glance
piercing. Had his eye-sight been but a little keener, he might have seen
Death creeping up that rampart in some hundred shapeshe might have
seen the long talon-like fingers of the skeleton-god clutching for his own
plump British throat. But his eye-sight was not keenmore's the pity for
him.
Pity it was, that the sentinel could not hear a little more keenly. Had
his ears been good, he might have heard a little whisper that went from two
hundred tongues, around the ramparts of Stony Point.
General, what shall be the watch-word?
And then, had the sentinel inclined his ear over the ramparts, and listened
very attentively indeed, he might have heard the answer, sweeping up to
the Heavens, like a voice of blood
Remember Paoli!
Hoho! And so Paoli is to be rememberedand so the Voice of
Blood shrieked not in the ears of God in vain.
And so the vengeance for Paoli is creeping up the ramparts of the fort!
Hoho! Pity Lord Grey were not here to see the sport!
The sentinel was not blessed with supernatural sight or hearing; he did
not see the figures creeping up the ramparts; he did not hear their whispers,
until a rude hand clutched him round the throat, and up to the Heavens
swept the thunder-shout
Remember Paoli!
And then a rude bayonet pinned him to the wood of the ramparts, and
then the esplanade of the fort, and its rooms and its halls were filled with
silent avengers, and then came Britishers rushing from their beds, crying for
quarter, and then they had itthe quarter of Paoli!
And then, through the smoke, and the gloom, and the bloodshed of that
terrible night, with the light of a torch now falling on his face, with the
gleam of starlight now giving a spectral appearance to his features, swept on,
right on, over heaps of dead, one magnificent form, grasping a stout
broadsword
in his right hand, which sternly rose, and sternly fell, cutting a
British soldier down at every blow, and laying them along the floor of the
fort, in the puddle of their own hireling blood.
Ghosts of Paolishout! are you not terribly avenged?
Spare meI have a wifea childthey wait my return to England!
QuarterQuarter!
I mind me of a man named Shoelmirehe had a wife and a childa
mother, old and grey-haired, waited his return from the wars. On the night
of Paoli, he cried for quarter! Such quarter I give youRemember Paoli!
Save mequarter!
How that sword hisses through the air!
Remember Paoli!
`I have a grey-haired father! Quarter!
So had Daunton at Paoli! Oh, Remember Paoli!
Spare meyou see I have no sword!Quarter!
Friend, I would spare thee if I dared. But the Ghosts of Paoli nerve
my arm`We had no swords at Paoli, and ye butchered us!' they shriek.
Oh,
Remember Paoli
!
And as the beams of the rising moon, streaming through yonder narrow
window, for a moment light up the brow of the Avengerdusky with
battle-smoke
,
red with blood, deformed by passionbehold! That sword
describes a fiery circle in the air, it hisses down, sinks into the victim's
skull? No!
His arm falls nerveless by his side; the sword, that grim, rough blade,
dented with the records of the fight of Brandywine, clatters on the floor.
It is my dutythe Ghosts of Paoli call to mebut I cannot kill you!'
shouts the American Warrior, and his weaponless hands are extended to
the trembling Briton.
All around is smoke, and darkness, and blood; the cry for quarter, and
the death-sentence, Remember Paoli! but here, in the centre of the scene
of slaughteryes, in the centre of that flood of moonlight, pouring through
the solitary window, behold a strange and impressive sight:
The kneeling forma grey-haired man, who has grown hoary doing
murder in the name of Good King George,his hands uplifted in trembling
supplication, his eyes starting from the dilating lids, as he shrieks for the
mercy that he never gave!
The figure towering above him, with the Continental uniform fluttering
in ribands over his broad chest, his hands and face red with blood and
darkened with the stain of powder, the veins swelling from his bared throat,
the eye glaring from his compressed brow
Such were the figures disclosed by the sudden glow of moonlight!
And yet from that brow, dusky with powder, red with blood, there broke
the gleam of mercy, and yet those hands, dripping with crimson stains,
were extended to lift the cringing Briton from the dust.
Look yeold manat Paoli and that hoarse voice, heard amid the
roar of midnight conflict, grew tremulous as a child's, when it spoke those
fatal wordsat Paoli; even through the darkness of that terrible night, I
beheld a boy, only eighteen years old, clinging to the stirrup of Lord Grey;
yes, by the light of a pistol-flash, I beheld his eyes glare, his hands quiver
over his head, as he shrieked for `Quarter!'
And he spared him? faltered the Briton.
Now, mark you, this boy had been consigned to my care by his
mother, a brave American woman, who had sent this last hope of her
widowed heart forth to battle
And he spared him again faltered the Briton.
The same pistol, which flashed its red light over his pale face, and
quivering hands, sent the bullet through his brain. Lord Grey held that
pistol, Lord Grey heard the cry for mercy, Lord Grey beheld the young
face trampled into mangled flesh by his horse's hoofs! And now, sir
with that terrible memory of Paoli stamped upon my soulnow, while that
young face, with the red wound between the eyes, passes before me, I
spare your life;there lies my swordI will not take it up again! Cling
to me, sir, and do not part for an instant from my side, for my good soldiers
have keen memories. I may forget, but hark! Do you hear them?
They do not massacre defenceless men in cold bloodah, no! They
only
REMEMBER PAOLI!
BOOK THIRD.
BENEDICT ARNOLD.
BENEDICT ARNOLD.
I.THE MOTHER AND HER BABE.
The
angels of God look down from the sky to witness the deep
tenderness
of a mother's love. The angels of God look down to witness that
sight which angels love to seea mother watching over her sleeping babe.
Yes, if even these awful intelligences, which are but little above man, and
yet next to God, circling there, deep after deep, far through the homes of
eternity, bend from the sky to witness a scene of human bliss and woe, that
sight is the deep agony of a mother's love as she watches o'er her sleeping
child!
The deep agony of a mother's love? Yes! For in that moment, when
gazing upon the childsmiling upon it as it sleepsdoes not a deep agony
seize the mother's soul, as she tries to picture the future life of her babe?
whether that child will rise in honor and go down to death in glory, or
whether the dishonored life and unwept death will be its heritage?
Ah, the sublimity of the heart is there, in that mother's love, which even
angels bend down to look upon.
One hundred years ago, in a far New England town, a mother, with her
babe in her arms, stole softly through the opened doors of a quaint old
village
church, and knelt beside the altar.
Yes, while the stillness of the Sabbath evening gathered like a calm from
heaven around her,while a glimpse of the green graveyard came through
the unclosed windows, and the last beam of the setting sun played over the
rustic steeple, that mother knelt alone, and placed her sleeping boy upon
the sacramental altar.
That mother's face was not beautifulcare had been too busy there
yet there was a beauty in that uplifted countenance, in those upraised eyes
of dark deep blue, in that kneeling form, with the clasped hands pressed
against the agitated bosom,a beauty holier than earth, like that of Mary,
the Virgin Mother.
And why comes this Mother here to this lonely church, in this twilight
hour, to lay her babe upon the altar, and kneel in silence there?
Listen to her prayer.
She prays the
Father
, yonder, to guide the boy through life, to make him
a man of honor, a disciple of the Lord.
While these faltering accents fall from her tongue, behold! There, on
the vacancy of the twilight air, she beholds a vision of that boy's life, act
crowding on act, scene on scene, until her eyes burn in their sockets, and
the thick sweat stands in beads upon her brow.
First, her pale face is stamped with fear. She beholds her boy, now
grown to young manhood, standing upon a vessel's deck, far out upon the
deep waters. The waves heave around him, and meet above the mast, and
yet that boy is firm. The red lightning from you dark cloud, comes
quivering
down the mainmast, and yet his cheek does not pale, his breast does
not shrink. Yes, while the stout sailors fall cowering upon the deck, that
boy stands firm, and laughs at the stormas though his spirit rose to meet
the lightning in its coming, and grapple with the thunderbolt in its way.
This vision passes.
The mother, kneeling there, beside the sacramental altar, beholds another
scene of her boy's lifeanother and another. At last, with eyes swimming
in tears of joy, she beholds a scene, so glorious drawn there upon the
twilight
airher boy grown to hardy manhood, riding amid embattled legions,
with the victor's laurel upon his browthe praises of a nation ringing in his
earsa scene so glorious, that her heart is filled to bursting, and that deep
I thank thee, oh my God! falls tremulously from her lips.
The next scene, right after the scene of gloryit is dark, crushing,
horrible
!
The mother starts appalled to her feether shriek quivers through
the lonely churchshe spreads forth her hands over the sleeping babe
she calls to God!
Father in Heaven! take, O take this child while he is yet innocent!
Let him not live to be a mana demon in human shape
a curse to his race!
And as she stands there, quivering and pale, and cold with horrorlook!
That child, laid there on the sacramental altar, opens its clear dark eyes,
and claps its tiny hands, and smiles!
That child was
Benedict Arnold
.
Near half a century had passed away. It was night in that New
England
town, where, forty-five years before, that mother, in the calmness of
the Sabbath evening, brought her babe and laid it on the altar.
It was midnight. The village girl had bidden her lover a last good-night,
that good old father had lifted up his voice in prayer, with his children all
around himit was midnight, and the village people slept soundly in
their beds.
All at once, rising from the deep silence, a horrid yell went up to the
midnight sky. All at once a blaze of fire burst over the roof. Look
yonder
!That
father murdered on his own thresholdthat mother stabbed
in the midst of her childrenthat maiden kneeling there, pleading for life,
as the sharp steel crashes into her brain!
Then the blood flows in the startled streetsthen British troopers flit to
and fro in the red lightthen, rising in the centre of the town, that quiet
village church, with its rustic steeple, towers into the blaze.
And thereoh, Father of Mercy!there, in that steeple, stands a soldier,
with a dark cloak half-wrapped around his red uniformyes, there he stands,
with folded arms, and from that height surveys with a calm joy, the horrid
scene of massacre below.
Now, mother of Arnold, look from Heaven and weep! Forty-five years
ago, you laid your child upon the sacramental altar of this church, and now
he stands in yonder steeple, drinking in with a calm joy, the terrible cries
of old men, and trembling women, and little children, hewn down in hideous
murder, before his very eyes.
Look there, and learn what a devil
Remorse
can make of such a man!
Here are the faces he has known in Childhoodthe friends of his
manhood
the
matrons, who were little girls when he was a boyhere they
are, hacked by British swords, and he looks on and smiles!
At last, the cries are stilled in death; the last flash of the burning town
glares over the steeple, and there, attired in that scarlet uniform, his bronzed
face stamped with the conflict of hideous passionsthere, smiling still amid
the scenes of ruin and blood, stands
Benedict Arnold
.
That was the last act of the Traitor on our soil. In a few days he sailed
from our shores, and came back no more.
And now, as he goes yonder, on his awful way, while millions curse the
echo of his name, in yonder lonely room two orphans bless that name.
What is this you say? Orphans bless the name of Arnold? Yes, my
friendsfor there was a night when those orphans were without a crust of
bread, while their father lay mouldering on the sod of Bunker Hill. Yes,
the Legislature of Massachusetts had left these children to the cold mercy of
the world, and that when they bore his name who fell on Bunker Hill
the immortal
Warren
.
While they sate there, hungry and cold, no fire on the hearth, not a crust
of bread upon the table, their eyes fixed upon the tearful face of the good
woman who gave them the shelter of a roof, a letter came, and in its folds
five hundred dollars from Benedict Arnold.
This at the very moment when he was steeling his soul to the guilt of
Treason. This at the moment when his fortune had been scattered in
banquets
and pageantswhen assailed by clamorous creditors, he was ready to
sell his soul for gold.
From the last wreck of his fortune, all that had been left from the
parasites
who fed upon him, while they could, and then stung the hand that fed
them, he took five hundred dollars and sent them to the children of his
comrade, the patriot Warren.
Is it true, that when the curse of all wronged orphans quivers up yonder,
the Angels of God shed tears at that sound of woe? Then, at the awful
hour when Arnold's soul went up to judgment, did the prayer's of Warren's
orphan children go up there, and like Angels, plead for him with
God
.
II.THE DRUGGIST OF NEW HAVEN.
Let
us look at his life between these periods; let us follow the varied
and tumultuous course of forty-five years, and learn how the innocent and
smiling babe, became the Outcast of his native land.
The course of this strange history, will lead us to look upon two men:
First, a brave and noble man, whose hand was firm as his heart was true,
at once a Knight worthy of the brightest days of chivalry, and a Soldier
beloved by his countrymen; honored by the friendship of Washington
that man,
Benedict Arnold
.
Then, a bandit and an outcast, a man panoplied in hideous crimes, so
dark, so infamous, that my tongue falters as it speaks his name
Benedict
Arnold
.
Let me confess, that when I first selected this theme. I only thought of
its melo-dramatic contrasts, its strong lights and deep shadows, its incidents
of wild romance.
But now, that I have learned the fearful lesson of this life, let me frankly
confess, that in the pages of history or fiction, there is no tragedy to
compare
with the plain history of Benedict Arnold. It is, in one word, a
Paradise
Lost, brought down to our own times and homes, and told in familiar
language of everyday life. Through its every page, aye from the smiling
autumnal landscape of Kenebec, from the barren rock of Quebec, or the
green heights of Hudson, there glooms one horrid phantom, with a massive
forehead and deep-set eyes, the Lucifer of the storyBenedict Arnold.
The man who can read his life, in all its details, without tears, has a
heart harder than the roadside flint.
One word in regard to the infancy of Arnold.
You have doubtless seen, in the streets of our large cities, the painful
spectacle of a beggar-women, tramping about with a deformed child in her
arms, making a show of its deformity, exciting sympathy by the exhibition
of its hideousness? Does the poor child fail to excite sympathy, when
attired in a jacket and trowsers, as a little boy? Then, the gipsey conceals
its deformed limbs under a frock, covers its wan and sickly face with a
bonnet.
And she changes it from to-day, making deformity always new, sickness,
rags and ulcers always marketable.
There is a class of men, who always remind me of this crafty
beggar-woman
.
They are the journeymen historians, the petty compilers of
pompous
falsehood, who prevail in the vincinity of bookseller's kitchens, and
acquire corpulence.
As the beggar-woman has her Deformed child, so these Historians who
work by the line and yard, have their certain class of Incidents, which they
crowd into all their Compilations, whether Histories, Lectures, or Pictorial
abominations, dressing them somewhat variously, in order to suit the changes
of time and place.
For example; the first English writers who undertook the history of
Napoleon, propagated various stories about his infancy, which, in point of
truth and tragic interest, remind us of Blue-beard and Cock-robin. The
same stories had been previously told of Alexander, Csar, Richlieu, and
lately we have seen them revived in a new shape, in order to suit the
infantile
days of Santa Anna.
These stereotyped fablesthe Deformed children of Historyare in fact,
to be found in every Biography, written by an enemy. They may wear
trousers in one history, put on a frock in another, but still cannot altogether
hide their original features. Cloak it as you may, the Deformed child of
history appears wherever we find it, just what it is, a puny and ridiculous
libel.
One of these Deformed children lurks in the current life of Arnold.
It is the grave story of the youth of Benedict, being passed away in
various
precocious atrocities. He strewed the road with pounded glass, in
order that other little boys might cut their feet; he fried frogs upon a
bakeiron
heated to an incredible intensity; he geared flies in harness, decapitated
grasshoppers, impaled Katy-dids.
So says the history.
Is not this a very dignified, very solemn thing for the Historian's notice?
Why did he not pursue the subject, and state that at the age of two years,
Benedict Arnold was deeply occupied in the pursuit of Latin, Sanscript,
Hebrew, Moral Philosophy and the Philosopher's stone?
Because the latter part of a man's life is made infamous by his crimes,
must your grave Historian ransack Blue-beard and Cock-robin, in order to
rake up certain delectable horrors, with which to adorn the history of his
childhood?
In our research into Arnold's life, we must bear one important fact in
mind.
After he had betrayed his country, it was deemed not only
justifiable
to chronicle every blot and spec in his character, but highly
praiseworthy
to tumble the overflowing inkstand of libel upon every vestige of
his name
.
That he comes down to our time, with a single good deed adhering to his
memory, has always seemed miraculous to me.
With these introductory remarks, let us pursue the history.
It was in the city of New Haven, on a cold day of April, 1775, that a
man of some thirty-five years, stood behind a counter, an apron on his
manly chest, mixing medicines, pasting labels on phials, and putting poisons
in their places.
Look well at this man, as he stands engaged in his occupation. Did you
ever see a bolder browa deeper, darker, or more intensely brilliant eye
a more resolute lip or more determined chin? Mark the massy outline of
that face from the ear to the chin; a world of iron will is written in that
firm outline.
The hair, unclogged with the powder in fashion at this time, falls back
from his forehead in harsh masses; its dark hue imparting a strong relief to
the bold and warrior-like face.
While this man stands at his counter, busy with pestle and mortarhark!
There is a murmur along the streets of New Haven; a crowd darkens
under those aged elms; the murmur deepens; the Druggist became
conscious
of four deep-muttered words:
BattleLexingtonBritishBeaten!
With one bound the Druggist leaps over the counter, rushes into the
street and pushes his way through the crowd. Listen to that tumultuous
murmur! A battle has been fought at Lexington, between the British and
the Americans; or in other words, the handsomely attired minions of King
George, have been soundly beaten by the plain farmers of New England.
That murmur deepens through the crowd, and in a moment the Druggist
is in the centre of the scene. Two hundred men group round him, begging
to be led against the British.
But there is a difficulty; the Common Council, using a privilege granted
to all corporate bodies from immemorial time, to make laughing-stocks of
themselves, by a display of petty authority, have locked up all the arms.
Arnold, cried a patriotic citizen, uncouth in attire and speech: We
are willing to fight the Britishers, but the city council won't let us have
any guns!
Won't they? said the Druggist, with that sardonic sneer, which always
made his enemies afraid: Then our remedy is plain. Come; let us
take them!
Five minutes had not passed, before the city Council, knowing this
Druggist to be a man of few words and quick deeds, yielded up the guns.
That hour the Druggist became a soldier.
Let us now pass over a month or more.
It is a night in May.
Look yonder, through the night? Do you see that tremendous rock, as
it towers up ruggedly sublime, into the deep blue sky? Yes, over the wide
range of woods, over the silent fastnesses of the wilderness, over the calm
waters of Lake George and the waves of Champlain, that rock towers and
swells on the night, like an awful monument, erected by the lost Angels,
when they fell from Heaven.
And there, far away in the sky, the moon dwindled away to a slender
thread, sheds over the blue vault and the deep woods and the tremendous
rock, a light, at once sad, solemn, sepulchral.
Do you see the picture? Does it not stamp itself upon your soul, an
image of terrible beauty? Do you not feel the awful silence that broods there?
18
On the summit of that rock the British garrison are sleeping, aye,
slumbering
peacefully, under the comfortable influence of beef and ale, in the
impregnable fortress of Ticonderoga. From the topmost crag, the broad
Banner of the Red Cross swings lazily against the sky.
At this moment, there is a murmur far down in the dark ravine. Let us
look there. A multitude of shadows come stealing into the dim light of the
moon; they climb that impregnable rock; they darken round that fortress
gate. All is still as death.
Two figures stand in the shadows of the fortress gate; in that stern
determined
visage, you see the first of the green mountain boys, stout
Ethan
Allen
; in that muscular figure, with the marked face and deep-set eye,
you recognize the druggist of New Haven,
Benedict Arnold
.
A fierce shout, a cry, a crash goes up to Heaven! The British Colonel
rushing from his bed, asks what Power is this, which demands the
surrender
of Ticonderoga?
For all his spangled coat and waving plumes, this gentleman was
behind the age. He had not heard, that a New Nation had lately been
born on the sod of Lexington. Nor did he dream of the Eight Years
Baptism
of blood and tears, which was to prepare this nation for its full
communion
with the Church of Nations, on the plains of Yorktown.In
what name do you demand the surrender of this fortress?
In the name of a King? Or perchance in the name of Benedict Arnold
and stout Ethan Allen? No! Hark how that stern response breaks through
the silence of night.
In the name of the Lord Jehovah and the Continental Congress!
And floating into the blue sky, the
Pine tree
banner waved from the
summit of Ticonderoga.
You will remember, that the emblem of the New-born nation, at
that time, was a Pine Tree. The Lord had not yet given his stars, to flash
from the Banner of Freedom; an emblem of the rights of man all over the
world.
That was the first deed of Benedict Arnold; the initial letter to a long
alphabet of glorious deeds, which was to end in the blackness of Treason.
III.THE MARCH THROUGH THE WILDERNESS.
There
was a day, my friends, when some Italian peasants, toiling in the
vineyards of their cloudless clime, beneath the shadow of those awful Alps,
that rise as if to the very Heavens, ran in terror to the village Priest,
begging
him to pray for them, for the end of the world was coming.
The Priest calmly inquired the cause of all the clamor. Soon the
mystery
was explained. Looking up into the white ravines of the Alps, the
peasants had seen an army coming downemerging from that awful
wilderness
of snow and ice, where the avalanche alone had spoken, for ages
with cannons, and plumes, and banners, and a little man in a grey
ridingcoat
in their midst.
That little man was named Napoleon Bonapartea YOUNG MAN, who
one day was starving in Paris for the want of a dinner, and the next held
France in the palm of his hand.
That was a great deed, the crossing of the Alps, by the young man,
Napoleon
,
but I will now tell you a bolder deed, done by the Patriot,
Benedict
Arnold
.
In April, 1775, that man Arnold stood behind a counter, mixing
medicines
,
pasting labels on phials, and putting poisons in their places.
In May, the Druggist Arnold, stood beside stout Ethan Allen, in the gate
of conquered Ticonderoga.
In September, the soldier Arnold was on his way to Quebec, through an
untrodden desert of three hundred miles.
One night, the young Commander Washington sat in his tent at
Cambridge
,
(near Boston,) with his eye fixed on the map of Canada, and his
finger laid on that spot marked
Quebec
.
While thus employed a soldier stood by his side.
Give me two thousand men, General, said he, and I will take
Quebec.
Washington answered this with a look of incredulous surprise.
Three hundred miles of untrodden wilderness are to be traversed, ere
you can obtain even a glimpse of the rock of Quebec.
Yet I will go! was the firm response of the soldier.
But there are rocks, and ravines, and dense forests, and unknown lakes,
and impassable cataracts in the way, answered Washington; and then
the cold of winter will come on; your provisions will fail; your men will
be starved or frozen to death.
Still that soldier was firm.
Give me two thousand men, and I will go!
Do you mark the bold browthe clear, dark eyethe determined lip of
that soldier? Do you behold the face of Washingtonutterly unlike your
vulgar pictures of the maneach outline moulded by a high resolve, the
eye gleaming chivalry, the brow radiant with the light of genius?
That soldier was Benedict Arnold.
Washington took him by the hand, and bade him go!
Yes, go through the wilderness. Attack and possess Quebec. Then
the annexation of Canada will be certain; the American name will embrace
a Continent. Go! and God speed you on your journey.
Did that great truth ever strike you? Washington did not fight for a
Half-America, or a Piece-America, but for the Continent, the whole
Continent
.
His army was not called the American, but the
Continental
army. The Congress was not entitled American, but
Continental
. The
very currency was
Continental
. In one word, Washington and his
compatriots
were impressed with the belief that God had given the whole
Continent
to the Free.Therefore he gazed upon the map of Canada.
Therefore
,
pressing Arnold's hand, he bade him God speed!
And he did go. Yes, look yonder on the broad ocean. Behold that
little
fleet of eleven vessels stealing along the coast, toward the mouth of the
Kennebec. That fleet, sailing on the 17th of September, 1775, contains
eleven hundred brave men, and their leader, Benedict Arnold.
They reach the mouth of the Kennebecthey glide along its
cliff-embosomed
shores. These brave men are about to traverse an untrodden
wilderness of 300 miles, and then attack the Gibralter of America. If that
was not a bold idea, then the crossing of the Alps was a mere holiday
pastime.
Let us leave this little army to build their canoes near the mouth of the
Kennebec; let us hurry into the thick wilderness.
Even in these days of steam and rail-road cars, the Kennebec is beautiful.
Some of you have wandered there by its deep waters, and seen the smiles
of woman mirrowed in its wave. Some of you have gazed upon those high
cliffs, those shadowy glens, now peopled with the hum of busy life.
But in the day when Arnold dared its solitudes, there was a grandeur
stamped on these rocks and cliffsa grandeur fresh from the hands of God.
Yet, even amidst its awful wilds, there was a scene of strange loveliness,
a picture which I would stamp upon your souls.
Stretching away from the dark waters of that riverwhere another
stream mingles with its flooda wide plain, bounded by dense forests,
breaks on your eye.
As the glimmering day is seen over the eastern hills, there, in the centre
of the plain, stands a solitary figure, a lone Indian, the last of a line of kings;
yes, with his arms folded, his war-blanket gathered about his form, the
hatchet and knife lying idly at his feetthere stands the last of a long line
of forest kings, gazing at the ruins of his race.
The ruins of his race? Yeslook there! In the centre of that plain,
a small fabric arises under the shade of centuried oaksa small fabric, with
battered walls and rude windows, stands there like a tomb in the desert, so
lonely, even amid this desolation.
Let us enter this rude place. What a sight is there! As the first gleam
of day breaks over the eastern hills, it trembles through those rude windows,
it trembles upon that shattered altar, that fallen cross.
Altar and cross? What do they here in the wilderness? And why
does that lone Indianthat last of the kingswho could be burned without
a murmurwhy does he mutter wildly to himself as he gazes upon this
ruin?
Listen. Here, many years ago, dwelt a powerful Indian tribe, and here,
from afar over the waters, came a peaceful man, clad in a long coarse robe,
with a rude cross hanging on his breast. That peaceful man built the
church, reared the altar, planted the cross. Here, in the calmness of the
summer evening, you might see the red warrior with blunted war-knife,
come to worship; the little Indian child kneeling there, clasping its tiny
hands, as it learned, in its rude dialect, to lisp the name of Jesus; and here
the dark brown Indian maiden, with her raven hair falling over her bending
form, listened with dilating eyes, to that story of the virgin-mother.
Here, that man with the cross on his breast, lived and taught for
twenty-five
years. Forsaking the delights of Parisian civilization, the altars and
monuments of the eternal city, he came here to teach the rude Indian that
he had a soul, that God cared for him, that a great Being, in a far distant
land, wept, prayed, and died for
him
, the dusky savage of the woods.
When he first came here, his hair was dark as night: here he lived until
it matched the winter's snow.
One Sabbath morn, just as the day broke over these hills, while man and
woman and child knelt before the altar, while the aged Priest stood yonder,
lifting the sacramental cup above his head, yesmy blood chill, as I write
iton a Sabbath morning, as the worship of Almighty God was celebrated
in the church, all at once a horrid cry broke on the silent air! A cry, a
yell, a wild hurrah!
The cry of women, as they knelt for mercy, and in answer to their prayer
the clubbed rifle came crushing downthe yell of warriors shot like dogs
upon the chapel floorthe wild hurrah of the murderers, who fired through
these windows upon the worshippers of Jehovah!
There was a flame rising into that Sabbath skythere were the horrid
shrieks of massacre ringing on the air, as men and women plunged into the
floodwhile from yonder walls of rocks, the murderers picked them one by
one! The lonely plain ran with blood, down to the Kenebec, and the
dying who struggled in its waves, left but a bloody track on the waters, to
tell of their last fatal plunge!
And yonder, yes, in the church of God, kneeling beside that altar,
clasping
that cross with his trembling hands, there crouched the old man as the
death-blow sank into his brain!
His white hair was dyed blood-red, even as the name
of the Saviour
quivered from his lips.
Even, camewhere a Nation had been, was now only a harvest of dead
bodies: where Religion had been, was now only and old man, murdered
beside his altar.
Yet still, in death, his right hand uplifted, clung to the fallen cross.
And who were the murderers?
I will not say that they were Christians, but they were white men, and
the children of white parents. They had been reared in the knowledge of
a Saviour; they had been taught the existence of a God. They were
soldiers
,
too, right brave men, withal, for they came with knife and rifle,
skulking
like wolves along these rocks, to murder a congregation in the act of
worshipping their Maker.
Do you ask me for my opinion of such men? I cannot tell you. But
were this tongue mute, this hand palsied, I would only ask the power of
speech to say one wordthe power of pen, to write that word in letters
of fireand the word would be
Scorn!Scorn upon the murderers
of Father Ralle
!
And now, as the light of morning broke over the desolate plain, there
stood the lone Indian, gazing upon the ruins of his race. Natanis, the last
of the Norridgewocks, among the graves of his people!
But now he gazes far down the dark riverha! what strange vision
comes here?
Yonder, gliding from the shelter of the deep woods, comes a fleet of
canoes, carrying strange warriors over the waters. Strange warriors, clad
in the blue hunting-frock, faced with fur; strange warriors, with
powder-horn
,
knife and rifle. Far ahead of the main body of the fleet, a solitary
canoe skims over the waters. That canoe contains the oarsmen, and another
form, wrapped in a rough cloak, with his head drooped on the breast, while
the eye flashes with deep thoughtsthe form of the Napoleon of the
wilderness
,
Benedict Arnold
.
Look! He rises in the canoehe stands erecthe flings the cloak from
his formhe lifts the rough fur cap from his brow. Do you mark each
outline of that warrior-form? Do you note the bold thought now struggling
into birth over that prominent forehead, along that compressed lip, in the
gleam of those dark grey eyes, sunken deep beneath the brow?
He stands there, erect in the canoe, with outspread arms, as though he
would say
Wilderness, I claim ye as my own! Rocks, ye cannot daunt me;
cataracts, ye cannot appal! Starvation, death, and coldI will conquer
ye all!
Look! As he stands there, erect in the canoe, the Indian, Natanis,
beholds
him, springs into the river and soon stands by his side.
The Dark-Eagle comes to claim the wilderness, he speaks in the wild
Indian tongue, which Arnold knows so well. The wilderness will yield
to the Dark-Eagle, but the Rock will defy him. The Dark-Eagle will soar
aloft to the sun. Nations will behold him, and shout his praises. Yet
when he soars highest, his fall is most certain. When his wing brushes
the sky, then the arrow will pierce his heart!
It was a Propheey. In joy or sorrow, in battle or council, in honor or
treason, Arnold never forgot the words of Natanis.
He joins that little fleet; he advances with Arnold into the Wilderness.
Let us follow him there!
Now dashing down boiling rapids, now carrying their canoes through
miles of forest, over hills of rock, now wading for long leagues, through
water that freezes to their limbs as they go, the little army of Arnold
advance.
On, brave Arnold, on! For you the awful mountain has no terrors, the
cold that stops the blood in its flowing, no fear. Not even the dark night
when the straggler falls dying by the way, and unknown ravines yawn far
below your path, not even the darker day when the little store of parehed
corn fails, and your famished soldiers feed on the flesh of dogswhen even
the snake is a dainty mealnot even terrors like these can scare your iron
soul! On, brave Arnold, on!
Look, at last, after dangers too horrible to tell, the little fleet is floating
down that stream, whose awful solitude gained it this name, THE RIVER OF
THE DEAD. Far over the waters, look! A tremendous mountain rises there
from the waters above all other mountains into the blue sky; white, lonely
and magnificent, an alabaster altar, to which the Angels may come to
worship
.
Under the shadow of this mountain the little army of Arnold encamped
for three days. A single, bold soldier, ascends the colossal steep; stands
there, far above, amid the snow and sunbeams, and at last comes rushing
down with a shriek of joy.
Arnold! he cries, I have seen the rock and spires of Quebec!
What a burst of joy rises from that little host! Quebec! the object of
all their hopes, for which they starve, and toil, and freeze! Hark! to that
deep-mouthed hurrah!
Benedict Arnold then takes from his breast,where wrapped in close
folds he had carried it, through all his dreary marcha blue banner
gleaming
with thirteen stars. He hoists it in the air. For the first time the
Banner of the Rights of Man, to which God has given his stars, floats over
the waters of the Wilderness.
On, brave Arnold, on! On over the deep rapids and the mountain rock;
on again in hunger and cold, until desertion and disease have thinned your
band of eleven hundred down to nine hundred men of iron; on, brave hero
Napoleon on the Alps, Cortez in Mexico, Pizarro in Peru, never did a
bolder deed than yours!
Let us for a moment pause to look upon a picture of beauty, even in this
terrible march.
Do you see that dark lake, spreading away there under the shadow of
tall pines? Look upa faint glimpse of starlight is seen there through the
intervals of the sombre boughs. The stars look down upon the deeps;
solitude is there in all its stillness, so like the grave.
Suddenly a red light flares over the waters. The gleam of fires redden
the boughs of these pines, flashes around the trunks of these stout oaks. The
men of Arnold are here, encamped around yonder deserted Indian wigwam,
whose rude timbers you may behold among the trees, near the brink of the
waters.
For an hour these iron men are merry! Yes, encamped by the wave
of Lake
Chaudiere
. They roast the ox amid the huge logs; they draw the
rich salmon and the speckled trout from these waters. Forgive them if the
drinking horn passes from lip to lip; forgive them if the laugh and song go
round!Forgive themfor to-morrow they must go on their dread march
again; to-morrow they must feed on the bark of trees, and freeze in cold
waters againforgive them for this hour of joy.
Now let us follow them again; let us speak to brave Arnold, and bid
him on!
O, these forests are dark and dense, these rocks are too terrible for us to
climb, the cold chills our blood, this want of bread maddens our brainbut
still brave Arnold points toward Quebec, and bids them on!
Hark! That cry, so deep, prolonged, maddening, hark, it swells up into
the silence of night; it stops the heart in its beating. On, my braves! It
is but the cry of a comrade who has missed his footing, and been dashed
to pieces against the rocks below.
It is day again. The sun streams over the desolate waste of pines and
snow. It is day; but the corn is gonewe hunger, Arnold! The dog is
slain, the snake killed; they feast, these iron men. Then, with canoes on
their shoulders, they wade the stream, they climb the mountain, they crawl
along the sides of dark ravines. Upon the waters again! Behold the
stream boiling and foaming over its rocky bed. Listen to the roaring of the
torrent. Now guide the boat with care, or we are lost; swerve not a hair's
breadth, or we are dashed to pieces. Suddenly a crasha shoutand lo!
Those men are struggling for their lives amid the wrecks of their canoes.
But still that voice speaks out: Do not fear my iron men; gather the
wrecks, and leap into your comrades' canoes. Do not fear, for Quebec is
there!
At last two long months of cold, starvation and death are past; Arnold
stands on Point Levy, and there, over the waters, sees rising into light the
rock and spires of Quebec!
Napoleon gazing on the plains of Italy, Cortez on the Halls of
Montezuma
,
never felt such joy as throbbed in Arnold's bosom then!
It was there, there in the light, no dream, no fancy; but a thing of
substance
and form, it was there above the waters, the object of bright hopes
and fears; that massive rock, that glittering town.
At last he beheld
Quebec
!
IV.THE ATTACK ON QUEBEC.
It
was the last day of the year 1775.
Yonder, on the awful cliffs of Abraham, in the darkness of the daybreak,
while the leaden sky grooms above, a band of brave men are gathered; yes,
while the British are banquetting in Quebec, here, on this tremendous rock,
in silent array, stand the Heroes of the Wilderness, joined with their
brothers, the Continentals from Montreal.
That little army of one thousand have determined to attack the Gibralter
of America, with its rocks, its fortifications, its two thousand British soldiers.
Here, on the very rock, where, sixteen years ago, Montcalm and Wolfe
poured forth their blood, now are gathered a band of brave men, who are
seen in the darkness of this hour, extending like dim shadow-forms, around
two figures, standing alone in the centre of the host.
It is silent, and sad as death. The roaring of the St. Lawrence alone is
heard. Above the leaden sky, around the rock extending like a plain
yonder, far through the gloom, a misty light struggles into the sky, that
light gleams from the firesides of Quebec.
Who are these, that stand side by side in the centre of the band?
That muscular form, with a hunting shirt thrown over his breast, that
form standing there, with folded arms and head drooped low, while the eye
glares out from beneath the fanning brow, that is the Patriot Hero of the
Wilderness, Benedict Arnold.
By his side stands a graceful form, with strength and beauty mingled in
its outlines, clad in the uniform of a General, while that chivalrous
countenance
with its eye of summer blue, turns anxiously from face to face. In
that form you behold the doomed
Montgomery
. He has come from
Montreal
,
he has joined his little band with the Iron Men of Benedict Arnold.
Who are these that gather round, with fur caps upon each brow,
moccasins
upon each foot; who are these wild men, that now await the
signal-word
?You
may know them by their leader, who, with his iron form,
stands leaning on his riflethe brave
Daniel Morgan
.
The daybreak wears on; the sky grows darker; the snow begins to fall.
Arnold turns to his brothers in arms. They clasp each other by the
hand.Their lips move but you hear no sound.
Arnold! whispers Montgomery, I will lead my division along the St.
Lawrence, under the rocks of Cape Diamond. I will meet you in the
centre
of Quebecor die!
Montgomery, I will attack the barrier on the opposite side. There is my
hand! I will meet you yonderyonder in the centre of Quebecor perish!
It is an oath: the word is given.Look there, and behold the two
divisions
,
separating over the rocks: this, with Montgomery towards the St.
Lawrence, that with Arnold and Morgan, towards the St. Charles.
All is still. The rocks grow white with snow. All is still and dark, but
grim shadows are moving on every side.
Silence along the lines. Not a word on the peril of your lives! Do
you behold this narrow pass, leading to the first barrier, yonder? That
barrier, grim with cannon, commands every inch of the pass. On one side,
the St. Charles heaps up its rocks of ice; on the other, are piled the rocks
of granite.
19
Silence along the lines! The night is dark, the way is difficult, but
Quebec
is yonder! Soldier, beware of those piles of rocka single misplaced
footstep may arouse the sleeping soldier on yonder barrier. If he awake,
we are lost! On, brave band, on with stealthy footstep, and rifle to each
shoulder; on, men of the wilderness, in your shirts of blue and fur!
At the head of the column, with his drawn sword gleaming through the
night, Benedict Arnold silently advances.
Then a single cannon, mounted on a sled, and dragged forward, by stout
arms.
Last of all, Daniel Morgan with the riflemen of the Wilderness.
In this order along the narrow pass, with ice on one side and rocks on
the other, the hero-band advance. The pass grows narrowerthe battery
nearer. Arnold can now count the cannonnay, the soldiers who are
watching there. Terrible suspense! Every breath is hushedstout hearts
now swell within the manly chest.
Lips compressed, eyes glaring, rifles clenchedthe Iron Men move
softly on.
Arnold silently turns to his men.
And yonder through the gloom, over the suburb of that city, over the
rocks of that city's first barrierthere frowned the battery grim with
cannon.
There wait the sentinel and his brother soldiers. They hear no sound;
the falling snow echoes no footstep, and yet there are dim shadows moving
along the rocks, moving on without a sound.
Look! Those shadows move up the rocks, to the very muzzles of the
cannon. Now the sentinel starts up from his reclining posture; he hears
that stealthy tread. He springs to his cannonlook! how that flash glares
out upon the night.
Is this magic? There disclosed by that cannon flash, long lines of bold
riflemen start into view, and there
Standing in front of the cannon, his tall form rising in the red glare, with
a sword in one hand, the Banner of the Stars in the otherthere, with that
wild look which he ever wore in battle, gleaming from his eyethere stands
the patriot, Benedict Arnold!
On either side there is a mangled corsebut he stands firm. Before
him yawns the cannon, but he springs upon those cannonhe turns to his
menhe bids them on!
To-night we will feast in Quebec!
And the hail of the rifle balls lays the British dead upon their own
cannon
.Now
the crisis of the conflict comes.
Now behold this horrid scene of blood and death.
While the snow falls over the faces of the dead, while the blood of the
dying turns that snow to scarlet, gather round your leader, load and fire,
dash these British hirelings upon the barrier's rocksye heroes of the
Wilderness!
Now Arnold is in his glory!
Now he knows nothing, sees nothing but that grim barrier frowning
yonder! Those fires flashing from the housesthat rattling hail of bullets
pattering on the snowhe sees, he feels them not!
His eye is fixed upon the second barrier. He glances around that mass
of rifles, now glittering in the red lighthe floats the Banner of the Stars on
highHark to his shout!
Never fear, my men of the Wilderness! We have not come three
hundred miles to fail now! Have I not sworn to meet Montgomery there,
to meet him in the centre of the town, or die?
And then on, across the rocks and cannon of the barrier! Harkthat
crash, that yell! The British soldiers are driven back over the dead bodies
of comradesthe first barrier is won!
Arnold stands victorious upon that barrierstands there, with blood upon
his face, his uniformdripping from his swordstands there with the
Banner
of the Stars in his hand!
Oh! sainted mother of Arnold, who on that calm summer night, near
forty years ago, laid your child upon the sacramental altar, now look
from Heaven, andif saints pray for the children of earththen pray
that your son may die here upon the bloody barrier of Quebec! For then
his name will be enshrined with Warrens and Washingtons of all time!
Even as Arnold stood there, brandishing that starry banner, a soldier
rushed up to his side, and with horror quivering on his lip, told that the
gallant
Montgomery had fallen.
Fallen at the head of his men, covered with wounds; the noble heart,
that beat so high an hour ago, was now cold as the winter snow, on which
his form was laid.
Leaving Arnold for a moment, on the first barrier of Quebec, let us trace
the footsteps of his brother-hero.
Do you behold that massive rock, which arises from the dark river into
the darker sky? Along that rock of Cape diamond, while the St. Lawrence
dashes the ice in huge masses against its base, along that rock, over a path
that leads beneath a shelf of granite, with but room for the foot of a single
man, Richard Montgomery leads his band.
Stealthily, silently, my comrades!Not a wordlet us climb this
narrow
path. Take care; a misplaced footstep, and you will be hurled down
upon the ice of the dark river. Up, my men, and on! Yonder it is at
last, the block-house, and beyond it, at the distance of two hundred paces,
the battery, dark with cannon!
With words like these, Montgomery led on his men. The terrible path
was ascended. He stood before the block-house. Now, comrades!
How that rifle-blaze flashed far over the rocks down to the St. Lawrence!
An axe! an axe! by all that is brave! He seizes the axe, the brave
Montgomery; with his own arm he hews the palisades.The way is clear
for his men. A charge with blazing rifles, a shout, the block-house is won!
Talk of your British bayonetsha, ha! Where did they ever stand the
blaze of American rifles? Where? Oh, perfumed gentlemen, who in
gaudy uniforms, strut Chesnut streettalk to me of your charge of bayonets,
and your rules of discipline, and your system of tactics, and I will reply by
a single wordone American rifleman, in his rude hunting shirt, was worth
a thousand such as you. Who mocked the charge of bayonets on Bunker
Hill? Who captured Burgoyne? Whoat Brandywinekept back all
the panoply of British arms from morning till night?The Riflemen.
One shout the block-house is won.Now on toward the batteryload
and advance! Montgomery still in the front. With a yell, the British
behold
them approach; they flee from their cannon.Montgomery mounts
the walls of rocks and iron; his sword gleams on high, like a beacon for his
men. At this moment, hush your breath and look!While Montgomery
clings to the rocks of the battery, a single British soldier turns from his
flight, and fires one of those grim cannon, and then is gone again.
A blaze upon the right, a smoke, a chorus of groans!
Montgomery lays mangled upon the rock, while around him are
seattered
four other corses. Their blood mingles in one stream.
A rude rifleman advances, bends down, and looks upon that form,
quivering
for an instant only, and then coldupon that face, torn and mangled,
as with the print of a horse's hoof, that face, but a moment before glowing
with a hero's soul. He looks for a moment and then, with panic in his
face, turns to his comrades.
Montgomery is dead! he shrieks; and with one accord they retreat
they fly from that fatal rock.
But one form lingers. It is that boyish form, graceful almost to womanly
beauty, with the brow of a genius, the eye of an eagle. That boy ran away
from college, bore Washington's commands 300 miles, and nowcovered
with the blood of the fightstands beside the mangled body of Montgomery,
his dark eye wet with tears. In that form behold the man who was
almost
President of the United States, and Emperor of Mexicothe enigma of
our history,
Aaron Burr
.
They are gone. Montgomery is left alone, with no friend to compose
limbs or close those glaring eyes. And at this moment, while the snow
falls over his face, while the warm blood of his heart pours out upon the
rock, yonder in his far-off home, his young wife kneels by her bed, and
prays God to hasten his return!
He died in the flush of heroism, in the prime of early manhood, leaving
his country the rich legacy of his fame, leaving his blood upon the rock of
Quebec.
The day is coming when an army of Free Canadians will encamp on
that very rock, their rifles pointed at the British battery, their Republican
flag waving in the forlorn hope against the British banner! Then perhaps,
some true American heart will wash out the blood of Montgomery from the
rock of Quebec.
Arnold stood upon the first barrier, while his heart throbbed at the story
of Montgomery's fate.
Then that expression of desperation, which few men could look upon
without fear, came over Arnold's face. Now look at him, as with his form
swelling with rage he rushes on! He springs from that barrier, he shouts
to the iron men, he rings the name of Morgan on the air.
He points to the narrow street, over which the second barrier is thrown.
Montgomery is there, he shouts, in a voice of thunder, there waiting
for us!
Hurrah! How the iron men leap at the word! There is the quick
clang of ramrods; each rifle is loaded. They rush on!
At their head, his whole form convulsed, his lips writhing, his chest
heaving unconscious of danger, as though the ghost of Montgomery was
there before him, Benedict Arnold rushes on!
Even as he rushes, he falls. Even as you look upon him, in his battle
rage with his right leg shattered, he falls.
But does he give up the contest?
By the ghost of MontgomeryNo!
No! He lifts his face from the snow now crimsoned with his blood, he
follows with his startling eyes, the path of Morgan, he shouts with his
thunder tones, his well-known battle-cry.
He beholds his men rush on amid light and flame, he hears the crack of
the rifle, the roar of cannon, the tread of men, rushing forward to the
conflict.
Then he endeavors to rise. A gallant soldier offers his arm to the
wounded hero.
He rises, stands for a moment, and then falls. But still his soul is firm.
Still his eye glares upon the distant flight. Not until he makes his bed,
there on the cold snow, in a pool of his own blood, until his eyes fail and
his right leg stiffens, does his soul cease to beat with the pulsations of
battle
.
Then and then only, the Hero of the Wilderness is carried back to
yonder rock.
Would to God that he had died there!
Would to God that he had died there with all his honorable wounds about
him. O, for a stray bullet, a chance shot, to still his proud heart forever.
O, that he had laid side by side with Montgomery, hallowed forever by his
death of glory. Then the names of Arnold and Montgomery, mingled in
one breath, would have been joined forever, in one song of immortality.
But Montgomery died alone; his blood stains the rock of Quebec.
Arnold
lived; his ashes accursed by his countrymen, rest in an unknown
grave.
When the news of the gallant attack on Quebecgallant though
unsuccessful
reached
Philadelphia, the Congress rewarded Benedict Arnold with
the commission of a Brigadier General.
The same mob, who, afterwardswhile Arnold was yet true to his
country
stoned
him in the streets, and stoned the very arm that had fought for
them, now cracked their throats in shouting his name.
The very city, which afterwards was the scene of his Dishonorable
Persecution
,
now flashed out from its illuminated casements, glory of the Hero
of Quebec,
Benedict Arnold
.
V.THE WAR-HORSE LUCIFER.
Now let us pass with one bold flight over the movements of the
Continental
army in Canada; let us hasten at once, to that dark night when the
legions under Sullivan, embarked on the River Sorel, on their way to Lake
Champlain and Crown Point.
Let us go yonder to the darkened shore, as the shades of night come
down. A solitary man with his horse, yet lingers on the strand. Yes, as
the gleam of the advancing bayonets of Bourgoyne, is seen there through the
northern woodsas the last of the American boats ripples the river, far to
the south, while the gathering twilight casts the shadow of the forest along
the waters, here on this deserted strand, a single warrior lingers with his
war-horse.
There is the light canoe waiting by the shore, to bear him over the
waters; for he must leave that gallant steed with skin black as night, and a
mane like an inky wave.
He cannot leave him for the advancing foe; he must kill him.
Kill the noble horse that has borne him scatheless through many a fight!
Kill
Lucifer
so the warrior named himthat brave horse, whose heart
in battle beats with a fire like his own? Ah, then the stout heart of Arnold
quailed. Ah, then as the noble horse stooped his arching neck, as if to
invite
his master to mount him once again, and rush on to meet the foe, then
Arnold who never turned his face away from foe, turned his face away from
the large speaking eye of that horse, Lucifer.
He drew his pistol; the horse laid his head against his breast, floating
his dark mane over his shoulders. Arnold who never shed a tear for the
dead men in battle, felt his eyes grow wet. He was about to shoot that
friend, who had served him so well, and never betrayed him.
There was the report of a pistolthe sound of a heavy body falling on
the sandthe motion of a light canoe speeding over the waters.
And Arnold looked back, and beheld the dying head of his horse faintly
upraised; he beheld that large eye rolling in death.
Ah, little can you guess the love that the true warrior feels for his steed!
Ah, many a time in after life, when the friend of his heart betrayed, and the
beloved one on whose bosom he reposed, whispered Treason in his ear, did
he remember the last look of that dying war-horse,
Lucifer
.
VI.THE APE-AND-VIPER GOD.
Let
us now pass rapidly on, in this our strange history. At first a
glorious landscape bursts upon our view, and Courage and Patriotism walk
before us in forms of God-like beauty. Let us leave this landscape, let us
on to the dim horizon, where the dark cloud towers and glooms, bearing in
its breast the lightnings of Treason.
Let us pass over those brilliant exploits on Lake Champlain, which made
the Continent ring with the name of Arnold.
Let us see that man rising in renown as a soldier, who was always
First on the forlorn hope, last on the field of battle
.
Let us behold certain men, in Camp and Congress, growing jealous of
his renown.
They do not hesitate to charge him with appropriating to his own use,
certain goods, which he seized when in command at Montreal. The
records of history give the lie to this charge of mercenary business, for
when Arnold seized the goods, he wrote to his commanding general and to
Congress, that he was about to seize certain stores in Montreal for the
public
benefit. Those goods were left to waste on the river shore, through the
reckless negligence of an inferior officer.
We will then go to Congress, and behold the rise of that thing, which the
ancient sculptors would have impersonated under the mingled form of an
ape and a viperTHE SPIRIT OF PARTY.
It is the same in all ages. Without the courage or the talent, to project
one original measure, it is always found barking and snarling at the heels
of Genius. To-day it receives Napoleon, crowned with the bloody laurel
of Waterloo, and instead of calling upon France, to support her Deliverer,
this spirit of Party truckles to foreign bayonets, and requestshis
abdication
.
To-morrow, it meets the victor of the south, in a New Orleans' court
of justice, and while the shouts of thousands protected from British
bayonets
,
rings in his ears, this spirit of Party in the shape of a solemn Judge,
attempts to brand the hero with dishonor, by the infliction of a thousand
dollar fine. In the Revolution, Washington held the serenity of his soul
amid the hills of Valley Forge, combating pestilence and starvation, with an
unshrinking will. All the while in the hall of the Continental Congress,
the Spirit of Party was at work, planning a mean deed, with mean men for
its instruments; the overthrow of the Hero by a cabal, that was as
formidable
then, as it is contemptable now.
In all ages, to speak plainly, this spirit of party, this effervescence of
faction
,
is the voice of those weak and wicked creatures, who spring into life
from the fermenting compost of social dissension. It never shows a bold
front, never speaks a plain truth, never does a brave deed. Its element is
intrigue, more particularly called low cunning; its atmosphere darkness; its
triumph the orgie of diseased debauchery, its revenge as remorseless as the
malice of an ape, or the sting of a viper.
A great man may be a Republican, or even a King-worshipper, willing to
write, or speak, or fight for his principles, with a fearless pen and voice and
sword. But he never can be aParty Man. The very idea of faction,
pre-supposes intrigue, and intrigue indicates a cold heart, and a dwarfed
brain. It is the weapon of a monkey, not of a man.
This Spirit of Party, this manifestation of all the meanness and malice
which may exist in a nation, even as the most beautiful tropical flower
shelters the most venomous snake, has destroyed more republics, than all
the Tyrants of the world together, were their deeds multiplied by thousands.
Indeed, in nine cases out of ten, it has been by playing on the frothy
passions
of contending factions, that Tyrants have been suffered to trample
their way to power, over the bodies of freemen.
Let us go to the hall of Congress, and see this Spirit of Party, the
Apeand-Viper
God, which burdened the heart of Washington, more than all the
terror of British bayonets or scaffolds, first manifested in the case of Arnold.
Let a single fact attest its blindness and malignity.
In February, 1777, Congress created five Major Generals, over the
head of Benedict Arnold. All of these were his juniors; one of them was
from the militia.
Was that the way to treat the Hero of the Wilderness, of Quebec, of
Ticonderoga and of Champlain?
Even the well-governed spirit of Washington, started at such neglect.
He wrote a manly and soothing letter to Arnold. He knew him to be a
man of many good and some evil qualities, all marked and prominent. He
believed that with fair treatment, the Evil might be crushed, the Good
strengthened. Therefore, Washington, the Father of his Country, wrote a
letter, at once high-toned and conciliating, to the Patriot, Benedict Arnold.
What was the course of Arnold?
He expostulated with the party in Congress, who wished to drive him
mad.
How did he expostulate? In his own fiery way. Like many stout souls
of that Iron time, he spoke a better language with his sword than with his
pen. Let us look at the expostulation of Arnold.
It is night around the town of Danbury. Two thousand British
hirelings attack and burn that town. Yes, surrounded by his hirelings,
assassins
in the shape of British soldiers, and assassins in the shape of
American
Tories, brave General Tryon holds his Communion of Blood, by the
light of blazing homes.
In the dimness of the daybreak hour, these gallant men, whose trophies
are dishonored virgins, and blasted homes, are returning to their camp.
Yonder on those high rocks, near the town of Ridgefield, Arnold, with
only 500 men, disputes the path of the Destroyer. Ths Continentals are
driven back after much carnage, but Arnold is the last man to leave the rock.
His horse is shot under him; the British surround him, secure of their
prey; the dismounted General sits calmly on his dying steed, his arms
folded, his eye sunk beneath the compressed brow. A burly British soldier
approaches to secure the rebellook! He is sure of his prisoner. Arnold
beholds him, beholds the wall of bayonets and faces that encircle him. The
soldier extends his hand to grasp the prisoner, when Arnold, smiling
calmly, draws his pistol and shoots the hireling through the heart. Follow
him yonder, as he fights his way down the rock, through the breasts of
his foes.
That was the right kind of Expostulation!
When a faction, nestling in the breast of your country, wrong you, then
only fight for that country with more determined zeal. Right will come
at last.
Had Arnold always expostulated thus, his name would not now be the
Hyperbole of scorn. His name could at this hour, rank second, and only
second to
Washington
.
When Congress received the news of this Expostulation, Arnold was
raised to the rank of Major General. Yet still, they left the date of his
commission, below the date of the commissions of the other five Major
Generals
.
Thisto use the homely expression of a brave Revolutionary soldier
`was breaking his head and giving him a plaster,' with a vengeance.
Ere we pass on to the Battle-Day of Saratoga, let me tell you an incident
of strange interest, which took place in 1777, during Arnold's command near
Fort Edward, on the Hudson River.
VII.THE BRIDAL EVE.
One summer night, the blaze of many lights streaming from the windows
of an old mansion, perched yonder among the rocks and woods, flashed far
over the dark waters of Lake Champlain.
In a quiet and comfortable chamber of that mansion, a party of British
officers, sitting around a table spread with wines and viands, discussed a
topic of some interest, if it was not the most important in the world, while
the tread of the dancers shook the floor of the adjoining room.
Yes, while all gaiety and dance and music in the largest hall of the old
mansion, whose hundred lights glanced far over the waters of Champlain
20
here in this quiet room, with the cool evening breeze blowing in their faces
thro' the opened windows, here this party of British officers had assembled
to discuss their wines and their favorite topic.
That topic wasthe comparative beauty of the women of the world.
As for me, said a handsome young Ensign, I will match the
voluptuous
forms and dark eyes of Italy, against the beauties of all the world!
And I, said a bronzed old veteran, who had risen to the Colonelcy by
his long service and hard fighting; and I have a pretty lass of a daughter
there in England, whose blue eyes and flaxen hair would shame your tragic
beauties of Italy into very ugliness.
I have served in India, as you all must know, said the Major, who sat
next to the veteran, and I never saw painting or statue, much less living
woman, half so lovely as some of those Hindoo maidens, bending down with
water-lillies in their hands; bending down by the light of torches, over the
dark waves of the Ganges.
And thus, one after another, Ensign, Colonel, and Major, had given their
opinion, until that young American Refugee, yonder at the foot of the table,
is left to decide the argument. That Americanfor I blush to say it
handsome young fellow as he is, with a face full of manly beauty, blue deep
eyes, ruddy cheeks, and glossy brown hair, that American is a Refugee, and
a Captain in the British army.He wore the handsome scarlet coat, the
glittering epaulette, lace ruffles on his bosom and around his wrists.
Come, Captain, pass the wine this way! shouted the Ensign; pass
the wine and decide this great question! Which are the most beautiful:
the red cheeks of Merry England, the dark eyes of Italy, or the graceful
forms of Hindoostan?'
The Captain hesitated for a moment, and then tossing off a bumper of
old Madeira, somewhat flushed as he was with wine, replied:
Mould your three models of beauty, your English lass, your Italian
queen, your Hindoo nymph, into one, and add to their charms a thousand
graces of color and form and feature, and I would not compare this perfection
of loveliness for a single moment, with the wild and artless beauty of
an
American girl
.
The laugh of the three officers, for a moment, drowned the echo of the
dance in the next room.
Compare his American milk-maid with the woman of Italy!
Or the lass of England!
Or the graceful Hindoo girl!
This laughing scorn of the British officers, stung the handsome Refugee
to the quick.
Hark ye! he cried, half rising from his seat, with a flushed brow, but
a deep and deliberate voice: To-morrow, I marry a wife: an
American
girl?To-night, at midnight too, that American girl will join the dance in
the next room. You shall see heryou shall judge for yourselves!
Whether the American woman is not the most beautiful in the world!
There was something in the manner of the young Refugee, more than in
the nature of his information, that arrested the attention of his brother
officers
.For
a moment they were silent.
We have heard something of your marriage, Captain, said the gay
Ensign, but we did not think it would occur so suddenly? Only think
of it! To-morrow you will be gonesettledverdict brought insentence
passed
a married man!
But tell me? How will your lady-love be
brought to this house to night? I thought she resided within the rebel lines?
She does reside there! But I have sent a messengera friendly Indian
chief, on whom I can place the utmost dependenceto bring her from her
present home, at dead of night thro' the forest, to this mansion. He is to
return by twelve; it is now half-past eleven!
Friendly Indian! echoed the veteran Colonel; Rather an odd
guardian
for a pretty woman!Quite an original idea of a
Duenna
, I vow!
And you will match this lady against all the world, for beauty? said
the Major.
Yes, and if you do not agree with me, this hundred guineas which I lay
upon the table, shall serve our mess, for wines, for a month to come! But
if you do agree with meas without a doubt you willthen you are to
replace
this gold with a hundred guineas of your own.
Agreed! It is a wager! chorussed the Colonel and the two other
officers.
And in that momentwhile the door-way was thronged by fair ladies
and gay officers, attracted from the next room by the debateas the
Refugee
stood, with one hand resting upon the little pile of gold, his ruddy face
grew suddenly pale as a shroud, his blue eyes dilated, until they were
encircled
by a line of white enamel, he remained standing there, as if frozen
to stone.
Why, captain, what is the matter? cried the Colonel, starting up in
alarm, do you see a ghost, that you stand gazing there, at the blank wall?
The other officers also started up in alarm, also asked the cause of this
singular demeanor, but still, for the space of a minute or more, the Refugee
Captain stood there, more like a dead man suddenly recalled to life, than a
living being.
That moment passed, he sat down with a cold shiver; made a strong
effort as if to command his reason; and then gave utterance to a forced
laugh.
Ha, ha! See how I've frightened you! he saidand then laughed
that cold, unnatural, hollow laugh again.
And yet, half an hour from that time, he freely confessed the nature
of the horrid picture which he had seen drawn upon that blank,
wainscotted
wall, as if by some supernatural hand
.
But now, with the wine cup in his hand, he turned from one comrade to
another, uttering some forced jest, or looking towards the doorway, crowded
by officers and ladies, he gaily invited them to share in this remarkable
argument: Which were the most beautiful women in the world?
As he spoke, the hour struck.
Twelve o'clock was there, and with it a footstep, and then a bold Indian
form came urging through the crowd of ladies, thronging yonder doorway.
Silently, his arms folded on his war-blanket, a look of calm stoicism on
his dusky brow, the Indian advanced along the room, and stood at the head
of the table. There was no lady with him!
Where is the fair girl? She who it is to be the Bride to-morrow?
Perhaps the Indian has left her in the next room, or in one of the other
halls of the old mansion, or perhapsbut the thought is a foolish oneshe
has refused to obey her lover's requestrefused to come to meet him!
There was something awful in the deep silence that reigned through the
room, as the solitary Indian stood there, at the head of the table, gazing
silently in the lover's face.
Where is she?
at last gasped the Refugee. She has not refused to
come? Tell mehas any accident befallen her by the way? I know the
forest is dark, and the wild path most difficulttell me: where is the lady
for whom I sent you into the Rebel lines?
For a moment, as the strange horror of that lover's face was before him,
the Indian was silent. Then as his answer seemed trembling on his lips,
the ladies in yonder doorway, the officers from the ball-room, and the party
round the table, formed a group around the two central figuresthe Indian,
standing at the head of the table, his arms folded in his war-blanketthat
young officer, half rising from his seat, his lips parted, his face ashy, his
clenched hands resting on the dark mahogony of the table.
The Indian answered first by an action, then by a word.
First the action: Slowly drawing his right hand from his war-blanket, he
held it in the light. That right hand clutched with blood-stained fingers, a
bleeding scalp, and long and glossy locks of beautiful dark hair!
Then the word: Young warrior sent the red man for the scalp of the
pale-faced squaw! Here it is!
Yesthe rude savage had mistaken his message! Instead of bringing
the bride to her lover's arms, he had gone on his way, determined to bring
the scalp of the victim to the grasp of her pale face enemy.
Not even a groan disturbed the silence of that dreadful moment. Look
there! The lover rises, presses that long hairso black, so glossy, so
beautifulto his heart, and thenas though a huge weight, falling on his
brain, had crushed him, fell with one dead sound on the hard floor.
He lay therestiff, and pale, and coldhis clenched right hand still
clutching the bloody scalp, and the long dark hair falling in glossy tresses
over the floor!
This was his bridal eve!
Now tell me, my friends, you who have heard some silly and ignorant
pretender, pitifully complain of the destitution of Legend, Poetry, Romance,
which characterises our National Historytell me, did you ever read a
tradition
of England, or France or Italy, or Spain, or any land under the
Heavens, that might, in point of awful tragedy, compare with the simple
History of David Jones and John M'Crea? For it is but a scene from this
narrative, with which you have all been familiar from childhood, that I have
given you.
When the bridegroom, flung there on the floor, with the bloody scalp and
long dark tresses in his hands, arose again to the terrible consciousness of
lifethose words trembled from his lips, in a faint and husky whisper:
Do you remember how, half an hour agoI stood thereby the table
silent, and pale, and horror-strickenwhile you all started up round me,
asking me what horrid sight I saw? Then, oh then, I beheld the horrid
scenethat home, yonder by the Hudson river, mounting to Heaven in the
smoke and flames! The red forms of Indians going to and fro, amid flame
and smoketomahawk and torch in hand! There, amid dead bodies and
smoking embers, I beheld her formmy bridefor whom I had sent the
messengerkneeling, pleading for mercy, even as the tomahawk crashed
into her brain!
As the horrid picture again came o'er his mind, he sank senseless again,
still clutching that terrible memorialthe bloody scalp and long black hair!
That was an awful
Bridal Eve
.
VIII.
THE BLACK HORSE AND HIS RIDER; OR
WHO WAS THE HERO OF SARATOGA?
There
was a day my friends, when the nation rung with the glory of
the victor of Saratoga.
The name of Horatio Gates was painted on banner, sung in hymns,
flashed from transparencies, as the Captor of Burgoyne.
Benedict Arnold was not in the battle at all, if we may believe in the
bulletin of Gates, for his name is not even mentioned there.
Yet I have a strange story to tell you, concerning the very battle, which
supported as it is, by the solemn details of history, throws a strange light
on the career of Benedict Arnold.
It was the Seventh of October, 1777.
Horatio Gates stood before his tent, gazing steadfastly upon the two
armies, now arrayed in order of battle. It was a clear bracing day, mellow
with the richness of Autumn; the sky was cloudless, the foliage of the
woods scarce tinged with purple and gold; the buckwheat on yonder fields,
frosted into snowy ripeness.
It was a calm, clear day, but the tread of legions shook the ground. From
every bush shot the glimmer of the rifle barrel, on every hillside blazed the
sharpened bayonet. Flags were there, too, tossing in the breeze; here the
Banner of the Starsyonder the Red Cross gonfalon.
Here in solid lines were arrayed the Continental soldiers, pausing on
their arms, their homely costume looking but poor and humble, when
compared
with the blaze of scarlet uniforms, reddening along yonder hills and
over the distant fields. Ah, that hunting shirt of blue was but a rude dress,
yet on the 19th of September, scarce two weeks ago, on these very hills, it
taught the scarlet-coated Briton a severe lesson of repentance and humility.
Here, then, on the morning of this eventful day, which was to decide the
fate of America, whether Gates should flee before Burgoyne, or Burgoyne
lay down his arms at the feet of Gates, here at the door of his tent stood
the American General, his countenance manifesting deep anxiety.
Now he gazed upon the glittering array of Burgoyne, as it shone over
yonder fields, and now his eye roved over those hardy men in hunting shirts,
with rifles in their hands. He remembered the contest of the 19th, when
Benedict Arnold, at the head of certain bold riflemen, carried the day, before
all the glitter of British arms; and nowperchancea fear seized him, that
this 7th of October might be a dark day, for Arnold was not there. They
had quarrelled, Arnold and Gates, about some matter of military courtesy;
the former was now without a commission; the latter commanded, alone,
and now would have to win glory for himself with his own hands.
Gates was sad and thoughtful, as in all the array of his uniforn, he stood
before his tent, watching the evolutions of the armies, but all the once a smoke
arose, a thunder shook the ground, a chorus of shouts and groans, yelled
along the darkened air. The play of death was begun. The two flags
this of Stars, that of the Red Crosstossed amid the smoke of battle, while
the sky was clouded in leaden folds, and the earth throbbed as with the
pulsation of a mighty heart.
Suddenly Gates and his officers started with surprise. Along the gentle
height on which they stood, there came a Warrior on a Black Horse,
rushing
toward the distant battle. There was something in the appearance of
this Horse and his Rider, to strike them with surprise. The Horse was a
noble animal; do you mark that expanse of chest, those slender yet sinewy
limbs, that waving mane and tail? Do you mark the head erect, those
nostrils
quivering, that eye glaring with terrible light? Then his colorthe
raven is not darker than his skin, or maiden's cheek more glossy than his
spotless hide.
[9]
[9]
There have been certain learned critics, who object to this similie. They state,
with commendable gravity, that the idea of a horseeven a war-horse, who ranks,
in the scale of being, next to manhaving a hide `glossy as a maiden's cheek,' hurts
their delicate perceptions. Their experience teaches them, that the word `glossy,'
coupled with `black,' must refer to a `
glossy black maiden
.' Had my ideas ran in
that direction, I never would have penned the sentence; but as I do not possess the
large experience of these critics, in relation to `African maidens,' I must even let
the sentence stand as it is. They also object to the horse; saying piteouslyYou
make him a hero! I have no doubt they would prefer for a hero, an excellent
animal, noted for his deep throat and long ears. My taste inclines in a different
direction.
Look upon that gallant steed, and remember the words of Job
Hast thou given the horse strength? hast thou clothed his neck with thunder?
Cans't thou make him afraid as a grasshopper. The glory of his nostrils is terrible!
He paweth in the valley, and rejoiceth in his strength; he goeth on to meet the
armed men.
He mocketh at fear and is not affrighted; neither turneth he back from the sword.
The quiver rattleth against him, the glittering spear and the shield.
He swalloweth the ground with fierceness and rage; neither believeth he that it is
the sound of the trumpet.
He saith among the trumpets, Ha! ha! and he smelleth the battle afar off, the
thunder of the captains and the shouting.
But the Rider presents also a sight of strange and peculiar interest. He
is a man of muscular form, with a dark brow gathered in a frown, a darker
eye, shooting its glance from beneath the projecting forehead. His lip is
compressedhis cravat, unloosened, exposes the veins of his bared throat,
now writhing like serpents. It is plain that his spirit is with the distant
battle, for neither looking to the right or left, not even casting a glance aside
to Gates, he glares over his horse's head toward the smoke of conflict.
No sword waves in his grasp, but while the rein hangs on his horse's
neck, his hands rest by his side, the fingers quivering with the same
agitation
that blazes over his face.
Altogether it is a magnificent sight, that warrior in the blue uniform on
his Black Horse, who moves along the sod at a brisk walk, his tail and mane
tossing on the breeze. And as the noble horse moves on, the soldier speaks
to him, and calls him by name, and lays his right hand on his glossy neck.
Ho!
Warren
forward!
Then that Black Horsenamed after the friend of the soldier, a friend
who now is sleeping near Bunker Hill, where he felldarts forward, with
one sudden bound, and is gone like a flash toward the distant battle.
This brief scene, this vision of the Horse and his Rider, struck Gates
with unfeigned chagrin, his officers with unmingled surprise.
Armstrong! shouted Gates, turning to a brave man by his side,
Pursue
that man! Tell him it is my command that he returns from the field.
Away! Do not lose a minute, for
he will do something rash, if left to
himself!
Armstrong springs to his steed, and while the heaven above, and the broad
sweeps of woods and fields yonder, are darkened by the smoke of conflict,
he pursues the Black Horse and his Rider.
But that Rider looks over his shoulder with a smile of scorn on his lip,
a scowl of defiance on his brow. Look! He draws his swordthe sharp
blade quivers in the air. He points to the battle, and lo! he is gonegone
through yonder cloudswhile his shout echoes over the fields.
Wherever the fight is thickest, through the intervals of battle smoke
and cannon glare, you may see, riding madly forward, that strange soldier,
mounted on his steed, black as death.
Look at him, as with his face red with British blood, he waves his sword,
and shouts to the legions. Now you see him fighting in that cannon's
glare, the next moment he is away off yonder, leading the forlorn hope up
the steep cliff.
Is it not a magnificent sight, to see that nameless soldier, and that noble
Black Steed, dashing like a meteor through the long columns of battle?
And all the while, Major Armstrong, spurring his steed to the utmost,
pursues him, but in vain. He shouts to him, but the warrior cannot hear.
He can see the Black Horse, through the lifted folds of battle-smoke, now
and then he hears the Rider's shout.
Warren! Ho! Warren! Upon themcharge!
Let us look in for a moment through these clouds of battle. Here, over
this thick hedge, bursts a band of American militia mentheir rude farmer's
coats stained with their bloodwhile, scattering their arms by the way,
they flee before yonder company of red-coat hirelings, who come rushing
forward, their solid front of bayone's gleaming in the battle-light.
In the moment of their flight, a Black Horse crashes over the field.
The unknown warrior reins his steed back on his haunches, right in the
path of this broad-shouldered militia man.
Now, coward, advance another step, and I will shoot you to the heart!
shouts the rider, extending a pistol in either hand. What! are you
Americans
men
and fly before these British soldiers? Back and face
them once moreseize your armsface the foe, or I myself will ride you
down!
That appeal, uttered with deep, indignant tones, and a face convulsed
with passion, is not without its effect. The militia man turns, seizes his
gun; his comrades as if by one impulse, follow his example. They form
in solid order along the field, and silently load their pieces; they wait the
onset of those British bayonets.
Reserve your fire until you can touch the point of their bayonets!
was the whispered command of the Unknown. Those militia-men, so lately
panic-stricken, now regard the approach of the red-coats in silence, yet
calmly and without a tremor. The British came onnearer and nearer
yetyou can see their eyes gleam, you can count the buttons on their
scarlet coats. They seek to terrify the militia-men with shouts; but those
plain farmers do not move an inch.
In one linebut twenty men in allthey confront thirty sharp bayonets.
The British advancethey are within two yards.
Now upon the rebelscharge bayonet! shouted the red-coat officer.
They spring forward, with the same boundlook! Their bayonets
almost
touch the muzzles of these rifles!
At this moment the voice of the Rider was heard.
Now let them have it
fire!
A sound is hearda smoke is seentwenty Britons are down, some
writhing in death, some crawling along the sod, some speechless as stone.
The remaining ten start backbut then is no time for surprise.
Club your rifles, and charge them home! shouts the Unknown, and
the Black Horse springs forward, followed by the militia-men. Then a
confused conflicta cry of quarter!a vision of the twenty farmers
grouped around the Rider of the Black Horse, greeting him with hearty
cheers.
Thus it was all the day long.
Wherever that Black Horse and his Rider went, there followed victory.
The soldiers in every part of the field seemed to know that Rider, for they
hailed him with shouts, they obeyed his commands, they rushed after him,
over yonder cannon, through yonder line of bayonets. His appearance in
any quarter of the field was succeeded by a desperate onset, a terrible
charge, or a struggle hand to hand with the soldiers of Burgoyne.
Was this not a strange thing? This unknown man, without a command
was obeyed by all the soldiers, as though they recognized their General.
They acknowledged him for a Leader, wherever he rode; they followed
him to death wherever he gave the word.
Now look for him again!
On the summit of yonder hill, the Black Horse stands erect on his
haunches, his fore-legs pawing the air, while the rider bends over his neck,
and looks toward the clouded valley. The hat has fallen from that Rider's
brow; his face is covered with sweat and blood; his right-hand grasps that
battered sword. How impressive that sight, as an occasional sun-gleam
lights the Rider's brow, or a red flash of battle-light, bathes his face, as in
rays of blood!
At this moment, as the black steed rears on the summit of the hill, look
yonder from the opposite valley, dashes Major Armstrong, in search of that
Unknown Rider, who sees him coming, turns his horse's head and
disappears
with a laugh of scorn. Still the gallant Major keeps on his way, in
search of this man, who excites the fears of General Gatesthis brave
Rider, who was about to do
something rash
.
At last, toward the setting of the sun, the crisis of the conflict came.
That fortress yonder on Behmus Height, was to be won, or the
American
cause was lost.
That fortress was to be gained, or Gates was a dishonored man;
Burgoyne
a triumphant General.
21
That fortress yonderyou can see it through the battle-cloudswith its
wall of red-coats, its lines of British cannon, its forest of bayonets.
Even those bold riflemen, who were in the wilderness with one Benedict
Arnold, who stormed the walls of Quebec, with this Arnold and Montgomery,
on that cold daybreak of December thirty-first, 1775, even those men of
iron fell back, terrified at the sight.
That cliff is too steepthat death is too certain. Their officers cannot
persuade them to advance. The Americans have lost the field. Even
Morganthat Iron Man among Iron Menleans on his rifle, and despairs
of the field.
But look yonder! In this moment, while all is dismay and horror, here,
crashing on, comes the Black Horse and his Rider.
That Rider bends from his steed; you can see his phrenzied face, now
covered with sweat, and dust, and blood. He lays his hand on that bold
rifleman's shoulder.
Come on! he cries;
you
will not fail me now!
The rifleman knows that face, that voice. As though living fire had
been poured into his veins, he grasps his rifle, and starts toward the rock.
Come on! cries the Rider of the Black Horse, turning from one
scarred face to another. Come on!
you
will not fail me now!
He speaks in that voice which thrills their blood.
You
were with me in the Wilderness! he cries to one; and
you
at
Quebec! he shouts to another; do you remember?
And
you
at Montreal!
And YOU, there on Lake Champlain! You know meyou have
known me long! Have I ever spoken to you in vain? I speak to you
nowdo you see that Rock? Come on!
And now look, and now hold your breath as that black steed crashes up
the steep rock! Ah, that steed quivershe tottershe falls! No, no!
Still on, still up the rock, still on toward the fortress!
Now look againhis Rider turns his face
Come on, Men of Quebec, where I lead, you will follow!
But that cry is needless. Already the bold riflemen are on the rock.
And up and onward, one fierce bolt of battle, with that Warrior on his Black
Steed, leading the dread way, sweep the Men of the Wilderness, the Heroes
of Quebec.
Now pour your fires, British cannon. Now lay the dead upon the rock,
in tens and twenties. Nowhirelingsshout your British battle-cry if
you can!
For look, as the battle-smoke clears away, look there, in the gate of the
fortress for the Black Steed and his Rider!
That Steed falls dead, pierced by an hundred balls, but there his Rider
waves the Banner of the Stars, thereas the British cry for quarter, he lifts
up his voice, and shouts afar to Horatio Gates, waiting yonder in his tent;
he tells him that
Saratoga is won
!
And look! As that shout goes up to heaven, he falls upon his Steed,
with his leg shattered by a cannon ball.
He lays there, on his dead Steed, bleeding and insensible, while his
hand, laid over the neck of the gallant Horse, still grasps the Banner of the
Stars.
Who was the Rider of the Black Horse? Do you not guess his name?
Then bend down and gaze upon that shattered limb, and you will see that
it bears the scars of a former wounda hideous wound it must have been.
Now, do you not guess his name? That wound was received at the
Storming of Quebec; that Rider of the Black Horse was
Benedict
Arnold
.
In this hour, while the sun was setting over the field of the Seventh of
Octoberwhile the mists of battle lay piled in heavy clouds above the walls
of the conquered fortress,here, up the steep rock came Major Armstrong,
seeking for the man who
might do something rash!
He found him at last, but it was in the gate of the fortress, on the body
of the dead steed, bleeding from his wound, that he discovered the face of
Benedict Arnold, the Victor of Behmus Heights.
This was not the moment to deliver the message of Gates. No! for this
Rash Man had won laurels for his brow, defeated Burgoyne for him, rescued
the army from disgrace and defeat. He
had
done somethingRASH.
Therefore, Armstrong, brave and generous as he was, bent over the
wounded man, lifted him from among the heaps of dead, and bore him to a
place of repose.
Would it be credited by persons unacquainted with our historywould
the fact which I record with blushes and shame for the pettiness of human
nature, be believed, unless supported by evidence that cannot lie?
General Gates, in his bulletin of the battle, did not mention the name
of
Benedict Arnold
!
Methinks, even now, I see the same Horatio flying from the bloody field
of Camdenwhere an army was annihilatedhis hair turning white as
snow, as he pursues his terrible flight, without once resting for eighty miles
methinks I hear him call for another Arnold, to WIN THIS BATTLE, AS
Saratoga was won
!
The conduct of Arnold in this battle became known, in spite of the
dastardly opposition of his enemies, andsays a distinguished and honest
historianCongress relented at this late hour with an ill-grace, and sent
him a commission, giving him the full rank which he claimed.
He was now in truth, crowned as he stood, with the laurels of the
Wilderness
,
Quebec and Saratoga,
Major General Arnold
, of the Continental
Army.
At the same time that George Washington received the account of
Arnold's
daring at Saratoga, he also received from a Nobleman of France, three
splendid sets of epaulettes and sword-knots, with the request to retain one
for himself, and bestow the others on the two bravest men of his army.
George Washington sent one set of epaulettes with a sword-knot to
Benedict
Arnold.
When we next look for Arnold, we find him confined to his room, with
a painful wound. For the entire winter the limb which had been first
broken at Quebec, broken again at Saratoga, kept him a prisoner in the
close confinement of his chamber.
Then let us behold him entering New Haven, in triumph as the Hero of
Saratoga. There are troops of soldiers, the thunder of cannon, little
children
strewing the way with flowers.
Was it not a glorious welcome for the Druggist, who two years ago, was
pasting labels on phials in yonder drug store?
A glorious welcome for the little boy, who used to strew the road with
pounded glass, so that other little boys might cut their feet?
In this hour of Arnold's triumph, when covered with renown, he comes
back to his childhood's home, may we not imagine his Mother looking from
Heaven upon the glory of her child? Yes, sainted Mother of Arnold, who
long years ago, laid your babe upon the sacramental altar, baptized with the
tears and prayers of a Mother's agony, now look from heaven, and pray to
God that he may die, with all his honorable wounds about him!
IX.ARNOLD, THE MILITARY COMMANDER OF PHILADELPHIA.
Let
us look for Arnold again!
We will find him passing through the streets of old Philadelphia, in his
glittering coach, with six splendid horses, and liveried outriders; riding in
state as the Governor of Philadelphia.
Then we look for him again. In the dim and solemn aisle of Christ
Church, at the sunset hour, behold a new and touching scene in the life of
Benedict Arnold.
It is the sunset hour, and through the shadows of the range of pillars,
which support the venerable roof of the church, the light of the declining
day, streams in belts of golden sunshine.
As you look, the sound of the organ fills the church, and a passing ray
streams over the holy letters, I H S.
There beside the altar are grouped the guests, there you behold the Priest
of God, arrayed in his sacerdotal robe, and thereO, look upon them well,
in this last hour of the summer daythe centre of the circle, stand the
Bridegroom and Bride.
A lovely girl, scarce eighteen years in age, with golden hair and eyes of
deep clear blue, rests her small hand upon a warrior's arm, and looks up
lovingly into his battle-worn face. She is clad in silks, and pearls, and gold.
He in the glorious uniform of the Revolution, the blue coat, faced with buff
and fringed with gold. The sword that hangs by his side, has a story all
its own to tell. Look! As the sunshine gleams upon its hilt of gold, does
it not speak of Ticonderoga, Quebec, and Saratoga?
And in the deep serenity of this evening hourwhile the same glow of
sunshine gilds the white monuments in yonder graveyard, and reveals the
faces of the wedding guestsBenedict Arnold, in the prime of a renowned
manhood, having seen thirty-eight years of life, in all its phaseson the
ocean, in battle, amid scenes of blood and deathlinks his fate forever with
that queenly girl, whose romance and passion in love of power, are written
in two emphatic words
beautiful and eighteen!
Yes, in the aisle of Christ Church, the Hero of Quebec, hears the word
husbandwhispered by this young girl, who combines the witchery of a
syren, with the intellect of a genius; the Tory daughter of a Tory father.
And as the last note of the organ dies away, along the aisles, tell me, can
you not see the eye of that young wife, gleam with a light that is too intense
for love, too vivid for hope? That deep and steady gleam looks to me like
a fire, kindled at the altar of Ambition. The compression of that parting
lip, the proud arch of that white neck, the queenly tread of that small foot,
all bespeak the consciousness of power.
Does the the wife of Benedict Arnold, looking through a dark and troubled
future, behold the darkness dissipated by the sunshine of a Royal Court?
Does shewith that young breast heaving with impatient ambitionalready
behold Arnold the Patriot, transformed into Arnold the Courtierand
Traitor?
Future pages of this strange history, alone can solve these questions.
We must look at Arnold now, as by this marriage and his important
positionthe Military Commander of the greatest city on the Continent
he is brought into contact with a proud and treacherous aristocracyas he
feasts, as he drinks, as he revels with them.
From that hour, date his ruin.
That profligate and treacherous aristocracy, would ruin an angel from
heaven, if an angel could ever sink so low, as to be touched by the poison
of its atmosphere.
We can form our estimate of the character of this Aristocracy in the
Revolution, from the remnant which survives among us, at the present hour.
Yes, we have it among us yet, existing in an organized band of pretenders,
whose political and religious creed is comprised in one wordEngland
lovers of monarchy and every thing that looks like monarchy, in the shape
of privileged orders, and chartered infamies; Tory in heart now, as they
were Tories in speech, in the days of the Revolution.
I never think of this Aristocracy, without being reminded of those Italian
mendicants, who are seen in your streets, clad in shabby tinsel, too proud
to work the work of honest toil, and yet not too proud to obtain a livelihood
by the tricks of a juggler and mountebank.
I do not mean the aristocracy of worth, or beauty, or intellect, which gets
its title-deeds from God, and wears its coat of arms in the heart, and which
if ever man saw, I see before me now
[10]
[10]
On the occasion of the third lecture, before the Wirt Institute.
But I do mean that aristocracy, whose heraldry is written in the same
ledger of a broken bank, that chronicles the wholesale robbery of the widow
and the orphan, by privileged theft and chartered fraud.
If we must have an Aristocracy, or in other words a privileged class,
entitled
by law to trample on those who toil, eat their bread, and strip from
them one by one, the holy rights for which their fathers fought in the
Revolution
,
let us I pray you, have a Nobility, like that of England, made
respectable by the lineage of a few hundred years. Let usif we must
have an Aristocracyconstitute by law, every survivor of the Revolution,
every child of a hero of the Past, a Noble of the Land. This will at least
bear some historical justice on its face.
But to make these Tory children of Tory fathers, a privileged order, is it
not a very contemptable thing? As laughable as the act of the Holy
Alliance
,
who established the Restoration of the Bourbons, on the foundation
laid by Napoleon.
We have all seen the deeds of the Tory Aristocracy of Philadelphia.
To-day, it starves some poor child of geniuswhom it has deluded with
hopes of patronageand suffers him to go starving and mad, from the quiet
of his studio, to the darkness of the Insane Asylum. To-morrow, it
parades in its parties, and soirees some pitiful foreign vagrant, who calls
himself
a Count or Duke, and wears a fierce beard, and speaks distressing
English
.
This aristocracy never listens to a lecture on science, or history,
much less a play from Shakspeare, but at the same time, will overflow a
theatre, to hear a foreign mountebank do something which is called singing,
or to witness the indecent postures of some poor creature, who belies the
sacred name of Woman, which obscene display is entitled dancing.
There is nothing which this aristocracy hates so fervently, as Genius,
native to the soil. It starved and neglected that great original mind, Charles
Brockden Brown, and left him to die in his solitary room, while all Europe
was ringing with his praise.
It never reads an American book, unless highly perfumed and sweetened
with soft words, and tricked out in pretty pictures. It takes its history,
literature, religion, second-hand from England, and bitterly regrets that the
plainness of our Presidential office, is so strong contrasted with the
imperial
grandeur of Great Britain's hereditary sovereigna Queen, who imports
a husband from the poverty of some German Kingdom, three miles square,
and saddles her People with an annual Prince or Princess, whose advent
costs one hundred thousand yellow guineas.
This aristocracy never can tolerate native Genius. Because, in its
fermenting
corruption, it resembles a hot-bed, it plausibly fancies that
everything
which springs from such a soil, must be at once worthless and
ephemeral.
In one word, when we survey its varied phrases of pretension and
meanness
,
we must regret, that some bold Lexicographer had not poured into one
syllable, the whole vocabulary of scorn, in order to coin a word to be
applied
to this thing, which always creeps when it attempts to fly, crawls
when it would soarthis Aristocracy of the Quaker City.
This Tory aristocracy existed in full vigor, at the time Arnold assumed
the command in Philadelphia.
You will observe that his position was one of singular difficulty;
Washington
himself would not have given general satisfaction, had he been in
Arnold's place. In after time, Jackson at New Orleans, excited the enmity
of a bitter faction, because he held the same power, which Arnold once
exercisedthat of a Military Governor, who commands in the same town
with a Civil Magistracy.
You will remember, that the very Aristocracy, who yesterday had been
feasting General Howe, sharing the orgies of the British soldiery, swimming
in the intoxication of the Meschianza, were now patriots of the first water.
The moment the last British boat pushed from the wharf, these gentlemen
changed their politics. The sound of the first American trooper's horse,
echoing through the streets of the city, accomplished their conversion.
Yesterday, Monarchists, Tories; to-day, Patriots, Whigs, these gentlemen,
with dexterity peculiar to their race, soon crept into positions of power and
trust.
From their prominence, as well as from his marriage with Miss Shippen,
Arnold was thrown into constant intimacy with these pliable politicians.
Having grounded these facts well in your minds, you will be prepared to
hear the grumbling of these newly-pledged patriots, when Arnoldwho
yesterday was such a splendid fellow, sprinkling his gold in banquets and
festivalsobeyed a Resolution of the Continental Congress, and by
proclamation
,
prohibited the sale of all goods, in the city, until it was ascertained
whether any of the property belonged to the King of Great Britain or his
subjects.
This touched the Tory-Whigs on the tenderest point. Patriotism was a
beautiful thing with them, so long as it vented itself in fine words; but
when it touched King George's property, or the property of King George's
friends, they began to change their opinion.
Their indignation knew no bounds. They dared not attack Washington,
they dared not assail the Congress. Therefore, they opened their batteries
of malignancy and calumniation against Arnold.
Where that brave man had one fault, they magnified it into ten. Where
he was guilty of one wrong act, they charged him with a thousand.
Not seven months of Arnold's command had transpired, before Congress
and Washington were harrassed with letters asking for the trial and disgrace
of Arnold.
At last the matter was brought before Congress, and a Committee of that
body, after a thorough examination, gave to Benedict Arnold, a vindication
from any criminalty in the matters charged against him.
Then the war was opened against Arnold anew; then the Mobnot the
mechanics or men of toilbut the Rabble who do no work, and yet have
time to do all the riots in your large cities, were taught to hoot his name in
scorn, to stone him in the streets, him, the Hero of Quebec. Yes, the
out-casts
of the city, were taught to cover him with filth, to wound with their
missiles, the very limb that had been broken by a cannon ball, on the barrier
of Quebec.
Congress did not act upon the Report of the Committee. Why was this?
That report was referred to a joint Committe of Congress and the
Assembly
.
At last General Washington was harrassed into appointing a Court
Martial. It was done, the day fixed, but the accusers of Arnold were not
ready for trial. Yes, loud as they were in their clamors, they asked delay
after delay, and a year passed.
All the while, these men were darkening the character of Arnold, all the
while he stood before the world in the light of an untried CRIMINAL. The
Hero of Quebec was denied a right, which is granted to the vilest felon.
Accused of a crime, he was refused the reasonable justice of a speedy trial.
At last, after his accusers had delayed the trial, on various pretences, after
the sword of the `unconvicted criminal,' resigned on the 18th of March,
1779, had been taken up again by him, on the 1st of June, the day
appointed
for his trial, in order to defend his country once again, at last, on
the 20th of December, 1779, the Court Martial was assembled at the
head-quarters
of Washington, near Morristown.
At last the day cameArnold was triedand after a month consumed in
the careful examination of witnesses and papers, was found guilty of two
colossal enormities. Before we look at them, let us remember, that his
accusers, on this occasion, were General Joseph Reed, and other members
of the Supreme Executive council of Pennsylvania.
Here are the offences:
I.
An irregularity, without criminal intention, in granting a written
protection to a vessel, before his command in Philadelphia, while at
Valley
Forge
.
II,
Using the public wagons of Pennsylvania, for the
transportation
of private property from Egg Harbor
.
Those were his colossal crimes!
The other two charges were passed aside by the court.
It was upon these charges that the whole prosecution resteda military
irregularity in granting a written protection, before he assumed command in
Philadelphia, andO, the enormity of the crime almost exceeds the power
of beliefa sacriligious use of the baggage wagons of Pennsylvania!
For this Benedict Arnold had been pursued for at least thirteen months,
with a malignity insatiable as the blood-hounds thirst. For this he had
been held up to all the world as a criminal, for this pelted in the streets, and
for this, the Hero of Quebec and Saratoga and Champlain, was to be
publicly
disgraced, REPRIMANDED by
George Washington
.
Let us hear what that honest man, Jared Sparks, says of the matter:
It was proved to the court, that although the wagons had been
employed
for transporting private property, they were nevertheless used at
private expense, without a design to defraud the public, or impede the
military service
.
And the man who had poured out his blood like water, on the frozen
ground of Quebec, was to be stamped with eternal infamy for USING THE
PUBLIC WAGONS OF
Pennsylvania
!
You will pardon the italics and capitals. These words ought to be
inscribed
in letters of fire on a column of adamant!
Is it possible for an honest man to read this part of the tragedy, without
feeling the blood boil in his veins?
My friends, here is the only belief we can entertain in relation to this
matter. At the same time that we admit that Arnold was betrayed into
serious faults through his intimacy with the Tory aristocracy of
Philadelphia
,
as well as from the inherent rashness of his characterthat very
rashness forming one of the elements of his iron-souled braverywe must
also admit, that among the most prominent of his accusers or persecutors,
as you please,was
a man whose foot had once been lifted to take the
step which Arnold afterwards took
.
Before large and respectable audiences of my countrymen, assembled in
at least three States of this Union, I have repeatedly stated that I was
prepared to prove this fact, from evidence that cannot lie. No answer
was ever made to the assertion. In the public papers I have repeated the
statement, expressing my readiness to meet any person, in a frank and
searching discussion of the question
Was Arnold's chief accuser in heart
a Traitor?
Still no answer!
It is true, that other and unimportant points of my history have been
fiercely attacked. For example, when following the finger of history, I
awarded to Arnold the glory of Saratoga, a very respectable but decidedly
anonymous critic, brought all his artillery to bear upon a line, which had a
reference to the
preparation of buckwheat cakes!
So, when I expressed my readiness to examine the character of Arnold's
22
chief accuser, a very prominent individual, who has made that accuser's
deeds the subject of laborious and filial panegyric, instead of meeting the
question like a man, crept away into some dark corner of history, and called
a sincere patriot by the portentous name ofInfidel! This was very much
like the case of the patriot John Bull, who, hearing a Frenchman examine
the character of George the Third, in no very measured terms, replied by a
bitter attack on the Emperor of Timbuctoo!
Having therefore, repeatedly stated that I was ready to give a careful and
impartial investigation of the history of Arnold's chief accuser, I will now
enter upon the subject as a question comprised within the limits of
legitimate
history.
Is it not reasonable to suppose, that the man who took upon himself the
work of crushing Benedict Arnold, must have been a very good citizen, a
very sincere patriot, and if not a great warrior, at least a very honest
statesman?
Have we not a right to examine the character of this accuser?
Remember
this
trial and disgrace of Arnold, was the main cause of his treason
and then dispute our right to search the character of his Accuser, if you can.
Let us then, summon a solemn Court of history. Let us invoke the
Ghost of Washington to preside over its deliberations. Yes, approaching
that Ghost, with an awful reverence, let us ask this important question.
Was not General John Cadwallader your bosom friend, O, Washington,
the man whose heart and hand you implicitly trusted? Did he not defend
you from the calumniation of your enemies? Was he not, in one word, a
Knight of the Revolution, without fear and without reproach?
And the word that answers our question, swelling from the lips of
Washington
,
is
Yes
!
We will ask another question.
In the dark days of December, 1776, when with a handful of half-clad
men, you opposed the entire force of the British army, on the banks of the
Delaware, who then, O, Washington, stood by your side, shared in your
counsels, and received your confidence?
Benedict Arnold!
If these answers, which the Ghost of Washington whispers from every
page of history, be true, it follows that General John Cadwallader is an
impartial
witness in this case, and that Benedict Arnold was a sincere Patriot
in the winter of 1776.
Then let us listen to the details of facts, stated by General Cadwallader,
and by him published to the world, attested by his proper signature.
X.WHO WAS THIS ACCUSER?
In
December, 1776, a few days before the battle of Trenton, in the
darkest
hour of the Revolution, when Washington and his army were menaced
with immediate destruction, an important conversation took place at Bristol,
on the banks of the Delaware.
The interlocutors were John Cadwallader and the Adjutant General of
the Continental Army.
The conversation was explicit; no disguise about its meaning, not a
doubt in the sound or purport of its every word.
The adjutant general of the Continental army, to whom Washington had
entrusted duties, involving, in their faithful performance, the well-being,
perchance the existence of that army, remarked to General Cadwallader:
That he did not understand following the fortunes of a broken-down
and shattered army
At the very moment that he said this, Benedict Arnold was out yonder,
on the brink of the ice-bound river, assisting with his heart and hand, the
movements of George Washington.
But sheltered by the convenient silence of a comfortable chamber, the
Adjutant General continued:
That the time allowed by General Howe, for offering pardons and
protections to persons who would come in, before the
1
st of January
, 1777,
had nearly expired
The philosophical nature of this remark becomes evident, when you
remember
that at the very hour when the Adjutant General spoke, there was
a price set upon the head of the Rebel Washington.
And
continued this Adjutant General
I have advised the
Lieutenant
Colonel, my brother, now at Burlington, to remain there, and take
protection and swear allegiance, and in so doing he will be perfectly
justifiable
.
You will all admit, that this was beautiful and refreshing language from
any one, especially from the Adjutant General of the Continental army.
Much more was said of similar import, but the amount of the whole
conversation
was in one word,
that the Adjutant General, tired and sick of
the Rebel cause, was about to swear allegiance to his Majesty, King
George
.
General Cadwallader, the bosom friend of Washington, heard these
remarks
with surprise, with deep sorrow. From pity to the Adjutant
General
,
he locked them within the silence of his own breast, until the brilliant
attack at Trenton, which took place a few days afterwards, made it a safe
as well as comfortable thing, for the trembling patriot to remain true to his
country's flag.
Time passed, and General Cadwallader communicated this conversation
to certain prominent men of the time, thinking it better from motives of
kindness, to avoid a public exposure of the Adjutant General's intended
Treason.
But in the year 1778, a circumstance took place which forced the truth
from the lips of this memorable witness.
It was in a Court of Justice. A young man charged with Treason, was
on trial for his life. The Adjutant General, now transformed into an
Attorney
General, urged his conviction with all the vehemence of which he
was capable. There may have been some extenuating circumstances in the
young man's case, or perhaps, the manner of the Attorney General, betrayed
more than patriotic zeal, for General Cadwallader a spectator in the Court,
filled with indignation that he could not master, uttered these memorable
words:
It argues the effrontery of baseness
said the brave officer, directing
his eagle eye toward the Attorney General
in one man to pursue
another
man to death, for taking a step which his own foot had once been
raised to take
.
These were hard words. The steady look and pointed finger, and deep
voice of Cadwallader, made them intelligible to the entire Court.
The Adjutant General never forgot them.
In the course of some four or five years, a discussion was provoked, fact
after fact came out in its proper colors, and General Cadwallader accused
the Adjutant General before the whole world, of the painful dereliction
stated in the previous pages.
He did not merely accuse, but supported his accusation by such evidence
that we are forced to the conclusion in plain words, that either the Adjutant
General was a Traitor in heart, speech and purpose, or General
Cadwallader
was a gross calumniator.
The evidence which he produced in his published pamphlet, was a
thousand
times stronger than that which stripped the laurel from Arnold's brow.
As a part of this evidence, we find a letter from Alexander Hamilton, dated
Philada. March 14, 1783, in which that distinguished statesman affirms his
remembrance of a conversation, which occurred between him and General
Cadwallader, in '77, and which embraced a distinct narrative of the
dereliction
of the Adjutant General in December, '76.
Benjamin Rush, and other eminent men of that time, by letters dated 5th
Oct. 1782, March 12, 1783, and March 3, 1783, either record their
remembrance
of a conversation, with General Cadwallader, in which he
narrated
the treasonable sentiments of the Adjutant General, or distinctly
affirm
a conversation with that individual himself, had before the battle of
Trenton, and full of Disloyalty to the Continental cause.
Alexander Hamilton and Benjamin Rush, were never given to falsehood.
And then comes a statement from Major Wm. Bradford, which dated
March 15, 1783, strips the Adjutant General of every vestige of patriotism.
This brave officer states, that while he was at Bristol, in command of the
Philadelphia militia, in 1776,
the Adjutant General went over to
Burlington
,
where the enemy were, and was gone three days and nights. It was
the opinion of Col. Bayard, that he had gone over to swear allegiance to
King George
.
Such is but a portion of the testimony, presented in the memorable
pamphlet, signed by the bosom friend of Washington, John Cadwallader.
This case demands no elaborate argument, no expenditure of invective.
Either the Adjutant General was a Traitor, or John Cadwallader a * * * *.
There is no skulking away from the question. One way or other it
must be decided by every honest man, who peruses the evidence.
You will remember that I give no opinion about the matter. There are
the facts; judge every honest man for himself. That John Cadwallader
was no base calumniator, is attested by the records of history, by the
friendship of Washington.
To what fearful conclusion then, are we led?
That the Adjutant General in the dark days of 1776, not only avowed
his intention of deserting the Continental army, but was in fact, three days
and nights in the camp of the enemy.
Was this the conduct of a Patriot, orit is a dark word, and burns the
forehead on which it is brandedA
Traitor
!
This adjutant general, was General
Joseph Reed
, President of the
Supreme
Council of Pennsylvania, and the prominent accuser of
Benedict
Arnold
.
In his defence before the Court Martial, Arnold used these words:
I can with boldness say to my persecutors in general, and to the
chief of them in particularthat in the hour of danger, when the affairs of
America wore a gloomy aspect, when our illustrious general was retreating
through America, with a handful of men, I did not propose to my associates
basely to quit the General, and sacrifice the cause of my country to my
personal
safety, by going over to the enemy, and making my peace.
Can you see his eye flash, as he looks upon the Chief of his
Persecutors
?
XI.THE DISGRACE OF ARNOLD.
At
last the day of the Reprimand cameFather of Mercy what a scene!
That man Arnold, brave and proud as Lucifer, standing among the
generals
,
beside whom he had fought and bledstanding the centre of all
eyes, in the place of the Criminal, with the eye of Washington fixed upon
him in reproofwith a throng of the meaner things of the Revolution,
whom the British King might have bought, had he thought them worth the
buying, grouped about him; these petty menwho had been warming
themselves at comfortable fires, while the hands of Arnold were freezing on
the ramparts of Quebecexulting at his disgrace, glorying in his shame,
chuckling at his fall
It was too much for Arnold. That moment the iron entered his soul,
and festered there.
From that moment he stood resolved in his work of treason. From that
moment his country lost a soldier, history one of her brightest names,
Washington his right-hand man, the Revolution its bravest Knight. In one
word, from that moment John Andre lost his life, Benedict Arnold his
honor; Sir Henry Clinton gained aTraitor.
He could have borne reproof from the lips of Washington, but to be
rebuked
while the dwarf-patriots were standing by, while the little `great
men' were lookers on!It was indeed, too much for Arnold.
It is true, that the reprimand of Washington was the softest thing that
might bear the name
I reprimand you for having forgotten, that in
proportion as you have rendered yourself formidable to our enemies, you
should have shown moderation towards our citizens. Exhibit again
those splendid qualities, which have placed you in the rank of our most
distinguished generals
These were the words of Washington, worthy of his hero-heart, but
from that moment, Arnold the Patriot was dead.
At that instant from the terrible chaos of dark thoughts, wounded pride,
lacerated honor, sprung into birth a hideous phantom, known by history as
Arnold the Traitor.
Had he but taken the advice of Washington, had he but looked derision
upon his foes! Raising himself in all his proud height, his eye blazing
with that stern fire which lighted up his bronzed face on the ramparts of
Quebec, his voice deep, hollow, ringing with the accents of scorn, he should
have spoken to his enemies words like these:
Look! Pitiful creatures of an hour, how your poisoned arrows fall
harmless from this bosom, like water from the rock! Things of an hour,
creatures of falsehood, who `trafficked to be bought,' while I served my
country in hunger and blood and cold, I hurl my defiance to your very
hearts! I will yet live down your persecution. In the name of
Washington
and the Revolution, I swear it! I will yet write my name thereon
the zenith of my country's fame,there, where the vulture beak of slander
the hyena fang of malice, cannot taint nor touch it!
But he failed to do this. Unlike Jackson, who covered with the glory of New
Orleans, rested patiently for thirty years, under the odium of an unjust fine,
Arnold did not possess the power
to live down persecution
. He was
lost.
In order to understand the scene of his reprimand in all its details, we
must wander back through the shadows of seventy years.
That fine old mansion of Morristown rises before us, in the calm light of
a winter's day. There is snow upon the ground, but it is frozen, until it
resembles an immense mirror, which flashes back to the sky the light of
the sun. Yonder we behold the mansion, standing on a gentle eminence.
Those poplars before the door, or rather beside the fence at the foot of the
elevation, are stripped of their foliage. The elm yonder, bared of its green
leaves, shines with a thousand limbs of ice and snow. All is cold, serene,
desolate.
We enter this mansion. Without pausing to survey its massive front, or
steep roof or projecting eves, we ascend the range of steps, give the word
to the sentinels, and pass beneath these pillars which guard the hall door.
Step gently along this hall nter with uncovered brow, into this large
room, where the light of a cheerful hickory fire glowing upon the hearth,
mingles with the winter-sunshine, softened as it is by the thick curtains
along yonder windows.
Gaze with reverence, for great men are gathered here. Do not let your
eye wander to those antique chairs, fashioned of walnut, and carved into
various fantastic forms, nor to the heavy mouldings of the mantle-piece, nor
to the oval mirror encircled by a wreath of gold flowers.
But by the hearty glow of the hearthside flame, gaze I beseech, upon
this company of heroes, who dressed in blue and buff stand side by side,
leaving an open space before the fire.
A large table is there, on whose green cloth, are laid various papers,
burdened with seals, and traced with celebrated signatures. In the midst,
you behold a sword resting in its sheath, its handle carved in the shape of
an eagle's beak. That sword has seen brave days in the Wilderness and
at Quebec.
Three figures arrest your attention.
Neither the knightly visage of Wayne, nor the open countenance of the
Boy-General, La Fayette, nor the bluff hearty good-humor of Knox,
command
your gaze. They are all there. There too, Cadwallader the bosom
friend of Washington, and Greene so calmly sagacious, and all the heroes
of that time of trial. Yet it is not upon these you gaze, though their faces
are all darkened by an expression of sincere sorrow.
It is upon those three figures near the fire that you look, and hush each
whisper as you gaze.
The first standing with his face to the light, his form rising above the
others, superior to them all in calm majesty of look and bearing. The
sunshine streaming through the closed curtains reveals that face, which a
crown could not adorn, nor the title of King ennoble. It is the face of
Washington, revealing in every calm, fixed outline, a heart too high for the
empty bauble of a crown, a soul too pure for the anointed disgrace of Royal
Power. He is very calm, but still you can trace upon his countenance a
look of deep, aye, poignant regret.
His eye is fixed upon the figure opposite.
Standing with his back to the window, a man of some thirty-nine years,
vigorous in each muscular limb, majestic in his breadth of chest, and in the
erect bearing of his neck and head, rests one hand upon the table and gazes
upon Washington with a settled look. His brow is bathed in the light of
the hearth. Do you see the red glare that flashes over each rigid feature?
Does it not impart to that bold brow and firm lips and massive chin, an
expression
almostsupernatural?
As he stands there, you see him move one foot uneasily. The limb
broken once at Quebec, shattered once at Saratoga pains him. That of
course, is Arnold.
You hear the words of the Reprimand pass from the lips of Washington.
You listen with painful intensity. Not a whisper in this thronged room,
scarcely a breath! You hear the flame crackle, and the crumbling wood
fall in hot coals along the hearth.
Arnold hears it, allevery word of that solemn Reprimand.
Does his cheek blench? His eye change its fixed glance? His lip
quiver? No! As those words fall from the lips of Washington, he merely
suffers his head to droop slowly downward, until his eyes seem glaring
upward, from compressrd brows. But the light of those eyes is strange,
yes,vivid, deadly.
Meanwhile, looking between Washington and Arnold, do you see that
figure, resting one arm upon the mantel-piece, while his face is turned away,
and his eyes seem earnestly perusing the hot coals of the fire? That is a
very singular face, with parchment skin, and cold stony eyes, and thin,
pinched lips. The formby no means commanding, or peculiar, either for
height or dignityis attired in the glorious blue and buff uniform. Who
is this person?
Behold that glance of Arnold, shooting its scorn from the woven
eye-brows
,
and answer the question, every heart for itself. That glance surveys
the figure near the fire, and pours a volume of derision in a single look.
Who is this gentlemen? Ask the Secret records of the Revolution, and
ask quickly, for the day comes, when they will be secret no longer.
At last this scenewhich saddens you, without your knowing whyis
over. The reprimand is spoken. Arnold raises his head, surveys the whole
company, first, Washington, with a look of deep respect, then the warrior
faces of his brothers in arms, and last of all, that figure by the fireside.
O, the withering scorn of that momentary gaze!
The flame light falls upon Arnold's brow, and reveals him, very calm,
somewhat pale, but utterly Resolved.
So, do I imagine the scene of the Reprimand. So, taking for
granted, that his enemies, who had hunted him for thirteen months, were
present at the scene of his disgracedo I, in my own mind, delineate this
picture of the Past.
XII.ARNOLD AT LANDSDOWNE.
Aged
persons, survivors of the Revolution, have told me singular and
impressive
stories of Arnold's appearance and demeanor, while in Philadelphia,
after this trial.
He wandered from place to place, with an even and steady gait, neither
looking to one side nor to the other, scarcely even speaking to any one,
either in courtesy or in anger, but preserving a settled calm of look and
manner.
And when the Mob stoned him, he never looked back, but patiently
received
their missiles in his face, and on his wounded limb. He had grown
patient
.
They tell me, that his features, swarthy and battle-worn, lost every trace
of vivacity: they were rigidly fixed; the lips compressed, the brow calm
and unfrowning, wore an expression that no one could read, while his eyes
had a wildness in their gleam, a fire in their glance, that told somewhat of
the supernatural struggle at work within him, the Battle between Arnold's
Revenge and Arnold's Pride.
Who shall tell the horrors of that mental combat?
At this time, he brings to mind the Hebrew Giant, Sampson. Yes,
Arnold
imagined that his pursuers had put out the eyes of his honor, and
shorn off the locks of his strength. He fancied himself brought forth before
all America, to make sport for the tricksters and trimmers, in Camp and
Congressthe cowardly Philistines of that heroic time.
His fall had been determined with himself, but he also, resolved that the
ruins which were to crush him should neither be small nor insignificant.
He was to fall, but he would drag down the temple with him.
The Ruin should be great and everlasting. He would carve out for
himself
,
a monument of eternal infamy, from the rock of his patriot greatness.
Look yonder, my friends, into the retirement of Arnold's home.
Not the home in the city, amid the crowded haunts of life, but this
mansion
,
rising from the summit of a hill, that slopes gently away for a mile,
until its grassy breast melts into the embrace of the Schuylkill.
It is almost a Palace, this beautiful place of
Landsdowne
, which once
occupied by the Penn family, is now the retreat of Benedict Arnold. Here,
amid these beautiful woods, he hides his sorrow. Here, along these
gravelled
walks, beneath the shade of overhanging trees, he paces all day long.
Sometimes he gazes on the distant rocks of Laurel Hill. Sometimes he
strays by the Schuylkill, and its clear waters mirror his face, lowering with
fearful passions. At times, secluding himself in these silent chambers, he
utters certain words in a low voice.
Fancy the lion of the forest, captured, tied, his limbs, severed one by
one, and you have the case of Benedict Arnold.
23
This proud mansion, once rung with the clamor of a Three day's festival.
It was when Arnold, recently appointed General in command of
Philadelphia
,
received the French Minister, Monsieur Gerard. For three days,
liveries, uniforms, gold, jewels and laces, fluttered and shone, over the wide
sweep of this beautiful lawn. The wine ran, day and night, free as the
Schuykill's waves. The mansion, luxuriously furnished, displayed in every
room the gaiety of the French Court, combined with the glitter and show
of an oriental Divan. Beneath the trees banquets were spread; on the
river, boats, shapen like Venetian gondolas, glided softly, freighted with a
precious treasure of voluptuous beauty.
At night, the wood and the mansion, and the river broke out, all at once
with a blaze of light. It was like a scene of enchantment.
And amid all these scenes, one Woman, pre-eminently beautiful, glided
along, her young form, swelling in every vein, with a sense of life, her eyes
gleaming passion, pride, fascination. Her long hair waved to her half bared
bosom. Her small foot, encased in delicate slipper, bounded in the dance
like a feather blown by a gentle wind, so light, so easy, so undulating.
Every eye was centred on her form. How often Arnold would stand in the
shadow, gazing upon her as she went to and fro, and thinking that all this
treasure of warm loveliness, this world of enticing beauty, was his own!
His wife, his newly-married Bride!
But those glorious days were now changed. The guests were gone;
long since gone. Gone the honor, the gold, the friends. Then, the
celebrated
Arnold, surrounded by parasites; now the disgraced Arnold, living
alone in these shades, in company with his wife.
It is of that wife and of her influence that I would speak.Do you see
that lovely woman, clinging to the breast of the stern-browed warrior? It
is the evening hour. Through the window pours the red flush of sunset,
bathing
both forms in rosy light. Those tresses fall over her white shoulders,
and along the manly arms which gird her to his heart.
Do you think he loves her? Look at his eye, blazing from the shadow
of his brow; that glance surveys her form, and gathers a softened fire from
her look. And she rests in his arms, just as you have seen a solitary white
lily repose on the bosom of a broad green leaf, which the waves urged
gently to and fro.
She is indeed a beautiful womanbut listen? What words are these,
that she whispers in his ear?
Does she tell him how much nobler will be Arnold the Patriot, enshrined
in the hearts of his countrymen, than Arnold the Courtier, dancing
attendance
in the ante-chamber of King George?
Does shefollowing the example of many an humble country-woman,
clad not like her, in satins and gold, but in plain homespunplace in her
Husband's hand, the patriot's sword? Do those mild blue eyes, looking
up into his stern face, gleam with the holy flame of patriotism or with a
base love for the baubles of a Court?
Let History answer.
I make no charge against the wife of Arnold. May the sod lay lightly
on her beautiful frame, which has long since mouldered into dust. Peace
to her ashesif we invoke her memory, it is only for the sake of the
terrible
lesson which it teaches.
Had she, instead of a King-worshipper, a lover of titles and courts and
shows, been a Hero-woman, Arnold might have been saved. But he loved
her. She clung to him in his disgrace. When the world frowned, her
bosom received his burning brow, and pillowed his torn heart. She was
with him in his loneliness. Was it strange, that her voice whispering to
him at all hours, should sway his soul with a powerful, nay, an irresistable
influence?
Imagine him neglected by Congress, disgraced in the camp, pelted in the
streets, striding to his home, his heart beating against his breast, like a lion
in its cage. There, in his Home, a beautiful girl welcomes him. She, at
least, is true. She may have married him because he was so renowned,
because he bore his honors with so proud a grace, but
now
, she is Home,
Friend, World to him.
That single fact should make the flowers grow more beautifully above
her grave.
She is ambitious. Perchance, when sleeping on his breast, she dreams
of a royal court, and there, attired in coronet and star, she beholds,
Earl
Arnold
! Then when she wakes, bending her lips to his ear, she whispers
her dream, and not only a dream, but lays the plan ofTreason. Is it
improbable that Arnold was fatally swayed by the words of this bewitching
wife?
Again I repeat, had this wife, instead of a lover of courts and pomps and
names, been a Hero-Woman, her heart true to the cause of freedom, her
soul beating warmly for Washington and his cause, there would never have
been written, on the adamantine column which towers from history
dedicated
to the memory of Infamous Menthe name of
Benedict Arnold
.
Let Woman learn this lesson, and get it by heart.
The influence of his wife was one of the main causes of Arnold's
treason
.
A terrible lesson, to be remembered and told again, when this hand is dust!
How did she influence his life? By forcing herself into the rostrum or
the pulpit? By sharing in the debates of the Congress, the broils of the
camp? No? These women who write big books and mount high pulpits,
talking theology and science by the hour, never influence anybody. They
are admired for the same reason that the mob rushes to see a Mermaid or
link from the Sea Serpent's tail. Not on account of the usefulness, but
merely for the curiosity of the thing; for the sake of the show.
It was in the Home, at the Fireside, that the wife of Arnold exercised
her bewitching and fatal power!
And, O, let the Woman of our country, unheeding the silly philanthropy
which would force her into the pulpit, or the rostrum, into the clamor of
wordy debates, or the broils of political life, remember this great truth:
Her influence is by the Fireside. Her world is Home. By the light of
that Fireside, she stands a Queen upon her Throne. From that Throne,
she can mould man to good or evilfrom the Sanctity of her home, she
can rule the world.
Let us now, in one historical picture, condense three important points
of Arnold's career.
XII.ARNOLD, THE TRAITOR.
There
was a night, when an awful agony was passing in the breast of
Arnold; the struggle between Arnold's revenge and Arnold's pride.
You have all seen that old house, in Second near Walnut street, which
once the Home of William Penn, once the Palace of Benedict Arnold, is
now used as a manufactory of Venus De Medicis, and sugar candies. That
old house, picturesque in ruins, with battlemented walls and deep-gabled
roofs?
One night a gorgeously furnished chamber, in that mansion, was
illuminated
by the glare of a bright wood fire. And there, with his back to that
fire,there, looking out upon the western sky, gleaming in deep starlight,
stood Benedict Arnold. One hand was laid upon his breast, which throbbed
in long deep gasps; the other held two letters.
Read the superscription of those letters, by the light of the stars; one is
directed to General Washington, the other to Sir Henry Clinton. One
announces
his acceptance of the command of West Point, the other offers to
sell West Point to the British.
And now look at that massive face, quivering with revenge, pride and
patriotism; look at that dark eye, gleaming with the horror of a lost soul;
look at that bared throat with the veins swelling like cords!
That is the struggle between Arnold the Patriot, and Arnold the Traitor.
And there, far back in the room, half hidden among silken curtains, silent
and thoughtful, sits a lovely woman, her hands clasped, her unbound hair
showering down over her shoulders, her large blue eyes glaring wildly upon
the fire! Well may that bosom heave, that eye glare! For now the wife
of Arnold is waiting for the determination of her husband's fate; now, the
darkest shadow is passing over the Dial-plate of his destiny.
While Arnold stands brooding there, while his wife sits trembling by the
firewithout, in the ante-chamber, three persons wait for him.
One is a base-browed man clad in the blue uniform of the Continentals.
Turn that uniform and it is scarlet. That is a British Spy. He is waiting
to bear the letter to Sir Henry Clinton.
That handsome cavalier, dressed in the extreme of fashion, with
embroidered
coat, red heeled shoes and powdered hair, is a nobleman of
France; the Ambassador of the French King, the Chevalier De Luzerne.
He
has come here to listen to the offer of Arnold, who wishes to enter the
service of the French King.
The thirdlook! A silent and moody red-man of the forest; an Indian
chief; wrapped up in his blanket, standing there, proud as a king on his
throne.
He has come from the wilds of the forest in the far northwest, to hearken
to the answer of Arnold (the
Death Eagle
, as the Indians call him,) to
their proposition, by which they agree to make him chief of their tribes.
Now look: the door opens; the three enter; Arnold turns and beholds
them.
Then occurs a hurried and a deeply-interesting scene.
While the wife of Arnold sits trembling by the fire, he advances, and
greets the Chevalier De Luzerne:
Look ye, he mutters in quick tones, Your king can have my sword,
but mark! I am in debt; the mob hoot me in the streets; my creditors are
clamorous. I must have money!
This bold tone of one used to command, little suits the polite Ambassador.
My King never
buys
soldiers! he whispers with a sneer, and then
bowing, politely retires.
Stung to the quick with this cool insult, Arnoldturning his eyes away
from the British Spysalutes the Indian chiefhark! They converse in
the wild, musical Indian tongue.
My brothers are willing to own the Death Eagle as their chief,
exclaims
the Indian. Yet are they afraid, that he loves the pale faces too
well
Try my love for the pale faces,mutters Arnold with a look and a
sneer that makes even the red Indian start.
The chief resumes: My brothers who are manytheir numbers are as
the leaves of the forestmy brothers who sharpen their war-hatchets for
the scalp of the pale-face, will ask the Death Eagle to lead them on the
towns of the pale-face; to burn, to kill, till not a single pale-face is left in
the land.
Try me
! was the hoarse response of Arnold, given with knit brows,
and clenched hands.
Then shall the Death Eagle become the chief of the red mensaid
the IndianBut his pale face squaw there! He must leave her; she can
never dwell in the tents of the red men.
Then it was that Arnoldwho had embraced with a gleam of savage
delight
,
the proposition, to become the chief of a murderous tribe of wild
Indians
felt
his heart grow cold!
Ah! how he loved that wife!
Arnold who in his mad revenge, was willing to sweep the towns of the
whites with torch and knife, quailed at the idea of leaving that fair young
wife.
The Death Eagle cannot be your chief! he said as he turned from the
Indian. The red man went from the room with a sneer on his dark face,
for the man who could not sacrifice his wifethe loved one of his heart
to that revenge, which was about to stamp his name with eternal scorn.
`Now take this letter to Sir Henry Clinton! gasped Arnold, placing
the fatal letter in the hands of the British Spy. And then Arnold and his
wife were alone.
Then that wifegazing on the noble countenance of her husband, now
livid as ashes,gazing in that dark eye, now wild and rolling in its glance,
gazing on that white lip, that quivered like a dry leafthen that wife of
Arnold trembled as she felt that the dread Rubicon was passed, that Arnold,
the Patriot,
dead
, she sat in the presence of
Arnold, the Traitor
.
XIV.THE FALL OF LUCIFER.
How often in the lower world, does the tragedy of life, walk side by side
with the Common-place!
A dark cavern, where no light shines, save the taper flashing from the
eyes of hollow skulla lonely waste where rude granite rocks tossed in
fantastic forms, deepen the midnight horror of the hourthe crash of battle,
where ten thousand living men in one moment, are crushed into claysuch
are the scenes which the Romancer chooses for the illustration of his
Tragedy
,
the Historian for his storied page, every line full of breathing interest
and life.
But that the development of a horrible tragedy, should be enacted amid
the familiar scenes of Home? What
is
more common, what
appears
more
natural?
That the awful tragedy of Arnold's treason, should find its development
at aBreakfast-table!Does it not make you laugh?
Treason
comes to us in history, hooded in a cowl, dagger in hand, the
dim light of a taper trembling over its pallid skull. But
Treason
calmly
sitting down to a quiet breakfast, the pleasant smile upon his face, hiding
the canker of his heart, the coffeethat fragrant intensifier of the brain
smoking like sweet incense, as it imparts its magnetism from the lip to the
soulTreason with a wife on one side, a baby laughing on his knee!
Does it not seem to mingle the ridiculous with the sublime, or worse, the
dull Common-place with the Demoniac?
And yet, there is nothing under Heaven more terribly true! Search
history, and you will find a thousand instances, where the most terrible
eventsthings that your blood congeals but to readwere mingled with
the dullest facts of every-day life.
While the head of Mary Queen of Scots, falls bleeding on the sawdust
of the scaffold, every vein of that white neck, which Kings had deemed it
Paradise to touch, pouring forth its separate stream of blood, in yonder
chamber Queen Elizabeth, the sweet Jezebel of the English throne, is
adding another tint to the red paint on her cheek, and breaking her looking
glass, because it cannot make her beautiful!
Napoleon, flying from the field of Waterloo, where he had lost a World,
pauses in his flight to drink some miserable soup, made by a peasant, in the
hollow of a battered helmet!
General Nash, riding to the bloody surprise of Germantown, from which
he was to come back a mangled corse, turns to Washington, and gravely
apologizes for the absence of powder from his hair, cambric ruffles from
his wrists!
We might multiply our illustrations of the fact, by a thousand other
instances.
Yet among them all, that Development of Arnold's Treason, which took
place at a Breakfast-table, has ever seemed to us most terrible.
Yonder in Robinson's House, which you behold among the trees, on the
sublime heights of the Hudson, opposite the cliffs of West Point, the
Breakfast-party
are assembled.
The blessed sunshine of an autumnal morning, which turns the Hudson's
waves to molten gold, and lights the rugged rocks of West Point with a
smile of glory, also shines through these windows, and reveals the
equip-age
of the breakfast-table, the faces of the guests.
Why need I tell you of the antique furniture of that comfortable room, or
describe the white cloth, the cups of transparent porcelain, or the cumbrously
carved coffee urn, fashioned of solid silver? These things are very
common-place
,
and yet even the coffee urn becomes somewhat interesting, when
we remember that its polished silver reflects the bronzed features of a
Traitor
?
That traitor sits near the head of the table, his imposing form attired in a
blue coat, glittering with buttons and epaulettes of gold, a buff vest, ruffles,
and neckcloth of cambric. That face whose massive features have glowed
with demoniac passions, is now calm as marble. The hand which has
grasped the Sword of Quebec and Saratoga, now lifts a porcelain cup. And
yet looking very closely you may see the hand tremble, the features
shadowed by a gloom, not the less impressive, because it is almost
imperceptible
.
Near the General are seated two young officers, his aids-de-camp, whose
slender form do not conceal a coward thought. Their eyes wander from
the form of the General, to the figure by his side.
That figure, the most beautiful thing out of Paradisea young wife, with
a baby nestling on her bosom!
At the head of the table she is seen; her form now ripened into its
perfect
bloom, negligently attired in a loose robe, whose careless folds cannot
hide the whiteness of her neck, or the faultless contour of that half-bared arm.
And the child that sleeps upon her full bosom, its tiny hands wound
among the tresses of her golden hair, is very beautiful. The Darkness of
its Father's Crime, has not yet shadowed its cherub face.
Arnold is silent. Ever and again from the shadows of his deep drawn
brows, he gazes upon her, his wife! Upon the burden of her breast, that
smiling child.
How much has he risked for them!
Her eye of deep melting blue, first trembles over the face of the infant,
and then surveys her husband's visage. O, the fearful anxiety of that
momentary
gaze! Does she fear for the future of her babe? Shall he be the
heir of Arnold the Earl? Does she the child of wealth and luxury, lapped from
her birth in soft attire, for a moment fancy that Arnold himself, was once a
friendless babe, pressed to the agonized bosom of a poor and pious woman?
Ere we listen to the conversation of the Breakfast-table, let us approach
these windows, and behold the scene without.
Not upon the beautiful river, nor the far extending mountains, will we
gaze. No! There are certain sights which at once strike our eye.
A warrior's horse stands saddled by the door.
Yonder far down the river, the British Flag streams from the British
Ship, Vulture. To the north-west, we behold the rocks and cliffs of West
Point.
Let us traverse this northern road, until having passed many a quiet nook
we stand upon the point, where a narrow path descends to the river.
From the green trees, a brilliant cavalcade bursts into view. Yonder
rock arises from the red earth of the road, overshadowed by a clump of
chesnut trees. A General and his retinue mounted on gallant steeds come
swiftly on, their uniforms glittering, their plumes waving in the light.
It is
Washington
, attended by La Fayette and Knox, with the other
heroes of his band. In this gallant company, need you ask which is the
form of the American Chief?
He rides at the head of his Generals, his chivalric face glowing with the
freshness of the morning air. By his side a slender youth with a high
forehead
and red hairLa Fayette! Then a bluff General, with somewhat
corpulent form and round good-humored faceGeneral Knox. And on the
right hand of Washington, mounted on a splendid black horse, whose dark
sides are whitened by snowy flakes of foam, rides a young man, not
remarkable
for heighth or majesty of figure, but his bold high forehead awes,
his deep-set eyes, flashing with genius, win and enchain you. It is young
Alexander Hamilton.
As we look at this gallant cavalcade, so gloriously bursting into view
from the shadows of these green trees, let us listen to La Fayette, who
gently lays his hand on the arm of Washington.
General, you are taking the wrong way, he says, in his broken accent
That path leads us to the river. This is the road to Robinson's
House. You know we are engaged to breakfast at General Arnold's
head-quarters
?
A cheerful smile overspread Washington's face
Ah, I see how it is! he said, alternately surveying La Fayette and
HamiltonYou young men, ha, ha! are all in love with Mrs. Arnold, and
wish to get where she is, as soon as possible. You may go and take
breakfast with her, and tell her not to wait for me. I must ride down and
examine the redoubts on this side of the river, and will be there in a short
time!
The officers however, refuse to take advantage of their General's kind
permission. Two aids-de-camp are sent forward to announce Washington's
return from Hartford, where he had been absent for some days, on a visit
to Count De Rochambeau.In the meantime, the Chief and his retinue
disappear in the shadows of the narrow path leading to the river.
The aids de-camp arrive, announce the return of Washington, and take
their seats beside Mrs. Arnold, at the breakfast-table.
The General is well? asked that beautiful woman, with a smile that
revealed the ivory whiteness of her teeth.
Never in better spirits in his life. Our visit to Hartford, was a
remarkably
pleasant oneBy the bye, General,turning abruptly to Arnold
What think you of the rumor now afloat, in reference to West Point?
The porcelain cup, about to touch Arnold's lip, was suddenly stopped in
its progress. As the sunlight pours in uncertain gleams over his forehead,
you can see a strange gloom overshadow his face.
Rumor? West Point? he echoed in his deep voice.
Yes hesitated the aid-de-campOn our way home, we heard
something of an intended attack on West Point, by Sir Henry Clinton
The smile that came over Arnold's face, was remembered for many a
day, by those who saw it.
Pshaw! What nonsense! These floating rumors are utterly
ridiculous
!
Sir Henry Clinton meditate an attack on West Point? He may be
weak, or crazy, but not altogether so mad as that!
The General sipped his coffee, and the conversation took another turn.
The latest fashion of a lady's dresswhether the ponderous head-gear
of that time, would be succeeded by a plainer stylethe amusements of
24
the British in New York, their balls, banquets and gala dayssuch were
the subjects of conversation.
Never had the wife of Arnold appeared so beautiful. Her eyes beaming
in liquid light, her white hand and arm moving in graceful gesture, her hair
now floating gently over her cheek, now waving back in all its glossy
loveliness
,
from her stainless neck her bosom heaving softly beneath its beloved
burden, that peerless woman gave utterance to all the treasures of her
musical
voice, her bold and vivacious intellect.
Arnold was silent all the while.
Suddenly the sound of horses' hoofsthe door flung rudely opena
soldier appears, covered from head to foot with dust and mud, and holding
a letter in his hand.
Whence come you? said Arnold, quietly sipping his coffee, while his
eye assumed a deeper light, and the muscles of his face suddenly contracted,
From whom is that letter?
I came from North Castlethat letter's from Colonel Jamison.The
Messenger sank heavily in a chair, as though tired almost to death.
Arnold took the letter, broke the seal, and calmly read it. Calmly,
although
every word was fire, although the truth which it contained, was
like a voice from the grave, denouncing eternal woe upon his head.
You can see the wife centre her anxious gaze upon his face. Still he is
calm. There is one deep respiration heaving his broad chest, beneath his
General's uniform, one dark shadow upon his face.as terrible as it is
briefand then, arising with composed dignity, he announces, that sudden
intelligence required his immediate attendance at West Point.
Tell General Washington when he arrives, that I am unexpectedly
called to West Point, but will return very soon.
He left the room.
In an instant a servant in livery entered, and whispered in Mrs. Arnold's
earThe General desires to see you, in your chamber.
She rose, with her babe upon her bosom, she slowly passed from the
room. Slowly, for her knees bent beneath her, and the heart within her
breast contracted, as though crushed by a vice. Now on the wide stairway,
she toils towards her chamber, her face glowing no longer with roses, but
pale as death, her fingers convulsively clutching her child.
O, how that simple message thrills her blood! The General desires
to see you, in your chamber!
She stands before the door, afraid to enter. She hears her husband pace
the room with heavy strides. At last gathering courage, she enters.
Arnold stands by the window, with the morning light upon his brow.
From a face, darkened by all the passions of a fiend, two burning eyes,
deep set, beneath overhanging brows, glare in her face.
She totters towards him.
For a moment he gazes upon her in silence.
She does not breathe a word, but trembling to him, as though unconscious
of the action, lifts her babe before his eyes.
Wife he exclaimed, in a voice that was torn from his very heart
All is lost!
He flung his manly arms about her formone pressure of his bosom,
one kiss upon her lipshe seizes the babe, kisses it with wild frenzy, flings
it upon the bed, and rushes from the room.
Then the wife of Arnold spread forth her arms, as though she stood on
the verge of an awful abyss, and with her eyes swimming in wild light, fell
heavily to the floor.
She laid there, motionless as death; the last fierce pulsation which
swelled from her heart, had burst the fastening of her robe, and her white
bosom gleamed like cold marble, in the morning light.
Arnold hurries down the stairs, passes through the drawing room, mounts
the saddled horse at the door, and dashes toward the river.
Awaking from her swoon, after the lapse of many minutes, the wife
arises, seeks her babe again. Still it sleeps! What knows it, the sinless
child, of the fearful Tragedy of that hour? The Mother passes her hand
over her brow, now hot as molten lead; she endeavors to recal the memory
of that scene! All is dim, confused, dark, She approaches the window.
Far down the river, the British Flag floating from the Vulture, waves in
the light.
There is a barge upon the waters, propelled by the steady arms of six
oarsmen. How beautifully it glides along, now in the shadow of the
mountains
,
now over the sunshiny waves! In the stern stands a figure, holding
a white flag above his head. Yes, as the boat moves toward the British
ship, the white flag defends it from the fire of American cannon, at
Verplanck's
point. As you look the barge glides on, it passes the point, it
nears the Vulture, while the ripples break around its prow.
Did the eye of the wife once wander from that erect figure in the stern?
Ah, far over the waters, she gazes on that figure; she cannot distinguish
the features of that distant face, but her heart tells her that it is
Arnold
!
In the history of ages, I know no picture so full of interest, as this
The Wife of Arnold, gazing from the window of her home, upon the
barge, which bears her Husband to the shelter of the British flag!
It was now ten o'clock, on the morning of the 25th of September, 1780.
Soon Washington approached Robinson's house, and sat down with
Hamilton and La Fayette, to the Breakfast table. He was told that Arnold
had been called suddenly to West Point. After a hurried breakfast, he
resolved to cross the river, and meet his General at the fortress. After
this interview it was his purpose to return to dinner. Leaving Hamilton
at the house, he hastened to the river.
In a few moments the barge rippled gently over the waves. Washington
gazed upon the sublime cliffs all around him, upon the smooth expanse of
water, which rested like a mirror, in its mountain frame, and then gaily
exclaimed:
I am glad that General Arnold has preceded us. He will receive us
with a salute. The roar of cannon is always delightful, but never so grand
as when it is re-echoed among the gorges of these mountains.
The boat glided on toward the opposite shore. No sound of cannon
awoke the silence of the hills. Doubtles, Arnold was preparing some
pleasant
surprise. Nearer and nearer to the beach glided the barge. Still no
salute.
What! exclaimed WashingtonDo they not intend to salute us?
As the barge grated on the yellow sand, an officer in the Continental
uniform, was seen on the rocks above:
He was not prepared for the reception of such visitors, and hoped that he
would be excused for any apparent neglect, in not having placed the garrison
in proper condition for a military inspection and review.
What? Is Arnold not here? exclaimed Washington, as he leaped
upon the beach.
He has not been here within two days, nor have I heard from him
within that time! replied the officer.
Washington uttered an exclamation of surprise, and then for a moment
stood wrapped in thought, the sheath of his sword sinking in the sand as he
unconsciously pressed his hand upon the hilt.
Did the possibility of a Treason, so dark in its details, so tremendous in
its general outline, burst upon him, in that moment of thought?
Soon he took his way up the rocks, and followed by his officers, devoted
some three hours to an examination of the works of West Point.
It was near 4 o'clock in the afternoon, when he returned to Robinson's
house.
As the company pursued the path leading from the river to the house,
an officer appeared, his countenance stamped with deep anxiety, his step
quickened into irregular footsteps. There was an unimaginable horror
written on his face.
That officer was Alexander Hamilton.
As Washington paused in the roadside, he approached and whispered a
few words, inaudible to the rest of the party.
Neither La Fayette or Knox heard these words, but they saw that
expression
of horror reflected from Hamilton's visage to the face of
Washington
,
and felt their hearts impressed with a strange awe. As a dim, vague
forboding thrilled from heart to heart, the party approached the house.
Washington beckons La Fayette and Knox to his side:
These letters and papers, despatched to me two days since, by Colonel
Jamison of North Castle reveal a strange truth, gentlemen.We journeyed
to Hartford by the lower road, but returned by the upper. Therefore, the
messenger has been chasing us for two days, and the information has not
reached me until this morning.The truth gentlemen, is plainGeneral
Arnold is a
Traitor
. Adjutant General Andreof the British armya
SPY!
La Fayette sank into a chair, as though the blood had forsaken his heart.
Knox uttered an involuntary oath.
Then the agony which was silently working its way through the soul
of Washingtonleaving his face calm as marblemanifested itself in these
words:
Whom, he whispered, quietly folding the papers,
Whom can we
trust now
?
Hamilton immediately started, on the fleetest horse, for Verplanck's,
point his intention being to intercept the Traitor. He returned in the course
of an hour, not with the Traitor, but with a letter headed His Majesty's
Ship, Vulture, Sept. 25, 1780, directed to Washington, and signed
Benedict
Arnold
.
Meanwhile a strange, aye, we may well say it, a terrible interview took
place at Robinson's house.
The actorsWashington and the wife of Arnold.
The General ascended the stairs leading to her chamber. He was met
at the threshhold by a strange apparition. A beautiful woman, with her
dishevelled hair floating over her bared bosom, her dress flowing round her
form in disordered folds, her white arms convulsively clutching her
frightened
babe.
The tears streamed down her cheeks.
Do not harm my child! she said, in a voice that brought tears to the
eyes of WashingtonHe has done no wrong! The father may be guilty,
but the child is innocent! O, I beseech you, wreak your vengeance on me,
but do not harm my babe!
Madam, there is no one that dares lay the finger of harm, on yourself
or your child! replied Washington.
You can see this lovely woman turn; she places the babe upon the bed;
she confronts Washington with heaving breast and flashing eyes:
Murderer! she cried, Do not advance! You shall not touch the
babe! I know youknow your plot to tear that child from a Mother's
breast, but I defy you!
Strange words these, but a glance convinced Washington, that the wife
of Arnold stood before him, not calm and collected, but with the light of
madness glaring from her blue eyes.
She stood erect, regarding him with that blazing eye, that defiant look.
O, shame! she cried, curling her proud lip in scornA warrior like
you, to harm an innocent babe! Wreak your vengeance on me. I am
ready to bear it all. But the childwhat has he ever done?
Her voice softened as she spoke these last words: she bent forward with
a look of beseeching eloquence.
On my word, I will protect you and your babe! said Washington,
and his voice grew tremulous with emotion.
For a moment, she stood before him calm and beautiful, even with her
disordered robes and loosened tresses, but that moment gone, the light of
madness blazed again from her eyes.
Murderer! she exclaimed, again, and grasped his arm, with a clutch
like the last effort of the dying; but as she spoke, her face grew paler, her
bosom ceased to beat; she dashed the thickly clustered tresses from her
face, and fell to the floor.
The only signs of life which she exhibited, were a tremulous motion of
the fingers, a slight quivering of the nether lip. Her eyes wide open, glared
in the face of Washington. Then, from those lips, whose beauty had been
sung by poets, celebrated by warriors, pressed by the Traitor, started a
white foam, spotted with drops of blood.
And the babe upon the bed, with its face baptized in the light of the
setting
sun, smiled playfully as it clapped its tiny hands and tried to grasp the
fleeting beams.
Washington stood beside the unconscious woman: his face was
convulsed
with feeling. The tears started from his eyes.
May God help you, and protect your babe! he said, and hurried from
the room.
What mean these strange scenes, occurring on this 25th of Sept., 1780?
What were the contents of the letter which Arnold received at the Breakfast
table? Can you tell what Revelations were those comprised in the letters
and papers which Washington perused, on the afternoon of this interesting
day?
Who was John Andre?
Was the Wife of Arnold a Partner in the work of Treason?
The first question must be answered by another picture, painted on the
shadows of the Past.
Ere we survey this picture, let us glance for a moment, at the last scene
of that fatal day.
While the Wife lay cold and senseless, there, in the chamber of her
desolated
home, the State Room of the Vulture presented a scene of some
interest.
The British ship was gliding over the Hudson, its dishonored flag tinted
by the last beam of the setting sun. On the soft cushions of the State
room sofa, was seated a man, with his throat bared, his brow darkened,
every line of his face distorted by passion. His eyes were fixed upon an
object, which rested on the Turkish carpet at his feet.
That man, the Hero of the Wilderness, whose glory had burst upon his
country, with the bewildering splendor of the Aurora, which flushes the
northern sky with dies of matchless beautyBenedict Arnold.
That object was an unsheathed swordthe sword of Quebec and
Saratoga
.
XVTHE TULIP-POPLAR;
OR
THE POOR MEN HEROES OF THE REVOLUTION.
One
fine morning in the fall of 1780, seven men went out by the roadside
to watch for robbers!
It was two days before the scene of the Breakfast table.
Four of these men concealed themselves in the bushes on the summit of a
high hill.
Three of their comrades sat down under a large poplar treesome
hundred
yards to the northwardfor a pleasant game at cards.
These are plain sentences, telling simple facts, yet on these simple facts
hinged the destiny of George Washington, the Continental Army, and the
cause of freedom.
Let us go yonder into the hollow, where the highway, descending a hill,
crosses a gentle brook, ascends the opposite hill, and is lost to view among
the trees to the south. On either side of the road, darkens the foliage of
the forest trees, scarcely tinged by the breath of autumn.
This gentle brook, tossing and murmuring on its way, is surmounted by
a bridge of rade pine planks, defended on either side by a slender railing.
A dark-brown horse stands champing the bit and tossing his black mane
in the centre of the bridge, while his dismounted rider bends over yonder
railing, and gazes down into the brooklet with a vacant stare.
Let us look well upon that traveller. The manly form, enveloped in a
blue overcoat, the young brow, surmounted by a farmer's round hat, the
undercoat of a rich scarlet hue, with gold buttons and tinselled trinkets, the
well polished boots, all display the mingled costume of a yeoman and a
soldier.
His rich brown hair tosses aside from his brow: his dark hazel eye
grows glassy with thought: his cheek is white and red by turns. Now his
lip is compressed, and now it quivers. Look! He no longer leans upon
the railing, no longer gazes down into the dark waters, but pacing hurriedly
up and down the rustic bridge, displaying the elegance of his form, the
beauty of his manly face, to the light of day.
The sun is seen by intervals through the tops of these eastern trees; the
song of birds is in the woods; the air comes freighted with the rich odours
of fall. It is a beautiful morning. Light, feathery clouds floating overhead,
only serve to relieve the clear blue of the autumnal sky.
It is a beautiful morning, but the young traveller feels not the breeze,
cares not for the joyous beam. Nor do those wreaths of autumnal mist,
hanging in graceful festoons among the tall forest trees, arrest the glance of
his hazel eye.
He paces along the bridge. Now he lays his hand upon the mane of his
horse; now hastily buttons his overcoat, as if to conceal the undercoat of
claret, with its handsome gold buttons; and at last, pausing in the centre
of the bridge, he clasps his hands, and gazes absently upon the rough planks.
Well may that man that paces the bridge, thus clasping his hands, thus
stand like marble, with his dark hazel eyes glassy with thought.
For he is a Gambler.
He has matched his life against a glittering boonthe sword of a General.
The game he plays isTreasonif he wins, an army is betrayed, a
General
captured, a Continent lost. If he loses, he dies on the gallows, with
the rope about his neck, and the bandage over his eyes.
Was he not a bold Gambler?
He has been far into the enemy's country. Over the river, up the rocks,
and into the secret chamber. With the
Traitor
he has planned the
Treason
.
Now he is on his way home again to the city, where his General
awaits him, trembling with suspense.
Is that not a handsome boot on his right foot? I do not allude so much
to the heavy tops, nor to the polished surface, but to the glove-like nicety
with which it envelopes the manly leg. That boot contains the fortress of
West Point, the liberty of George Washington, the safety of the Continental
Army! An important boot, you will admit, and well adapted to create
fever in his mind who wears it.
One question is there before the mind of that young traveller:
Can he
pass unmolested to the city of New York?
He has come far on his journey; he has passed through perils that
chilled his blood, and now thirty miles alone remain. But thirty miles of
neutral ground, ravaged by robbers from both armies, who plunder the
American because he is not a Briton, and rob the Briton because he is not
an American.
This is a thrilling question.
Those papers in his boot, once transferred to Sir Henry Clinton, this
young gentleman will be rewarded with a General's commission.
As this brilliant thought passes over his mind, there comes another
thought, sad, sweet, tender.
The little sitting room yonder in England, where his fair-haired sister,
and his sister with the flowing dark tresses, are seated by the mother's
knee, talking of him, their absent brother! O, it is sweet to dream by
night, but sweeter far, to dream by day, with the eyes wide open. A
beautiful
dream! That old familiar room, with oaken wainscot and antique
furniture; the mother, with her placid face, venerable with grey hair; the
fair girls now blushing and ripening into women!
He will return home; yes, they shall hear his manly step. They shall
look from the door, and instead of the untitled Cadet, behold the renowned
General. The thought fires his soul.
He gives his fears to the wind. For he is a brave man, but now he is
afraid, for he is doing a coward's work, and feels a coward's pangs.
He springs on his horse, and with Washington, West Point, and the
Continental
Army in his right boot, he passes on his way.
Let us go up yonder hill before him. What is this we see?
Three men seated beneath a tree playing cards! Alone and magnificent
stands that Tulip-Poplar, its broad limbs extending at least forty feet from
the trunk, and that trunk six feet in diameter. Such a tree you may not
see in a life-time. A trunk, like the column of some Druid Temple, hewn
of granite rock, a shade like the shelter of some colossal war-tent. How the
broad green leaves toss to and fro to the impulse of the breeze!
It stands somewhat aside from the road, separated from the trees of
yonder wood.
While these men pass the cards and fill the air with the song and laugh,
let us draw near.
That small man, leaning forward, with the smile on his lips, is named
Williams
. He is near forty years of age, as you can see by the intricate
wrinkles on his face. His costume, a plain farmer's dress, with belt and
powder horn. By his side, reclining on the ground, a man of large frame,
stalward arms, broad chest, also leans forward, his eyes fixed upon the game.
He is named
Van Wert
. His face, dogged and resolute in its expression,
gives you an idea of his character. The third, a tall, well-formed man of
some twenty years, with an intelligent countenance and dark eye, is dressed
in a faded British uniform. He is at once the most intelligent and
soldier-like
man of the company. His name is
Paulding
.
Their rifles are laid against the trunk of the tulip-poplar. Here we have
them, intent upon their game, laughing in careless glee, now and then
singing
a camp song, while the cards move briskly in their fingers.
All at once the party turned their faces to the north. The sound of
a horse's hoof struck on their ears.
Here comes a stranger! exclaimed Van Wert, with a marked Dutch
accent, A fine, gentleman-like man. Hey, Paulding? Had not we better
stop him?
Paulding sprang to his feet. He beheld our young traveller riding slowly
toward the tree. In a moment he was in the highway, intently regarding
the stranger, whom he surveyed with a meaning glance.
As his horse reached the poplar tree, Williams sprang forward and seized
the reins, while Paulding presented his rifle to the breast of the young man.
Stand! he exclaimed, in a deep, sonorous voice, Which way?
For a moment the stranger gazed in the face of the soldier, who stood
before him, clad in a British uniform. A shade of doubt, inquiry, fear
passed over his handsome face.
25
Gentlemen, said he, in a voice which struck their ears with its tones
of music, I hope you belong to our party?
Which party? ashed Paulding.
The Lower Party!
returned the traveller.
A smile darted over Paulding's face.
So do I, said he, still keeping his rifle at the breast of the unknown.
`I am a British officer! exclaimed the young man, rising proudly in his
stirrups, as he displayed a gold watch in his extended hand. I trust that
you will know better than to detain me, when you learn that I am out of
the country on particular business.
The three soldiers started. The athletic Van Wert advanced to the side
of Williams, and seized the other bridle rein. Paulding smiled grimly.
Dismount! he said, pointing the rifle at the very heart of the stranger,
who gazed from face to face with a look of wonder.
My God! said he, gaily, with a faint laugh, I suppose I must do
anything to pass.
He drew from his breast a paper, which he extended to Paulding. The
other soldiers look over their comrade's shoulder as he read it aloud:
Head Quarters, Robinson's House
,
Sept'r 22d, 1780.
Permit Mr. John Anderson to pass the Guards to the White Plains, or below
if he chooses. He being on Public Business by my Direction.
B.
Arnold
, M. Gen.
Now, said the bearer of this passport, as he dismounted, I hope you
will permit me to pass. You will risk a great deal by detaining me.
General
Arnold will not lightly overlook my detention, I assure you!
Paulding, with the paper in his hand, turned to his comrades, who, with
surprise in their faces, uttered some hurried words, inaudible to the stranger.
You see, sir, I'd let you pass, said Paulding, but there's so many
bad people about, I'm afeerd you might be one of them. Besides,
Mister
Anderson, how came you, a
British officer
, in possession of this pass from
an
American General?
For the first time the face of the stranger was clouded. His lip was
tightly compressed, as though he was collecting all the resources of his
mind.
Why do you wear a British uniform? he exclaimed, pointing to
Paulding's
dress.
Why you see, the tories and robbers belongin' to your army, would not
let me live a peaceable life until I enlisted under your king. I staid in New
York until I could escape, which I did one fine day, with this uniform on
my back. Here I am, on neutral ground, but an American to the backbone!
Come, Mister, exclaimed Williams, You may as well walk into the
bushes; we want to sarch you.
Without a word, the stranger suffered them to lead him under the shade
of yonder wood. In a moment he stood on a mossy sod, with a leafy
canopy overhead. Around him, with suspicion, wonder, curiosity, stamped
on their faces, stood Paulding, Williams, and Van Wert.
He was calm, that unknown man; not a flush was on his face, not a
frown upon his brow. Yet his hazel eye glanced from face to face with a
look of deep anxiety.
They took the overcoat, the coat of claret hue, glittering with tinsel, the
nankin and flannel waistcoats, nay, the ruffled shirt itself, from his form,
and yet no evidence of his character in the shape of written or printed paper
met their eyes. At last his boots, his under-garments, all save his
stockings
,
were removed; yet still no paper, no sign of mystery or treason was
revealed.
He stood in that silent recess, with all the proud beauty of that form
which, in its manliness of chest, grace of limb, elegance of outline, rivalled
the Apollo of the Sculptor's dreamlaid bare to the light. His brown curls,
tossed to the impulse of the breeze, about his face and brow. His arms
were folded across his breast, as he gazed in the soldier's faces.
Your stockings, if you please, said Paulding, bending down at the
officer's feet. The stocking of the right foot was drawn, and lo! three
carefully folded papers, placed next the sole of the foot, were disclosed. In
a moment the other stocking, and three papers more.
The young man shook with a sudden tremor.
One burst of surprise echoed from the soldiers as they opened the papers.
The stranger had one hope! They were but rude men; they might not
be able to read the papers, but that hope was vain, for in a clear, bold voice,
Paulding gave their fatal secret to the air.
Artillery orders, showing how the garrison of West Point should be
disposed
of in case of an alarm; an estimate of the force of the fortress; an
estimate of the number of men, requisite to man the works; a return of the
ordnance; remarks on the strength and weakness of the various works, a
report of a council of war lately at head quarters, concerning the campaign,
which Washington had sent to Arnoldsuch were the secrets of these
papers, all in the undisguised hand writing of Benedict Arnold.
It is in vain to picture the dismay which was stamped upon each soldier's
face, as word by word, they spelled out and guessed out the terrible
treachery
,
which, to their plain minds, seemed to hang over these letters.
The young mannow their prisonerstood silent, but pale as death.
For a moment all his fortitude seemed to have forsaken him.
At last, laying his hands on Paulding's arms, he said, in tremulous tones
Take my watch, my horse, my purseall I haveonly let me go!
This was a terrible temptation for three poor men, who, living in a land
demoralized by war, where neither property nor life was safe for an hour,
had never, in all their lives, owned such a fine horse, elegant gold watch,
or purse of yellow guineas.
For a moment Paulding was silent, his manly face wore a hesitating look.
Will you gif us any ting else? said Van Wert, with a strong Dutch
accent.
Yes, I will make each man of you rich for life, repeated the young
man, his manner growing more urgent, while his face was agitated with
emotion.Landsdry-goodsmoney, to enable you to live independent
of the worldanything you like, only let me go!
Poor fellow! His tones were tremulous. He was only pleading not for
a free passage, but for life, and aGeneralship. A terribly distinct vision
of his mother and sisters flashed over his soul.
But, Mister, exclaimed Williams, How are we to know that you'll
keep your word?
I will stay here until you go into the city and return! was the response
of the prisoner.
Paulding was yet silent, with a shade of gloom on his brow, while Van
Wert and Williams looked in one another's face. The prisoner, with agony
quivering in every feature, awaited their reply.
Dress yourself, muttered Paulding, in a rough voice.
Then you consent,you will let me go? eagerly exclaimed the diguised
officer.
Paulding made no reply.
Slowly he resumed his apparel.
He then looked around, as if to read his doom in the faces of these
rude men.
For they were rude men. It was an awful time of fear, doubt, murder,
that era of 1780. No man could trust his neighbor. This thirty miles of
neutral ground was as much under the control of law as the Desert of
Arabia
.
These men had felt the hand of British wrong; they had been robbed,
ill-treated, trampled under foot by British power.
Here was a chance to make them all rich men. The young man's words
were fair. He would remain a prisoner until they had tested his truth, by
going to New York. They knew that some strange mystery hung about
his path; they guessed that his escape would bring danger to Washington.
But more than this, they could neither know nor guess.
Admit, as some have urged, that these men were robbers, who came out
this fine morning of September, to try their fortune on the highway, and
the case becomes more difficult. If poor men, they would scarcely refuse
his offer; if robbers, they would at once take watch, and horse, and gold,
and bid him go!
For some moments deep silence prevailed.
Will you accept my offer, gentlemen?
Paulding turned and faced him.
No! said he, in a voice which chilled the young man's blood; If
you were to offer me ten thousand guineas I could notI would not, let
you go!
The prisoner said not a word, but his face grew paler.
They went slowly forth from the wood, and stood once more beneath the
Tulip Poplar.
The young stranger looked upon his horse, which was to bear him away
a prisoner, and his heart thrilled with a pang like death.
At this moment, turning to the west, he beheld a sight which chilled his
blood. The British ship
Vulture
,which he had missed near West
Point, by some accident never yet explainedrode there, upon the calm
Hudson, within a mile from the spot where he stood. Escape, safety,
honor, so near, and yet he was a prisoner.
Once more he turned, once more in piercing tones, with hurried
gestures
,
he besought them to take all; he promised them fortune, only that
he might depart.
But still that stern answer:
For ten thousand guineas we would not let you go
!
The sun was up in the heavens. The breeze tossed the magnificent
limbs of the Tulip-Poplar. Grouped under its shadow were the captors
and their prisoner. Here, the manly Paulding, with an expression of pity
stealing over his face; there, Williams, his countenance expressing a dull,
apathetic wonder; farther on, Van Wert, his form raising above his
comrades
,
while his arms were folded across his breast. The cards were
littered
over the grass, but each man grasped his rifle.
O, silken people, in fine robes, who read your perfumed volumes,
detailing
the virtues of the rich and great, can you see no virtue under those rude
waistcoats, no greatness in those peasant faces? It has been my task again
and again, to portray the grandeur of a Washington, the chivalry of
Lafayette
,
the glorious deeds of Wayne; but here, in these half-robber,
half-soldier
forms, methinks is found a
Self-denial
, that will match the
brightest
of them all. Honor to Washington, and Lafayette, and Wayne, and
honor to Paulding, Williams, and Van Wert, the
Poor Men Heroes of
the Revolution
.
They stood grouped under the Tulip-Poplar; but their prisoner?
He laid his arms upon his horse's neck, and hid his face on its dark
mane.
Long ago the bones of that young traveller crumbled to dust, in a felon's
grave, beneath a gibbet's foot.
Long ago, on a stormy night, the lightnings of God descended upon the
Tulip-Poplar, and rent its trunk to the roots, and scattered its branches to
the air.
And Paulding, Williams, and Van Wert, are also gone, but their names
are remembered forevermore. Let us look for a moment at the class to
which they belonged, let us take one of these humble men and paint the
picture of a Poor Man Hero,
He crouches beside the trunk of the giant oak, on the wild wood
side. He sweeps the overhanging leaves aside with his brawny handthe
light falls suddenly over his swarthy and sunburnt face, over his fur cap,
with its bucktail plume, over the blue hunting shirt, over his forest
moccasins
,
and huntsman's attire. He raises the glittering rifle to his eye, that
keen, grey eye, looking from beneath the bushy eyebrow, and fixed upon
the distant foemanhe raises his rifle, he aims at the star on the hearthe
fires. The wood rings with the soundthe Britisher has taken the
measure
of his grave.
And thus speeding along from tree to rock, from the fence to the secure
ambush of the buck wheat fieldspeeding along with his stealthy footsteps,
and his keen eye ever on the watch, the bold rifleman heeds not the battle
raging in the valley below; he cares not for the noise, the roar of cannon,
the mechanical march of the drilled columns; he cares for naught but his
own true rifle, that bears a death in every ballthat shrieks a death-knell
at every fire. A free man was the old rifleman. His home was the wild
wood, his companions the beasts of the ravine, and the birds of the cliff;
his friend, true and unfailing, was his rifle, and his joy was to wander
along the lonely pathway of the wilderness, to track the Indian to his
camp-fire, the panther to his lair.
A free man was the old rifleman. At the close of the day's hard chase,
what king so happy as he? He seats himself on the green sward, at the
foot of the ancient oak, in the depths of the eternal woods, while the setting
sunbeams fling their lines of gold athward the mossy carpet, and between
the quivering leaves of the twilight foliage.
He rears the booth of forest branches, with its walls and roof of leaves,
he spreads his couch of buffalo robes, and then gathering the limbs of
decayed
trees, he lights his fire, and the rosy gleam flares over the darkening
woods, a sign of home built in the wilderness.
The victim of the day's chase, the gallant deer, is then dragged to the
fire-side
,
divested of his skin, and anon the savory steak smokes in the blaze,
and the tree hermit of the woods, the free old backwoodsman, rubs his bony
hands with glee, and chuckles with all a hunter's delight.
Such were the men that thronged the woods and peopled the solitudes
of this, our glorious land of the New World, in the year of grace,
Seventy-Six
,in
the year of freedomOne. To this class belong the captors of
Andre, who refused a fortune, rather than aid the enemy of Washington.
Such were the men whom the British were sent to conquer: such were
the men who knew nothing of pretty uniforms, mechanical drills, or regular
lines of march, whom the stout red-coats were to annihilate.
The huntsman's frock of blue was not very handsome, his rough leggings
were not quite as pretty as the grenadier's well polished boots, his cap of
fur was a shapeless thing altogether, and yet he had two things that
sometimes
troubled his enemies not a little
a sure rifle and a keen eye
.
Let us be just to their memories. While we honor Paulding, Williams,
and Van Wert, let us remember that ten thousand such as these, rest
unknown
,
unnamed, beneath the graves of the Past, while the grass grows
more beautiful above, moistened with their blood, the unhonored Poor Men
Heroes of the Revolution.
[11]
[11]
Note
.There is a strange mystery connected with:this capture. Like other
prominent incidents of the Revolution, it has been described in at least twenty
different ways. The distinguished historian, Sparks, presents a plain, straightforward
account, which in its turn is contradicted by a late article in a western paper,
purporting to be reminiscences of a gentlemen named Hudson, who professes to be
conversant with the facts, from an actual acquaintance with Paulding, Williams,
and Van Wert. Mr. H. states that Paulding wore a British uniform; that Williams
was despatched with a note to Arnold; and that the prisoner was taken to Sing Sing,
and from thence to Tappan, where
Washington arrived in a few minutes
. Sparks,
the FIRST Historian of our country, makes no mention of the uniform, and by the
evidence of the three heroes, directly contradicts the other statements. Andre
was taken to North Castle, while
Washington was absent on a journey to Hartford
.
Not a word (on the trial of Andre,) was said by either Paulding or his comrades, in
relation to the
departure of Williams with a note to Arnold
. There is an evident
ambiguity here, which should be removed. Mr. Hudson's statement, plain and decided
as it is, contradicts the evidence of the men from whom he received it. If correct,
then they uttered falsehoods on the trial of Andre,if untrue, they are guilty of
wilful or involuntary misrepresentation. The mention of the British uniform places
a new construction upon the whole affair, and is, in my opinion, the only satisfactory
explanation of the conduct of Andre, ever yet published.
It now becomes our task to examine the contents of the letter which
Arnold received at the Breakfast table.
Andre, when captured, was taken to the nearest military post at North
Castle, where Colonel Jamison was stationed with a regiment of dragoons.
This brave officer was utterly confounded by the revelations of the papers,
which had been concealed in the boot of the Conspirator. He could not
imagine, that a General so renowned as Arnold was a Traitor. His
confusion
may be imagined when it is known, that the letter perused by the
traitor at the breakfast table, was a hasty note from Jamison, announcing the
capture of a man named Anderson, who
had a passport signed in your
name and papers of a very dangerous tendency
.
At the same time, he announced that he had sent these dangerous papers
to Washington.You have seen the agitation of the American General,
when after two day's delay, he received these documents at Robinson's
House.The honest blunder of Jamison saved the Traitor's neck.
Next comes the questionWas Arnold's wife a Partner in the work of
Treason? Again let us question the shadows of the past for an answer.
Was her fate, in any manner, connected with the destiny of John Andre?
Let these scenes, which break upon us from the theatre of the Revolution,
solve the question,
XVI.THE KNIGHT OF THE MESCHIANZA.
Two
scenes from the past; two scenes from the dim shadows of
Revolutionary
Romance. One is a scene of Lightthe other, of Gloom.
The first scene took place when the British Army was in Philadelphia;
and while Benedict Arnold was confined to his room, in the city of New
Haven, with the wounds of Saratoga.
The other scene occurred more than two years afterwards, when Benedict
Arnold was in command at West Point.
Yonder, on the outskirts of Philadelphia, stands an old house, with the
marks of decay about its roofs, its windows and walls. An old house, with
scattered tenements and broken commons all around it. Not long ago,
fallen into utter neglect, it was occupied as a coach-shop; now it is crowded
with the young faces, the busy hum of a common school.
There was a time, when that old house was a lordly palace, with one
wide green lawn stretching away from the hall-door for half a mile, away
to the brink of the broad Delaware.
There was a night when that house shook to the tread of warriors, and
the steps of dancerswhen every tree along that wide lawn shone with
lights on every bough. Yes, a night, a banquet was given there by the
officers of Sir William Howe, in honor of his glorious victory! Victory?
Yes, in honor of the fact that he hadn't been worse beaten, by Mister
Washington.
Ah, it was a glorious night. A midnight sky above, and light and glitter
below. Then gondolas, freighted with beauty, glided over the waters,
flashing streams of light along the dark waves. Then the gallant officers
put off their red coats to put on armor and helmet, like knights of old, and
a gay tournament, with heralds, and plumes, and steeds, and banners, flashed
over the wide lawn.
Let us for a moment look upon this tournament.
In yonder balcony, on the southern side of the lawnthat balcony,
overhung
with the blood-red banner, festooned with flowersis croweded one
living mass of womanly beauty. Blue eyes and hazel, eyes dark as
midnight
,
or soft and languishing as June, there mingle these glances in one
blaze of light. There you behold the tender forms of girlhood, the mature
bust of womanhood, there crowded into one view, you see all that is like
the ruby or the rose on woman's lip, like the summer dawn on her cheek,
like the deep stars of night in her eye.
These are the flowers of the aristocracy, assembled in one group of
loveliness
,
to grace the Meschianza of Sir William Howe.
Meschianza? That is a strange word, what does it mean? I cannot
tell you, but my mind is somewhat impressed with the fancy of its Hindoo
origin. Yes, it is possibly derived from some Sancrit word, and signifies,
to be glad at not being worse beaten, to be exceedingly joyful on limited
victories, to be thankful that one's neck is safe. That is the only derivation
I could ever find for Mechianza.
Below the balcony spreads the scene of the tournament. There, at one
end, through the trees, you see the palace, flaming like a funeral pyre, with
lights, and yonder, far down the lawn, the broad Delaware glimmers into
view.
Hush every whisper; the Tournament is ready to begin.
From these groups of Knights at either end of the lists, two cavaliers
sally forth and confront each other. One in armour of plated gold, mounted
on a dark steed, with a black plume shadowing his brow. The other, on
that milk-white steed, is cased from head to foot, in an armour of azure
steel. A white plume tosses from his brow.
Now hold your breath, for they come thundering on. On, on, over the
green lawn, on to each other's breasts, on with the levelled lance.
There is a pausethey crash togethernow there is a moment of doubt
but nowlook! How the white scarfs from yon gallery wave like
snow-flakes on the air.
The Knight on the dark steed is down; but the Knight in armour of
azure steel, mounted on the milk-white steed, rides round the lists in
triumph, with his snowy plume tossing as he goes.
Oh, this is a glorious show, a grand Tournament, a splendid display of
lovely women, and oh, for a swelling word from the vocabulary of adjectives
a Meschianza; and all in honor of Sir William Howe, who is so glad
that he is not
worse beaten
by Mister Washington.
Yonder fair girl bending from the gallery, lets fall upon the brow of that
white-plumed Knight, a chaplet of laurel, woven with lilies and roses.
His dark hazel eyes upraised catch the smile as it speaks from her lips.
The Queen of Beauty crowns the Victor of the Tournament. It is a
lovely picture. Let us look upon a lovelier.
Yonder, in the deep shadows of the grove, where the lights glare
flickering
and indistinct, over the tufted sward, a knight cased in glittering armour
kneels at the feet of a lovely girl.
For she is lovely, even into that towering head-dress that lays back her
golden hair from her white brow, in a mass of powder and pearls; she is
lovely in that gorgeous dress, trailing in luxurious folds upon the ground, its
jewels and satin and gold, hiding the matchless outline of her form. Yes,
she is lovely, for that deep, yet wild and languishing eye, that laughing lip,
would be more beautiful, were the form girded in a peasant garb, instead of
being veiled in the royal robes of a Queen.
And tell me, as that fair girl, extending her hand, half turns her head
away, the blush ripening over her cheek, while the lover looks up with glad
and grateful eyes, tell me, is it not as lovely a picture as artist ever drew?
26
Now change the scene. Let the Tournament pass. Let Sir William
Howe go home to England. Let the gay Knights of the Blended Roses
and Burning Lances go to the battle-field again, there to be beaten by Mad
Anthony, that Knight of the Iron-Hand; or George Washington, the Knight
without Fear and without Reproach.
Now let us go to West Point.
In the Southern window of the mansion, opposite that fortress stands a
beautiful woman, with her long hair all scattered in disorder about her
shoulders
,
while her blue eye, glaring with a look like madness, is fixed on the
Southern sky.
In that beautiful woman, you recognize the lovely girl of the Meschianza.
That woman is now the wife of Benedict Arnold, who fled from West
Point but a few brief days ago, in the British ship Vulture. That child
laughing on her bosom, is the child of a Traitor.
Yes, she has linked her fate with the destiny of Arnold. Yet, still
after
her marriage, she continues her correspondence with the Knight of the
Meschianza, who dwells in New York, the favorite of Sir Henry Clinton
.
In those letters, the first letters of Arnold to Clinton, signed Gustavus,
and speaking Treason, were enclosed. Thus, the letters of the Wife, to
the gallant Knight, were the vehicles of her Husband's dishonor
.
Why does she gaze so earnestly toward the South? She looks for the
Knight of the Tournament!
There on that piece of table-land, which looks down upon the Hudson,
where its waters sweep in their broadest flowat Tappan Zeethere
under the light of the noon-day sun, a dense crowd is gathered near a small
stone house; not a murmur is heard in that crowd; all is silent as the clay
cold lips of the dead.
Ere we look upon the sight which chills the crowd into such deep
silence, let us go back to the daybreak hour.
Day was breaking over the broad Hudson, over the hills crowned with
gorgeous autumnal foliage, over yon solitary stone house and along the level
space, when two figures came hither with spades in their hands.
They were rough men, embrued in life-long deeds of blood, but as they
sunk two holes in the sod, with the distance of a few feet between, they
were at first silent; then a scalding drop of moisture stole from the eyes of
that rough man, while his comrade cursed him for crying, as his own eye
was wet with a tear.
It must have been a dark matter indeed to make men like these, shed tears.
When those holes were dug, then they brought two thick pieces of
scantling, and placed them in the cavities; then another piece at the top
connected these upright timbers; and last of all, a rope was brought, and
then beholdthe
Gallows
!
It was around this gallows as the hour of noon came on, that a dense
crowd gathered. There were blue and gold uniforms, and there the brown
dress of the farmer. That high-browed man, whom you see yonder,
among the crowd of officers, bears the great name, which the nation always
loved to repeatAlexander Hamilton.
It is noonand look! From yonder stone-house comes a young man,
in a magnificent scralet uniform; a young man, with glossy brown hair and
a deep hazel eye.
As he comes through the lane, made by the parting of the crowd, you
can see that cart moving slowly at his heels; that cart in which crouches a
grim figure, sitting on a pine box, with crape over its face.
Does this spectacle interest you? Then look in that young man's face,
and behold the Knight of the Tournament. When we beheld him last, a
fair lady dropped laurel on his brow, a chaplet of laurel and roses.
To-day
,
that grim figure will crown him with a chaplet of death!
He draws near the foot of the gallows. For a moment, he stands,
rolling
over a little stone with his foot, as he tries to smother that choking
sensation
in his throat.
There is silence in that crowd.
Look! the cart waits for him under the dangling ropethat grim figure
lays the pine coffin upon the groundand then binds his arms lightly with
a handkerchief.
The silence is deeper.
Now the young man turns very pale. With his half-pinioned arms, he
arranges the frill of the ruffle around his wrist; he binds the handkerchief
over his face.
Oh, father of souls, that look! Yes, ere he winds the handkerchief
around his brow, he casts one glance, one deep and yearning look over the
faces of men, the river, the sky, the mountains.
That look is his farewell to earth!
Why do those stout men cry like little children? Heads bowed on their
breasts, faces turned away, showering tearsthe sun shines on them all.
The young man leaps lightly into the cartDoes'n't it make your blood
run cold to see the rough hangman wind that rope around his neck, so fair,
so like a woman's?
Now, there is silence, and tears, and veiled faces, in that crowd.
At this moment let us look yonder, in that quiet room, away in
England
.
A mother and two fair sisters sit there, embroidering a scarf, for the
son and brother, who is now in a far land.
Hark! exclaims the dark-haired sister; it is not his footstep?
And as she goes to the door, trembling with suspense and joy, and looks
out for her brother
Here, that brother stands, upon the death-cart, with
the hangman's rope about his neck!
Even as the sister looks forth from her home, to behold his form
Ah, at the very moment the hangman speaks to his horse, the cart moves
onlook!
There is a human being dangling at the end of a rope, plunging and
quivering in the air. Behold it, nor shudder at the sight! That
blackened
face, livid, blue, purple at turns, those starting eyes,Oh, hide the
horrid vision! What, hide the Poetry of the Gallows?
Hide it you may, but still the thick, gurgling groan of that dying man
breaks on your ear.
That is the Music of the Gallows.
Ah, can that loathsome corse, with the distorted face, can that be the
gallant Knight who fell at the feet of the lovely girl, in the gay Tournament?
While he hangs quivering on the gallows, yonder in New York, before a
glittering mirror, stands Benedict Arnold, surveying his proud form, attired
for the first time, in that hangman's dressa scarlet uniform.
Yondereven while the last tremor shakes his formyonder, alone,
kneels George Washington, in prayer with his God.
And now, as they thrust his young formscarcely coldinto the pine
coffin, his mother and sisters, in that far English town, have done
embrodiering
the scarfnay, that one dark-eyed sister has even worked his name
in the corner
My Brother * * * * John Andre
.
From that Gibbet of John Andre, the fairest flowers of Poetry and
Romance wave fragrantly from the night of ages.
Around that hideous thing of evil, whose blackened timbers rise before
us from the twilight of sixty-seven years, are clustered the brightest and
the darkest memories, like a mingled crowd of fiends and angels.
His fate was very dark, yet on the very darkness of the cloud that hung
over his setting sun, his name has been written in characters of light.
All that can melt the heart in pathos, all that can make the blood run
cold in tragedy, scenes of tender beauty, memories of immeasurable horror,
are grouped beside the dishonored grave of John Andre.
A volume might be filled, with the incidents connected with his closing
hour; the long winter night passed unheeded away, ere the narrator could
tell but half the Legends that hover round his tomb.
There was that in his fate, which made his friends stand palzied with
horror, his very enemies shed tears for him. The contempt, which all
honorable men feel for one who undertakes the lacquey work of Treason,
and plays the part of a
Spy
, was lost in the unmeasured scorn which all
men felt for Benedict Arnold.
Behold the Legends that hover above the grave of Andre the Spy.
XVII.JOHN CHAMPE.
A soft
voluptuous light pervaded that luxurious chamber.
It was the night of November Second, 1780. The mansion was one
of the most magnificent in the New York of that day. It stood in a
garden, planted with vines and flowers. Near this garden a dark alley led
to the river.
The vines and flowers were withered now. The night was dark, and
the spacious mansion lay wrapt in shadow. There were dim shadowy
figures moving along the darkness of the alley. Yet from a single window,
through the closed curtains, the warm gleam of a light flashed over the
deserted garden.
In the centre of this chamber, stood a beautiful woman, her form clad in
a habit of black velvet, her dark hair laid plainly back from her clear
forehead.
As the light falls over that formone hand laid upon the table, the
fingers touching a parchmentwhile the other clasps the bosom, heaving
through its dark vestment, let us gaze upon this beautiful woman, and ask
the cause of her lonely watch?
The chamber is elegantly furnished. The gorgeous carpet was woven
in a Turkish loom, the massive chairs are cushioned with crimson velvet,
the wainscot blooms with fruits and flowers, carved from the forest oak.
The lamp standing on the table, its warm light softened and refined by a
shade of clouded glass, is upheld by a sculptured figure of Apollo. The
hangings of dark crimson velvet depending along these windows, their folds
presenting masses of light and shade, are worthy the hall of a Prince.
In yonder corner from a shadowy niche, the marble form of the Medicean
Venus steals gently on you. Beautiful in its spotless whiteness, this image
of womanly loveliness, with the averted head, the gently bending form, the
half-raised hands steals softly on your eye, like a glimpse from Eden.
And the living woman, who stands by the table there, her tall form clad
in dark velvet, impresses you with her strange wild beauty, more than all
the statues in the world.
Do you mark the bosom heaving from its vestment? The alabaster of
that rounded neck, contrasted with the black velvet which encircles it?
The falling symmetry of the waist, contrasted with the ripe fulness of the
other part of her figure! The foot protruding from the folds of the habit,
small and delicate, cased in a satin slipper and beating with an impetuous
motion against the carpet?
The form bewilders you with its impetuous loveliness, but the face
startles you with the conflict of passions, impressed on every outline.
The bloom of the cheeks, the love of the warm lips, the melting softness
of the dark eyes, are all lost in a pale fixed expression of resolute despair.
Yes, there is Despair written on that beautiful countenance, but Revenge
glares in the deadly fire of those dark eyes. The white brow is deformed
by a hideous wrinkle, that, black and swollen, swells upward to the roots
of the hair.
Who is this woman so pale in the face, so voluptuous in the form, now
waiting alone in this silent chamber?
Her hand rests upon a letter, inscribed with the name ofBenedict
Arnold.
That sword resting on the table, with the dented edge and battered hilt,
is the sword of Quebec and Saratoga.
The blue uniform thrown carelessly over the arm of the chair, is the
costume of a Continental hero. Wherefore are sword and uniform thrown
neglectedly aside, in this luxurious room?
It is the apartment of Benedict Arnold. He does not wield that sword,
or wear that uniform any longer. He is a Traitor, and makes his home
here in the city of New York, in this spacious mansion.
The sound of a bell disturbs the silence; it tolls the hour of twelve.
The beautiful woman is still there, her bosom fluttering with those
pulses of revenge, which resemble the throbbings of love, as the lurid torch
of the assassin resembles the soft sad light of the moon.
Presently raising her dark eyes, she unfastens the gold button that rises
with each throb of her heart. She uncovers that bosom, now the home of
hideous passion. She draws forth not a love-letter, nor yet the lock of a
lover's hair, but a glittering and pointed dagger.
Grasping that dagger with her small hand, while the lines of strange
emotion are drawn more darkly over her face, she speaks in a hollow
voice:
If the plot fails, this must do the work of my love and my revenge!
Then sinking in the arm-chair, this woman overcome by her emotion,
lets the dagger fall, and bursts into tears.
O, that agony of a heart that loved so truly, hoped so madly, and then
lived to see both love and hope turned to hatred and despair, by the hand
of death!
Is this the wife of Arnold? Gaze on her dark eyes and black hair, and
remember that the hair of the wife waves in flakes of sunshine gold, that
her eyes are summer blue. Is it his Ladye-love? The thought is vain.
Say rather, as you behold the bosom torn by fiery passions, the eyes
darting
the magnetic rays of revenge, the dagger gleaming death from its keen
blade, that this lovely woman waiting alone in his most secret chamber, is
his
Executioner
!
You observe the chain, with its slender links of gold falling from the
neck, into the shadowy recess of her bosom. She raises the chain; a
miniature
is revealed; the portrait of a gallant cavalier with hazel eyes, and
locks of dark brown hair.
So young, so gallant, so brave!
The last time
he pressed my hand
the last time
his kiss melted on my lips! O, God, shall I ever forget it?
And
now
As the hideous picture broke in all its details upon her brain, she started
to her feet, grasping the dagger once more with a hand that knew no tremor.
She heard the sound of a footstep echoing from afar, through the
corridors
of the mansion. Bending her head to one side, she listened, as her
lips parted and her eyes dilated.
She then approached the window. The rope-ladder which had gained
her admittance, was still confined beneath the sash. A dark object touched
her feet; it was her velvet mantle, concealing a precious relic of the dead,
the warrior costume of one loved and lost.
She shrouds herself within that voluminous curtain. Shrouded from the
light within, and the profane gaze without by this impenetrable veil, she
loosens the fastenings of her dress, while her bosom freed from those velvet
folds, soars more tumultuously upward. Another moment, and her
woman's costume flutters from her form. You hear a sob, a sigh, a
muttered
word, and stepping from the curtain's shadow, this beautiful woman
comes once more toward the light, attired
In the silken robes of a queen?
Or, in the majesty of her own loveliness?
No! She stands before us attired as a young and gallant cavalier.
From those white shoulders descends a red coat, with wide skirts and
facings of gold. The bosom is veiled beneath a vest of finest doe-skin,
which falls in loose folds around the waist. Cambric ruffles hide the
whiteness
of the throat, while eacli elegantly moulded limb is encased in a
warrior's
boot. Those dark tresses are covered with a gay chapeau, heavy
with lace and waving with plumes.
Beautiful in her woman's costume, but most bewitching as a gallant
cavalier!
You now gaze upon the movements of the disguised woman with
deepening
interest.
She listensthe echo of that footstep grows near and near. Gazing on
the mahogony panels of the folding door, the lady sinks in the arm chair.
Her position is peculiar. The head bowed, the cheek laid on the hand,
the face averted, she awaits the approach of the Unknown, with statue-like
immovability.
As she sits there, with the light playing downward over her formthe
chapeau hiding her face in shadowtell me, what strange resemblance chills
you with an involuntary horror?
This beautiful woman resemblesO, fearfully resemblesa young and
gallant cavalier, whose hand could write poetry, paint pictures or wield a
sword, whose foot sprung as lightly toward the cannon's muzzle, as it
bounded in the dance.
But what young and gallant cavalier.
You dare not repeat his name! A sickening tragedy crowds on your
memory, as that name arises! The image of a handsome form, hidden
beneath clods of clay, the worms revelling over its brow, the taint of the
gibbet's rope about its neck!
How the heart of that woman beats, as she hears that foot!
He comes! she murmurs, still preserving that strange position
Murderer and Traitor, he comes! At the dead hour of midnight, to his
most secret chamber, he comes, to lay his plans of ambition and plot new
treasons! But here, in the silence of this room, where his guilty heart can
find no refuge from its remorse, here, placing his foot on yonder threshhold,
he will feel his blood curdle with horror, as he beholds, seated at his table,
waiting for him, the form of the murdered
John Andre
!
You will confess with me, that the revenge of this impetuous woman is
terrible.
Arnold! That sight should blast you into madness!
Nearernearer yet, the sound of that step is heard. The woman
trembles
.
There is a hand upon the doorshe hears the step on its opposite
side. Still that statue-like positionstill the endeavor to hide the anguish
of the heart, by laying one hand upon the swelling bosom.
The door opens. The disguised woman hears the footstep cross the
threshhold. Is it a warrior's footstep? Too light, two soft, too delicate!
She does not raise her head to look, but suddenly the sound of that stealthy
tread is lost in silence.
There, slightly advanced from the shadows of the threshhold, stands
the appalled form of Benedict Arnold? No!
No! Would that it were! But there, disclosed by the light, stands a
young woman, her blooming form clad in a loose robe, her unfastened hair
drooping to her uncovered shoulders.
You see her blue eyes centred on the figure by the table. At that sight
the roses wither on her cheekher bosom bounds from its slight covering.
Her uplifted arm, grasping a bed-room candle, is palziedher lips slowly
partunable to advance or retreat, she stands before you, a picture of
unutterable
anguish.
At last she gathers courage to speakto address the Phantom.
Andre speak to me! she gasps.
At that voice, the disguised woman feels her blood grow cold. Slightly
turning her face, she gazes on the woman with golden hair, between the
fingers of her right hand.
Andre! again the voice of the horror-stricken woman is heardYou
come from the grave to haunt me! SpeakO, speak to me! Could I
28
help it, if your fate was so dark and cold? Your death so hideous? Your
grave so dishonored?
The woman clad in the attire of John Andre slowly rises. She turns,
and flinging the chapean aside, confronts theWife of Arnold.
Yes, the lady-love of John Andre, confronts the wife of his Evil Genius,
Benedict Arnold.
You will remember that this Wife, when a blooming virgin, once in the
revelry of a Tournament, crowned John Andre with a chaplet of laurel and
roses, that she corresponded with him some months after her marriage,
that in her letters, the letters of Arnold to Sir Henry Clinton were
enveloped
,
thatperchancefrom her girlhood memories,perchancefrom
deeper reasonshe was dear to her heart!
Therefore, you will understand, that this meeting in the secret chamber
of Arnold, was a strangely interesting scene.
The lady-love of the Spythe Wife of the Traitor! Behold them
survey
each other. The wife sweeps back her golden tresses from her brow,
as if to gaze more clearly upon the Disguised woman. The lady-love
stands erect, in her voluptuous beauty, a mocking smile upon her lip, a
fiend-like
scorn in her dark eyes.
Virginia De * * * * *! exclaimed the Wife, breathing a name renowned
for virtue, wealth and beautyYou here! In the chamber of
I await your husband, madam! replied the strange woman, laying her
hand upon the dagger, and a deadly light blazed from her dark eyes.
At this moment a sound is heard, like the raising of a window. A shadow
steals from the curtains, approaches the light, and you behold the form of a
Soldier, clad in scarlet uniform.
He surveys the two women, and unfastening his coat, reveals the blue
and buff Continental uniform. His features are concealed by a veil of dark
crape.
Is all ready? whispered the lady disguised in the attire of Andre;
The Traitor is not yet come. But there, you behold his wife. It is well.
She shall behold his Punishment!
And as the Wife shrank back appalled, there commenced in that lonely
chamber of Arnold, a scene of wild interest.
This, you will remember, was on the night of November Second, 1780.
Andre had been captured some forty-two days before, on the
twenty-third
of September.
We will now reveal to you, a scene which took place but a few days
after his capture.
Alone in his marqu, on the heights of Tappan, sat General Washington,
his sword placed on the table, which was covered with piles of papers.
He was writing.Not often was his face disturbed by emotion, but at
27
this still hourwhile the stars came shining out above the mountains and
over the riverhis entire form was shaken by a powerful agitation.
As the light streamed upon his face, his lips were compressed, his
eye-brows
drawn downward, his eyes wet with moisture.
It was plainly to be seen, that the sense of a severe duty, to be performed
by him, was struggling with the softer feelings of his heart. Still he wrote
on. Still, combatting the writhings of his breast, he committed his thoughts
to paper.
Presently a shadow stood in the doorway of his tent.
Do you behold that form? That is one of the most renowned Knights
of the Revolution. Yes, this young man, whose slight form is clad in a
green coat, with pistols in his girdle, and a trooper's sword by his side, is
a true Knight, who loves danger as a brother, and plays with sword and
bayonet as though he thought Death itself a pastime.
His face is swarthy and freckled, his eyes, dark grey, and piercing as a
dagger's point. His frame is very slight, and yet you see in every outline
the traces of an iron will, a knightly daring.
Washington gazes upon him with pride, for that young man has played
sad tricks in his time, with the good soldiers of King George.
Sometimes, in the hour of battle, when the British thought the Rebels
altogether beaten, aye, when their legions drove the Continentals from the
field, like sheep before the wolf, this young man, would dart from the covert
of a thicket, and write his mark upon their faces. He came not alone, you
will remember. Eighty iron forms, mounted on sinewy steeds, were wont
to follow at his back, with eighty swords flashing above their heads. And
the way they came down upon the British, was beautiful to see, for each
trooper marked his man, and that mark always left a dead body beneath
the horse's hoofs.
There was not a soldier in the British army who did not know this
young man. He was so unmannerly!
They sometimes, after having plundered an American farm-house, and
murdered a few dozen farmers, would gather round a comfortable fire, for a
quiet meal. But then, the blaze of rifles would flash through the shutters,
the door would give way, and this Young Man, with his troopers, would
come in, rather rudely, and eat the meal which the British had prepared.
You may be sure that he took good care of these red coat gentlemen, before
eating their supper.
Still he was a glorious young man! You should have seen him, on
some dark night, scouring a darker road, at the head of his men, and
marching
some fifty miles without once pulling a bridle rein, so that he might
pay his regards to his dear friends, the British!
Then, how he crashed into their camp, making sweet music with his
eighty swords!
He loved the British so, that he was never happy, unless he was near
them.
Oftentimes, in the hour of battle, Washington would turn to La Fayette,
and pointing with his sword, far down the shadows of a defile, observe in a
quiet way
The
Major is yonder! Do you see him, at the head of
his men? Ah, General, it does one's heart good to see him pour down
upon the enemy, when they think he is a hundred miles away!
His men loved their captain dearly. It mattered not how dark the night,
or how tired with the previous day's toil, or how starved they were, let the
Major once whisperThere is work for us, my friends! and ere five
minutes passed, eighty horses bore eighty men on their way, while the
stars played with the blades of eighty swords.
And as the Men of that hero-band loved their captain, so the horses loved
the men,That man who does not love his horse, even as a comrade, is no
warrior.Gathered like the Men from the beautiful hills of Carolina, these
horses always seemed to know that a battle was near, and when it came
dashed with erect heads, firm front, and quivering nostrils, on the foe.
Even when the bullet or the cannon ball, pierced their smooth flanks,
these horses would crawl on while life lasted, and with their teeth tear the
horses of the enemy.
Why all these words to describe the chivalry of this hero-band?
You may compress courage, honor and glory in three words
The
Legion of Lee
!
Aye, the Legion of Lee, for it was their Captain, who now stood
uncovered
in the presence of Washington.
Major, said Washington, pointing with his right arm, through the
door of the tent. Look yonder!
The Major turned and lookednot upon the beautiful Hudson, nor the
mountainsbut upon a small stone house, which arose from the bosom of
the sward.
The Major understood the extended finger and look of Washington.In
that stone house, John Andre was a prisoner. Taken as a Spy, he would
be hung on a felon's gibbet.
Is there no way to save him? said Lee, in a voice that quivered with
emotion.
There is, said Washington, I depends upon you to save him, and
at the same time, save the honor of an American General!
Lee started with surprise.
On me? he echoed.
You behold these papers? Intercepted despatches of the enemy, which
implicate one of our bravest general's in the treason of Arnold?
Lee glanced over the papers and suffered an ejaculation of surprise to
pass his lips.
Andre has your sympathies said WashingtonSo young, so
gallant, so chivalrous, he has the hearts of all men with him. And yet
unless a certain thing can be accomplished, he must die. Not even the
death of a soldier will be awarded him, but the death of a common felon.
You can save him, Major Lee! You can rescue the name of this General
from the taint of Treason!
And thus speaking, that Deliverer Washington, turned the eloquence of
his face and eyes full upon Major Lee.
Never had the Knight of the Legion beheld his Chief so powerfully
agitated.
Lee trembled to see this great manalways so calm and impenetrable
now affected almost to tears.
General, speak the word and I will do it! exclaimed the Partizan,
sharing the emotion of Washington.
The Chief reveals his plan. Why is it, that Lee turns pale and red by
turns, knits his brows and clenches his hands, and at last falters a refusal?
But Washington will not be denied. Again with his face and voice all
eloquent, with deep emotion, he urges the enterprise.
Andre must die unless you consent. There is no hope for him! Every
one pities, every one confesses the justice of his doom! What have I
neglected, to save his life? No sooner was his capture known to me, than
I despatched a Special messenger to Congress. I asked the counsel of my
Generals. I questioned my own heart, I besought guidance from my God!
Behold the result! My Generals weep for him, but condemn. Congress
confirms that sentence. The struggle of my own soul, and my prayers to
Heaven, have one result. This young man must pay the penalty of his
crime, and die a felon's death!
Washington passed his hand over his brow, as with every feature
quivering
with emotion, he surveyed the face of Lee.
And all this you may avert! YouLeewhom I have never known
to faltermay save the life of Andre!
How could Major Lee refuse? To stand and hear Washington, with
tears in his eyes, beseech him to save the life of Andre!
General, I consent! he said, in a voice husky with emotion.
Washington
wrung his hand, with a grasp that made Lee's heart bound within
him.
The camp of Lee's Legion was pitched near the roadside, in the shadows
of a secluded dell. Their white tents were constrasted with the dark rocks
all around. The music of a brook rippled on the silence of the air. From
afar, the broad river flashed in the light of the stars.
In the centre of the encampment arose the tent of Henry Lee. The
furniture of that tent was by no means luxurious. A chest, on which a
flickering candle was placeda narrow beda military cloaka sword and
pair of pistols.
Lee was seated on the bed, with his head placed between his hands.
But a half an hour ago, he had conversed with Washington, and now, he
was to hold a similar conversation with one of the bravest men of his iron band.
There was the sound of a heavy footstep, and that man stood before him.
It must be confessed, that he looked the Soldier in every inch of his form.
Imagine a man of some twenty-four years, somewhat above the common
size, with a bronzed visage, a form full of bone and muscle, and the air of a
soldier, whom danger could only delight. He was attired in a green
trooper's coat, breeches of buckskin, and long boots of dark leather. A pair
of pistols hung from one side of his belt; a long and ponderous sword from
the other.
He stood before Lee, with his heavy steel helmet faced with fur, in his
right hand.
The Major surveyed him for a moment with a look of admiration, and
then stated the desperate enterprize in all its details.
The brave man trembled, shuddered, and grew pale, as he heard the
words of his commander. Yes, Sergeant John Champe,an iron man,
who had never known fearnow felt afraid.
No words can depict the agony of that half hour's interview.
At last, as Lee bent forward, exclaiming, Would you save the life of
Andre? Champe hurried from the tent.
From a nook among the bushes he led forth his steed. While the
helmet
,
drawn over his brows, shadowed the emotion of his swarthy visage
from the light of the rising moon, he silently flung his cloak over the back
of the horse, tied his valise to the saddle, and placed his orderly book within
the breast of his coat.
These preparations all betokened the stern composure of a mind bent
on a desperate deed.
In silence he led the horse along the sward, under the shadow of the
thicket. At last, emerging into the light, where two high rocks,
overlooking
the road, raised their brows in the beams of the moon, he placed his
hand on the saddle, and laid his face against the neck of his steed. His
emotions were dark and bitter.
The beauty of that horse's proportions was revealed in the calm, clear
light. His hue was dark as ink. A single star on the forehead varied the
midnight blackness of his hide. A small head, a sinewy body, supported
by light and elastic limbs, a long mane and waving tail, an eye that softened
as it met it's master, or glared terribly in the hour of battlesuch was the
horse of John Champe, the renowned Sergeant Major of Lee's Legion.
That horse had been given to him in 1776, by the old man, his father.
Before the door of his home, in a green valley of Loudon county, Virginia,
the white-haired patriot had bestowed this parting gift to his son.
John, I bid you good bye with a single word! When you fight, strike
with all your mightand never let this horse bear you from the foe!
And now this Son, blessed by his Patriot Father, was about to turn the
horse's head toward the British Camp, the soldier, praised by Washington
and loved by Lee, was about to turn
Deserter
!
He had never groaned in battle, but now he uttered a cry of anguish, as
he thought of that fatal word!
You have borne me many a time, old Powhatan, into the ranks of the
foe! Nownowyou must bear me to New Yorkyou must carry the
Deserter
into the enemy's camp! Comewe have many miles to travel
many dangers to dare!
This horse,known by his master as
Powhatan
after the Indian king
raised his head, and with quivering nostrils, uttered a long and piercing
neigh. He thought that he was about to bear his master to battle! What
knew he of that word of scorn
Deserter?
As Champe stood beside his steed, wrapped in deep thought, a mass of
dark clouds, that had been gathering on the mountain tops, came rolling
over the moon. From an aperture in the black mass, a parting ray of
moonlight streamed down upon the soldier and his steed.
All around was dark, yet that picture stood out from the back-ground of
rocks, in strong lightthe mounted soldier, his horse starting forward, as
he raised his hand to heaven, with the moonbeams on his writhing face!
The horse moved onward! Champe passed the boundary of the camp,
and dashed along the road. The thunder growled and the rain fell. Still
down into the shadows of the road. On the corner of a projecting rock,
stood a Patrole of Lee's band, his horse by his side. A challengeWho
goes there? No answer! The crack of a rifle!
The button is torn from the breast of his coat, yet still Champe the
Deserter dashes on.
The rain fell in large drops, sinking heavily into the roadside dust. From
afar, the thunder moaned, its sound resembling the echo of huge rocks,
precipitated
from an immense height over an inclined plane of brass.
Ere half an hour passed, Captain Carnes, a brave and somewhat
sanguinary
officer, rushed into Lee's tent, with a pale face and scowling brow.
Lee was on his couch, but not asleep.
Major, a soldier has just passed the patrole, and taken the road to the
enemy!
What? cried the Partizan, with an incredulous smileA trooper of
Lee's Legion turn Deserter? Impossible!
Not only a trooper of the Legion, cried the indignant Captain, But
John Champe, the bravest of the band!
John Champe desert? By Jove, Major, you must be dreaming! And
Lee turned himself to sleep again.
But the Captain would not be denied. Again with many an oath and
exclamation of contempt, as he named the Sergeant, he stated on his honor,
that Champe had been seen taking the route to Paulus Hook, opposite the
city of New York.
Lee heard this information with deep emotion. He could not believe that
Champe would desert. The idea was ridiculous; some mistake had
happened
;
he wished to sleep, for he was fatigued with his ride to
head-quarters
;
in fact, half an hour passed before Captain Carnes could impress the
Partizan with the fact, that one of his bravest men had gone over to the
British.
At last Lee arose, and sent for Cornet Middleton, a man of stout frame,
with a ruddy face with light brown hair. He was noted for the mildness
of his temper, while Carnes was fierce to cruelty.
Cornet, it appears that Sergeant Champe has taken the road to Paulus
Hook. Take with you twenty dragoons and pursue him. Bring him
alive his face quivered in every feature as he spokeso that he may
suffer in presence of the army! Kill him if he resists! Every nerve
of his form trembled with an emotion, the cause of which was unknown
to the bystanders
Aye, kill him if he resists, or escapes after being
taken!
Lee was now alive in every vein. So anxious was he, that the Deserter
should be taken, that he spent another half hour in giving the Cornet
directions
with regard to the pursuit.
At a few minutes past twelve, Henry Lee, standing near the door of his
tent, beheld the Cornet and his Dragoons gallop forward, their swords
glittering
in the light.
As the last man disappeared, Lee entered his tent and flung himself upon
the couch.
He passed that night like a man under sentence of death.
All the mildness of his nature turned to gall, by this flagrant act of
Treachery on the part of one so renowned as Champe, the Cornet dashed
along the road, at the head of his men. Every lip was clenched, every
brow wore a scowl. Woe! to the Deserter if he encounters these iron
men, his pursuers and executioners!
They hurried on, pausing now and then in their career, to examine the
print of hoofs, stamped in the dust of the road. The moon came out and
revealed these traces of the traitor's career. The horse-shoes of the
Legion
were impressed with a peculiar mark. The recent rain settling the
dust, left each foot-print clear and distinct. There was no doubt of success;
they were on the track of the Deserter.
Their swords clattering, the sound of their horses' hoofs echoing through
the wood, they dashed on, eager for the blood of this man, who lately
shared their mess, and fought among their bravest.
It was at the break of day that the most exciting scene took place.
Some miles to the north of the village of Bergen, arose a high hill,
commanding
a view of the road far to the south.
Cornet Middleton, riding at the head of his men, led the way up the hill;
a wild hurrah broke from his band.
Half a mile to the south, they beheld the black horse, his sides whitened
with foam; they beheld the Deserter, with his head turned over his
shoulder
.
He saw them come, he knew his doom if taken, so, digging the rowels
into the flanks of his steed, he bounded away.
It was a splendid sight to see the troopers thundering down one hill,
while Champealone, desperate, the object of their vengeanceexcited his
horse to unnatural efforts of speed, in ascending the opposite hill.
He gained the summit, looked back, uttered a hurrah in scorn, and was
gone.
On the brow of this hill, by the roadside, arose the hotel of the Three
Pidgeons.
The Cornet reined his steed in full career:
Beyond the village of Bergen, the high road crosses a bridge, which
the deserter must cross in order to reach Paulus Hook. You see this
bye-road
on your left? Sergeant Thomas, you will take four dragoons, and
gain this bridge by the short-cutconceal yourselvesand wait the
approach
of the traitorwhile we drive him into the ambush, by pursuing the
high road!
You see the veteran Thomaswhose face bears the marks of battles
fought amid the snows of Canada, under the sun of Carolinawith four
dragoons dash into the shadows of the bye-path, while the Cornet hurries
on in the high road. The capture of the deserter is now certain.
The road-side tavern is soon left behind. Cornet Middleton, his face
flushed with the fever of pursuit, his eye fired with the ardor of the chase,
points the way with his sword, speaks to his horse and at the head of his
band thunders on.
For a moment they lose sight of the chase. Hethe Deserter, the
Traitoris lost to view behind those trees, on the summit of yonder hill.
Now he bursts into light again, urging his black horse to desperate feats:
they see him bending forward, they see the noble steed dash on with the
speed of a hurled javelin, while the white foam gathers on his neck and
bathes his flanks.
On, my comrades! We must secure this villain, or be disgraced!
Only think of itone of Lee's legion a deserter! The honor of the corps
is at stake! Hahawe gain on him, we will have him, aye, before the
day is an hour older! There he is againyou see his horse is tired, he
seems about to fall! Onon my boys! Through the village of Bergen,
we will drive him toward the Bridge, and there, ho, ho! The fox is
caughtwe'll be in at the death!
The music of those rattling bridles, those clanking scabbards, those hoofs
thundering down with one sound, was very pleasant to hear. But those
compressed lips, those eyes glaring from beneath the steel frontlet of each
trooper's helm, did not indicate much mercy for the Deserter.
But a quarter of a mile in front, Champe looked over his shoulder, and
saw them come! Now is the time to try the mettle of Powhatan! Now
if you do not love the gibbet's ropemake one bold effort and secure
your neck, by gaining Paulus Hook!
Champe saw them come. His dark face assumed a ferocious expression,
his eyes shone with a wild intensity.
OnonPowhatan! he muttered, while the blood and foam streamed
down the flanks of his steed.
Like the limb of a tree, rent by the hurricane and hurled along the
darkened air, Champe dashed into the old town of Bergen, and was lost to
view, among the shadows of its rustic homes.
Close at his heels followed Middleton, marking the traces of his horse's
hoofs, winding where he had wound, turning where he had turnedwhile
the dragoons at his back, preserving a death-like silence, began to feel that
the crisis of the chase was near.
Suddenly they lose all traces of the Deserter's course. Amid these
streets and lanes he has doubled, until the foot-tracks of his horse are no
longer discernable.
Never mind, my boys! He has taken the road to Paulus Hookto
the bridge, to the bridge!
To the bridge! responded the sixteen troopers, and away they
dashed.
It was a fine old bridge of massive rocks and huge timbers, with the
waves roaring below, and forest trees all about it. The red earth of the
road was contrasted with autumn-dyed forest leaves above.
They turn the bend of the road, they behold the bridge. Yes, they
have him now, for yonder, reined in the centre of the road, are the bold
Sergeant and his comrades. Near and nearer draws Middleton and his
band.
Leaning over the neck of his steed, he shouts:
You have him, Sergeant? Yes, I knew it! He plunged blind-fold
into the trap!
The Sergeant waves his sword and shouts, but they cannot distinguish
his words.
Still on in their career, until with one sudden movement they wheel their
steeds upon the bridge.
The prisonerwhere is he? thunder sixteen voices in chorus.
He is not here. We waited for him but he came not this way
growled the old Sergeant.
With a burst of cries and oaths, the whole band wheel, and hasten back
to the village. In a moment dispersed through all the streets, they search
28
for the foot-tracks of the deserter. The villagers roused from their
slumbers
saw him passa solitary man, with despair on his face, urging his
steed with spur and bridle-reinbut cannot tell the way he has gone.
The search is tumultuous, hurried, intensely interesting. At last a
trooper's cry is heard
Here he is! I've found his track!
And ere the word has passed from his lips, another trooper points with
his sword
Yonder, look yonder! On the road to Elizabeth Town Point, he
rides! Ahhe has tricked us! Foiled in his purpose to gain Paulus
Hook, he is determined to make at once for the Bay, and take refuge
a-board the British galleys!
And there on the road to the Point, they beheld their chase. He must
gain the shore of the bay, swim to the British galleys or be taken! It is
his last hope.
But three hundred yards of beaten road, separates the pursuers and
pursued
.
Only that space of red earth, between John Champe and the
Gallows
!
Let his brave steed but miss his footing, or stumble for an instant,
and he is a doomed man.
It was terrific to see the manner in which they dashed after him, every
horse nerved to his utmost speed. As the troopers dug the rowels into the
flanks of their steeds, they drew their pistols.
John Champe felt that the crisis of his fate was near. Patting gently on
the neck of his brave horse, whispering encouragement to him in a low
tone, he looked back and felt his heart bound. His pursuers had gained
fifty yardswere rapidly nearing him!
As this fact became evident, the river, the city, and the bay broke upon
his view! A beautiful city, that thrones itself amid glorious watersa
noble river rushing from its mountain fortress, to make battle with the sea
a lordly bay, that rolls its waters from island to island, reflecting on
every wave, the blue autumnal sky, the uprising sun.
It was a beautiful sight, but John Champe had no time, no eye for
beautiful
sights just now. The only beauty that met his eye, was the vision of
the British Galleys, rising and falling upon the waves, within pistol-shot of
shore. The fresh breeze played with the British flag, and tossed it gaily
to and fro.
John beheld the galleys, the flag, and knew the moment of his fate had
come.
Let us look upon him now, as three hundred yards lie between him and
the shore, while his pursuers are within two hundred yards of his horse's
heels.
He looked back, every vein of his face swollen, his eyes starting from
the expanded lids. He counted the number of his pursuers. Twenty
men, twenty horses, twenty swords, twenty levelled pistols! He could see
the morning sun glitter on their buttonsyes, their faces convulsed with
rage, their horses with quivering nostrils, were there clearly and distinctly,
in the light of the new-risen day.
But two hundred yards between him and death!
Yield! shouted Cornet Middleton, whose white horse led the way
Yield, or you die!
Champe turned and smiled. They could see his white teeth, contrasted
with his sun-burnt face. That laugh of scorn fired their blood. Without a
shout, without an oath, they crashed along the road.
The movements of Champe were somewhat peculiar.
Even in that moment of awful suspense, he took his valise and lashed it
to his shoulders. Then, rising magnificently in his stirrups, he flung away
his scabbard, placed the sword between his teeth, and threw his arms on
high, grasping a pistol in each hand.
Now, come on! Comeand do your worst! he said in a voice,
which low-toned and deep, was yet heard, above the clatter of horse's
hoofs.
Even now I see him, yes, between the troopers and the uprising sun!
That hunted man, mounted on a steed, which black as death, moistens
the dust, with the foam, that falls in flakes from its sides, that miserable
deserter, rising erect in his stirrups, the sword between his teeth, a pistol
in each hand!
Powhatan, save your master! If I fall, may God pity my mother
my poor father! A Deserter, rushing to the shelter of the British flag!
Help! Help! I come to seek the protection of the King!
A blue smoke, wound upward from the deck of each galleya report
like thunder startled the air.
And while the decks, were crowded with spectators, while the pursuers,
thundered nearer to the shore, every pistol, emitting a volume of smoke
and flame, that lonely man on his black horse, held on his dread career.
It was a moment of fearful interest.
That same day, at four o'clock in the afternoon, a wild hurrah, disturbed
the silence of Lee's encampment.
Lee, sitting alone, his whole frame, shaken by some indefinable emotion,
heard that hurrah, and started to his feet. Rushing hurridly to the door of
his tent, he beheld a group of draggons, dismounted, surrounding a band of
mounted men, whose trappings were covered with dust.
In the midst of this band, a riderless steed, with a cloak, thrown over
the saddle, was led along, exciting the attention of every eye.
Cornet Middleton and his band had returned. That horse, was the steed
of John Champe, the gallant Powhatan.
Joy, Majorgood news! cried a trooper rushing forwardThe
troop have come back! The scoundrel's killed!
Lee was a brave man, but at that wordas the sight of the riderless
horse, met his eyea sudden faintness came over him. He grasped the
tent-pole, and grew very pale.
Killed did you say? he cried in a tone of wringing emphasis
Champe killed? My God, it cannotcannot be true!
The trooper was thunder-stricken, with astonishment, as he beheld, the
sorrow painted on the Major's face. Sorrow for a traitor, grief for the
death of adeserter!
Let us return to the chase.
It was the crisis of the Deserter's fate.
A pistol bullet, tore a button from his breast, as he reached the bank.
His pursuers were not fifty yards behind him.
As his noble horse, stood trembling on the shore, recoiling on his
haunches, while the sweat and foam, streamed down his sides, Champe
turned his head to his pursuersbeheld them come onsaw their pistols
levelled once moreand in a moment was wrapt in a cloud of smoke.
When that cloud cleared away, a riderless horse, dashed wildly along the
bank. Is he killed? The eyes of the British on the galley-decks, the
glances of the troopers, who scatter along the shore, all search for the corse
of the traitor.
From the shore, for fifty yards or more, extends a dreary march of reeds.
You see their tops wave, as though a serpent was trailing its way over the
oozy mud, you see a head upraised, and then the sound of a heavy body,
falling into the water is heard.
Look once again, and look beyond the marsh, and see that head, rising
above the waves, those arms dashing the spray on either side.
It is John Champe, swimming with sword in his teeth, towards the
nearest galley.
Middleton and his troopers, gaze upon him, from the bank, in dismay,
while the Commander of the galley, surrounded by sailors and soldiers,
encourages the deserter with shouts.
An old trooper of the Legion kneels. He carries a riflea delicate
piece, with stock mounted in silverat his back, suspended by a leather
strap. He unslings it, examines the lock, takes the aim. Old Holford,
has been in the Indian wars; he can snuff a candle at a hundred yards.
Therefore you may imagine, the deep interest, with which the other
troopers
regarded him, as raising the rifle, he levelled it, at the head, appearing
above the waters.
John Champe may look his last upon God's beautiful sky!
Yes, as the sword in his teeth, gleams in the sun, Old Holford fires. At
the same instant a heavy volume of smoke and flame, rolls from the
galleys; certain missiles make an unpleasant hissing over the trooper's
heads.
When the smoke rolls away, the troopers look for the corse of the
doomed man, writhing its last, ere it sinks forever.
But the Commander of the Galley, reaching forth his arm, grasps the
hand of John Champewhose cheek bleeds from the touch of a bullet
and assists him to reach the deck.
The sword still between his teeth, his cheek slightly bleeding, his
uniform
dripping with spray. John Champe, with a pistol in each hand,
gazes calmly over the waters. After that composed look he hails his late
comrades with these words.
Good bye my boys! Take care of Powhatan and d'ye hear? Present
my respects to Washington and Lee!
From a multitude of expressions, uttered by the troopers on the bank,
we select a single one, which fell from the lips of old Holford:
I'm a scoundrel, he said, doggedly, slinging his rifleYou're a
scoundrelto a comradeand you, and you, and you! There's
nobody
honest in the world after to day. We're all scoundrels. I dont trust
myself. Do you axe why? Yesterday, the best of our Legion, and the
bravest was John Champe. To daylook yonder, and see, John Champe
aboard a British galley! Why I would not trust my own father, after that!
In silence the band, returned their steps to camp, leading the riderless
steed by the bridle rein. Lee, soon, discovered the falsity of the
rumor, which announced the Deserter's death. Cornet Middleton, with
his handsome face, covered with chagrin, told the whole story, and in terms
of sincere anguish, regretted, that he had not pistolled the Deserter, and
cursed the hour when he escaped.
To the utter confusion of the good cornet, Major Henry Lee, burst into
a roar of laughter.
He took horse, without delay, and riding to head quarters told the story
to the Chieftain, who heard it, with a countenance, beaming with smiles.
Though Champe has basely deserted the cause of freedom, his future
history, is fraught with interest.
Behold him, standing before Sir Henry Clinton, who delighted to receive
a deserter from the famed corps of Lee, questions him, with an almost
ridiculous
minuteness. Yet, the rough soldier, answers all Sir Henry's
questions, and satisfies him, on various important points. The army were
tired of Washington. Other Generals were preparing to follow the example
of Arnold. Neither discipline, nor patriotism could keep the Mob of
Mister
Washington together much longer. The good Sir Henry, was
delighted with the information, and laughed till his fat sides shook, and
gave John Champe three golden guineas.
The fourth day, after the desertion, Lee received a letter, by the hands
of a secret messenger, signed,
John Champe
. What did the recreant desire?
A pardon, perchance?
On the 30th of September, Champe, was appointed one of Arnold's
recruiting
sergeants. The traitor Sergeant and the traitor General, were thus
brought together. That scarlet costume, which they had so often rent and
hacked in battle, was now their uniform.
Every day, or so, a secret messenger, in New York, forwarded to Lee,
certain letters, signed by Champe. Perhaps, he repented of his treason?
Or, did he wish to impart information, that might prove the ruin of
Washington
?
What was the Deserter's object?
Behold him now, an efficient soldier of Arnold's American Legion,
dressed in a red uniform, and doing the work of a Briton. Did he never
think of the old man, even his father, who had bestowed upon him, the
noble horse, Powhatan?
At this time, there was not a home on New York, but morning, noon
and night, rung with the name of
John Andre
.
Would Washington dare to execute him? Had Sir Henry Clinton
spared one exertion to save the life of his favorite? What would be
Arnold's
course, in case Andre was put to death as a spy?
These questions were often asked, often answered; but on the evening
of the Second of October, a rumor came to town, which filled every heart
with joy.
Andre was to be set free
.
At midnight, on the Third of October, a brilliant company thronged the
lighted halls of an Aristocrat, who was pledged to the cause of Our Blessed
King.
The soft light of the chandeliers streamed over the half-bared bosoms of
some two hundred beautiful women. Their forms fluttering in silks and
laces, their necks circled by pearls and jewels, these beautiful dames went
bounding in the dance. And the same light that revealed the lovely women,
and disclosed the statues, pictures, hangings and ornaments of those brilliant
saloons, also shone over groups of British officers, young and old, who
mingled with the fair Americans, or stood in the deep-framed windows,
talking in low, earnest tones of the fate of John Andre.
On a luxurious divan, cushioned with dark crimson velvet, with a statue
of the good King George forming the centre, Sir Henry Clinton reclined,
surrounded by a crowd of officers, mingled with beautiful women.
Among those women, there was only one who did not wear the tall
head-gear, in fashion at that time; a sort of tower, that ladies had agreed
to carry on their brows, as an elephant carries a castle on his back.
She stood apart, while in front of her chattered a bevy of beauties, whose
cheeks, rendered surpassingly white by the contrast of patches, were
relieved
by their intricately arranged hair.
Her dark locks gathered plainly back from her brow, fell behind the
small ears in glossy tresses. The other ladies were clad with a profusion
of silks, laces, pearls, jewels. She, so strange in the majestic loveliness
of her dark eyes, so melting in the warm ripeness of her lips, in the
voluptuous
fullness of the bosom, stands alone, clad in a white dress that
eminently
becomes the beauty of her commanding person.
This is the Heiress of the Aristocrat who gives the festival to-night.
Do you see her eyes flash, her bosom heave, as those ladies converse
with Sir Henry Clinton?
Do you think indeed, Sir Henry, lisps a fair haired beauty, that
Major Andre will be set free by that odious Washington?
I have no doubt that we will be able to snatch him from the ogre's
grasp, replies Sir Henry, with a smile, But to speak seriously, the
intelligence
received last night, sets my mind at rest. Andre will be with us in
a day or so!
A murmur of satisfaction thrills through the group.
The Heiress feels her heart bound more freely: glancing towards a large
mirror she beholds the roses blooming once more upon her cheek.
Andre will be free in a day or so! she murmurs, and suffers a gallant
officer to lead her forward in the dance.
Presently the wide floorchalked like the mazes of a puzzling garden,
is thronged with dancers. Such a fluttering of pretty feet over the boards,
that bound as they seem to feel the value of that beauty which they sustain!
Such a glancing of fair necks and white arms in the light. Music too,
filling
the air, and making heart and feet and eyes, go leaping together.
The floor is crowded with dancers; Sir Henry Clinton smiles with
delight
as he surveys the beautiful prospect.
And among all the dangers, that ONE, with the dark hair and brilliant
eyes, and voluptuous form, clad in white, most attracts the eye of Sir
Henry, for John Andre had kissed her hand, his arm has encircled her
waist, his lips felt the magic of her rosy mouth.
Presently an officer is seen treading his way through the mazes of the
dance. Strange to say, he is not clad in ball costume. He appears in boots
spattered with mud, while his hard-featured face seeks the form of Sir
Henry with earnest eyes. He comes through the dancers and whispers to
Sir Henry Clinton, who says never a word, but hides his face in his
hands.
I cannot tell how it was, but assuredly, the presence of that officer, with
the hard-featured face and spattered boots, spread a chill through the room.
One by one the couples left the dance: a circle, gradually deepening
was formed around Sir Henry: at last, the Heiress and her partner were
left alone in the centre of the room, pacing a solemn minuet, while her eyes
and cheeks and lips smiled in chorus. She was entirely happy: for she
conversed with her partner about John Andre.
Presently she observed the circle gathered about the British General.
She turned her gaze and beheld every feature clouded in sorrow. She heard
no more the light laugh, nor the careless repartee. All was silent around
the divan, from whose centre arose the statue of the King.
The Heiress turned to ask the cause of this strange gloom, which had so
suddenly possessed the place, when a little girl, not more than six years
old, came running to her, spreading forth her tiny hands, and in one breath
she called the beautiful woman by name, and
Spoke a fatal truth, that had just broken on her ears.
John Andre was dead. He had been hung that day, about the hour
of noon
.
The shriek that thrilled through that lighted hall, stopped every heart in
its throbbings.
One shriek, and one only: the Heiress fell, her hair showering about her
as she lay senseless on the floor.
So you may have seen a blossoming tree, which has long swayed to and
fro beneath the blast, suddenly tower erect, each leaf quivering gently, and
thentorn up by the rootsprecipitate itself in ruins on the ground.
At the same hour, Benedict Arnold was writing in his most secret
chamber
,
while his brother-traitor, John Champe, waited near his chair.
The shaded lamp spread a circle over Arnold's face and hand, while all
around was twilight. Champe stood in the shadow behind the back of
Arnold, his dark visage working with a peculiar expression.
Arnold was just writing these words, when the door opened
`
If this warning shall be disregarded, and he suffer, I call Heaven
and earth to witness, that your Excellency will be justly
anwerable
for the torrent of blood that may be spilt in consequence
.'
Let them put Andre to death, if they dare! Thus I wrote to
Washington
yesterday, and now I write it again, so that my soul may never forget
these words! If Andre perishes
As Arnold spoke, the door opened and a Soldier entered the room
General, Major Andre was put to death at noon to-day!
Arnold gazed in the face of the Soldier, with a look of vacant
astonishment
.
You spoke, I believe? The next time you intrude upon my privacy,
I will thank you to use a little more formality!
Excuse me, General, but this news has set us all a kind o' topsy-turvy!
News? What news?
Major Andre was hung to-day at noon.
Arnold did not speak for five minutes. For that space of time, he sat in
the chair, with his eyes fixed on the paper, but in truth he saw nothing. A
hazy vapor swam before his sight, the sound of bells was in his ears. When
he saw clearly again, the stupified soldier stood in the doorway, gazing upon
the general in awe, for the agitation of that iron face was horrible to behold.
How did he die? His voice was hoarse; he spoke with a great effort.
By the rope,at noonWashington wouldn't allow him to be shot.
As the Traitor turned he beheld Champe, seated on a military chest, his
frame writhing in agony, while his swarthy face was bathed in tears.
I thought you were a mana soldier! Why, you weep like a child
Arnold spoke in scorn, but took good care to keep his own eyes from the light.
Andre was all that Champe could gasp.
Arnold paced the room, now folding his arms, now clenching his hands,
now uttering in a low voice, horrible blasphemies.
Champe he said, abruptly pausing, as his distorted countenance
glowed in the lightThey have known me in the Wildernessyes, at
Quebecat Saratoga; my sword has been tried, and it has crimsoned its
blade in victory! Nowby he muttered a horrible oath, they shall
know that sword once more, know it as the instrument of vengeanceaye,
they shall know it as the Avenger of John Andre!
Terrified, as though he beheld a fiend instead of a man, Champe slowly
rose to his feet.
By the light of their desolate homes, I will offer victims to the ghost
of Andre! Take care, Washington! Your towns will blaze! Take
carethe Traitor Arnold will stand amid heaps of dead bodies, shouting as
he plunges his sword into your soldiers' hearts, This and This for John
Andre! TraitorI accept the nameI will wear it! From his hour,
every tie that bound me to this soil, is torn from my heart! From this
hour, in camp and councilby my wrongs, by the death of Andre I swear
itI stand the Destroyer of my native land!
He turned to Champe, who shrank back from the blaze of his maddened
eyes.
You loved Andre? Then join swords, and swear with me to avenge
his death! Swear to have vengeance upon his Murderer!
I swear to have vengeance upon the Murderer of John Andre! said
Champe, with a meaning emphasis.
Arnold stood erect, one hand laid upon his sword, while the other
uplifted
in the awful formality of an oath, attested the deep sincerity of his
resolve.
This was on the night of October Third, 1780.
In the space of time between this night, and midnight of November
Second
,
the current of John Champe's life flowed smoothly on, scarcely
marked by the ripple of an event.
It was however observable, that in the intervals of his time, he was wont
to visit the secret messenger, who had conveyed his previous letters to Lee.
On the 19th of October, he despatched another message to his former
Commander. Still his object is shrouded in mystery. What mean these
communications sent by a Deserter from the cause of freedom, to a
renowned
Champion of that cause?
One, whose years are scarce beyond girlhood, stands as if paralyzed; her
uplifted hand grasping a taper, while the light reveals her form, attired in a
white robe whose loose folds disclose her bosomso pure and stainless
her small feet and bared arms.
The hair which falls along her cheeks and over her neck and breast, in
hue resembles the first mild sunshine of a summer's day.
The other, rising in queenly stature, her formmore round, more
voluptuous
,
more commanding in its outlinesattired in the scarlet coat of a
British officer, with cambric ruffles fluttering over the virgin breast, military
boots enveloping the finely formed foot and limb. Her hair showers to her
shoulders, in dark masses. Her facewhose faint olive tint deepens on
the warm lips and rounded cheek into bright vermillionis marked with
the lines of conflicting passions.
Her full dark eye pours its light upon the clear blue eye of the woman,
who shrinks back from her gaze.
You here! In the chamber of my husband! faltered the WifeIn
this guise, too
Here, in the dress of John Andre! Here to welcome Benedict Arnold,
in the garb of his victim! Here, to award justice to the Double Traitor!
The strange lady folded her arms, as if to still the throbbings of her
breast. The Wife stood like one fascinated by a serpent's gaze.
Do you remember the days of your girlhood, Madam, when the
threshhold
of your home was crossed by a young soldier, who won all hearts by
his knightly bearing? Do you remember him so young, so brave? His
heart warmed with all that is noble in man, the light of genius flashing
from his hazel eye?
O, do notdo not speak of these memories gasped the wife of
Arnold.
But I will speak, and you must hear! was the reply of the proud
maiden, with the dark eye and scornful lipsYou
do
remember him?
Every body loved him. You can witness that! For you saw him in his
young manhoodyou surrendered your waist to his arm in the danceyou
heard that voice, which was at once Music and Poetry! O, do you
remember
it all?
The wife stood like a figure of marble, her blue eyes dilating, her lips
parting in an expression of speechless horror.
Where now is this gallant soldier? Where now the Hero, whose
sword flashed so fearlessly in the hour of battle?Wife of Arnold, ask
your heartnay, go to the river shore, and ask the sod of that lonely grave!
Yes, the hand that pressed yours in the dance, is now the food of the
grave-worm! The eye that gleamed so brightly, when your hand dropped
the crown of roses and laurel on the plumed brow, is dark forever!
The Wife of Arnold sank on her knees.
Spare me! she cried, lifting her ashy face toward that beautiful
woman
,
clad in the dress of John AndreDo not rend my heart with these
words
How died he, the young, the gifted, the brave?You see that eye
dart an almost demoniac firePerchance in battle at the head of legions,
his good steed beneath him, his true sword in hand? Yes, charging into
the thickest of the fight, he fell, his last smile glowing in the sunshine of
victory! Or, maybe he perished in some midnight massacre, perished in
the act of an heroic defence? Nonono! There was no sword in his
hand when he died. He diedO, does it wring your heartwith the rope
about his neck, the vacant air beneath his feet. Beguiled into the lines of
an enemy by a Traitor, he diednot even by bullet or axebut quivering
on a gibbet, like a common felon!
How like the voice of an Accusing Angel, sent on earth to punish guilt,
the tones of that dark-haired woman rung through the chamber!
Could I help it? faltered the beautiful Wife of Arnold, her face now
deathly paleDid I hurry him to this fatal death? Wherefore wring my
heart with these memories? Have you no mercy?
Mercy! sneered the disguised maidenMercy for the Wife of
Benedict
Arnold, who after her marriage suffered her letters to John Andre, to
enclose the letters of the Traitor to Sir Henry Clinton! Ah, droop your
head upon your bosom, and bury your face in your handsit is true!
Had you no share in that dark game? Did you advise Benedict Arnold to
make John Andre the tool of his Treason? O, if in your heart there ever
lurked one throb of love for this noble soldier, how could you see him led
on to infamy?
That proud virgin, transformed by her dress into a living portrait of John
Andre, by her passions into an avenging spirit, was now bitterly avenged.
For the wife of Arnold knelt before her, her face upon her breast, her
golden hair floating to the knees, which crouched upon the floor. And the
light revealed the shape of her beautiful shoulders, a glimpse of her
tumultuous bosom.
You ask why I am here? I, a maiden whose good name no breath
has ever dimmed, here in the chamber of Arnold?I am here, because I
am a woman, because that love which can never be given twice to man,
now lies buried with the dead,here to avenge the murder of that brave
soldier, who ere he started on his horrible journey, pressed his kiss upon
my lips, and told me, he would return on the morrow!
How sobbed the kneeling womanHow will you avenge his
death? You cannot reach Washington?
But Washington can reach Arnold!her voice sinks to a whisper, as
she repeats these meaning words. A shudder thrilled the kneeling woman.
Yes, as Andre died, so Arnold shall dieon the gibbet! Aye, raise
your face and gaze on me in wonder. I speak the solemn truth. From
this chamber, bound and dumb, Arnold shall be led this night. In the dark
street trusty men are waiting for him, even now. That street leads to the
rivera boat is ready for the traitor, there. On the opposite shore, certain
brave Americans under the gallant Lee, watch for the coming of the Traitor!
Ha, ha! Washington will not sleep to-nighthe expects a strange visitor,
Benedict Arnold!
As though all life had fled from her veins, the Wife of Arnold glared in
the face of the dark-haired woman. The words of the strange maiden,
seemed for the moment to deprive her of all power of speech.
It is not so much for myself that I strike this blow! But the Mother
of Andrethose innocent sisters who await his return Homethey are
before me nowthey speak to methey call for vengeance on the Double
Traitor!
As she spoke, the Soldier with crape about his face advanced a single step,
his chest heaving with emotion.
You cannot do this. Deliberately consign to an ignominious death, my
husband, who never wronged you?The Wife raised her eyes to the face
of the dark-haired lady, while the fingers of her small hands were locked
together.
But there is no mercy in that determined face; not one gleam of pity in
those brilliant eyes.
As I stand attired in the garb of Andre, so surely will I take vengeance
on his murderer!
The Wife of Arnold made no reply. Bowing her face low upon her
bosom, with her loosened robe slowly falling from her shoulders, she
crouched on the floor, her luxuriant hair twining about her uncovered arms.
The dark-haired woman beheld her agony, heard the sobs which
convulsed
her form, aye, heard the groan which the Soldier uttered as he
witnessed
this strange scene, yet still she stood erect, her unrelenting eye fixed
in a steady gaze, upon her victim's form.
If the plot fails, this dagger will do the work of my revenge!
The word has not gone from her lips, when the Soldier approaches
whispersyou see the determined woman startchange color and sink
helplessly into the chair.
Does the fiend protect him? she gasps, in a voice utterly changed
from her tone of triumphant resolve.
Yesthis very night, he sails for the coast of Virginia, the Soldier
whispersThis night, selected for our purpose, has by some strange
chance, torn him from our grasp. Already on ship-board, he plans the
destruction of American towns, the murder of American freemen!
You see the Wife of Arnold start to her feet, her blue eye gleaming,
while with her upraised arm she dashes back from her face those locks of
golden hair.
He is saved! Thank heaven your schemes are foiled. The angels
need not weep, to behold another scene of murder!
For she loved him, her Warrior-husband, that Wife of Arnold; and now,
with her entire frame quivering with a joy which was more intense, from
the re-action of her despair, she beheld the schemes of her enemies crushed
in a moment.
The angels need not weep to behold another scene of murder? spoke
the deep voice of the Soldier, who stood with his face veiled in crape;
And yet the Bandit and Traitor, who betrayed Washington, and left
Andre to perish on the gibbet, is now unloosed like a savage beast, on the
homes of Virginia!
The tone in which he spoke, rung with the hollow intonation of scorn.
Who are you? Attired in the garb of a British soldier, with a rebel
coat beneath?
Even that Wife, felt a throb of pity as she heard the sad voice of this
unknown soldier.
I have no name! I had oncewas once a brave soldierso they said.
But now, the Americans never speak of me, but to curse my name, in the
same breath with Arnold!
He slowly retired toward the window: standing among the heavy
curtains
,
he beheld the conclusion of this dark scene.
The woman attired in the dress of Andre slowly rose. The Wife shrank
back appalled, from the settled frenzy of her face, the sublime despair
stamped upon her features and flashing from her eyes.
It is well! Arnold escapes the hand of vengeance now. Now, flushed
with triumph, he goes on to complete his career of blood. He will gather
goldrenown, aye, favor from the hands of his King. But in the hour of
his proudest triumph, even when he stands beside the Throne, one form,
invisible to all other eyes, will glide through the thronging courtiers, and
wither him, with its pale face, its white neck polluted by the gibbet's rope,
its livid lip trembling with a muttered cursethe Phantom of John Andre!
That Phantom will poison his life, haunt him in the street, set by him at
the tableyes, follow him to the couch! As he presses his wife to his
lips, that pale face will glide between, muttering still that soundless curse.
To escape this Phantom, he will hurry from place to place! Now in
the snows of Canada, now amid the palm groves of the Southern Isles, now
on ship-board, now on shorestill John Andre's ghost will silently glide
by his side.
That Phantom will work for him, a Remorse more terrible than
madness
!
It will glide into men's hearts, enrage their souls against the Traitor,
teach their lip the mocking word, their finger the quivering gesture of scorn.
As the Traitor goes to receive his Royal Master's reward, he will hear a
thousand tongues whisper, Traitor! Traitor! Traitor! He will turn to
crush the authors of the scornturn and find, that the sword which may
hew a path through dead men, cannot combat the calm contempt of a
World!
Scorned by the men who bought himhis children and his wife all
swept awayhe will stand a lonely column on a blasted desert. He will
be known as the
Traitor Arnold
. As the General who sold immortal
glory for twenty thousand guineas. As the Traitor who left John Andre to
perish on the gibbet. As the
Man
WHO HAS NOT ONE FRIEND IN THE
WORLD.
And when he dies; behold the scene! No wife, no child! Not even
a dog to howl above his grave!
Yes, when he dieswhile the Phantom of Andre glides to his sideno
hand of friend or foe shall be placed upon his brow, no one shall wait by
his couch, no voice speak to him of Heaven or Hope, but in the utter
desolation
of a Blighted heart and a Doomed Name, shall depart the soul of the
Traitor, Benedict Arnold!
The scene of War was changed. The South was given up to the torch
and sword.
In Virginia, Cornwallis superintended the murders of the British, and
won his title, the Amiable, by a series of bloody outrages. Arnold, the
Traitor was there also, heading his band of Assassins. In the Carolinas
Lord Rawdon, that noble gentleman, who hung an innocent man in the
presence of a son, in order to terrify the Rebels, carried the Red Flag of
England at the head of a mingled crowd of Tories and Hirelings.
It was on the day when the glorious Nathaniel Greene, passed the
Congaree
in pursuit of Lord Rawdon, that the Legion of Lee pitched their tents
for the night, where the trees of a magnificent wood encircled a refreshing
glade of greenest moss.
Through the intervals of those treescrowning the summit of a high
hillmany a glimpse was obtained of the wide-spreading country, with
arms gleaming from the trees, and the Congaree, winding in light until it
was lost in the far distance.
The soldiers of the Legion were scattered along the glade, with the tops
of their tents glowing in the warm light of the evening sun. You may see
their horses turned loose on the green sward, while the brave men prepare
their evening meal, and the sentinels pace the hillside, beyond these trees.
In front of the central tent, seated on a camp stool, his elbow on his
knee, his swarthy cheek resting in the palm of his hand, you behold the
brave Lee, his helmet thrown aside, his green coat unfastened at the throat.
That sudden gush of sunlight, falling over his swarthy face, reveals the
traces of strong emotion. Yes, Lee is sad, although they have gained a
victory, sad, although he has been rewarded with the rank of Lieutenant
Colonel, sad, although his men love him like a brother, and would give their
lives to him.
Suddenly a wild murmur was heard, and two dragoons are seen
advancing
with a prisoner, led between their steeds. As they ride toward
Colonel
Lee, the entire Legion come running to the scene: on every side, you
behold men starting up from an untasted meal, and hurrying toward the
tent of their leader.
A miserable prisoner!
Every eye beholds him. Pale, hollow-eyed, his flesh torn by briars, his
form worn by famine, and clad in wretched rags, he is led forward. All
at once, the murmur swells into a shout, and then a thousand curses rend
the air.
Colonel the discordant cries mingled in chorusBehold him!
The next tree, a short prayer, and a strong cord for the traitor! Colonel
here is our deserterthe Sergeant Major! It is Champe!
Utterly absorbed in his thoughts, Lee had not observed the approach of
the dragoons. His eyes fixed upon the ground, he grasped his cheek in
the effort to endure his bitter thoughts. Yet at the word Champe!
spoken with curses, he raised his head and sprang to his feet.
Where? he cried; his whole manner changing with the rapidity of
lightning. His eyes encountered the strange hollow gaze of the Prisoner,
who stood silent and miserable, amid the crowd of angry faces.
To the next tree with the traitor! Ah, scoundrel, you would disgrace
the Legion, would you! Champe the Deserter!
The uproar grew tumultuous; it seemed as though the brave soldiers
were about to transgress the bounds of discipline, and take the law in their
own hands.
Lee gazed steadfastly upon the prisoner, who pale and emaciated,
returned
his look. Then, starting forward, his face betraying deep emotion,
he exclaimed:
Is this indeed John Champe?He was so wretchedly changed.
The silence of the poor wretch gave assent, while the dragoon stated that
they had taken him prisoner, as he was making his way toward the camp.
Lee manifested his opinion of the recreant and deserter, by an expressive
action and a few decided words. Suddenly that group of soldiers became
as silent as a baby's slumber.
The action! He took Champe by the hand, and wrung it, while the
tears came to his eyes. The words:
Welcome back to the Legion, brave and honest man
!
Those iron Legionists stood horror-stricken and dumb, while the reply
of the prisoner increased their dismay:
Colonel, I am back at last! he said, returning the pressure of Lee's
hand, and while the large tears streamed down his face, he whispered with
the Colonel.
My comrades, exclaimed Lee, as he took Champe by the hand and
surveyed the confounded crowdThere was a time when General
Washington
appealed to the Commander of a body of brave men, and asked him,
whether in his corps there could be found
one
man, willing to dare dishonor
and death, in the cause of Humanity and Justice! He wished to save John
Andre by taking Benedict Arnold prisoner. In order to accomplish this, it
would be necessary to find a man who would desert to the enemydesert,
pursued by his indignant comrades, desert in the sight of the British, and
take refuge in their ranks. This man was found. After a bitter struggle,
for he could not make up his mind to endure his comrades scornhe
deserted
,
and barely escaped with his life. Once in New York, he enlisted
in the Legion of Arnold. While he was making his preparations for the
capture of the Traitor, Andre was hung. This wrung the Deserter to the
heart, for his great reason for undertaking this work was the salvation of
Andre's life. One object remainedthe capture of Arnold. After the lapse
of a month, everything was arranged. You remember the night when a
detachment of our Legion watched until day, in the shades of Hoboken?
The traitor was to be seized in his garden, tied and gagged, hurried to the
boat, then across the river into our clutches. But we waited in vain, the
plot was foiled! That night Arnold went on ship-board, and with him the
Deserter, who, taken to Virginia, left the British at the first opportunity,
and after weeks of wandering and starvation, returned to his comrades.
What think ye of this Deserter? This Hero, who dared what the soldier
fears more than a thousand deathsthe
dishonor of desertion
in order
to save the life of John Andre? In short, my comrades, what think you
of this brave and good man,
John Champe
!
No sound was heard. At least an hundred forms stood paralyzed and
motionless; at least, an hundred hearts beat high with emotions, as strange
as they were indefinable. Not an eye but was wet with tears. When
iron men like these shed tears, there is something in it.
At last, advancing one by one, they took Champe by the hand, and
without
a word, gave him a brother's silent grasp. There was one old war-dog,
terribly battered with cuts and scars, who came slowly forward, and looked
him in the face, and took both hands in his own, exclaiming, in his rough
way, as he quivered between tears and laughter
Have n't you got another
hand, John?
It was the Veteran, who from the shore of Manhattan Bay, had taken
aim at the head of the deserter Champe.
This moment, said Champe, his voice husky with suffocating emotion,
This moment pays me for all I've suffered!
Never in the course of the Revolution, did the sun go down upon a scene
so beautiful!
The trees encircling the sward, with the horses of the legion tied among
their leaves. The scattered tents, and the deserted fires. The prospect
of the distant country, seen between the trees, all shadow and gold. The
tent of Lee, surrounded by that crowd of brave men, every eye centred
upon that ragged form, with the hollow cheek and sunken eyes.
30
Lee himself, gazing with undisguised emotion upon that face, now
reddened
by the sunset glow, the visage of John Champe, the Deserter.
Nothing was wanting to complete the joy of the heroyes, there was
one form absent. But, hark! A crash in yonder thicket, a dark horse
bounds along the sod, and neighing wildly, lays his neck against his master's
breast.
It was
Powhatan
.
You may imagine the scene which took place, when Champe mounted
on Powhatan, rode to meet Washington!
After many years had passed, when Washington was called from the
shades of Mount Vernon, to defend his country once again, he sent a
Captain's
commission to Lee, with the request that he would seek out Champe,
and present it to him.
The letter received by the American Chief, in answer, contained these
words:
`
Soon after the war, the gallant soldier removed to Kentucky. There
he died. Though no monument towers above his boneswe do not even
know his resting placeevery true soldier must confess, that the history
of the Revolution does not record a nobler name than
John Champe
.
XVIII.THE TEMPTATION OF SIR HENRY CLINTON.
One
more scene from the sad drama of Andre's fate!
On a calm autumnal eveningthe last day of September, 1780Sir
Henry Clinton sat in his luxurious chamber, in the city of New York,
pondering over matters of deep interest.
The wine stood untasted in the goblet by his side, as reposing in the
arm-chair, by yonder window, with his hands joined across his chest, he
fixed his eye vacantly upon the rich carpet beneath his feet.
There was every display of luxury in that chamber. High ceiling and
lofty walls, hung with pictures, carpets on the floor that gave no echo to
the footfall, furniture of dark mahogany polished like a mirror, silken
curtains along the windows, and a statue of his Majesty, George the
Third, in the background.
The view which stretched before that window was magnificent. The
wide expanse of Manhattan Bay, dotted with islands, and white with the
sails of ships of warthe distant shore of Staten Island and Jerseythe
clear skypiled up in the west, with heavy clouds, tinged and mellowed
with all the glories of an autumnal sunset; this was a lovely view, but Sir
Henry Clinton saw it not.
His thoughts were with a letter which lay half open beside the untasted
goblet of rich old wine, and that letter bore the signature of George
Washington.
Now, as some persons are always forming wrong ideas of the personal
appearance of great men, I ask you to look closely upon the face and form
of yonder General. His form is short, and heavy almost to corpulence;
his face round, full and good-humored; his red coat glittering with
epaulettes
,
thrown open in front, disclosed the buff vest, with ample skirts, and
the snowy whiteness of his cambric bosom, across whose delicate ruffles
his hands were folded. He wore polished boots reaching above the knee,
where his large limb was cased in buckskin. His sword lay on the table
by his side, near the letter and goblet.
Sir Henry had been sitting in this position for an hour, thinking over the
ONE TOPIC that occupied his whole soul; but strange it was, which ever
way he tried to turn his thoughts, he still saw the same picture. It was
the picture of a wan-faced mother, who sat in her lonely room, with a fair
daughter on either side, all waiting for the son and brother to come home
and he
Sir Henry dared not finish the picture. He was
afraid
when he thought
of it. And yet the Picture had been there before him, for an hourthere,
on the space between his eye and the western sky.
Suddenly his reverie was interrupted by the low tread of a footstep.
Sir Henry looked up, and beheld a man of harsh features, arrayed in a
Colonel's uniform.
The Colonel was a singular character. Harsh in features, with a
bronzed skin, long nose, thin lipshis character was moody, reserved and
misanthropic. He was attached to the General's staff, and yet he had no
associates. He never spoke except in monosyllables. Sir Henry had a
high regard for his military knowledge, as well as an admiration for his
blunt, soldierly bearing; so he spoke to him kindly, and invited him to be
seated.
The Colonel sat down in the opposite recess of the broad window, with
his back to the light.
So, John Andre is to be
hung?
uttered the Colonel, in a quiet,
unconcerned
tone.
Sir Henry moved nervously in his seat.
Whywhythe fact is, said he, hesitatingly, this letter from
Washington states that he has been tried as a spy, and will be hanged
tomorrow
morning as a spy.
A shade of gloom passed over Sir Henry's face. He bit his lip, and
pressed his hand violently against his forehead.
Very unpleasant, said the Colonel, carelessly. Hanged! Did you
say so, General? And he had such a white neckheigh-ho!
Sir Henry looked at the Colonel as though he could have stabbed him to
the heart. He said nothing, however, but crumpled Washington's letter in
his hand. He knew one trait of the Colonel; when he appeared most
careless and unconcerned, he was most serious.
So, they 'll take him out in a horrid old cart, said he, languidlya
cart that 'll go jolt! jolt! jolt! With a hideous hangman, tooand a pine
boxfaugh! I say, General, who would have guessed it, this time last
week?
Sir Harry said not a word.
Will it not be unpleasant, when your Excellency returns home? To
wait upon the Major's mother and sisters, and tell them, when they ask
you where he is, that he was
hung!
Sir Henry Clinton grew purple in the face. He was seized with deadly
anger. Rising in his seat, he extended his hand toward the Colonel
Zounds! sir, what do you mean? The man who can make a jest of
a matter like this, has no sympathy
For the General who will calmly consign one of his bravest officers to
the gallows! interrupted the sardonic Colonel.
Sir Henry now grew pale; the audacity of his inferior awed him.
Do you mean to say, that I consign John Andre to the gallows? he
said, in a low voice, that quivered with suppressed rage.
I do! coolly responded the Colonel.
Will you be pleased to inform me in what manner I am guilty in your
eyes? continued the General, in the same ominous tone.
You can save John Andre, but will not!
How can I save him?
This Rebel Washington does not so much care about hanging Andre,
as he does for making an example ofsomebody. You give up that
somebody
and he will deliver Andre, safe and sound, into your hands.
Had a thunderbolt splintered the floor at Sir Henry's feet, his face could
not have displayed such a conflict of wonder and alarm as it did now. He
looked anxiously around the room, as though he feared the presence of a
third person, who might overhear the deliberate expression of the Colonel.
ThatSOMEBODYI met just now in Broadway. What a splendid red
coat he wears! How well it becomes him, too! Don't you think he feels
a little odd?
Sir Henry rose from his seat, and paced hurriedly up and down the
room. Now he was gone into shadows, and now he came forth into light
again.
At last he approached the Colonel, and bending down, so that their faces
nearly touched, uttered these words in a whisper:
Give up Benedict Arnold for John Andreis that what you mean?
It is! and the Colonel looked up into the flushed face of his superior.
Pshaw! This is nonsense! Washington would never entertain such
a proposition, muttered Sir Henry.
The answer from the Colonel was deep-toned, clear, and deliberate.
Your Excellency will pardon my rudeness. I am a rough soldier, but
I have a heart. I'll be frank with you. The fate of this Andre fills me
with horror. He is a good fellow, though he does paint pictures, and
write rhymes, and act plays, and do other things beneath the dignity of a
soldier. But he has a soul, your Excellency, he has a heart. I would
peril my life to save him. I can't help thinking of his mother and sisters
in Englandhe is their only dependence, and
Well, Colonel, wellinterrupted Sir Henry.
An officer from Washington waits in the room below, with authority
from his General to make this proposition to you
Give me Arnold and I
will give you Andre!
Sir Henry Clinton fell back in his seat as though a shot had pierced his
breast. He said not a word, but as if stupefied by this proposition, folded
his hands across his breast, and gazed vacantly upon the sunset sky.
The last gleam of twilight fell over the broad expanse of Manhattan Bay.
All was silent in the chamber, save the hard, deep breathing of Sir Henry
Clinton, who, with his head inclined to one side, still gazed upon the
western
sky, with that same vacant stare.
At last two liveried servants entered, and placed lighted candles on the
table.
The Colonel started when he beheld the strange paleness of Sir Henry's
countenance. He was terribly agitated, for his lips were compressed, his
brows contracted, his hands pressed fixedly against his breast.
At last he spoke. His voice was strangely changed from his usual bold
and hearty tones.
Had George Washington offered me the Throne of the Western
Continent
,
he could not have so tempted me, as he does by this proposition, to
exchange Arnold for Andre!
Exchange them, growled the Colonel.
But what will the worldwhat will my King say? It would be a
breach of confidence, a violation of a soldier's honorit would in
fact, be
An easy method of rescuing the white neck of John Andre from the
gibbet! coolly interrupted the Colonel.
This was a hard thrust. Sir Henry was silent for a moment; but that
moment passed, he flung his clenched hand on the table.
I am tempted, horribly tempted! he exclaimed, in broken tones. I
never was so tempted in my life. Speak of it no more, sir, speak of it no
more! Did you say that the rebel officer waited below?
General, shall I call him up? whispered the Colonel, fixing his eyes
firmly on Clinton's face.
Sir Henry did not reply. The Colonel arose and moved towards the
door, when he was met by an officer attired in a rich scarlet uniform, who
came along the carpet with an easy stride, somewhat lessened in dignity by
a perceptible lameness.
The Colonel started as though a serpent had stung him.
For in that officer with the rich scarlet uniform, glittering with epaulettes
of goldin that officer with the bold countenance, and forehead projecting
over dark eyes that emitted a steady glare, he recognized
Benedict Arnold
.
Good evening, Colonel! said Arnold, with a slight inclination of his
head.
Good evening, Colonel
Arnold!
at last responded the Colonel, with a
slight yet meaning intonation of scorn. I never observed it before, but
excuse meyou limp in the right leg? Where did you receive the
wound?
It was not often that Arnold blushed, but now his throat, his cheeks, and
brow were scarlet. For a moment he seemed stricken into stone, but at
last he replied in a deep sonorous voice, that started Sir Henry Clinton
from his chair:
That leg sir, was twice broken; the first time,
when I stormed Quebec
.
The second time, at Saratoga,
when I took the last fortress of Burgoyne!
Are you answered, sir?
Without a word more, leaving the astonished officer to remember the
glare of his eye, he passed on, and saluted Sir Henry Clinton with a
deep bow.
Sir Henry received him with a formal bow, waving his hand toward the
chair, in the recess of the window. Arnold sat down, and crossing his legs
in a careless position, fixed his dark eyes full in Clinton's face, as he spoke
in a laughing tone:
Do you know, General, I heard a very clever thing as I passed along
the street. Two of
our
soldiers were conversing;`I tell you what it is,'
said one of the fellows to the other, `Sir Henry Clinton couldn't do a
better
thing, than send this Arnold(ha! ha!
this
Arnold, mark you!) to
General Washington, who will very likely hang him in place of Andre!'
Wasn't it clever, General? By the bye, this evening air is very cool.
Sir Henry saw the sneer on Arnold's face, and knew at once that
Andre's
fate was sealed!
XIX.THE SISTERS.
It
was a flower garden, watered by a spring that bubbled up from yellow
sands.
It was a flower garden, environed by a wall of dark grey stone,
overshadowed
with vines and roses.
It was a flower garden, standing in the centre of a wood, whose leaves
blushed like the rainbow, with the dyes of autumn.
Yonder rises the mansion, something between a stately dwelling and a
quiet cottage in appearance, you see its steep roof, its grotesque chimneys,
the porch before the door, supported by oaken pillows wreathed with
vines.
A dear retreat, this place of fragrant beds, and winding walks, of orchard
trees heavy with fruit, and flowers blooming into decay, trembling with
perfume ere they die.
It was that calm hour, when clouds hasten to the west, and range
themselves
in the path of the setting sun, as though anxious to receive the kiss
of their Lord, ere he sank to rest. It was that beautiful moment, when the
tree tops look like pyramids of gold, and sky resembles a dome of living
flame, with a blush of glory pervading its cope, from the zenith to the
horizon
.
It was the close of one of those delicious days in autumn, when we
love to bury ourselves in the recesses of brown woods, and think of the
friends that are gone, when it is our calm delight to wander through long
vistas of overarching trees, treading softly over the sward, and give our souls
to memories of love, or dwell sadly and yet tenderly upon the grave which
awaits us, when the play of life is over.
In the centre of the garden there grow four apple trees, their gnarled
limbs twining together, while their fruit of various colors glowed in the rosy
light. Beneath the shade and fruitage of these trees, a rugged bench, formed
with plain branches of oak twisted in various fantastic forms, was placed,
presenting a delightful retreat amid the recesses of that rustic garden.
Just as you may have seen, two flowers, alike beautiful, yet contrasted
in their style of loveliness, swaying side by side in the summer breeze,
their varied tints affording a picture of never-ending freshness, so two
beautiful
girls bloomed side by side, in that quiet recess.
Their faces are turned toward the evening light, as they feel the deep
serenity of that hour. One, a delicate, fragile thing, with skin almost
supernaturally
fair, eyes blue as an Italian sky, hair like threaded gold, lays
her hand upon her sister's shoulder, and nestles gently to her side.
Young Alice! A tender flower, that has just ripened from the bud, with
the dew yet fresh upon its petals.
The other, a warm figure, ripened into perfect womanhood, her breast
rounded, her small feet and hands in strong contrast with the blooming
fullness
of her shape. Her brown hair, that falls back from her white neck in
glossy masses,here, dark as a raven's wing, there, waving in bright
chesnut
huesaffords a fresh beauty to her boldly chisseled face, whose lips
are red with mature ripeness. Her deep grey eyes, the clearly defined
brows and impressive forehead, combine in an expression of intellectual beauty.
Womanly Mary! A moss rose, blooming its last hour of freshness, its
leaves crimsoning with all the beauty they can ever know.
On her full bosom the head of the younger Sister was laid, among her
brown tresses, the flaxen locks of her sister wandered, like sunshine rays
among twilight shadows.
It is so sweet, at this still hour, Mary, to think of him! To remember
how he looked, and what he said, when last we saw himto count the
days, yes, the moments that must elapse before he will return to us!
Thus spoke the young sister, her eye gleaming in moisture, but the elder
felt her face flush, and her eye brighten, as these words came impetuously
from her lips:
But sweeter far, Alice, to think how proud, how noble he will look,
when he stands before us, so like a hero, with the star upon his breast, the
warrior's robe upon his form! To think of him, not coming back to us as
he departed, an humble Cadet, but a titled General, welcomed by the favor
of his king, the applause of his countrymen!His last letters speak of his
certain ascent to fame. Even now, he is engaged upon a deedwhose
nature he does not revealthat will cause his name to burst in glory on his
country's fame!
Sisterly lovepure and child-likespoke in the words of the first.
Sisterly love, tender yet impetuous with ambition, rung in the strong tones
of the other.
And Mother, O, how glad she will be! We shall all feel so happy,
and  The younger Sister started, for she heard a step. With one
assent
,
they turned their eyes and beheld a widowed woman, with her silver
hair laid back from a mild and beaming face, come slowly along the garden
walk.
It was their Mother. They rose and greeted her, and in their different
ways, told their young hopes and fears.
She sat between them on the garden bench, each small hand on which
were marked the lines of time, laid upon a daughter's head.
How strange it is, that we have had no letters for a month! Not a
word from your brother, my children! Perhaps, since we have retired to
this quiet cottage, near a secluded country town, the letters miss us. Come,
girlsit is a pleasant evening, let us walk in the woods!
Taking their soft hands within her own, the Mother beside her daughters,
looked like a beautiful flower, whose young freshness has been but faintly
preserved in the leaves of Time's volume, contrasted with the young
loveliness
of ungathered blossoms.
She led the way toward the garden gate. Along this narrow path, where
the thicket stored with berries, blooms in evergreen freshness, into the dim
woods, where there is a carpet of soft moss, filled with sunshine and
shadows.
They strolled along, the younger sister now stooping to pluck a wild
flower as gay as herself, the other talking earnestly to her mother of the
absent Soldier.
Don't you remember, Mother, how a month ago, when we were
working
together, at our embroidery, I thought I heard my brother's step, and
went to the door to greet him? I am sure I heard his step, and yet it was
all a fancy!
As the Sister Alice spoke, in a tone full of laughing gaiety, Mary changed
color and leaned upon her mother's shoulder, her breast throbbing violently
againt her dark habit.
The Mother looked upon her with unfeigned alarm:
You are ill, Mary, and yet the evening air is by no means unpleasant,
she said.
It was the Second of October! she whispered, as though thinking
aloud.
How can you remember dates? said Alice, laughing: I'm sure I
can remember anything but dates. You know, Mary, when I read my
history at school, I always jumbled Henry the Eighth and Julius Csar
together!
It happened to fix itself upon my memory, replied Mary, raising her
face and walking statelily onward again. That sudden faintness is past: I
am quite well now, she said, passing her hand lightly over her brow.
O, I remember said the Mother, in a careless tone. On that day,
even as Alice hurried to the door, expecting to greet her brother's form, you
swooned away. You remember it, on account of your swoon? Now that
I call the circumstance to mind, I recollect, the old clock struck twelve, as
you fainted.
Twelve o'clockthe Second of October! faltered the pale Mary, as
the remembrance of the strange hallucination which possessed her, on that
day and hour, freezing her blood and darkening her reason, came to her
soul with redoubled force.
The Vision that she saw, sitting in that quiet chamber, she dared never
tell, it was so strange, so like a nightmare, pressing its beak into her virgin
breast, and drinking slowly the life-blood from her heart.
They wandered on, Alice tripping gaily over the sod, the Mother
conversing
cheerfully, even Mary felt her heart bound, in the deep serenity of
that evening hour.
There was a nook in that wild wood, where the bank shelved down and
the trees stood apart, forming a circle around an ancient pile of stones, over
whose moss-covered forms bubbled a fountain of clear cold water. Above
the fountain arose a form of wood, overgrown with vines, and leaning
forward
.
It was a Cross, planted three hundred years before, when these
lands belonged to a Monastery, and the Old Religion dwelt on the soil.
The Mother and her Daughters approached, and started back with wonder.
A rude form, clad in tattered garments, crouched on the sod beside the
fountain. His war-worn face was laid against the bank, while his unshaven
beard, white as snow, gleamed in the light. His coat, which had once been
bright scarlet, betrayed the old soldier. There was dust upon his gaiters,
and his much worn shoes could scarce conceal his galled feet.
As he slept he grasped his staff, and thrust one hand within the breast
of his coat. His slumber was disturbed; he seemed laboring under the
31
fears and hopes of some tumultuous dream. Suddenly, starting to his feet,
with a horrible cry, he gazed wildly round,
and
trembled, while the clammy
moisture stood in beads upon his brow.
`Who are you? Back! You shall not kill me! he cried, and put
himself in an attitude of defence.
It is the old Soldier, who went with my Son to the wars! cried the
MotherAbel, don't you know us?
The effect of his dream passed away, and the aged Soldier advanced, his
hard hand pressed by the warm fingers of the young girls. As he stood
before them, his eyes seemed to avoid their gazenow downcastnow
wandering on either sidehis sunburnt face was flushed with a warm
glow.
Speak! Our Brother! faltered the girls.
My Son! You bear a message from him? exclaimed the Mother.
The old Soldier was silent.
Your Son? You mean my Mastereh? The Major he hesitated.
Why have you returned home? Is the war over? exclaimed Mary.
AhBrother is on his way homehe will be here presentlywhat a
delightful surprise! cried Alice.
Still the Soldier stood silent and confused, his hands pressed together,
while his downcast eyes wandered over the sod.
My goodness, ladies he mutteredHave n't you received a letter?
Sir Henry wrote to you, Ma'am, and
Sir Henry write to me? echoed the Mother, her face growing deathly
paleWhy did not my son write himself?
And the sisters, laid each of them, a hand on the veteran's arm and looked
up eagerly into his rough visage.
His nether lip quivered; his eyes rolled strangely in their sockets. He
endeavored to speak but there was a choking sensation in his throat; all
the blood in his frame seemed rushing to his eyes.
I can't tell it! God help me and forgiv' my sins, I aint strong enough
to tell it! Ladies, can't you guessyou seethe Major
Through the gathering gloom of twilight, the Mother looked and beheld
his emotion, and felt her soul palzied by a terrible fear. You may see
Alice, stand there, gazing on the soldier with surprise; Mary, that stately
sister, is by her side, her face white as a shroud.
They stood like figures of stone placed in the midst of the wood, with
the moss beneath, and the autumnal leaves above. The sound of the
fountain
gurgling over the grey rocks alone disturbed the silence of the air.
The bluff old veteran stumbled forward, and fell on his knees.
Look ye,I'm roughI aint afraid of man or devil, but I'm afraid
now! Don't force me to speak it
Adown that sunburnt face, slowly trickled two large and scalding tears.
You see the Mother, her face manifesting sudden traces of that agony,
which now comes with overwhelming force, and takes her soul by storm,
you see her advance and take the veteran by the hand.
Rise, friend Abel! she said, in a voice of unnatural calmness. I
know your message. My son is dead.
The Soldier bowed his head and gave free vent to his tears.
Alice hears that word, and shrinks toward yonder tree, her eyes covered
in a strange mist, her heart suddenly palsied in its beatings. The Mother
stands as calm, as pale as a corse.
Mary alone advances, gasps these words as with the last effort of her
life
He died in battleat the head of his menSpeak! A soldier's
death
Transformed in every nerve, she quivered before him, her fingers
clutching
his iron arms, her eyes flashing a death-like glare into his face. Her
falling hair sweeping back from her face, completed that picture of a sinless
maiden, trembling on the verge of madness.
The old Soldier looked up and answered her:
He died on the Second of October, at the hour of twelveon the Gibbet
as a spy
.
These words, in a hollow yet deliberate voice, he slowly uttered, and the
Mother and the Sisters heard it all! Heard it, and could not, at the
moment
,
die!
God pity them, in this their fearful hour.
The Mother sank on her knees. Alice, the fair-haired and gentle, tottered
and fell, as though her life had passed with that long and quivering shriek.
The rough soldier wept aloud.
Mary, alone, stood erect: her pale countenance thrown into strong relief
by her dark flowing hair, her eyes glassy, her lips livid, her form towering
in marble-like majesty.
And as she stoodas though suddenly frozen into marbleher eyes
were fixed upon the heavens, visible through the intervals of the forest trees.
The last flush of sunset had died, and the
first star
came twinkling out
on the blue walls of space.
Only one expression passed her lips. Stifling the horrible agony of that
moment, she fixed her eyes upon that light in heaven, and said
It is my brother's star
!
XX.ANDRE THE SPY.
We
have now traversed the career of the ill-fated Andre in all its changes
of scene, in its varied phases of absorbing interest.
Pity that young man if you will, plant flowers over his grave, sing hymns
to his memory, but remember,
he was a
SPY.
That dishonored thing, which no true warrior can look upon, save with
loathingnot merely a Conspirator, nor a Traitor, but the lacquey of
Treason
A
SPY.
Remember, that the wife of Benedict Arnold, on terms of intimate
friendship
with Andre, while the British held Philadelphia, corresponded with
him long after her marriage, and then call to mind a single fact: her
correspondence
was the channel of communication between Arnold and the
British General. Can we, with any show of reason, suppose this wife
innocent of participation in the treason of her husband? Is it at all plausible,
or probable, that she was ignorant of the contents of Arnold's letters?
Remember that Andre was a partner in this conspiracy, from the first
moment of its dawn, until by his manly letter to Washington, he avowed
himself a British officer, captured in disguise, on American ground. He
was elevated to a Majority, dignified with the post of Adjutant General, in
order that he might more effectually carry out the plan, originated between
himself and Arnold. He was to enter West Point, not as an open foe,
ready to combat with his enemies on the ramparts of the fortress, but as a
Conspirator; he was to conquer the stronghold, laid defenceless by the
removal
of the Continental force, by a juggle, and wreathe his brows with the
parchments of a purchased victory.
For this, his promised reward was the commission of a Brigadier General.
For aiding an American General in his midnight campaign of craft and
treachery, he was to receive the honors that are awarded to a Conqueror
who fights in broad day; for taking a deserted fort, his brows were to be
wreathed with laurel, which is given to the leader of a forlorn hope, who
dares the sternest front of battle without a fear.
With all his talentdisplayed as an Artist, a Poet, and a Soldierwith
all the genius which made him an admirable companion, with all the
chivalry
which won praise and tears from his enemies, with all the rich cluster
of his gifts, and the dim memories that gather round his name, we must
confess, that he was one of the originator's of Arnold's Treason, that he
descended to a course of intrigue, beneath the honor of a warrior, that he
was justly condemned and hung as a Spy.
There is one dark thought that crowds upon us as we survey this history.
We may endeavor to banish it, but it will come back with overwhelming
force. It starts from the history, and moves along every page, a brooding
and fearful shadow.
John Andre and the Wife of Arnold, first planned
the Treason, and thenwhile his heart was lacerated by a sense of his
wrongslured him into the plot
.
That is a startling thought.
There is no point of Washington's career more thoroughly worthy of our
veneration, than his course in relation to Andre. He did not knowhe
could not guess the extent or ramifications of the Treason. A base plan
had been laid to capture a Fortress and crush his army. This plan aided
by an honorable gentleman in the guise of a Spy. It was necessary to
make an example, the time had come for the British General to learn the
bitter truth, that the American leader was no less ready to meet his foes,
sword in hand in battle, than to hang them on the gibbet's timbers as Spies.
At once he stood resolved in his course. Andre must die. No
persuasions
could change his firm purpose. He pitied the victim, but condemned
him to death. He wept for his untimely fate, but hung him on a gibbet.
His heart bled as he signed the death-warrant, but still he consigned Andre
to a felon's grave.
There have been many tears shed over Andre, but while I pity him, I
must confess that my tears are reserved for the thousand victims of British
wrong, murdered during the war. Then the thought of Benedict Arnold,
hurled from the Patriot and the Hero, into the Bandit and Traitor, as much
by the persecutions of his enemies, as by his own faults, as much from the
influence of Andre and his own wife,
[12]
[12]
It is stated on the authority of Aaron Burr, that the Wife of the Traitor, after
she joined her husband in the British lines, expressed her contempt for the American
cause, sanctioned the course of Arnold, and uttered other expressions of feeling,
which showed that she was a co-partner in the work of Treason.
as from inclination, has for me an
interest
that altogether surpasses the fate of the Spy.
The historical pictures which I have placed before you, show the
mystery
in every light. I have endeavored to embody in these pictures the
manners, the costume, the contending opinions, the very spirit of the
Revolution
.
Let me now present to you another illustration, in order to show,
that the British in a case similar to that of Andre, never indulged one throb
of pity.
Behold the Mercy of King George!
XXI.NATHAN HALE.
It
was a calm, clear evening in the early spring of 1775, when a young
man came to his native home, to bid his aged mother farewell.
I see that picture before me now.
A two-story house, built of grey stone, with a small garden extending
from the door to the roadside, while all around arise the orchard trees,
fragrant with the first blossoms of spring. Yonder you behold the
hay-rick
and the barn, with the lowing cattle grouped together in the shadows.
It is a quiet hour; everything seems beautiful and holy. There is a
purple
flush upon the Western sky, a sombre richness of shadow resting upon
yonder woods; a deep serenity, as if from God, imbues and hallows this
evening hour.
Yonder on the cottage porch, with the rich glow of the sunset on her
face, sits the aged mother, the silvery hair parted above her pale brow.
The Bible lays open on her knees. Her dress is of plain rude texture, but
there is that about her countenance which makes you forget her homespun
costume. Her eyes, their dark blue contrasting with the withered outlines
of her countenance, are upraised. She is gazing in the face of the son,
who bends over her shoulder and returns her glance.
His young form is arrayed in a plain blue hunting frock, faced with fur,
while his rifle rests against the door, and his pistols are girded to his waist
by a belt of dark leather. A plain costume this, but gaze upon the face of
that young man and tell me, do you not read a clear soul, shining from those
dark eyes? That white brow, shadowed by masses of brown hair, bears
the impress of Thought, while the pale cheek tells the story of long nights
given to the dim old Hebrew Bible, with its words of giant meaning and
organ-like music; to the profane classics of Greece and Rome, the sublime
reveries of Plato, the impassioned earnestness of Demosthenes, or the
indignant
eloquence of Cicero.
Yes, fresh from the halls of
Yale
, the poetry of the Past, shining
serenely
in his soul, to his childhood's home, comes the young student to
claim his mother's blessing and bid her a long farewell.
But why this rifle, these pistols, this plain uniform?
I will tell you.
One day, as he sat bending over that Hebrew Volumewith its great
thoughts spoken in a tongue now lost to man, in the silence of ageshe
looked from his window and beheld a dead body carried by, the glassy eyes
upturned to the sky, while the stiffened limb hung trailing on the ground.
It was the first
dead man of Lexington
.
That sight roused his blood; the voice of the Martyrs of Bunker Hill
seemed shrieking forever in his ears. He flung aside the student's gown;
he put on the hunting shirt. A sad farewell to those well-worn volumes,
which had cheered the weariness of many a midnight watch, one last look
around that lonely room, whose walls had heard his earnest soliloquies;
and then he was a soldier.
The Child of Genius felt the strong cords of Patriotism, drawing him
toward the last bed of the Martyrs on Bunker Hill.
And now in the sunset hour, he stands by his mother's side, taking the
one last look at that wrinkled face, listening for the last time to the
tremulous
tones of that solemn voice.
I did hope, my child, said the aged woman, I did hope to see you
ministering at the altar of Almighty God, but the enemy is in the land, and
your duty is plain before you. Go, my sonfight like a man for your
country. In the hour of battle remember that God is with your cause;
that His arm will guide and guard you, even in the moment of death.
War, my child, is at best a fearful thing, a terrible license for human
butchery; but a war like this, is holy in the eyes of God. Goand when
you fight, may you conquer, or if you fall in death, remember your
mother's blessing is on your head!
And in that evening hour, the aged woman stood erect, and laid her
withered hand upon his bended head.
A moment passed, and he had grasped his rifle, he had muttered the last
farewell. While the aged woman stood on the porch, following him with
her eyes, he turned his steps towards the road.
But a form stood in his path, the form of a young woman clad in the
plain costume of a New England girl. Do you behold a voluptuous
beauty waving in the outlines of that form? Is the hair dark as night, or
long, glossy, waving and beautiful? Are those hands soft, white and
delicate
?
You behold none of these; for the young girl who stands there in
the student's path, has none of the dazzling attraction of personal beauty.
A slender form, a white forehead, with the brown hair plainly parted around
that unpretending countenance, hands somewhat roughened by toil; such
were the attractions of that New England girl.
And yet there was a something that chained your eyes to her face, and
made your heart swell as you looked upon her. It was the soul, which
shone from her eyes and glowed over her pallid cheek. It was the deep,
ardent, all-trusting love, the eternal faith of her woman's nature, which gave
such deep vivid interest to that plain face, that pale white brow.
She stood there, waiting to bid her lover farewell, and the tear was in
her eye, the convulsive tremor of suppressed emotion on her lip. Yet
with an unfaltering voice, she bade him go fight for his country and
conquer
in the name of God.
Orshe exclaimed, placing her hands against his breast, while her
eyes were rivetted to his face, should you fall in the fight, I will pray God
to bless your last hour with all the glory of a soldier's death!
That was the last words she said; he grasped her hand, impressed his
kiss upon her lip, and went slowly from his home.
When we look for him again, the scene is changed. It is night, yet,
through the gloom, the white tents of the British army rise up like ghosts
on the summit of the Long Island hills. It is night, yet the stars look
down upon that Red Cross banner now floating sullenly to the ocean breeze.
We look for the Enthusiast of Yale! Yonder, in a dark room, through
whose solitary window pours the mild gleam of the stars, yonder we behold
the dusky outlines of a human form, with head bent low and arms folded
over the chest. It is very dark in the room, very still, yet can you
discover
the bearing of the soldier in the uncertain outline of that form, yet can
you hear the tread of the sentinel on the sands without.
Suddenly that form arises, and draws near the solitary window. The
stars gleam over a pale face, with eyes burning with unnatural light. It is
dusky and dim, the faint light, but still you can read the traces of agony
like death, anguish like despair stamped on the brow, and cheek, and lip
of that youthful countenance.
You can hear a single, low toned moan, a muttered prayer, a broken
ejaculation. Those eyes are upraised to the stars, and then the pale face
no longer looks from the window. That form slowly retires, and is lost in
the darkness of the room.
Meanwhile, without the room, on yonder slope of level ground, crowning
the ascent of the hill, the sound of hammer and saw breaks on the silence
of the hour. Dim forms go to and fro in the darkness; stout pieces of
timber are planted in the ground, and at last the work is done. All is still.
But, like a phantom of evil, from the brow of yonder hill arises that strange
structure of timber, with the rope dangling from its summit.
There is a face gazing from yonder window, at this thing of evil; a face
with lips pressed between the teeth, eyes glaring with unnatural light.
Suddenly a footstep is heard, the door of that room is flung open, and a
blaze of light fills the place. In the door-way stands a burly figure, clad in
the British uniform, with a mocking sneer upon that brutal countenance.
The formwhich we lately beheld in the gloomnow rises, and
confronts
the British soldier. It needs no second glance to tell us that we
behold
the Enthusiast of Yale. That dress is soiled and torn, that face is
sunken in the cheeks, wild and glaring in the eyes, yet we can recognize
the brave youth who went forth from his home on that calm evening in
spring.
He confronts the Executioner, for that burly figure in the handsome red
coat, with the glittering ornaments, is none other than the Provost of the
British army.
I am to die in the morning, began the student, or prisoner as you may
choose to call him.
Yes, growled the Provost, you were taken as a spy, tried as a spy,
sentenced as a spy, and to-morrow morning, you will be hanged as a spy!
That was the fatal secret. General Washington desired information from
Long Island, where the British encamped. A young soldier appeared, his
face glowing with a high resolve. He would go to Long Island; he would
examine the enemy's posts; he would peril his life for Washington. Nay,
he would peril more than his life; he would peril his
honor
. For the
soldier
who dies in the bloody onset of a forlorn hope, dies in honor: but the
man who is taken as a spy, swings on the gibbet, an object of loathing and
scorn. But this young soldier would dare it all; the gallows and the
dishonor
:
all for the sake of Washington.
General, was the sublime expression of the Enthusiast, when I
volunteered
in the army of liberty, it was my intention to devote my soul to
the cause. It is not for me now to choose the manner or the method of
the service which I am to perform. I only ask, in what capacity does my
country want me. You tell me that I will render her great service by this
expedition to Long Island. All I can answer is with one wordbid me
depart and I will go!
He went, obtained the information which he sought, and was about to
leave the shore of the Island for New York, when he was discovered.
Now, in the chamber of the condemned felon, he awaited the hour of his
fate, his face betraying deep emotion, yet it was not the agitation of fear.
Death he could willingly face, but the death of the
Gibbet!
He now approached the British officer, and spoke in a calm, yet hollow
voice:
My friend, I am to die to-morrow. It is well. I have no regrets to
spend upon my untimely fate. But as the last request of a dying man, let
me implore you to take charge of these letters.
He extended some four or five letters, among which was one to his
betrothed
,
one to his mother, and one to Washington.
Promise me, that you will have these letters delivered after I am dead.
The Briton shifted the lamp from one hand to the other, and then with
an oath, made answer:
By , I'll have nothing to do with the letters of a spy!
The young man dropped the letters on the floor, as though a bullet had
torn them from his grasp. His head sunk on his breast. The cup of his
agony was full.
At least, said he, lifting his large bright eyes, at least, you will
procure
me a Bible, you will send me a clergyman?I am ready to die, but I
wish to die the death of a Christian.
You should have thought o' these things before, young man, exclaimed
the Liveried Hangman. As for Bible or Preacher, I can tell you at once,
that you 'll get neither through me.
The young man sank slowly in his chair, and covered his face with his
hands. The brave Briton, whose courage had been so beautifully
manifested
in these last insults to a dying man, stood regarding the object of his
spite with a brutal scowl.
Ere a moment was gone, the young man looked up again, and exclaimed:
For the love of Christ, do not deny me the consolations of religion in
this hour!
A loud laugh echoed around the room, and the Condemned Spy was in
darkness.
Who shall dare to lift the veil from that Enthusiast's heart, and picture
the agony which shook his soul, during the slow-moving hours of his last
night? Now his thoughts were with his books, the classics of Greece and
Rome, or the pages of Hebrew volume, where the breeze of Palestine swells
over the waves of Jordan, and the songs of Israel resound forevermore;
now with his aged mother, or his betrothed; and then a vision of that great
course of glory which his life
was to have been
, came home to his soul.
That course of glory, those high aspirations, those yearnings of Genius
after the Ideal, were now to be cut off forever by
the Gibbet's rope!
I will confess, that to me, there is something terrible in the last night of
32
the Condemned Spy. Never does my eye rest upon the page of American
history, that I do not feel for his fate, and feel more bitterly, when I think
of the injustice of that history. Yes, let the truth be spoken, our history
is terribly unjust to the poorthe neglectedthe Martyrs, whose fate it
was, not to suffer in the storm of battle, but in the cell, or by the gibbet's
rope. How many brave hearts were choked to death by the rope, or buried
beneath the cells of the gaol, after the agonies of fever! Where do you
find their names in history?
And the young man, with a handsome form, a born of God genius, a
highly educated mindtell us, is there no tear for him?
We weep for Andre, and yet he was a mere Gambler, who staked his
life against a General's commission. We plant flowers over his grave, and
yet he was a plotter from motives altogether mercenaryWe sing hymns
about him, and yet with all his accomplishments, he was one of the main
causes of Arnold's ruin; he it was who helped to drag the Patriot down
into the Traitor.
But this young man, who watches his last night on yonder Long Island
shorewhere are tears for him?
Night passed away, and morning came at last. Then they led him forth
to the sound of the muffled drum and measured footsteps. Thenwithout
a Bible, or Preacher or friend, not even a dog to wail for him, they placed
him beneath the gibbet, under that blue sky, with the pine coffin before his
eyes.
Stern looks, scowling brows, red uniforms and bristling bayonets, were
all around,but for him, the Enthusiast and the Genius, where was the
kind voice or the tender hand?
Yet in that hour, the breeze kissed his cheek, and the vision of
Manhattan
Bay, with its foam-crested waves and green Islands, was like a dream
of peace to his soul.
The rough hands of the Hangman tied his hands and bared his neck for
the rope. Then, standing on the death-cart, with the rope about his neck,
and Eternity before him, that young man was very pale, but calm,
collected
and firm. Then he called the brutal soldiery the Refugee Hangman, to
witness that he had but one regret
And that regret not for his aged mother, not even for his meek-eyed
betrothed
,
not even for the darkness of that hour,but, said the Martyr,
I regret that I have only one life to lose for my country
.
That was his last word, for ere the noble sentiment was cold on his lips,
they choked him to death. The horse moved, the cart passed from under
his feet; the Martyr hung dangling in the air! Where was now that clear
white brow, that brilliant eye, that well formed mouth? Lookyes, look
and behold that thing palpitating with agonybehold that thing suspended
in the air, with a blackened mass of flesh instead of a face.
Above, the bright skyaround, the crowdfar away, the free waves
and yet here, tosses and plunges the image of God, tied by the neck to a
gibbet!
Like a dog he diedlike a dog they buried him. No Preacher, no
prayer, no friend, not even a dog to howl over his grave. There was only
a pine box and a dead body, with a few of the vilest wretches of the
British
camp. That was the Martyr's funeral.
At this hour, while I speak,in the dim shadows of Westminster Abbey,
a white monument arises in honor of John Andre, whose dishonorable
actions were, in some measure, forgotten in pity for his hideous death.
But this man of Genius, who went forth from the halls of
Yale
, to die
like a dog, for his country, on the heights of Long Islandwhere is the
marble pillar, carved with the letters of his name?
And yet we will remember him, and love him, forevermore. And should
the day come, when a Temple will be erected to the Memory of the
Heroes of the Revolutionthe Man-Gods of our Pastthen, beneath the
light of that temple's dome, among the sculptured images of Washington
and his compatriots, we will place one poor broken column of New
England
granite, surmounted by a single leaf of laurel, inscribed with the
motto
Alas that I have but one life for my country!
and this poor
column, and leaf of laurel and motto, shall be consecrated with the name of
Nathan Hale
.
Do you now condemn Washington for signing the death-warrant of
Andre?
The British visited their anathemas upon his head, denounced him as a
cold-blooded murderer, and talked long and loud of the `
Cruel
Washington.'
Their poets made rhymes about the matter. Miss Seward, one of those
amiable ladies who drivel whole quires of diluted adjectives, under the
name of Poetry, addressed some stanzas to Washington, which were filled
with bitter reproaches. Even their historians echoed the charge of cruelty,
and assailed that Man whose humanity was never called in question.
Let us, after the case of Nathan Hale, look at another instance of British
humanity. Let us see how the British leaders spared the unfortunate, let
us contrast their ruthless ferocity, with the Mercy of Washington.
XXII.THE MARTYR OF THE SOUTH.
There
is a gloom to-day in Charleston.
It is not often that a great city feels, but when this great heart of
humanity
whose every pulsation is a life, can feel, the result is more terrible than
the bloodiest battle. Yes, when those arteries of a city, its streets, and
lanes, and alleys, thrill with the same feeling, when like an electric chain it
darts invisibly from one breast to another, until it swells ten thousand
hearts, the result is terrible.
I care not whether that result is manifested in a Riot, that fills the streets
with the blood of men, and women, and little children, that fires the roof
over the head of the innocent, or sends the Church of God whirling in
smoke and flame to the midnight sky; or whether that feeling is manifested
in the silence of thousands, the bowed head, the compressed lip, the
stealthy footstep, still it is a fearful thing to see.
There is gloom to-day in Charleston.
A dead awe reigns over the city. Every face you see is stamped with
gloom; men go silently by, with anguish in their hearts and eyes.
Women
are weeping in their darkened chambers; in yonder church old men
are kneeling before the altar, praying in low, deep, muttered tones.
The very soldiers whom you meet, clad in their British uniforms, wear
sadness on their faces. These men to whom murder is sport, are gloomy
to-day. The citizens pass hurriedly to and fro; cluster in groups; whisper
together; glide silently unto their homes.
The stores are closed to-day, as though it were Sunday. The windows
of those houses are closed, as though some great man were dead; there is
a silence on the air, as though a plague had despoiled the town of its beauty
and its manhood.
The British bannerstained as it is with the best blood of the Palmetto
Stateseems to partake of the influence of the hour; for floating from
yonder staff, it does not swell buoyantly upon the breeze, but droops heavily
to the ground.
The only sound you hear, save the hurried tread of the citizens, is the
low, solemn notes of the Dead March, groaning from muffled drums.
Why all this gloom, that oppresses the heart and fills the eyes? Why
do Whig and Tory, citizen and soldier, share this gloom alike? Why this
silence, this awe, this dread?
Look yonder, and in the centre of that common, deserted by every
human
thing, beholdrising in lonely hideousnessbehold, a
Gallows
.
Why does that gibbet stand there, blackening in the morning sun?
Come with me into yonder mansion, whose roof arises proudly over all
other roofs. Up these carpeted stairs, into this luxurious chamber, whose
windows are darkened by hangings of satin, whose walls are covered with
tapestry, whose floor is crowded with elegant furniture. All is silent in this
chamber.
A single glow of morning light steals through the parted curtains of
yonder window. Beside that window, with his back to the light, his face
in shadow, as though he wished to hide certain dark thoughts from the light,
sits a young man, his handsome form arrayed in a British uniform.
He is young, but there is the gloom of age upon that woven brow, there
is the resolve of murder upon that curling lip. His attitude is significant.
His head inclined to one side, the cheek resting on the left hand, while the
right grasps a parchment, which bears his signature, the ink not yet dried.
That parchment is a death-warrant.
If you will look closely upon that red uniform you will see that it is
stained with the blood of Paoli, where the cry for quarter was answered
by the falling sword and the reeking bayonet. Yes, this is none other than
General Grey, the Butcher of Paoli, transformed by the accolade of his
King into
Lord Rawdon
.
While he is there by the window, grasping that parchment in his hand,
the door opens, a strange group stand disclosed on the threshhold.
A woman and three children, dressed in black, stand there gazing upon
the English lord. They slowly advance; do you behold the pale face of
that woman, her eyes large and dark, not wet with tears, but glaring with
speechless woe? On one side a little girl with brown ringlets, on the other
her sister, one year older, with dark hair relieving a pallid face.
Somewhat in front, his young form rising to every inch of its height,
stands a boy of thirteen, with chesnut curls, clustering about his fair
countenance
.
You can see that dark eye flash, that lower lip quiver, as he
silently confronts Lord Rawdon.
The womanI use that word, for to me it expresses all that is pure in
passion, or holy in humanity, while your wordladymeans nothing but
ribbons and milinerythe woman advances, and encircled by these
children
,
stands before the gloomy lord.
I have come, she speaks in a voice that strikes you with its music
and tenderness, I have come to plead for my brother's life!
She does not say,
behold, my brother's children
, but there they are, and
the English lord beholds them. Tears are coursing down the cheeks of
those little girls, but the eye of the woman is not dim. The boy of thirteen
looks intently in the face of the Briton, his under lip quivering like a
leaf.
For a single moment that proud lord raises his head and surveys the
group, and then you hear his deep yet melodious voice:
Madam, your brother swore allegiance to His Majesty, and was
afterwards
taken in arms against his King. He is guilty of Treason, and must
endure the penalty, and that, you well know, is
Death
.
But, my lord, said that brave woman, standing firm and erect, her
beauty shining more serenely in that moment of heroism, You well know
the circumstances under which he swore allegiance. He, a citizen of South
Carolina, an American, was dragged from the bedside of a dying wife, and
hurried to Charleston, where this language was held by your officers`Take
the oath of allegiance, and return to the bedside of your dying wife: Refuse,
and we will consign you to gaol. This, my lord, not when he was free to
act, ah, no! But when his wife lay dying of that fearful diseasesmall pox
which had already destroyed two of his children. How could he act
otherwise than he did? how could he refuse to take your oath? In his
case, would you, my lord, would any
man
, refuse to do the same?
Still the silent children stood there before him, while the clear voice of
the true woman pierced his soul.
Your brother is condemned to death! He dies at noon. I can do
nothing for you!
Silently the woman, holding a little girl by each hand, sank on her knees;
but the boy of thirteen stood erect. Do you see that group? Those hands
upraised, those voices, the clear voice of the woman, the infantile tones of
those sweet girls, mingling in one cry for Mercy! while the Briton looks
upon them with a face of iron, and the boy of thirteen stands erect, no tear
in his eye, but a convulsive tremor on his lip!
Then the tears of that woman come at lastthen as the face of that stern
man glooms before her, she takes the little hands of the girls within her
own, and lifts them to his knee, and begs him to spare the father's life.
Not a word from the English Lord.
The boy still firm, erect and silent, no tear dims the eye which glares
steadily in the face of the tyrant.
Ah, you relent! shrieks that sister of the condemned man. You
will not deprive these children of a fatheryou will not cut him off in the
prime of manhood, by this hideous death! As you hope for mercy in
your last hour, be merciful nowspare my brother, and not a heart in
Charleston but will bless youspare him for the sake of these children!
Madam, was the cold reply, your brother has been condemned to
die. I can do nothing for you!
He turned his head away, and held the parchment before his eyes. At
last the stern heart of the boy was melted. There was a spasmodic motion
about his chest, his limbs shook, he stood for a moment like a statue, and
then fell on his knees, seizing the right hand of Lord Rawdon with his
trembling fingers.
Lord Rawdon looked down upon that young face, shadowed with
chesnut-curls
,
as the small hands clutched his wrist, and an expression of
surprise
came over his face.
My child, said he, I can do nothing for you!
The boy silently rose. He took a sister by each hand. There was a
wild light in his young eyea scorn of defiance on his lip.
Come, sisters, let us go.
He said this, and led those fair girls toward the door, followed by the
sister of the condemned. Not a word more was saidbut ere they passed
from the room, that true woman looked back into the face of Lord Rawdon.
He never forgot that look.
They were gone from the room, and he stood alone before that window,
with the sunlight pouring over his guilty brow.
Yes, it is necessary to make an example! This rebellion must be
crushed; these rebels taught submission! The death of this man will
strike terror into their hearts. They will learn at last that treason is no
trifling game; that the rope and the gibbet will reward each Rebel for his
crime!
Poor Lord Rawdon!
The streets were now utterly deserted. Not a citizen, a soldier, not
even a negro was seen. A silence like death rested upon the city.
Suddenly the sound of the dead march was heard, and yonder behold
the only evidence of life through this wide city.
On yonder common, around the gibbet, is gathered a strangely
contrasted
crowd. There is the negro, the outcast of society, the British officer
in his uniform, the citizen in his plain dress. All are grouped together in
that crowd.
In the centre of the dense mass, beside that horse and cart, one foot
resting on that coffin of pine, stands the only man in this crowd with an
uncovered brow. He stands there, an image of mature manhood, with a
muscular form, a clear full eye, a bold forehead. His cheek is not pale,
nor his eye dim. He is dressed neatly in a suit of dark velvet, made after
the fashion of his time; one hand inserted in his vest, rests on his heart.
Above his head dangles the rope. Near his back stands that figure with
the craped face; around are the British soldiers, separating the condemned
from the crowd. Among all that rude band of soldiers, not an eye but is
wet with tears.
The brave officer there, who has charge of the murder, pulls his chapeau
over his eyes, to shield them from the sun, orcan it be?to hide his
tears.
All is ready. He has bidden the last farewell to his sister, his children
in yonder gaol; he has said his last word to his noble boy, pressed his last
kiss upon the lips of those fair girls. All is ready for the murder.
At this moment a citizen advances, his face convulsed with emotion
Hayne, he speaks, in a choking voice, show them how an American
can die!
I will endeavor to do so, was the reply of the doomed man.
At this moment the hangman advanced, and placed the cap over his brow.
A cry was heard in the crowd, a footstep, and those soldiers shrank back
before a boy of thirteen, who came rushing forward.
Father! he shrieked, as he beheld the condemned with the cap over
his brow.
One groan arose from that crowda simultaneous expression of horror.
The father drew the cap from his brow: beheld the wild face, the glaring
eyes of his son.
God bless you, my boy, he spoke, gathering that young form to his
heart. Now go, and leave your father to his fate. Return when I am
deadreceive my body, and have it buried by my forefathers!
As the boy turned and went through the crowd, the father stepped firmly
into the cart.
There was a pause, as though every man in that crowd was suddenly
turned to stone.
The boy looked back but once, only once, and then beheldah, I dare
not speak it, for it chills the blood in the veinshe beheld that manly
form suspended to the gibbet, with the cap over his brow, while the
distorted
face glowed horribly in the sun.
That was his
Father
!
That boy did not shriek, nor groan, but instantlylike a light
extinguished
suddenlythe fire left his eye, the color his cheek. His lips opened in
a silly smile. The first word he uttered told the story
My father! he cried, and then pointed to the body, and broke into a
laugh.
Oh, it was horrible, that laugh, so hollow, shrill, and wild. The child
of the Martyr was an idiot.
Still, as the crowd gathered round him, as kind hands bore him away,
that pale face was turned over his shoulder toward the gallows:
My Father
!
And still that laugh was borne upon the breeze, even to the gibbet's
timbers, wherein hideous mockery, a blackened but not dishonored thing
swung the body of the
Martyr Hayne
.
This death will strike terror into the hearts of the Rebels!
Poor Lord Rawdon!
Did that man, in his fine uniform, forget that there was a God? Did he
forget that the voice of a Martyr's blood can never die?
This death strike terror into the heart of the Rebels?
It roused one feeling of abhorrence through the whole South. It took
down a thousand rifles from the hooks above the fire-side hearth. It turned
many a doubting heart to the cause of freedom; nay, Tories by hundreds
came flocking to the camp of liberty. The blood of Hayne took root and
grew into an army.
There came a day when George Washington, by the conquest of
Yorktown
,
had in his possession the murderer who did this deed; Lord
Cornwallis
,
who commended, nay commanded it: Lord Rawdon, who signed
the death-warrant.
Here was a glorious chance for Washington to avenge the Martyr Hayne,
who had been choked to death by these men. The feeling of the army,
the voice of Americanay, certain voices that spoke in the British
Parliament
,
would have justified the deed. The law of nations would have
proclaimed
it a holy act. But how did Washington act?
He left each murderer to God and his own conscience. He showed the
whole world a sublime manifestation of forgiveness and scorn.
Forgiveness
for this humilitated Cornwallis, who, so far from bearing Washington
home to London a prisoner in chains, was now a conquered man in the
midst of his captive army.
But this Lord Rawdon, who, captured by a French vessel, was brought
into Yorktown, this arrested murderer, who skulled about the camp, the
object of universal loathing, how did Washington treat him?
He scorned him too much to lay a hand upon his head; from the fulness
of contempt, he permitted him to live.
Poor Lord Rawdon!
Who hears his name now, save as an object, forgotten in the universality
of scorn?
But the Martyrwhere is the heart that does not throb at the mention of
his fate, at the name of
Isaac Hayne
?
XXIII.ARNOLD IN VIRGINIA.
In
the history of the present Mexican war, it is stated, that fifteen women
were driven by the bombardment of Vera Cruz, to take refuge in a church,
near the altar, their pale faces illumined by the same red glare, that revealed
the sculptured image of Jesus and the sad, mild face of the Virgin
Mother.
While they knelt there, a lighted bomba globe of iron, containing at
least three hundred ballscrashed through the roof of the church, descended
in the midst of the women, and exploded
There is not a Fiend, but whose heart would fail him, when surveying
the result of that explosion.
So, upon the homes of Virginia, in December, 1781, burst the Traitor,
Benedict Arnold.
As his ship glided up James River, aided by wind and tidea leaden
sky above, a dreary winter scene around, the other vessels following in the
wakehe stood on its deck, and drew his sword, repeating his oath, to
avenge the death of John Andre!
How did he keep that Oath?
He was always excited to madness in the hour of conflict, always
fighting
like a tigress robbed of her young, but now he concealed the heart of a
Devil, beneath a British uniform. The homes that he burnt, the men that
he stabbed, the murders that dripped from his sword, could not be told in a
volume.
At midnight, over the ice-bound river and frozen snow, a red column of
flame flashed far and wide, rising in terrible grandeur into the star-lit sky.
It was only Arnold and his Men, laying an American home in ashes and
blood.
When morning came, there was a dense black smoke darkening over
33
yonder woods. The first light of the winter's day shone over the maddened
visage of Arnold, cheering on his men to scenes of murder.
The very men who fought under him, despised him. As the officers
received his orders, they could not disguise the contempt of the curved lip
and averted eye. The phantom of Andre never left him. If before he had
been desperate, he was now infernalif Quebec had beheld him a brave
soldier, the shores of James River, the streets of Richmond saw in his form
the image of an Assassin.
Tortured by Remorse, hated, doubted, despised by the men who had
purchased his sword, his honor, Arnold seemed at this time, to become the
Foe of the whole human race.
When not engaged in works of carnage, he would sit alone in his tent,
resting his head in his clenched hand and shading from the light, a face
distorted by demoniac passions.
The memory of Andre was to him, what the cord, sunken in the lacerated
flesh, is to the Hindoo devotee, a dull, gnawing, ever-present pain.
One day he sent a flag of truce, with a letter to La Fayette. The heroic
Boy-General returned the letter without a word. Arnold took the
unanswered
letter, sought the shadow of his tent, and did not speak for some
hours. That calm derision cut him to the soul.
There was brought before him, on a calm winter's day, an American
Captain who had been taken prisoner. Arnold surveyed the hardy soldier,
clad in that glorious blue uniform, which he himself had worn with honor,
and after a pause of silent thought, asked with a careless smile
What will the Americans do with me, in case they take me prisoner?
Hang your body on a gibbet, but bury your leg with the honors of war.
Not the leg that first planted a footstep on the British ship, but the leg that
was broken at Quebec and Saratoga!
Arnold's countenance fell. He asked no more questions of that soldier.
One dark and cheerless winter's evening, as the sun shining from a blue
ridge of clouds, lighted up the recesses of a wood, near the James River, a
solitary horseman was pursuing his way along a path that led from the
forest into a wild morass.
On either side of the path were dangerous bogs, before the traveller a
dreary prospect of ice and reeds, at his back, the unknown wood which he
had just left. He had wandered far from the road, and lost his way.
He covered his face and neck with the cloak, which, drooping over his
erect form, fell in large folds on the back of his horse. The sky was dark
and lowering, the wind sweeping over the swamp, bitter cold. From an
aperture in the clouds, the last gush of sunlight streamed over the ice of the
morass, with that solitary horsemen darkly delineated in the centre.
Suffering the horse to choose his way, the traveller, with his face
concealed
in the cloak, seemed absorbed in his thoughts, while the sun went
down; the night came on; the snow fell in large flakes.
The instinct of the horse guided him through many devious paths, at
last, however, he halted in evident distress, while the falling snow whitened
his dark flanks. The traveller looked around: all had grown suddenly
dark. He could not distinguish the path. Suddenly, however, a light
blazed in his face, and he beheld but a few paces before him, the glow of a
fireside, streaming through an opened door. A miserable hut stood there,
on an island of the swamp, with the immense trunks of leafless trees rising
above its narrow roof.
As the traveller, by that sudden light hurried forward, he beheld standing
in the doorway, the figure of an old man, clad after the Indian style, in
hunting shirt, leggings and moccasins, with a fur cap on his brow.
Who comes thar? the challenge echoed and a rifle was raised.
A friend, who will thank you to direct him to the path which leads into
the high road!
On sich a night as this, I'd reether not! answered the old hunter
How'sever, if you choose to share my fire and Johnny cake, you're
welcome
!
That's all an old soldier can say!
In a few moments, looking into the solitary room of that secluded hut,
you might see the traveller seated on one side of a cheerful fire, built on the
hard clay, while opposite, resting on a log, the old man turned the cake in
the ashes, and passed the whiskey flask.
A lighted pine knot, attached to a huge oaken post which formed the main
support of the roof, threw its vivid glare into the wrinkled face of the hunter.
The traveller, still wrapped in his cloak, seemed to avoid the light, for while
he eagerly partook of the cake and shared the contents of the flask, he
shaded his eyes with his broad chapeau.
Around these two figures were many testimonials of the old man's skill,
and some records of his courage. The antlers of a deer nailed to a post,
the skin of a panther extended along the logs, five or six scalps suspended
from the roof, bore testimony to a life of desperate deeds. By his side,
his powder horn and hunting pouch, and an old rifle, glowed redly in the
light.
The rude meal was finished; the traveller raised his head and glanced
covertly around the place.
You seem comfortable here? A somewhat lonely spot, however, in
the middle of the swamp, with nothing but ice and reeds around you?
The old hunter smiled until his veteran face resembled a piece of
intricate
net work.
If you'd a-been some five years cap-
tive
among the Ingins as I have
been, you'd think this here log hut reether comfortable place!
Youa captive? muttered the traveller.
Look thar! and raising his cap he laid bare his skull, which was at
once divested of the hair and skin. The hideous traces of a savage outrage,
were clearly perceptible.
Thar's whar the Ingins scalped me! But old Bingimin did n't die
jest then!
Where were you, at the time the Indians captured you?
In Canada
Canada? echoed the traveller.
Does that seem pecooliar? chuckled the old manTaken captive in
Canada, I was kept among 'em five years, and did n't get near a white
settlement
,
until a month back. I haint lived here more nor three weeks.
You see I've had a dev'lish tough time of it!
You are not a Canadian?
Old Virginny to the back-bone! You see I went to jine the army near
Boston, with Dan'el MorganYou mought a-happened to heard o' that
man, stranger? A parfict hoss to fight, mind I tell 'ee!
Morgan? whispered the traveller, and his head sunk lower in his cloak.
Yes, you see Morgan and his men jined Arnoldyou've heered of
him?
The traveller removed his seat, or log, from the fire. It was getting
uncomfortably
warm.
Arnoldyes, I think I have heard of that man?
Heer'd of him? Why I reckon, if livin', by this time he's the greatest
man a-goin'! Yes, stranger, I was with him, with Arnold on his v'yge
over land to Quebec! What a parfict devil he was, be sure!
You knew Arnold?
Wer n't I with him all the way, for two months? Die n't I see him
every hour of the day? Nothin' could daunt that fellowhis face was
always the sameand when there was danger, you need n't ask where he
was. Arnold was always in the front!
He was a rash, high-tempered man?
A beaver to work and a wild cat to fight! Hot-tempered as old Sattin,
but mind I tell 'ee, his heart was in the right place. I recollect one day,
we brought to a halt on the banks of a river. Our provisions were gone.
There were n't a morsel left. E'en the dogs an' sarpints had run out. Our
men set about in squads, talkin' the matter over. We were the worst
starved men, that had ever been seen in them parts. Well, in midst of it
all, Arnold calls me asideI see his face yet, with an eye like one of them
fire-coalsses he,
Bingimin, you're a little older than the rest of us!
Take this crust!
And he gives me a bit of bread, that he took from the
breast of his coat. Yes, the Colonelsufferin' himself for breadgive me
the last he had, out of his own mouth!
The old man brushed his eyes with the back of his hand. The traveller
seemed asleep, for his head had fallen on his breast, while his elbows rested
on his knees. The hunter, however, continued his story.
Then you should a-seen him, at the Stormin' o' Quebec! Laws help
us! Why, even when his leg was broke, he cheered his men, and fought,
sword in hand, until he fell in a puddle of his own blood! I tell you, that
Arnold was a born devil to fight!
You said you were captured by the Indians? hastily interrupted the
stranger, keeping his face within the folds of his cloak.
I carried Arnold from the Rock at Quebec, and was with him when the
Americans were retreating toward Lake Champlain. One night, wandering
on the shore, the red skins come upon mebut it's a long story. You
seem to be from civilized parts, stranger. Can you tell me, what's become
of Benedict Arnold? Is he alive?
He is, sullenly responded the traveller.
At the head of the heap, too, I'll be bound! A Continental to the
backbone? Hey? Next to Washington himself?
The traveller was silent.
Maybe, stranger, you can tell me somethin' about the war? You
seem to come from the big cities? What's been doin' lately? The
Continental
Congress still in operation? I did heer, while captive among the
Ingins, that our folks had cut loose altogether from King George?
The strange gentlemen did not answer. His face still shrounded in his
cloak, he folded his arms over his knees, while the old man gazed upon
him with a look of some interest.
So you knew Benedict Arnold? a deep, hoarse voice echoed from the
folds of the cloak.
That I did!And a braver man never
He was brave? Was he?
Like his iron sword, his character was full of dents and notches, but
his heart was always true, and his hand struck home in the hour of battle!
The soldiers liked him?
Reether so! You should have seen 'em follow his voice and eye on
the ramparts of Quebec! They fairly warshipped him
Do you think he loved his country?
Do I think! I don't think about itI
know
it!But you don't seem
welleh? Got a chill? You trimble so. Wait a moment, and I'll put
more wood on the fire.
The stranger rose. Still keeping his cloak about his neck and face, he
moved toward the narrow door.
I must go! he said, in that hoarse voice, which for some unknown
reason, struck on the old man's ear with a peculiar sound.
Go: On sich a night as this? It taint possible!
I must go! You can tell me, the best path from this accursed swamp,
and I will leave without a moment's delay!
The old man was conscious that no persuasion on his part, could change
the iron resolve of the stranger's tone.
In a moment standing in the door, a lighted pine knot in his hand, he
gazed upon the sight revealed by its glareThat cloaked figure mounted on
the dark steed, who with mane and tail waving to the gust, neck arched
and eye rolling, stood ready for the march.
It was a terrible night. The snow had changed to sleet, the wind
swelling
to a hurricane, roared like the voices of ten thousand men clamoring in
battle, over the wilds of the swamp. Although it was in the depth of
winter, the sound of distant thunder was heard, and a pale lurid lightning
flashed from the verge of that dreary horizon.
The old man, with the light flaring now over his withered face, now over
the stranger and his steed, stood in the doorway of his rude home.
Take the track to the rightturn the big oak about a quarter of a mile
from this place, and then you must follow the windin's of the path, as best
you may!But hold, it's a terrible night: I'll not see a fellow bein's life in
peril. Wait a minute, until I get my cap and rifle; I'll go with you to the
edge of the swamp
So you would like to know interrupted the deep voice of the
Stranger
So
you would like to know what has become of Benedict Arnold?
That voice held the old man's eye and ear like a spell. He started
forward
,
holding the torch in his hand, and grasped the stirrup of the traveller.
Then occurred a sudden, yet vivid and impressive scene!
You hear the winter thunder roll, you see the pale lightning glow. That
torch spreads a circle of glaring light around the old man and the horseman,
while all beyond is intensely dark. You behold the brown visage of the
aged soldier, seamed with wrinkles, battered with scars, its keen grey eyes
upraised, the white hairs streaming in the wind.
And then, like some wild creation of that desert waste, you see the
impatient
horse, and the cloaked figure, breaking into the vivid light, and
distinctly
relieved by the universe of darkness beyond.
The old man gazed intently for a moment, and then fell back against the
door-post of his hut, appalled, frightened, thunderstricken. The mingled
despair, wonder, fear, stamped upon his battle-worn face, was frightful to
behold.
The cloak had fallen from the Stranger's shoulders. The old man
beheld
a massive form clad in scarlet, a bronzed visage disturbed by a hideous
emotion, two dark eyes that flashed through the gloom, as with the light of
eternal despair.
Now, do you know me?
thundered that hoarse voice, and a mist came
over the old man's eyes.
When he recovered his consciousness again, the tufted sward before his
hut was vacant. There was the sound of horse's hoofs, crashing through
the swamp, there was the vision of a horse and rider, seen far over the
waste, by the glare of the winter lightning.
The space before the hut was vacant, yet still that old man with his
paralyzed
hand clenching the torch, beheld a hideous vision rising against the
dark sky
a red uniform, a bronzed visage, two burning eyes!
To-night, he falteredthis brave old man, now transformed into a
very coward, by that sightTo-night, I have seen the
Fiend of
Darkness
for
it was notno! It was not
Benedict Arnold
!
And the old man until the hour of his death, firmly believed that the
vision of that night, was a horrible delusion, created by the fiend of
darkness
,
to frighten a brave old soldier. He died, believing still in the
Patriot
Arnold
.
Arnold was afterwards heard to say, that all the shames and scorns,
which had been showered upon his head, never cut him so thoroughly to
the soul, as the fervent admiration of that Soldier of the Wilderness, who
in his lonely wanderings still cherished in his heart, the memory of the
Patriot Arnold
.
XXIV.THE THREE WORDS
WHICH FOLLOWED BENEDICT ARNOLD TO HIS GRAVE.
When
we look for the Traitor again, we find him standing in the steeple
of the New London church, gazing with a calm joy upon the waves of fire
that roll around him, while the streets beneath, flow with the blood of men
and women and children.
It was in September 1781, that Arnold descended like a Destroying
Angel
upon the homes of Connecticut. Tortured by a Remorse, that never
for a moment took its vulture beak from his heart, fired by a hope to please
the King who had bought him, he went with men and horses, swords and
torches, to desolate the scenes of his childhood.
Do you see this beautiful river, flowing so calmly on beneath the light of
the stars? Flowing so silently on, with the valleys, the hills, the orchards
and the plains of Connecticut on either shore.
On one side you behold the slumbering town, with the outlines of Fort
Trumbull rising above its roofs; on the other, a dark and massive pile,
pitched on the summit of rising hills, Fort Griswold.
All is very still and dark, but suddenly two columns of light break into
the star-lit sky. One here from Fort Trumbull, another over the opposite
shore, from Fort Griswold. This column marks the career of Arnold and
his men, that the progress of his Brother in Murder.
While New London baptized in blood and flames, rings with
death-groans
,
there are heard the answering shout of Murder, from the heights of
the Fort on the opposite shore.
While Benedict Arnold stands in the steeple, surveying the work of
assassins, yonder in Fort Griswold a brave young man, who finds all
defence
in vain, rushes toward the British officer and surrenders his sword.
By the light of the musquet flash we behold the scene.
Here the young American, his uniform torn, his manly countenance
marked with the traces of the fight. There the British leader, clad in his
red uniform, with a scowl darkening his red round face.
The American presents his sword; you see the Briton grasp it by the
hilt, and with an oath drive it through that American's heart, transfixing
him with his own blade!
British magnanimity! Now it chains Napoleon to the Rock of St.
Helena, poisoning the life out of him with the persecutions of a Knighted
Tookey, now it hangs the Irish Hero Emmet, because he dared to strike
one blow for his native soil, now it coops a few hundred Scottish men and
women in the ravine of Glencoe, and shoots and burns them to death!
British mercy! Witness it, massacre ground of Paoli witness it, gibbet
of the martyred Hayne, hung in Charleston in presence of his son, witness
it, corse of Leydard stabbed in Fort Griswold with your own surrendered
sword!
Do not mistake me, do not charge me with indulging a narrow and
contracted
national hatred. To me, there are even two Nations of England,
two kinds of Englishmen. The England of Byron and Shakspeare and
Bulwer, I love from my heart. The Nation of Milton, of Hampden, of
Sidney, I hold to form but a portion of that great commonwealth of
freedom
,
in which Jefferson, Henry, and Washington were brothers.
But there is an England that I abhor! There is an Englishman that I
despise! It is that England which finds its impersonation in the bloody
imbecile George the Third, as weak as he was wicked, as blind as he was
cruel, a drivelling idiot, doomed in his reign of sixty years, to set brother
against brother, to flood the American Continent with blood, to convulse a
world with his plunders, and feel at last the Judgment of God in his blighted
reason, his demoralized family, his impoverished nation.
Behold him take the crown, a young and not unhandsome man with the
fairest hopes blossoming round him! Behold him during the idiocy of
forty years, wandering along that solitary corridor of his palace, day after
day, his lip fallen, his eye vacant, his beard moistened by his tears, while
grasping motes with his hands he totters before us, a living witness of the
Divine Right of Kings.
And yet they talk of his private virtues! He was such a good, amiable
man, and gave so many half-pence to the poor; he even took a few shillings
from the millions wrung from the nation, to pamper his royal babes, and
bestowed them in charity, mark you, upon thePeople whom he had
robbed!
I willingly admit his private virtues. But when the King goes up to
Judgment, to answer for his Crimes, will you tell me what becomes of
theMan?
There is a kind of Englishman that I despise, or if you can coin a word
to express the fullness of honest contempt, speak it, and I will echo you!
Behold the embodiment of this Englishman in the person of George the
Fourth, who after a life rich only in the fruits of infamy, after long years of
elaborate pollution, after making his court a brothel the very air in which
he walked a breathing pestilence, went groaning one fine morning from his
perfumed chamber, to an unwept, a detested grave!
On that grave, not one flower of virtue bloomed; on that dishonored
corse, lying in state, not one tear of pity fell. The meanest felon, may
receive on his cold face one farewell tearall the infamous tyrannies, enacted
beside the death-bed of Napoleon, could not prevent the tears of brave men
and heroic women, falling like rain, upon his noble brow. But will you
tell me, the name of the human thing, that shed
one tear
only oneover
George the Fourth?
It is thoughts like these, that stir my blood, when I am forced, to record
the dastardly deeds, performed by British herelings in our Revolution.
That single corse of the heroic Leydard, stabbed with his own sword,
should speak to us with a vice, as eternal as the Justice of Heaven!
While he laid, cold and stiff, on the floor of the conquered fort, the flames
from the burning town spread to the vessels in the river and to the light of
blazing
roofs and sails, Benedict Arnold looked his last upon his childhood's home.
Soon afterward he sailed from our shores, and came back no more. From
this time, forth wherever he went, three whispered words followed him,
singing through his ears into his heart
Arnold the Traitor
.
When he stood beside his king in the House of Lordsthe weak old
man, whispered in familiar tones to his gorgeously attired Generala
whisper crept through the thronged Senate, faces were turned, fingers
extended
,
and as the whisper deepened into a murmur, one venerable Lord
arose and stated that he loved his Sovereign, but could not speak to him,
while by his side there stood
Arnold the Traitor
.
He went to the theatre, parading his warrior form, amid the fairest flowers
of British nobility and beauty, but no sooner was his visage seen, than the
whole audience rosethe Lord in his cushioned seat, the vagrant of
London
in the gallerythey rose together, while from the pit to the dome
echoed the cry
Arnold the Traitor
?
When he issued from his gorgeous mansion, the liveried servant, that ate
his bread, and earned it too, by menial offices, whispered in contempt, to
his fellow lacquey as he took his position behind his Master's carriage
Benedict Arnold the Traitor
.
One day, in a shadowy room, a mother and two daughters, all attired in
the weeds of mourning, were grouped in a sad circle, gazing upon a picture
shrowded in crape. A visitor now advanced; the mother took his card
from the hands of the servant, and the daughters heard his name. Go?
said that mother, rising with a flushed face, while a daughter took each hand
Go! and tell the man, that my threshhold can never be crossed by the
murderer of my sonby
Arnold the Traitor
.
34
Grossly insulted in a public place, he appealed to the companynoble
lords and reverend men were thereand breasting his antagonist with his
fierce brow, he spat full in his face. His antagonist was a man of tried
courage. He coolly wiped the saliva from his cheek. Time may spit
upon me, but I never can pollute my sword by killing
Arnold the
Traitor
!
He left London. He engaged in commerce. His ships were on the
ocean, his warehouses in Nova Scotia, his plantations in the West Indies.
One night his warehouse was burned to ashes. The entire population of
St. John'saccusing the owner of acting the part of incendiary, to his own
property, in order to defraud the insurance companiesassembled in that
British town, in sight of his very widow, they hung an effigy, inscribed
with these words
Arnold the Traitor
.
When the Island of Guadalope was re-taken by the French, he was
among the prisoners. He was put aboard a French prison-ship in the
harbor
.
His moneythousands of yellow guineas, accumulated through the
course of yearswas about his person. Afraid of his own name, he called
himself John Anderson; the name once assumed by John Andre. He
deemed himself unknown, but the sentinel approaching him, whispered that
he was known and in great danger. He assisted him to escape, even aided
him to secure his treasure in an empty cask, but as the prisoner, gliding
down the side of the ship, pushed his raft toward the shore, that sentinel
looked after him, and in broken English sneered
Arnold the Traitor
!
There was a day, when Tallyrand arrived in Havre, hot-foot from Paris.
It was in the darkest hour of the French Revolution. Pursued by the
blood-hounds of the Reign of Terror, stripped of every wreck of poverty
or power, Tallyrand secured a passage to America, in a ship about to sail.
He was going a beggar and a wanderer to a strange land, to earn his bread
by daily labor.
Is there any American gentleman staying at your house? he asked the
Landlord of his HotelI am about to cross the water, and would like a
letter to some person of influence in the New World
The Landlord hesitated for a moment, and then replied:
There is a gentleman up stairs, either from America or Britain, but
whether American or Englishman, I cannot tell.
He pointed the way, and Tallyrandwho in his life, was Bishop, Prince,
Prime Ministerascended the stairs. A venerable supplicant, he stood
before the stranger's door, knocked and entered.
In the far corner of a dimly lighted room, sat a gentleman of some fifty
years, his arms folded and his head bowed on his breast. From a window
directly opposite, a flood of light poured over his forehead. His eyes,
looking from beneath the downeast brows, gazed in Tallyrand's face, with
a peculiar and searching expression. His face was striking in its outline;
the mouth and chin indicative of an iron will.
His form, vigorous even with the snows of fifty winters, was clad in a
dark but rich and distinguished costume.
Tallyrand advancedstated that be was a fugitiveand under the
impression
,
that the gentleman before him was an American, he solicited his
kind offices.
He poured forth his story in eloquent French and broken English.
I am a wandereran exile. I am forced to fly to the New World,
without a friend or a hope. You are an American? Give me, then, I
beseech
you, a letter of introduction to some friend of yours, so that I may be
enabled to earn my bread. I am willing to toil in any mannerthe scenes
of Paris have filled me with such horror, that a life of labor would be
Paradise
,
to a career of luxury in Franceyou will give me a letter to one of
your friends? A gentleman like you, has doubtless, many friends
The strange gentleman rose. With a look that Tallyrand never forgot,
he retreated toward the door of the next chamber, still downcast, his eyes
still looking from beneath his darkened brows.
He spoke as he retreated backward: his voice was full of meaning.
I am the only man, born in the New World, that can raise his hand
to God, and say
I have not one friendnot onein all America
.
Tallyrand never forgot the overwhelming sadness of that look, which
accompanied these words.
Who are you? he cried, as the strange man retreated toward the next
roomYour name?'
My name with a smile that had more of mockery than joy in its
convulsive expressionMy name is
Benedict Arnold
.
He was gone. Tallyrand sank into a chair, gasping the words
Arnold
the Traitor
.
Thus you see, he wandered over the earth, another Cain, with the
murderer's mark upon his brow. Even in the secluded room of that Inn,
at Havre, his crime found him out and faced him, to tell his name, that
name the synonomy of infamy.
The last twenty years of his life, are covered with a cloud, from whose
darkness, but a few gleams of light flash out upon the page of history.
The manner of his death is not distinctly known. But we cannot doubt
that he died utterly friendless, that his cold brow was unmoistened by one
farewell tear, that Remorse pursued him to the grave, whispering John
Andre! in his ears, and that the memory of his course of glory, gnawed
like a canker at his heart, murmuring forever, `true to your country, what
might you have been,
O, Arnold the Traitor
!'
In the closing scene of this wild drama. I have dared to paint the agony
of his death-hour, with a trembling hand and hushed breath, I have lifted
the curtain from the death-bed of Benedict Arnold.
XXV.ARNOLD: HIS GLORY, HIS WRONGS, HIS CRIMES.
Did
you ever, reader, journey among dark mountains, on a stormy night,
with hideous gulfs yawning beneath your feet, the lightning enveloping your
form, with its vivid lightmore terrible from the blackness that followed
the thunder howling in your ears, while afraid to proceed or go back, you
stood appalled, on the verge of a tremendous chasm, which extended deep
and black for half a mile below?
Did you ever after a journey like this, ascend the last mountain top in
your path, behold the clouds roll from the scene of last night's danger, and
the eastern sky, glowing with the kiss of a new-born day? Then you
surveyed the past terror with a smile, and counter the chasms, and measured
the dark ways with a look of calm observation.
So, after our dark and fearful journey over Arnold's life, do we reach
the last mountain top, and the day breaks over us. Not upon
him
, dawns
the blessed lightah, no! But upon us it glows, and we will now look
back upon the long track of his deeds, the waste of his despair, spread far
behind us.
Yes, our journey is near its end. The pleasant valleys of the
Brandywine
will soon invite us to their shadows, soon we will repose beside their
clear waters, and drink the perfume of their flowers, while we listen to the
Legends of Battle, and Love, and Supernatural beauty, that rise like spirits
from those mound-like hills. Yet ere we pass to those shades of Romance
and Dreams, let us, at one bold sweep, survey the life of Arnold, his Glory,
his Wrongs, his Crimes.
He was born at Norwich, Connecticut, on the 3d of January, 1740.
At the age of sixteen, he ran away and joined the British army, was
stationed at Ticonderoga, but unable to endure either the restraint of
discipline
,
or the insults of power, he deserted and returned home.
He was now the only son of a devoted Mother. Left by a drunken father,
to the tender mercies of a World, which is never too gentle to the widow
or the orphan, his character was formed in neglect and hardship. He was
apprenticed to a druggist, and after his apprenticeship removed to New
Haven.
He next became a merchant, shipping horses and cattle and provisions
to the West Indies, and commanding his own vessel. In the West Indies,
his ardent temper involved him in a duel. His strong original genius, soon
led him in the way to wealth; his precipitate enterprize into bankruptcy.
He married at New Haven, a lady named Mansfield, who bore him three
sons, Benedict, Richard, and Henry. The first inherited the father's
temper
,
and met an untimely end. The others settled in Canada after the war:
the wife died at the dawn of the Revolution.
One sister, a noble-hearted woman, Hannah Arnold, clung to him in all
the changes of his life, and never for an hour swerved from the holy
tenderness
of a sister's faith.
In May, 1775, he shared with Ethan Allen, the glory of Ticonderoga.
In September, 1775, with such men as Daniel Morgan, the great
Rifleman
,
and Christopher Greene, afterward the hero of Red Bank, under his
command, together with eleven hundred men, he commenced his expedition
through the Wilderness, to Quebec. After two months of suffering and
hardship, without a parallel in our history, he arrived at Point Levy,
opposite
Quebec, having accomplished a deed that conferred immortal honor to
his name.
On the last day of the year, 1775, he led the attack on Quebec.
Congress
awarded him for his gallant expedition and brilliant attack, with the
commission of brigadier general.
After the campaign of Canada was over, Arnold was accused of
misconduct
in seizing certain goods at Montreal. The testimony of the first
historian
in our country, proves, that in the removal of these goods, he was
neither practising any secret manuvre, nor did he endeavor to retain them
in his possession. It is well to bear these truths in mind: the charge of
misconduct at Montreal, has been suffered almost to grow into history.
He was next appointed to the command of a fleet on Lake Champlain.
The nation rung with the fame of his deeds. On the water, as on the land,
his indomitable genius bore down all opposition.
A week before the battle of Trenton, he joined Washington's Camp, on
the west side of the Delaware, remained with the Chieftain three days, and
then hastened to Providence, in order to meet the invaders on the New
England coast.
In February, 1777, the first glaring wrong was visited upon his head.
Congress appointed five new major generals, without including him in the
list: all were his juniors in rank, and one was from the militia.
Washington
was astonished and surprised at this measure; he wrote a letter to
Arnold, stating that the promotion which was due to your seniority, was
not overlooked for want of merit in you.
While on a journey from Providence to Philadelphia, where he intended
to demand an investigation of his conduct, he accomplished the brilliant
affair of Danbury.
Congress heard of this exploit, and without delay, Arnold was promoted
to the rank of Major General. With an inconsistency not easily explained,
the date of his commission was still left below the other five major
generals.
We next behold him in Philadelphia, boldly demanding an investigation
of his character, at the hands of Congress. The Board of War, to whom
all charges were referred, after examining all the papers, and conversing
with the illustrious Carrol, (Commissioner at Montreal) declared that the
character and conduct of General Arnold had been groundlessly and cruelly
aspersed.
Congress confirmed that report, complimented Arnold with the gift of an
elegantly caparisoned horse, yet still neglected to restore him to his
hard-won
rank. This was the best way that could have been adopted to worry
a brave man into madness.
While his accounts lingered in the hands of Congress, Arnold was
appointed
to command the army then convening in the vicinity of
Philadelphia
.
This duty he discharged with his usual vigor.
At last, chafed by the refusal of Congress to settle his accounts, and
adjust his rank, he resigned his commission in these words:
I am ready to risk my life for my Country, but honor is a sacrifice
that no man ought to make
At this crisis came the news of the fall of Ticonderoga, and the approach
of a formidable Army under Burgoyne. On the same day that Congress
received the resignation, they also received a letter from Washington,
recommending
that Arnold should be immediately sent to join the northern
army.
He is active, judicious, and brave, and an officer in whom the militia
will repose great confidence
.
This was the language of Washington.
Arnold did not hesitate a moment. He took up his sword once more,
only hoping that his claims would be heard, after he had fought the battles
of his country.
He even consented to be commanded in the northern army, by General
St. Clair, who had been promoted over his head. With all his rashness,
all his sense of bitter wrong and causeless neglect, on this occasion, he acted
with heroic magnanimity.
In the two Battles of Saratoga, the one fought on September the 19th,
and the action of Oct. 7th, Arnold was at once the General and the Hero.
From 12 o'clock, until night on the 19th, the battle was fought entirely by
Arnold's division, with the exception of a single regiment from another
brigade
.
There was no general officer on the field during the day. Near
night, Col. Lewis, arriving from the scene of action, stated that its progress
was undecisive. I will soon put an end to it, exclaimed Arnold, and set
off in full gallop for the field.
Gates was so far forgetful of justice, as to avoid mentioning the name of
Arnold or his division in his despatches. A quarrel ensued, and Arnold
resigned his command.
On the 7th of Oct., without a command, he rushed to the field and led
the Americans to victory. It is a singular fact, says Sparks, that an
officer, who really had no command in the army, was leader in one of the
most important and spirited battles of the Revolution.
At last Congress gave him the full rank which he claimed.
If ever a man won his way to rank, by heaping victory on victory, that
man was Benedict Arnold.
In May, 1778, Arnold joined the army at Valley Forge.
But a short time elapsed ere he established his headquarters in
Philadelphia
,
as Military Governor or Commander.
Here, he prohibited the sale of all goods in the city, until a joint
Committee
of Congress and the Provincial Council should ascertain, whether
any of the property belonged to King George or his subjects. This
measure
,
of course sanctioned by Washington and Congress, surrounded him
with enemies, who were increased in number and malignancy, by his
impetuous
temper, his luxurious style of living, and his manifest consciousness
of fame and power.
He had not been a month at Philadelphia, ere he solicited a command in
the navy.
It was at this time, that he sent five hundred dollars, out of his contracted
means, to the orphan children of Warren, and pressed their claims upon
the notice of Congress.Six weeks before the consummation of his treachery,
he sent a letter to Miss Scollay, who protected the hero's children,
announcing
that he had procured from Congress, the sum of thirteen hundred
dollars, for their support and education.
Soon after he assumed command in Philadelphia, he married Miss
Shippen
,
a beautiful girl of eighteen, daughter of a gentleman, favorable to the
King, and an intimate acquaintance of John Andre. This marriage encircled
Arnold with a throng of Tory associates. So familiar was the intimacy of
his wife with John Andre, that she corresponded with him, after the British
left the city and returned to New York.
His enemies now began their work. A list of charges against him, with
letters and papers was presented to Congress, by General Joseph Reed,
President of Pennsylvania, and referred to a committee of inquiry.
That Committee vindicated Arnold from any criminality in the matters
charged against him.
Congress did not act upon their report, but referred the matter to a joint
Committee of their body and of the Assembly and Council of Pennsylvania.
At last, Washington ordered a Court Martial, and gave notice to the
respective parties.
The accusers were not ready at the appointed time. The trial was put
off to allow them to collect evidence.
Three months had now elapsed since the charges were first presented to
Congress.
On the 18th of March, 1779, Arnold resigned his commission.
The day finally agreed upon, was the 1st of June, 1779, the place,
Middlebrook.
At this time the enemy in New York made threatening demonstrations,
and the Court Martial was again postponed.
Arnold then formed the project of forming a settlement for the soldiers
and officers who had served under him. He wished to obtain the grant of
a tract of land in Western New York. The members of Congress from
that state seconded his wishes, and wrote a joint letter to Governor Clinton,
soliciting his aid:
To you Sir, or to our state, General Arnold can require no
recommendation
:
a series of distinguished services, entitle him to respect and
favor
The President of Congress, the virtuous Jay, enforced the same
application
in a private letter to Governor Clinton. He said
Generosity to Arnold will be Justice to the State
.
These testimonies speak for themselves. Was Arnold without noble and
virtuous friends?
Still with the odium of an unconvicted criminal upon his head, he was
attacked by a Mob, his person assaulted and his house surrounded. In
tones of bitter indignation he demanded a guard from Congress, and was
refused.
Time wore on, and the trial came at last. It commenced at Morristown,
on the 20th of December, and continued until the 26th of January 1780.
He was thoroughly acquitted on the first two charges; the other two
were sustained in part, but not so far as to imply a criminal intention.
He gave a written protection, (while at Valley Forge,) for a vessel to
proceed
to sea. He used the baggage wagons of Pennsylvania. These were
his offences; for these he was sentenced to be reprimanded by Washington.
At least thirteen months had passed, from the time of the first accusation
until he was brought to trial. In the course of this time, he made his first
approaches of Treason.
Plunged into debt, he wished to enter the service of the French King,
to join an Indian tribe, to betray his country to the British. The
French Minister met his offer with a pointed refusal, his mysterious
proposition
to become the Chief of the red men, was never carried into effect;
the only thing that remained, the betrayal of his country, was now to be
accomplished.
Supported by powerful influence, he obtained command of West Point.
He had corresponded for some months with Sir Henry Clinton, through
the letters of his wife to Major Andre. Andre affixed to his letter the
signature
,
John Anderson
, and Arnold was known as
Gustavus
. Andre from
a mere correspondent and friend of the wife, was at last selected as the
great co-partner in the work of Treason. He was raised to the position of
Adjutant General, and when the fall of West Point was accomplished, was
to be created a Brigadier General.
The Conspirators met within the American lines; by some inexplicable
mistake Andre failed to go on board the Vulture, attempted to return to New
York by land, and was captured by Paulding, Williams, and Van Wert.
He was captured on the 23d of September, 1780. On the 25th, Arnold
escaped to the Vulture. On the 2nd of October, at twelve o'clock, Andre
was hung.
In May 1781, Arnold returned to New York from Virginia, thus
narrowly
escaping the capitulation of Yorktown; in September he laid New
London in ashes; and in December he sailed from the Continent for
England.
Thus plainly in short sentences and abrupt paragraphs, without the least
attempt at eloquence or display, you have the prominent points of Arnold's
career before you.
Judge every heart for itself, the mystery of his wonderful life!
A friendless boy becomes a merchant, a man of wealth, a bankrupt, a
druggist. From the druggist he suddenly flashes into the Hero of the
Wilderness
and Quebec, the Victor of Champlain and Saratoga. In renown as
a soldier and general, having no superior save Washington, he is constantly
pursued by charges, and as constantly meets them face to face. The best
men of the nation love him, Washington is his friend, and yet after the
torture
of thirteen months delay, his accusers press their charges home, and
he is disgraced for using the public wagons of Pennsylvania.
Married to a beautiful wife, he uses her letters to an intimate friend as
the vehicles of his treason, and afterwards meets that friend as a brother
conspirator. Resolved to betray his country, he does not frankly break his
sword, and before all the world proclaim himself a friend of the King, but
in darkness and mystery plans the utter ruin of Washington's army.
His star rises at Quebec, culminates at Saratoga, and sets in eternal night
in the reprimand of Morristown. When it appears again, it is no longer a
star, but a meteor streaming along a midnight sky, and flashing a sepulchral
light over the ruins of a world.
The track of his glory covers the space of five years.
When we contemplate his life, we at once scorn and pity, despise and
admire, frown and weep. His strange story convulses us with all
imaginable
emotion. So much light, so much darkness, so much glory, so much
dishonor, so much meanness, so much magnanimity, so much iron-hearted
despair, so much womanly tenderness in the form of Benedict Arnold! In
the lonely hours of night, when absorbed in the books which tell of him, or
searching earnestly the memorials which are left on the track of time, to
record his career, I have felt the tears come to my eyes, and the blood beat
more tumultuously at my heart.
If there is a thing under Heaven, that can wring the heart, it is to see a
Great Man deformed by petty passions, a Heroic Soul plunged all at once
into the abyss of infamy. We all admire Genius in its eagle flightbut
who has the courage to behold its fall?
To see the Eagle that soared so proudly toward the rising sun, fall with
broken wing and torn breast into the roadside mireto see the white
35
column that rose so beautifully through the night of a desert waste, the
memorial of some immortal deed, suddenly crumble into dustto see the
form that we have loved as a holy thing, in a moment change into a leprous
deformityWho would not weep?
And then through the mist of sixty-seven years, the agonized words of
Washington thrills us with deep emotionWhom he cried,
Whom
can we trust now
?
You may not be able to appreciate my feelings when I survey the career
of Arnold, but you will in any event, do justice to the honesty of my
purpose
.
Arnold has not one friend, on the wide earth of God, unless indeed
his true-hearted sister survives. His name is a Blot, his memory a
Pestilence
.
Therefore no mercenary considerations sway me in this my solemn
task. Had money been my object, I might have served it better, by
writing
certain Traitors into Heroes, and believe me there are plenty of
grand-children
,
with large fortunes, who would pay handsomely to have it done.
But Arnoldwhere is there a friendto pay for one tear shed over his
dishonored grave?
Guided by the same feeling with which I investigated the character of
Washington, and found it more Pure and Beautiful than even the dull history
tells it, I have taken up Arnold and looked at him in every light, and to his
good and evil, rendered
Justice
.
Those who expect to find in my pages, a minute record of his petty
faultshow he burnt grasshoppers when a little boy, or swindled grown
men out of fine black horses, when a warriorwill be wofully disappointed.
It may be true that he defrauded some one of the price of a horse, but
while we abuse him for the deed, let us at least remember, that he had a
strange way of killing his horses throughout the war. It was his chance
to ride ever in the front of the fight. Then as he plunged into the jaws of
Death, snatching the laurel leaf of victory from the brow of a skull, his
horse would fall under him, gored by a chain-shot, or rent by a cannon ball.
It was my intention to have drawn a portrait of his character, in
conclusion
of this Tragedy, to have compared him with the heroes and
accursed
ones of olden times, but the pen drops from my hand
I can only say
Lucifer was the Son of the Morning, brightest and most beautiful of all
the hosts of Heaven. Pride and Ambition worked his ruin. But when he
fell, the angels were bathed in tears.
XXVI.THE RIGHT ARM.
Fifty
years ago, a terrible storm shook the city of London. At the dead
of night, when the storm was at its highest, an aged minister, living near
one of the darkest suburbs of the city, was aroused by an earnest cry for
help. Looking from his window, he beheld a rude man, clad in the coarse
attire of a sweeper of the public streets. In a few moments, while the rain
came down in torrents, and the storm growled above, that preacher, leaning
on the arm of the scavenger, threaded his way to the dark suburb, listening
meanwhile to the story of the dying man.
That very day, a strange old man had fallen speechless, in front of the
scavenger's rude home. The good-hearted street-sweeper had taken him
inlaid him on his bedhe had not once spokenand now he was dying.
This was the story of that rough man.
And now through dark alleys, among miserable tenements, that seemed
about to topple down upon their heads, into the loneliest and dreariest
suburb of the city, they passed, that white-haired minister and his guide.
At last into a narrow court, and up dark stairs, that cracked beneath their
tread, and then into the death room.
It was in truth a miserable place.
A glimmering light stood on a broken chair.There were the rough
walls, there the solitary garret window, with the rain beating in, through
the rags and straw, which stuffed the broken panes,and there, amid a heap
of cold ashes, the small valise, which it seems the stranger had with him.
In one corner, on the coarse straw of the ragged bed, lay the dying man.
He was but half-dressed; his legs were concealed in long military boots.
The aged preacher drew near, and looked upon him. And as he looked,
throbthrobthrobyou might hear the death-watch ticking in the
shattered
wall.
It was the form of a strong man, grown old with care more than age.
There was a face, that you might look upon but once, and yet wear in
your memory for ever.
Let us bend over the bed, and look upon that face: A bold forehead,
seamed by one deep wrinkle between the browslong locks of dark hair,
sprinkled with greylips firmly set, yet quivering as though they had a
life, separate from the life of the manand then two large eyes, vivid,
burning, unnatural in their steady glare.
Ah, there was something so terrible in that facesomething so full of
unutterable loneliness, unspeakable despairthat the aged minister started
back in horror.
But look! Those strong arms are clutching at the vacant airthe
death-sweat
starts in drops upon that bold browthe man is dying.
Throbthrobthrobbeats the death-watch in the shattered wall.
Would you die in the faith of the Christian? faltered the preacher, as
he knelt there, on the damp floor.
The white lips of the death-stricken man trembled, but made no sound.
Then, with the strong agony of death upon him, he rose into a sitting
posture. For the first time, he spoke:
Christian! he echoed in that deep tone, which thrilled the preacher to
the heart, will that faith give me back my honor? Come with me, old
mancome with me, far over the waters. Hah! we are there! This is
my native town. Yonder is the church in which I knelt in childhood
yonder the green on which I sported when a boy. But another flag waves
yonder in place of the flag that waved when I was a child. And listen,
old man, where I to pass along the street, as I passed when but a child, the
very babes in their cradles would raise their tiny hands and curse me.
The graves in yonder graveyard would shrink from my footsteps, and yonder
flagwould rain a baptism of blood upon my head?
That was an awful death-bed. The minister had watched the last
night with a hundred convicts in their cells, and yet never beheld a scene
so terrible as this.
Suddenly the dying man arose. He tottered along the floor. With those
white fingers, whose nails are blue with the death-chill, he threw open the
valise. He drew from thence a faded coat of blue, faced with silver, an
old parchment, a piece of damp cloth, that looked like the wreck of a
battle-flag.
Look ye, priest, this faded coat is spotted with my blood! he cried, as
old memories seemed stirring at his heart. This coat I wore, when I
first heard the news of Lexingtonthis coat I wore, when I planted the
banner of the stars on Ticonderoga! That bullet-hole was pierced in the
fight of Quebec; and nowI am alet me whisper it in your ear!
He hissed that single, burning word into the minister's ear.
Now help me, priest, he said, in a voice grown suddenly tremulous;
help me to put on this coat of blue and silver. For you see and a
ghastly smile came over his facethere is no one here to wipe the cold
drops from my brow; no wifeno childI must meet death alone; but I
will meet him, as I have met him in battle, without a fear!
And while he stood arraying his limbs in that worm-eaten coat of blue
and silver, the good preacher spoke to him of faith in Jesus. Yes, of that
great faith, which pierces the clouds of human guilt, and rolls them back
from the face of God.
Faith! echoed that strange man, who stood there, erect, with the
death-chill on his brow, the death-light in his eye. Faith? Can it give
me back my honor? Look, ye priest, there over the waves, sits George
Washington, telling to his comrades, the pleasant story of the eight years'
warthere in his royal halls sits George of England, bewailing in his idiot
voice, the loss of his Colonies. And here am IIwho was the first to
raise the flag of freedom, the first to strike a blow against that Kinghere
am I, dying, ah, dying like a dog!
The awe-stricken preacher started back from the look of the dying man,
while throbthrobthrobbeat the death-watch in the shattered wall.
Hush! silence along the lines there! he muttered, in that wild absent
tone, as though speaking to the dead; silence along the lines! Not a
word, not a word on peril of your lives. Hark you, Montgomery, we will
meet in the centre of the town. We will meet there, in victory, or die!
Hist! Silence, my mennot a whisper, as we move up these steep rocks!
Now on, my boys, now on! Men of the Wilderness, we will gain the
town!Now up with the banner of the starsup with the flag of freedom,
though the night is dark and the snow falls! Nownow shrieked that
death stricken man, towering there, in the blue uniform, with his clenched
hands waving in the airnow, now! One blow more, and Quebec is
ours!
And look! His eye grows glassy. With that word on his, he stands
thereah, what a hideous picture of despair, erect, livid, ghastly! There
for a moment, and then he falls! He is dead!
Ah, look at that proud form, thrown cold and stiff upon the damp floor.
In that glassy eye there lingers, even yet, a horrible energya sublimity
of despair.
Who is this strange man, dying here alone, in this rude garretthis man,
who, in all his crimes, still treasured up that blue uniform, that faded flag?
Who is this being of horrible remorse?this man, whose memories seem
to link something of heaven, and more of hell?
Let us look at that parchment and flag
The aged minister unrolls that faded flagit is a blue banner, gleaming
with thirteen stars.
He unrolls that parchment. It is a colonel's commission in the
Continental
army, addressed to
Benedict Arnold
!
And there, in that rude hut, while the death-watch throbbed like a heart
in the shattered wallthere, unknown, unwept, in all the bitterness of
desolation
,
lay the corse of the Patriot and the Traitor.
O, that our own true Washington had been there, to sever that good right
arm from the corse, and while the dishonored body rotted into dust, to bring
home that good right arm, and embalm it among the holiest memories of
the Past.
For that right arm struck many a gallant blow for freedom, yonder at
Ticonderoga, at Quebec, Champlain, and SaratogaTHAT ARM, YONDER,
BENEATH THE SNOW-WHITE MOUNTAIN, IN THE DEEP SILENCE OF THE RIVER
OF THE DEAD, FIRST RAISED INTO LIGHT THE
Banner of the Stars
.
BOOK FOURTH.
THE BATTLE OF BRANDYWINE.
THE BATTLE OF BRANDYWINE.
I.THE GLORY OF THE LAND OF PENN.
Beautiful
in her solitary grandeurfair as a green island in a desert
waste, proud as a lonely column, reared in the wildernessrises the land
of Penn, in the History of America.
Here, beneath the Elm of Shackamaxon, was first reared the holy altar
of Toleration.
Here, from the halls of the old State House, was first proclaimed, that
Bible of the Rights of Manthe Declaration of Independence.
Here, William Penn asserted the mild teachings of a Gospel, whose
every word was Love. Here, Franklin drew down the lightnings from the
sky, and bent the science of ages to the good of toiling man. Here,
Jefferson
stood forth, the consecrated Prophet of Freedom, proclaiming, from
Independence Hall, the destiny of a Continent, the freedom of a People.
Here, that band of men, compared to whom the Senators of Rome
dwindle
into parish demagogues,the Continental Congressheld their solemn
deliberations, with the halter and the axe before their eyes.
New England we love for her Adams', her Hancocks, and her Warrens.
Her battlefields of Bunker Hill and Concord and Lexington, speak to us
with a voice that can never die. The South, too, ardent in her fiery blood,
luxuriant in flowers and fruits, we love for her Jefferson, her Lees, her
immortal
Patrick Henry. Not a rood of her soil but is richer for the martyr
blood of heroes.
But while we love the North or the South for their Revolutionary glories,
we must confess that the land of Penn claims a glory higher and holier than
either. The glory of the Revolution is hers, but the mild light of science
irradiates her hills, the pure Gospel of William Penn shines forever over
the pages of her past.
While we point to Maryland for her Calvert and her Carroll, to Jersey
for her Witherspoon, to Delaware for her Kirkwood and M'Lanewhile
we bow to the Revolutionary fame of New England and the South, we
must confess that the land of Penn has been miserably neglected by history.
It is a singular fact, that while all other States have their eulogists, their
historians, and their orators, to speak of their past glory, their present
prosperity
,
and their present fame, yet has Pennsylvania been neglected; she
has been slighted by the historian; her triumphs and her glories have been
made a matter of sparse and general narrative.
Our own fair land of Penn has no orator to celebrate her glories, to point
to her past; she has no Pierpont to hymn her illustrious dead; no Jared
Sparks to chronicle her Revolutionary granduer.
And yet the green field of Germantown, the twilight vale of the
Brandywine
,
the blood-nurtured soil of Paoli, all have their memories of the Past,
all are stored with their sacred treasure of whitened bones. From the far
North, old Wyoming sends forth her voicefrom her hills of granduer and
her vallies of beauty, she sends her voice, and at the sound the Mighty Dead
of the land of Penn sweep by, a solemn pageant of the Past. The
character
of the Pennsylvanian has been mockingly derided, by adventurers from
all parts of the Union. We have been told that our peoplethe
Pennsylvanians
had
no enterprise, no energy, no striking and effective qualities.
Southern chivalry has taunted us with our want of daring ardor in the
resentment
of insult; Northern speculation has derided our sluggishness in
falling into all the mad adventures of these gambling and money-making times.
To the North we make no reply. Let our mountains, with their stores
of exhaustless wealth, answer; let the meadows of Philadelphia, the rich
plains of old Berks, the green fields of Lancaster answer; let old
Susquehannah
,
with her people of iron nerve, and her mountain-shores of wealth
and cultivation, send forth her reply.
And to the Southwhat shall be our answer? They ask for our
illustrious
dead! They point to the blood stained fields of Carolina. They ask,
where are your fields of battle? They point to Marionto Sumpterto
Leeto all the host of heroes who blaze along the Southern sky
Pennsylvanians
,
where are your heroes of the Revolution?
They need not ask their question more than once. For, at the sound,
from his laurelled grave in old Chester, springs to life again, the hero of
Pennsylvania's olden time, the undaunted General, the man of Paoli and of
Stony Point, whose charge was like the march of the hurricane, whose
night-assault scared the British as though a thunderbolt had fallen in their midst.
We need not repeat his name. The aged matron, sitting at the
farm-house
door of old Chester, in the calm of summer twilight, speaks that
name to the listening group of grand-children, and the old Revolutioner,
trembling on the verge of the grave, his intellect faded, his mind broken,
and his memory gone, will start and tremble with a new life at the name,
and as he brushes the tear from the quivering eye-lid of age, will exclaim
with a feeling of pride that a century cannot destroyII, too, was a
soldier withmad Anthony Wayne!
Bunker Hill has its monument, New England her historians, South
Carolina
her oratorsbut the field of Germantown, and the meadows of
Brandywine
where
are their monumental pillars, their historians, their orators?
And yet the freemen of our Land of Penn may stroll over the green lawn
36
of Germantown, mark the cannon-rifts on the walls of Chew's House, hear
the veteran of the Revolution discourse of the bloodshed of the 4th of
October
,
1777and count the mounds that mark the resting place of the dead,
and feel his heart throb, and his pulse warm, although no monumental
pillar arises from the green lawn, no trophied column consecrates the
repose
of the slain.
And when the taunt falls from the lips of the wanderer and adventurer,
when the South sneers and the north derides, then let the Pennsylvanian
remember that though the Land of Penn has no history, yet is her story
written on her battlefields of blood; that though she has no marble pillars,
or trophied columns, yet her monuments are enduring and undecaying
they are therebreaking evermore into the skyher monuments are her
own eternal mountains.
Her dead are scattered over the Continent;Quebec and Saratoga,
Camden and Bunker Hill, to this hour retain their bones!
Nameless and unhonored, Poor Men Heroes of Pennsylvania
sleep the last slumber on every battlefield of the Revolution. Their
history
would crowd ten volumes like this; it has never been written.
In every spear of grass that grows on our battlefields, in every wild
flower that blooms above the dead of the Revolution, you read the quiet
heroism of the children of the Land of Penn.
Be just to us, People of the North! Do not scorn our history, Chivalry
of the South!
While we gladly admit the brightness of your fame, do not utterly forget
the nameless and neglected
Heroes of the Land of Penn
.
II.THE PROPHET OF THE BRANDYWINE.
The
Alleghanies lifting their summits into the sky, while their sides are
gorgeous with the draperies of autumn, and old Susquehanna flows grandly
at their feet! This is a sight at once religious and sublime.
The Wissahikon, flowing for miles through its dark gorge, where grey
rocks arise and giant pines interlock their branches from opposing cliffs!
This is a sight of wild romancea vision of supernatural beauty.
But when you seek a vision of that pastoral loveliness, which fired the
poets of Greece and Rome,that loveliness which presents in one view, the
ripeness of the orchard, the green slope of the meadow, the mirror-like
beauty of tranquil waters,then come with me to the shades of Brandywine!
In the southern part of old Chester Countynear the line of
Pennslyvania
and Delawarethis valley bursts on your eye, in one vivid panorama
of beauty and gloom.
It seems as though the hand of God, stretched out from yonder sky, had
scattered his blessings broadcast over hill and dale.
A clear and glassy stream, now overshadowed by drooping elm or oaken
trees, now open to the gleam of the sunlight, winds along amid the recesses
of this valley. Sloping to the east, a plain of level earth spreads green and
grassya lake of meadowwinding with each bend of the rivulet on the
one side, and arising on the other into massive, mound-like hills. These
hills are baptized in beauty. Here crowded into one glowing view, you
may behold the chesnut, the oak, and the beech tree; here you may see
the brown field of upturned earth, the green corn, the golden wheat, the
meadowy pasturage.
It is, indeed, a lovely valley.
In the summer time, those ancient farm-houses, scattered along the bed
of the vale, look out from amid the rustic beauty of embroidered verdure.
Each knoll is magnificent with the foliage of its clustered trees. The wild
vine on the rock, the forest flowers scattered over the ground, the grapes
drooping in clusters from the tall trees, silence and shadow in the bushy
dells, music and verdure on the plainah, it is beautiful in summer time,
this valley of the meadow and rivulet. Here indeed, the verdure seems
richer, the skies more serene; here the hills arise with a more undulating
grandeur, than in any other valley throughout the Continent. The Hudson
is sublime; the Susquehanna terrible and beautiful; the Wissahikon lone
and supernatural in its beauty; but the witchery of the Brandywine is at
once quiet, gentle, and full of peace. A sinless virgin with gentle thoughts
gleaming from her mild eye, soft memories flushing over her young cheek,
grace in her gestures and music in her voicesuch is the Brandywine
among rivers, such her valley among other valleys!
Far away from the Brandywine, yet within an half hour's ride in the
centre of this Garden of the Lord, arises an old-time church.
Here are no towers to impress the soul with images of gloom; no marble
monuments to glare upon you through the night; here is no majestic dome
swelling up with the sky, with its cross gleaming in the stars. No!
A plain one storied fabric, stands in one corner of a small enclosure of
dark green grass. This enclosure is fenced from the field and highway by
a wall of grey stone; this fabric, built of the same kind of stone, is
surmounted
by a plain roof. Such is the Meeting House, such the Graveyard
of the Brandywine.
Yet there are certain dim stains of blood upon those walls; there are
marks of bullet and cannon ball along that roof.
I never shall forget that calm still hour, when my foot pressed the
graveyard
sod. It was in the purple glory of an evening in fall. The sky all
azure and gold, arched calmly overhead. Around lay the beautiful sweep
of hill and valley; here an orchard heavy with ripened fruit; yonder a
quaint old farm-house; and far away the summit of the battle hill crowned
with woods, rose up into the evening sky. There was a holy calmness, a
softened sadness on the air.
Standing by that rude wall, I looked upon the mounds of the graveyard,
and examined with a reverential glance, the most minute details of the old
fabric, its walls and doors, windows and roof. As I stood there, a stranger
and a pilgrim on that holy ground, an old man stood by my side, his wrinkled
visage glowing with the last radiance of day. He was grey-haired. His
dress was a plain farmer's costume, and as for his speech, although not a
Quaker, he said thee and thou.
And while the silence of evening gathered round us, that old man told me
stories of the battle-field that thrilled my blood. He was but a boy on the
battle-day, yet he remembered the face of Washington, the look of La
Fayette, the hearty war-shout of Anthony Wayne. He also had a memory
of a wild dusky figure, that went crashing over the field on a black horse,
with long flakes of dark hair flying over his shoulders. Was this the
Count Pulaski?
Yet there was one legend, falling from the old man's lips, which struck
my soul with its supernatural beauty.
It was not the legend of the maiden, who watching the setting moon, in
the silence of midnight, beheld a dark cloud lowering over the valley, and
thronged with the phantoms of opposing armies.Nor was it that wild
tradition
of Lord Percy, whose grave was at my feet. No! It was a legend
of a Sabbath day, some forty years before the battle, when Peace stood
serene and smiling on these hills, her hands extended in blessings over the
valley. It was a legend which impresses us with the belief that God sends
his warning voice to the sons of men, ere they pollute his earth with the
blood of battle.
More than one hundred years agoforty years before the battlethe
plain walls of the Quaker Meeting House arose in the calm light of a
Sabbath
afternoon, in the first flush of June.
Here in the stillness of that Sabbath hour, the Quaker brethren were
assembled
,
listening to the earnest words of the preacher, who stood in their
midst.
He stood there, in that rude gallery which supplied the place of pulpit
and altar, his snow-white hair sweeping to his shoulders, while his calm
blue eyes shone with a mild light, as he spake of the Saviour, who hung
upon the cross, for the salvation of all mankind.
Yes, in calm and even tones, touched with a deep pathos, he spoke of
the life of Jesus. While his accents fell round the rude placeas the
breeze of June came softly through the opened windows, as a vision of hill
and valley lay there, mellowing in the light of the afternoon sunhis
hearers were hushed into deep silence
Yon aged Quaker therewhose white hairs had once been pressed by
the hands of William Penn, bent his head upon his staff and listenedyon
bold backwoodsman, standing beside the open window, in his robes of fur,
crossed his arms upon his breast, as the story of the Saviour's life broke
on his ears; nay, even the wild and wandering Indian, won by the tones of
the preacher's voice, dropped his knife and rifle on the graveyard sod, and
standing silent and motionless in yonder door-way, listened with a mute
wonder to that strange story of
Jesus
.
And there, listening also to the preacher's words, was woman; yes,
woman
,
with her big eyes dim with tears, her parted lips quivering with
suspense
,
leaning forward with clasped hands as the name of Jesus trembled
on her earyes, clad in her Quaker garb, yet with all her loveliness about
her, there was woman, listening to that story which she is never tired of
hearing: the story of the Saviour and the three beautiful women, who
watched and wept with him, and when all the world forsook him, still came
weeping to his tomb.
Then the old man, in a tremulous voice, pictured the horrors of that
awful day when Jerusalem was deserted by her people; while Calvary
throbbed with the beating of ten thousand heartswhen the world was
dark, while its Saviour suspended to the cross, looked down, even in the
moment of his agony, and beheld
woman watching there!
Dilating in this great theme, that aged man began to predict the reign of
peace over all the world.
This valley, he said, elevating his form, and speaking in the low deep
tone of a prophet, This valley shall never be stained with human
blood!
His attitude, his voice, that uplifted handall were sublime.
As he stood, a silence like the grave, prevailed throughout the Quaker
church.
Here Peace, driven from the old world shall find a home at last. War
may ravage the old world, Murder may look down upon its battle-fields, and
Persecution light its flames! But here, yea, here in this beautiful valley,
shall the sons of men rear at last the altar to the
Unknown God
that God
of Peace, whose face for near two thousand years, has been hidden by the
smoke of slaughter. Here shall be reared the altar of peace; this valley
shall never be stained with human blood!
His manner was rapt, his tone eloquent, but even as the word Peace,
rung from his lips, an awful change came over him. He stood there
clasping
the railing of the pulpit with trembling handshis brow was damp, as
with death-sweathis blue eye shone with a wild deep light.
The brethren started from their seats in awe and wonder.
Look! cried the aged preacher, in gasping tones, Look! The
vision of God is upon me!
Then his eye was fixed upon vacancy, and in a hollow voice, as though
some awful scene of human guilt was before his sight, he spoke this strange
prophecy:
This is a quiet and happy place, my brethren, and the Sabbath
sunbeams
shine with a mild glow upon your calm and peaceful faces!
But the day cometh, yea, the Lord speaks, and I hear! The day
cometh when those mild sunbeams shall shine through yonder windows,
but shine upon heaps of dying, heaps of dead, piled up within these solemn
walls!
The day cometh when the red waves of battle shall roll over yonder
meadowwhen the quiet of these walls shall be broken by the cry of
mortal agony, the groan of the parting soul, the blasphemy of the sinner,
dying the death of murder, blood upon his brow, and despair in his heart!
Here woman shall weep for her husband, butchered in battle; here the
maiden shall place her hands upon the cold brow of her lover; little
children
shall kneel beside the corse of the murdered father!
The Lord speaks, and I listen!
The sword shall gleam within these walls; the bullet rain its iron hail
upon this sacred roof; the hoofs of the war-horse stamp their bloody prints
upon this floor!
And yonder graveyarddo ye behold it? Is it not beautiful, as its
grassy mounds arise in the mild glow of the afternoon sun? The day
cometh when you graveyard shall be choked with ghastly heaps of dead
broken limbs, torn corses, all crowded together in the graveyard of Peace!
Cold glassy eyeballsshattered limbsmangled bodiescrushed skulls
all glowing in the warm light of the setting sun! For the Lordfor the
Lord of Israel hath spoken it!
This was the prophecy, preserved in many a home of Brandywine.
Years passed on. The old men who had heard it were with their
fathers. The maidens who had listened to its words of omen, were grave
matrons, surrounded by groups of laughing children. Still the prophecy
lingered in the homes of Brandywine. Still it was whispered by the lips
of the old to the ears of youth.
At last a morning came when there was panic in the very air. The
earth shook to the tread of legions; the roads groaned beneath the weight
of cannon. Suddenly a white cloud overspread the valley, and enveloped
the Quaker temple. Then groans, shouts, curses, were heard. The white
cloud grew darker. It advanced far over the plain, like a banner of colossal
murder. It rolled around yonder hill, it lay darkening over the distant
waters of the Brandywine.
At last, toward evening it cleared away.
The sun shone mildly over the beautiful landscape; the Brandywine
rippled
into light from afar.
But the beams of the sun lighted up the cold faces of the dead, with a
ghastly glow.
For in the fields, along the slope of yonder hill, down by the spring under
the wild cherry tree, in the graveyard there, and within the walls of
the meeting house, were nothing but dead men, whose blood drenched the
sod, dyed the waters of the spring and stained the temple floor, while their
souls gathered in one terrible meeting around the Throne of God.
The prophecy had met its fulfilment. The valley of Peace had been
made the Gologotha of slaughter; the house of prayer, the theatre of blood.
III.THE FEAR OF WAR.
It
was in the month of September, in the year of our Lord, 1777, when
the Torch of Revolution had been blazing over the land for two long years,
that the fear of war first startled the homes of Brandywine.
For many days the rumor was vague and shadowy; the fear of war
hovered in the air, with the awful indistinctness of the Panic, that precedes
the Pestilence.
At last, the rumor took form and shape and grew into a Fact.
General Howe, with some 17,000 well armed and disciplined soldiers,
had landed on the peninsula of Maryland and Delaware, above the mouth
of the Susquehanna. His object was the conquest and possession of
Philadelphia
,
distant some 30 or 40 miles.
To attain this object, he would sweep like a tornado over the luxuriant
plains that lay between his troops and the city. He would write his
footsteps
on the soil, in the fierce Alphabet of bloodthe blasted field, the
burned farm-house, the bodies of dead men, hewn down in defence of their
hearth sides, these all would track his course.
With this announcement, there came another rumora rumor of the
approach of Washington; he came from the direction of Wilmington, with
his ill-clad and half-starved Continentals; he came to face the British
Invader
,
with his 17,000 hirelings.
It became a fact to all, that the peaceful valley of the Brandywine was
soon to be the chess board, on which a magnificent game of blood and
battle would soon be played for a glorious stake.The city of
Philadelphia
,
with its stores of provisions, its munitions of war, its Continental
Congress.
IV.THE GATHERING OF THE HOSTS.
It
was the 9th of September.
The moon was up in the blue heavens. Far along the eastern horizon,
lay a wilderness of clouds, piling their forms of huge grandeur up in deep
azure of night.
The forests of Brandywine arose in dim indistinctness into the soft
moonlight. There were deep shadows upon the meadows, and from many
a farmer's home, the light of the hearth-side lamp poured out upon the
night.
It was night among the hills of Brandywine, when there was a strange
sound echoing and trembling through the deep forests. There was a strange
sound in the forest, along the hills, and through the meadows, and soon
breaking from the thick shades, there came a multitude of dim and spectral
forms.
Yes, breaking into the light of the moon, there came a strange host of
men, clad in military costume, with bayonets gleaming through the air and
banners waving overhead.
They came with the regular movement of military discipline, band after
band, troop after troop, column after column, breaking in stern silence from
the covert of the woods, but the horses of the cavalry looked jaded and
worn, the footsteps of the infantry were clogged and leaden, while the broad
banners of this strange host, waving so proudly in the air, waved and
fluttered
in rags. The bullet and the cannon ball had done their work upon
these battle flags!
And over this strange host, over the long columns of troopers and
foot-soldiers
over
the baggage wagons bearing the sick, the wounded, nay, over
the very flags that fluttered into light on every side, there rose one broad
and massive banner, on whose blue folds were pictured thirteen stars.
Need I tell you the name of this host? Look down yonder, along the
valley of the Brandywine, and mark those wasted forms, seared by the
bullet and the sword, clad in rags, with rusted musquets in their hands and
dinted swords by their sideslook there and ask the name of this strange
host!
The question is needless. It is the army of George Washington, for
poverty and freedom in those days, walked hand in hand, over rough roads
and bloody battlefields, while sleek faces and broad clothed Loyalty went
pacing merry measures, in some Royal ball room.
And thus, in silence, in poverty, almost in despair, did the army of
Washington take position on the field of Brandywine, on the night of
September
9th, 1777.
And over the banner of the Continental host, sat an omen of despair, a
brooding and ghastly Phantom, perched above the flag of freedom,
chuckling
with fiend-like glee, as he pointed to the gloomy Past and thento the
Unknown future.
On the next day, the Tenth of the Month, the hosts of a well-disciplined
army came breaking from the forests, with the merry peal of fife and drum,
with bugle note and clarion sound, and while the morning sun shone brightly
over their well burnished arms, they proceeded to occupy an open space
of ground, amid the shadow of the woods, at a place called Kennet's Square,
some seven miles westward of Chadd's Ford, where Washington had taken
his position.
How grandly they broke from the woods, with the sunbeams, shining on
the gaudy red coat, the silver laced cap, the forest of nodding plumes. How
proudly their red cross banner waved in the free air, as though not ashamed
to toy and wanton in breeze of freedom, after it had floated above the fields
of down-trodden Europe, and looked down upon the plains of ravaged
Hindoostan!
Yes, there in the far East, where the Juggernaut of British Power had
rolled over its ten thousand victims, father and son, mother and babe, all
mingled in red massacre?
Who would have thought, that these finely-built men, with their robust
forms, were other than freemen? That their stout hands could strike
another blow than the blow of a free arm, winged by the impulse of a free
thought?
Who, gazing on this gallant host, with its gleaming swords upraised in
the air, its glittering bayonets shining in the light, who would have thought,
that to supply this gallant host, the gaols of England had been ransacked,
her convict ships emptied? That the dull slaves of a German Prince had
been
bought
, to swell the number of this chivalric band! That these were
the men who had crossed the wide Atlanticwith what object, pray?
To tame these American peasants, who dared syllable the name of
freedom
.
To whip these rebel-dogs,such was the courteous epithet, they
applied to Washington and Wayneback to their original obscurity. To
desolate the fair plains and pleasant vallies of the New World, to stain the
farmer's home with his own blood, shed in defence of his hearthside.
To crush with the hand of hireling power, the Last Hope of man's
freedom
,
burning on the last shrine of the desolated world!
Who could have imagined that the majestic looking man, who led this
host of hirelings onward, the brave Howe, with his calm face and mild
forehead
,
was the Master-Assassin of this tyrant band?
Or that the amiable Cornwallis, who rode at his side, was the fit tool for
such a work of Massacre? Or that the brave and chivalric sons of
England's
nobility, who commanded the legions of the invading host, that these
men, gay and young and generous, were but the Executioner's of that
Hangman's
Warrant, which converted all America into one vast prison of
convicted
felonseach mountain peak a scaffold for the brave, each forest oak
a gibbet for the free?
And here, while a day passed, encamped amid the woods of Kennet's
Square, lay the British army, while the Continental host, spreading along
the eastern hills of Brandywine, awaited their approach without a fear. The
day passed, and then the night, and then the morning came
Yet ere we mingle in the tumult of that battle morn, we will go to the
American camp, and look upon the heroes in the shadows of the twilight
hour.
37
V.THE PREACHER OF BRANDYWINE.
It
was the eve of the battle of Brandywine.
I see before me now that pleasant valley, with its green meadow
stretching
away into the dim shadows of twilight. The stream, now dashing
around some rugged rock, now spreading in mirror-like calmness; the hills
on either side, magnificent with forest trees; the farm houses, looking out
from the embrace of orchards, golden with the fruitage of the fall; the
twilight sky blushing with the last kiss of dayall are there now, as they
were on the 10th of September, 1777.
But then, whitening over the meadow, arose the snowy tents of the
Continential
encampment. Then arms gleamed from these hills, and war-steeds
laved their limbs in yonder stream. Then, at the gentle twilight hour, the
brave men of the army, sword and rifle in hand, gathered around a Preacher,
whose pulpita granite rockuprose from the green hill-side, near Chadd's
Ford.
Look upon him as he stands there, his dark gown floating around his tall
form, his eye burning and his brow flushing with the excitement of the
hour. He is a man in the prime of manhoodwith a bold face, tempered
down to an expression of Christian meeknessyet, ever and anon, a
warrior
soul looks out from that dark eye, a warrior-shout swells up from that
heaving bosom.
Their memories are with me now; those brave men, who, with God for
their panoply, shared the terrors of Trenton, the carnage of Brandywine,
the crust and cold of Valley Forge; their memories are with me now, and
shall be forevermore. They were brave men, those Preacher-Heroes of
the Revolution. We will remember them in hymns, sung on the cold
winter nights, around the hearthsides of our homeswe will not forget
them in our prayers. We will tell the story to our children: Children!
there were brave men in the Revolutionbrave men, whose hearts panted
beneath a preacher's gown. There were brave men, whose hands grasped
a Bible, a cross, and a sword. Brave men, whose voices were heard amid
the crash of legions, and beside the quivering forms of the dying. Honest
men were they, who forsook pulpit and church to follow George
Washington's
army, as it left its bloody footsteps in the winter snow. Honor to
those Preacher-Heroes, who called upon their God in the storm and heard
his answer in the battle-shout!
We will sing to their memory in hymns of the olden time; on the
Christmas night we will send up a rude anthembold in words, stern in
thought, such as they loved in the Revolutionto the praise of these
children
of God.
Washington, Wayne, Pulaski, Sullivan, Greene; there all are grouped
around the rock. The last ray of sunset gleams on their uncovered brows.
Far away spread the ranks of the army. Through the silence of the
twilight hour, you may hear that bold voice, speaking out words like these.
Comewe will go to church with the Heroes. Our canopy the sky,
the pulpit, you granite rock, the congregation, a band of brave men, who,
with sword and rifle in hand, await the hour of fight; our Preacher a
warrior-soul, locked up in a sacerdotal robe. Comewe will worship with
Washington and Wayne; we will kneel upon this sod, while the sunset
gleams over ten thousand brows, bared to the beam and breeze.
Do you hear the Preacher's voice swelling through the twilight air?
And first, ere we listen to his voice, we will sing to his memory, this
rugged hymn of the olden time
HYMN TO THE PREACHER-HEROES.
'Twas on a sad and wintry night
When my Grandsire died;
Ere his spirit took its flight,
He call'd me to his side.
White his hair as winter snow,
His voice all quiv'ring rung
His cheek lit with a sudden glow
This chaunt in death he sung.
Honor to those men of old
The Preachers, brave and good!
Whose words, divinely bold,
Stirr'd the patriot's blood.
Their pulpit on the rock,
Their church the battle-plain;
They dared the foeman's shock,
They fought among the slain.
E'en yet methinks I hear
Their deep, their heart-wrung tones,
Rising all bold and clear
Above their brothers' groans.
They preached, they prayed to-night,
And read God's solemn word
To-morrow, in the fight,
They grasp'd a freeman's sword.
O! they were brave and true,
Their names in glory shine;
For, by the flag of blue,
They fought at Brandywine.
At Germantownaye, there!
They pray'd the columns ON!
Amen! to that bold pray'r
God and Washington!
Honor to those men of old,
Who pray'd in field and gorge
Who shar'd the crust and cold
With the brave, at Valley Forge.
On the sacramental day
Press we His cup agen
'Mid our sighs and tears we'll pray
God bless those martyr-men.
Those Preachers, lion-soul'd,
Heroes of their Lord,
Who, when the battle roll'd,
Grasp'd a freeman's sword.
Grasp'd a freeman's sword
And cheer'd their brothers on
Lifted up His word
By Freedom's gonfalon.
Nor sect or creed we know,
Heroes in word and deed
Bloody footprints in the snow
Mark'd each preacher's creed.
'Mid the snows of cold December,
Tell your son's the story;
Bid them for aye remember,
The Hero-Preacher's glory.
While glows the Christmas flame;
Sing honor to the good and bold
Honor to each Preacher's name
The lion-hearted men of old.
REVOLUTIONARY SERMON,
Preached on the eve of the Battle of Brandywine
, (
September
10, 1777,)
in presence of
Washington and his Army, at Chadd's Ford
.
[13]
[13]
This Sermon was originally published, (before it was incorporated with the
Lectures
,)
with fictitious names attached, etc. etc. There is no doubt that a sermon was
delivered on the eve of the Battle of Brandywine, and I have substantial evidence to
prove that the Preacher was none other than
Hugh Henry Breckenridge
, a
distinguished
Divine, who afterwards wrote Modern Chivalry, an eminently popular
production, and filled various official positions with honor to himself and his country.
The Sermon is, I trust, not altogether unworthy of that chivalric band, who forsaking
their homes and churches, found a home and church in the Camp of Washington.
They that take the sword, shall perish by the sword.
Soldiers and Countrymen:
We have met this evening perhaps for the
last time. We have shared the toil of the march, the peril of the fight,
the dismay of the retreatalike we have endured toil and hunger, the
contumely
of the internal foe, the outrage of the foreign oppressor. We have
sat night after night beside the same camp fire, shared the same rough
soldier's
fare; we have together heard the roll of the reveille which called us
to duty, or the beat of the tattoo which gave the signal for the hardy sleep
of the soldier, with the earth for his bed, the knapsack for his pillow.
And now, soldiers and brethren, we have met in the peaceful valley, on
the eve of battle, while the sunlight is dying away beyond yonder heights,
the sunlight that to-morrow morn will glimmer on scenes of blood. We
have met, amid the whitening tents of our encampmentin times of terror
and of gloom have we gathered togetherGod grant it may not be for the
last time.
It is a solemn time. Brethren, does not the awful voice of nature, seem
to echo the sympathies of this hour? The flag of our country, droops
heavily from yonder staffthe breeze has died away along the plain of
Chadd's Fordthe plain that spreads before us glistening in sunlightthe
heights of the Brandywine arise gloomy and grand beyond the waters of
yonder stream, and all nature holds a pause of solemn silence, on the eve
of the bloodshed and strife of the morrow.
They that take the sword, shall perish by the sword
.
And have
they
not taken the sword?
Let the desolated plain, the blood-soddened valley, the burned farm-house,
the sacked village, and the ravaged town, answerlet the whitening bones
of the butchered farmer, strewn along the fields of his homestead answer
let the starving mother, with the babe clinging to her withered breast, that
can afford no sustenance, let her answer, with the death-rattle mingling with
the murmuring tones that mark the last struggle for lifelet the dying
mother and her babe answer!
It was but a day past, and our land slept in the light of peace. War was
not herewrong was not here. Fraud, and woe, and misery, and want,
dwelt not among us. From the eternal solitude of the green woods, arose
the blue smoke of the settler's cabin, and golden fields of corn peered forth
from amid the waste of the wilderness, and the glad music of human voices
awoke the silence of the forest.
Now! God of mercy, behold the change! Under the shadow of a
pretext
under
the sanctity of the name of God, invoking the Redeemer to
their aid, do these foreign hirelings slay our people! They throng our
towns, they darken our plains, and now they encompass our posts on the
lonely plain of Chadd's Ford.
They that take the sword, shall perish by the sword.
Brethren, think me not unworthy of belief when I tell you that the doom
of the Britisher is near!Think me not vain when I tell you that beyond
that cloud that now enshrouds us, I see gathering, thick and fast, the darker
cloud, and the blacker storm, of a Divine Retribution!
They may conquer us to-morrow! Might and wrong may prevail, and
we may be driven from this fieldbut the hour of God's own vengeance
will come!
Aye, if in the vast solitudes of eternal spaceif in the heart of the
boundless
universe, there throbs the being of an awful God, quick to avenge, and
sure to punish guilt, then will the man George of Brunswick, called King,
feel in his brain and in his heart, the vengeance of the Eternal Jehovah!
A blight will be upon his lifea withered brain, an accursed intellecta
blight will be upon his children, and on his people. Great God! how
dread the punishment!
A crowded populace, peopling the dense towns where the man of money
thrives, while the laborer starves; want striding among the people in all its
forms of terror; an ignorant and God-defying priesthood, chuckling over
the miseries of millions; a proud and merciless nobility, adding wrong to
wrong, and heaping insult upon robbery and fraud: royalty corrupt to the
very heart; aristocracy rotten to the core; crime and want linked hand in
hand, and tempting men to deeds of woe and death; these are a part of the
doom and retribution that shall come upon the English throne and people.
SoldiersI look around among your familiar faces with a strange
interest
!
To-morrow morning we will all go forth to battlefor need I tell you,
that your unworthy minister will go with you, invoking God's aid in the
fight? We will march forth to battle. Need I exhort you to fight the good
fightto fight for your homesteads, and for your wives and children?
My friends, I might urge you to fight by the galling memories of British
wrong! WaltonI might tell you of your father, butchered in the silence
of midnight, on the plains of Trenton: I might picture his grey hairs,
dabbled
in blood; I might ring his death-shriek in your ears.
Shelmire, I might tell you of a mother butchered, and a sister outraged
the lonely farm-house, the night-assault, the roof in flames, the shouts of
the troopers as they despatched their victims, the cries for mercy, the
pleadings
of innocence for pity. I might paint this all again, in the terrible colors
of vivid reality, if I thought your courage needed such wild excitement.
But I know you are strong in the might of the Lord. You will go forth
to battle to-morrow with light hearts and determined spirits, though the
solemn duty, the duty of avenging the dead, may rest heavy on your souls.
And in the hour of battle, when all around is darkness, lit by the lurid
cannon-glare, and the piercing musquet-flash, when the wounded strew the
ground, and the dead litter your path, then remember, soldiers, that God is
with you. The Eternal God fights for youhe rides on the battle-cloud,
he sweeps onward with the march of the hurricane charge.The Awful
and the Infinite fights for you, and you will triumph.
They that take the sword, shall perish by the sword.
You have taken the sword, but not in the spirit of wrong and ravage.
You have taken the sword for your homes, for your wives, for your little
ones.You have taken the sword for truth, for justice and right; and to
you the promise is, be of good cheer, for your foes have taken the sword,
in defiance of all that man holds dearin blasphemy of Godthey shall
perish by the sword
.
And now, brethren and soldiers, I bid you all farewell. Many of us may
fall in the fight of to-morrowGod rest the souls of the fallenmany of us
may live to tell the story of the fight of to-morrow, and in the memory of
all, will ever rest and linger the quiet scene of this autumnal night.
Solemn twilight advances over the valley; the woods on the opposite
heights fling their long shadows over the green of the meadow; around us
are the tents of the Continental host, the half-suppressed bustle of the camp,
the hurried tramp of the soldiers to and fro; now the confusion, and now
the stillness which mark the eve of battle.
When we meet again, may the long shadows of twilight be flung over a
peaceful land.
God in heaven grant it.
Let us pray.
PRAYER OF THE REVOLUTION.
Great Father, we bow before thee. We invoke thy blessingwe
deprecate
thy wrathwe return thee thanks for the pastwe ask thy aid for
the future. For we are in times of trouble, Oh, Lord! and sore beset by
foes merciless and unpitying: the sword gleams over our land, and the
dust of the soil is dampened by the blood of our neighbors and friends.
Oh! God of mercy, we pray thy blessing on the American arms. Make
the man of our hearts strong in thy wisdom. Bless, we beseech thee, with
renewed life and strength, our hope and Thy instrument, even
George
Washington
. Shower thy counsels on the Honorable, the Continental
Congress; visit the tents of our hosts; comfort the soldier in his wounds
and afflictions, nerve him for the fight, prepare him for the hour of death.
And in the hour of defeat, oh, God of hosts! do thou be our stay; and
in the hour of triumph, be thou our guide.
Teach us to be merciful. Though the memory of galling wrongs be at
our hearts, knocking for admittance, that they may fill us with desires of
revenge, yet let us, oh, Lord, spare the vanquished, though they never
spared us, in the hour of butchery and bloodshed. And, in the hour of
death, do thou guide us into the abode prepared for the blest; so shall we
return thanks unto thee, through Christ our Redeemer.
God prosper the
CauseAmen
.
As the words of the Preacher die upon the air, you behold those battle
hostsWashington in their midst, with uncovered brow and bended head
kneeling like children in the presence of their God.
For he is there, the Lord of Sabaoth, and like a smile from heaven, the
last gleam of the setting sun lights up the Banner of the Stars.
VI.THE DAWN OF THE FIGHT.
It
was the battle day.The
Eleventh
of September!
It broke in brightness and beauty, that bloody day: the sky was clear
and serene; the perfume of wild flowers was upon the air, and the blue
mists of autumn hung around the summit of the mound-like hills.
The clear sky arched above, calm as in the bygone days of Halcyon
peace, the wide forests flung their sea of leaves all wavingly into the light
the Brandywine, with its stream and vallies, smiled in the face of the dawn,
nature was the same as in the ancient time, but man was changed.
The Fear of war had entered the lovely valley. There was dread in all
the homes of Brandywine on that autumnal morn. The Blacksmith wrought
no more at his forge, the farmer leaned wistfully upon the motionless plough,
standing idly in the half-turned furrow. The fear of war had entered the
lovely valley, and in the hearts of its people, there was a dark presentiment
of coming Doom.
Even in the Quaker Meeting house, standing some miles away from
Chadd's Ford, the peaceful Friends assembled for their Spirit Worship, felt
that another Spirit than that which stirred their hearts, would soon claim
bloody adoration in the holy place.
On the summit of a green and undulating hill, not more than half-a-mile
distant from the plain of Chadd's Ford, the eye of the traveller is arrested,
even at this day, by the sight of a giant chesnut tree, marked by a colossal
trunk, while the wide-branching limbs, with their exuberance of deep
green-leaved foliage, tell the story of two hundred years.
Under this massive chesnut tree, on that renowned morn, as the first
glimpse of the dawn broke over the battlefield, there stood a band of men in
military costume, grouped around a tall and majestic figure.
Within sight of this warlike groupa mound-shaped hill and rolling
valley
intervening,lay the plain of Chadd's Ford, with the hastily-erected
tents of the American encampment, whitening along its sward.
There floated the banner of the stars, and there, resting on their well-tried
arms, stood the brave soldiers of the Continental host, casting anxious yet
fearless glances towards the western woods which lined the rivulet, in
momentary
expectation of the appearance of the British forces.
And while all was expectation and suspense in the valley below, this
warlike group had gathered under the shade of the ancient chesnut treea
hurried Council of war, the Prelude to the blood-stained toil of the coming
battle.
And the man who stood in their midst, towering above them all, like a
Nobleman whose title is from God, let us look well upon him. He
converses
there, with a solemn presence about him. Those men, his
battle-worn
peers, stand awed and silent. Look at that form, combining the
symmetry
of faultless limbs, with a calm majesty of bearing, that shames the
Kings of earth into nothingnesslook upon that proud form, which
dignifies
that military costume of blue and buff and goldexamine well the
outlines of that face, which you could not forget among ten thousand, that
face, stamped with the silent majesty of a great soul.
Ask the soldier the name he shouts in the vanguard of battle, ask the dying
patriot the name he murmurs, when his voice is husky with the flow of
suffocating blood, and death is iceing over his heart, and freezing in his
veinsask the mother for the name she murmurs, when she presses her
babe to her bosom and bids him syllable a prayer for the safety of the father,
far away, amid the ranks of battle, ask History for that name, which shall
dwell evermore in the homes and hearts of men, a sound of blessing and
praise, second only in sanctity to the name of the Blessed Redeemer.
And that nameneed I speak it?
Need I speak it with the boisterous shout or wild hurrah, when it is
spoken in the still small voice of every heart that now throbs at the sound
of the wordthe name of George Washington.
And as the sunbeams came bright and golden through the foliage of the
ancient chesnut tree, they shone upon the calm face of the sagacious Greene
the rugged brow of the fearless Pulaskithe bluff, good-humored visage
of Knoxthe frank, manly face of De Kalband there with his open brow,
his look of reckless daring, and the full brown eye that never quailed in its
glance, was the favorite son of Pennsylvania, her own hero, dear to her
history in many an oft-told tradition, the theme of a thousand legends, the
praise of historian and bardMad Antony Wayne!
Standing beside George Washington, you behold a young soldier
quite
a boy
with a light and well-proportioned form, mingling the outlines of
youthful beauty with the robust vigor of manly strength. His face was
free, daring, chivalric in expression, his blue eye was clear and sparkling in
its glance, and his sand-hued hair fell back in careless locks from a bold and
lofty brow.
And who was he?
38
Not a soldier in the American camp, from the green mountain boy of the
north, to the daring Ranger of the Santee, but knows his name and has his
story at his tongue's end, familiar as a household word.
And why cast he friends and rank and hereditary right aside, why
tearing
himself from the bosom of a young and beautiful wife, did he cross the
Atlantic in peril and in danger, pursued by the storm and surrounded by the
ships of the British fleetwhy did he spring so gladly upon the American
shore, why did he fling wealth, rank, life, at the feet of George
Washington
,
pledging honor and soul in the American cause?
Find your answer in the history of Francefind your answer in the
history of her Revolutionsthe Revolution of the Reign of Terror, and the
Revolution of the Three daysfind your answer in the history of the
world for the last sixty yearsin every line, you will behold beaming forth
that high resolve, that generous daring, that nobility of soul, which in life
made his name a blessing, and in death hangs like a glory over his memory
the namethe memory of La Fayette.
Matter of deep import occupied this hurried council of war. In short
and emphatic words, Washington stated the position of the Continental
army. The main body were encamped near Chadd's Fordthe
Pennsylvania
militia under Armstrong two miles below; the Right Wing under
Sullivan
two miles above.
This Washington stated was the position of the army. He looked for
the attempt of the enemy to pass the Brandywine, either at Chadd's or
Brinton's Ford.
He had it is true, received information that a portion of the British
would attack him in front, while the main body crossing the Brandywine
some miles above, would turn his right flank and take him by surprise.
But the countryso Washington said in a tone of emphatic scorn
swarmed with traitors and tories; he could not rely upon this information.
While the chiefs were yet in council, all doubt was solved by the arrival
of a scout, who announced the approach of Kniphausen towards Chadd's
Ford.
An hour passed.
Standing on the embankment, which grim with cannon, frowned above
Chadd's Ford, General Wayne beheld the approach of the Hessians along
the opposite hills.
The word of command rang from his lips, and then the cannon gave
forth their thunder, and the smoke of battle for the first time, darkened the
valley of the Brandywine.
Standing on the embankment, Mad Antony Wayne beheld the valley
below
shrouded in smoke, he heard the cries of wounded and the dying!
He saw the brave riflemen, headed by Maxwell and Porterfield, dart
down from the fortified knoll, hurry across the meadow, until the green trees
overlooking the stream, received them in their thick shade.
Then came the fierce and deadly contest, between these riflemen and the
Yager bands of the Hessian army!
Then came the moment, when standing in mid stream, they poured the
rifle-blaze into each other's faces, when they fought foot to foot, and hand
to hand, when the death-groan bubbled up to the water's surface, as the
mangled victim was trodden down into the yellow sands of the rivulet's bed.
Then with a shout of joy, gallant Mad Anthony beheld the Hessians driven
back, while the Banner of the Stars rose gloriously among the clouds of
battle, and then
But why should I picture the doubt, the anxiety, the awful suspense of
that morning, when Washington looking every moment for the attack of
the British on his front, was yet fearful that they would turn his right wing
and take him by surprise?
Suffice it to say, that after hours of suspense, one o'clock came, and with
that hour came the thunderbolt.
A wounded scout brought intelligence of the approach of the British, in
full force, above the heights of Birmingham Meeting House, toward the
Right Wing of the Continental Army. The wounded scout gave this dread
message, and then bit the dust, a dead man.
Come with me now, come with me through the lanes of Brandywine;
let us emerge from these thick woods, let us look upon the hills around
Birmingham Meeting House.
VII.THE QUAKER TEMPLE.
It
is now two o'clock.
The afternoon sun is shining over a lovely landscape diversified with hills,
now clad with thick and shady forests, now spreading in green pasturages,
now blooming in cultivated farms.
Let us ascend yonder hill, rising far above the plainyou hill to the
north east crowded with a thick forest, and sloping gently to the south, its
bare and grassy bosom melting away into a luxuriant valley.
We ascend this hill, we sit beneath the shade of yonder oak, we look
forth upon the smiling heavens above, the lovely land beneath. For ten
wide miles, that map of beauty lies open to our gaze.
Yonder toward the south arise a ravage of undulating hills, sweeping
toward the east, in plain and meadowgently ascending in the west until
they terminate in the heights of Brandywine.
And there, far to the west, a glimpse of the Brandywine comes laughing
into lightit is seen but a moment a sheet of rippling water, among green
boughs, and then it is gone!
Gaze upon yonder hill, in the south east. It rises in a gradual ascent.
On its summit thrown forward into the sun by a deep background of woods,
there stands a small one-storied fabric, with steep and shingled roofwith
walls of dark grey stone.
This unpretending structure arises in one corner of a small enclosure,
of dark green grass, varied by gently rising mounds, and bounded by a wall
of dark grey stone.
This fabric of stone rests in the red sunlight quiet as a tomb. Over its
ancient roof, over its moss covered walls, stream the warm sunbeams. And
that solitary tree standing in the centre of the graveyardfor that enclosed
space is a graveyard, although no tombstones whiten over its green mounds
or marble pillars tower into lightthat solitary tree quivers in the breeze,
and basks in the afternoon sun.
That is indeed the quiet Quaker graveyardyon simple fabric, one story
high, rude in architecture, contracted in its form is the peaceful Quaker
meeting house of Birmingham.
It will be a meeting house indeed ere the setting of yon sun, where
Death and blood and woe shall meet; where carnage shall raise his fiery
hymn of cries and groans, where mercy shall enter but to droop and die.
There, in that rude temple, long years ago, was spoken the Prophecy
which now claims its terrible fulfilment.
Now let us look upon the land and sky. Let us look forth from the top
of this hillit is called Osborne's hilland survey the glorious
land-scape
.
The sky is very clear above us. Clear, serene and glassy, A single
cloud hovers in the centre of the sky, a single snow white cloud hovers
there in the deep azure, receiving on its breast, the full warmth of the
Autumnal sun.
It hovers there like a holy dove of peace, sent of God!
Look to the south. Over hill and plain and valley look. Observe those
thin light wreaths of smoke, arising from the green of the forest some two
or three miles to the southwesthow gracefully these spiral columns curl
upward and melt away into the deep azure. Upward and away they wind,
awayawayuntil they are lost in the heavens.
That snowy smoke is hovering over the plain of Chadd's Ford, where
Washington and Wayne are now awaiting the approach of Kniphausen
across the Brandywine.
Change your view, a mile or two eastwardyou behold a cloud of smoke,
hovering over the camp fires of the reserve under General Greene; and
yonder from the hills north of Chadd's Ford, the music of Sullivan's
Division comes bursting over wood and plain.
We will look eastward of the meeting house. A sight as lovely as ever
burst on mortal eye. There are plains glowing with the rich hues of
cultivation
plains
divided by fences and dotted with cottageshere a massive
hill, there an ancient farm house, and far beyond peaceful mansions, reposing
in the shadow of twilight woods
Look! Along these plains and fields, the affrighted people of the valley
are fleeing as though some bloodhound tracked their footsteps. They flee
the valley of the Quaker Temple, as though death was in the breeze,
desolation
in the sunlight.
Ask you why they flee? Look to the west and to the north west,
what see you there?
A cloud of dust rises over the woodsit gathers volumeslarger and
widerdarker and blackerit darkens the western skyit throws its dusky
shade far over the verdure of the woodlands.
Look againwhat see you now?
There is the same cloud of dust, but nothing more meets the vision. Hear
you nothing?
Yes. There is a dull deadened sound like the tramp of war steedsnow
it gathers volume like the distant moan of the ocean-stormnow it murmurs
like the thunder rolling away, amid the ravines of far-off mountainsand
now!
By the soul of Mad Anthony it stirs one's blood!
And now there is a merry peal bursting all along the woodsdrum, fife,
bugle, all interminglingand now arises that ominous soundthe clank of
the sword by the warrior's side, and all the rattle and the clang of arms
suppressed and dim and distant, but terrible to hear!
Look again. See you nothing?
Yes! Look to the north and to the west. Rank after rank, file after
file, they burst from the woodsbanners wave and bayonets gleam! In
one magnificent array of battle, they burst from the woods, column after
columnlegion after legion. On their burnished armson their waving
plumes shines and flaunts the golden sun.
Lookfar through the woods and over the fields! You see nothing but
gleaming bayonets and gaudy red-coatsyou behold nothing but bands of
marching men, but troops of mounted soldiers. The fields are red with
British uniformsand there and there
Do you see that gorgeous bannerdo you see its emblemsdo you mark
its colors of blooddo you see
Oh, Blessed Redeemer, Saviour of the world, is that thy cross? Is that
thy cross waving on that blood-red banner?
Thy Cross, that emblem of peace and truth and mercy, emblem of thy
sufferings, thy death, thy resurrection, emblem of Gethemane and of
Calvary
!
thy cross waves there, an emblem of HIDEOUS MURDER!
Look! The blood of the Nations drips from that flag! Look, it is
stained with the blood of the Scot, the Irishman, RED
Indian
, and the dusky
Hindooit is stained with the blood of all the earth! The ghosts of
millions
,
from a thousand battlefields arise and curse that flag forever in the
sight of God! And nowah, now it comes on to the valley of the
Brandywine
it
comes on its work of murder and blood!
And there waving in the sun, that cross so darkly, so foully dishonored,
courts the free air and does not blush for its crimes!
VIII.WASHINGTON COMES TO BATTLE.
Again
turn we to the South. What see you there?
There is the gleam of arms, but it is faint, it is faint and far away!
Hark! Do you hear that
sound?
Is it thunder, is it the throbbing of
some fierce earthquake, tearing its way through the vitals of the earth?
No! No! The legions are moving.
Washington has scented the preydoubt is over. Glory to the god
of battlesglory! The Battle is now certain. There, there, hidden by
woods and hills, advances the Banner of the New Worldthe Labarum of
the Rights of man! There, the boy-general La Fayette gaily smiles and
waves his maiden swordthere, there white-uniformed Pulaski growls his
battle crythere calm-visaged Greene is calculating chances, and there
WayneMad Anthony Wayne? Hah? What does he now? Listen to
his cannonthey speak out over three miles of forest! That is the
welcome
of Mad Anthony to Kniphausen, as he attempts to cross the
Brandywine
!
And on they come, the American legionsover hill and thro' wood,
a long lonely dell, band after band, battalion crowding on battallionand now
they move in columns! How the roar of the cataract deepens and swells!
The earth tremblesall nature gives signs of the coming contest.
And over all, over the lonely valley, over the hosts advancing to the fight,
there sits a hideous Phantom, will the head of a fiend, the wings of a
vulture
!
Yes, yes, there, unseon and unknown, in mid-air, hovers the Fiend
of Carnage! He spreads his dusky wings with joy! He will have a rare
feast ere sundowna dainty feast! The young, the gallant, the brave are
all to sodden your graveyard with their blood.
Near the foot of this hill, down in the hollow yonder, a clear spring of
cold water shines in the sun. Is it not beautiful, that spring of cold water,
with its border of wild flowers, its sands yellow as gold?
Ere the setting of yonder sun, that spring will be red and rank and foul
with the gore of a thousand hearts!
For it lays in the lap of the valley, and all the blood shed upon yon hill,
will pour into it, in little rills of crimson red!
And on, and on, over hill and valley, on and on advances the Banner of
the New World.
Glory to the God of battle, how fair that banner looks in the green woods,
how beautiful it breaks on the eye, when toying with the gentle breezes, it
pours its starry rays among the forest trees, or mirrors its beauty in some
quiet brook?
But when it emerges from the green woods, when tossing on the winds
of battle, it seeks the open plain, and its belts of scarlet and snow float
grandly in the air, and its stars flash back the light of the sunah, then it
is a glorious sight! Then let this prayer arise from every American heart!
Be thou enthroned above that banner, God of Battles! Guard it with
thy lightnings, fan it with thy breezes, avenge it with thy thunders!
May it ever advance as now, in a cause holy as thy light! May the
hand that would dare pluck one star from its glory, withermay treason
fall palsied beneath its shade!
But should it ever advance in the cause of a Tyrant, should its folds ever
float over a nation of slaves, then crush Thou that banner in the dustthen
scatter its fragments to space and night, then, then take back to Heaven
thy Stars!
But may it wave on and onmay it advance over this broad continent
freedom's pillar of cloud by dayfreedom's pillar of fire by nightuntil
there shall be but one nation, from the ice-wilderness of the north, to the
waters of the Southern Seaa nation of Americans and of brothers!
IX.THE HOUR OF BATTLE.
It
was now four o'clockthe hour of battle.
It is the awful moment, when twenty-two thousand human beings, gazing
in each other's faces from opposite hills, await the signal word of fight.
Along the brow of yonder high hillOsborne's hill, and down on either
side, into the valley on one hand, the plain on the other, sweeps the
formidable
front of the British army, with the glittering line of bayonets above
their heads, another glittering line in their rear, while the arms of the
Brigade
in Reserve glimmer still farther back, among the woods on the
hill-top
and
yet farther on, a Regiment of stout Englishers await the bidding
of their masters, to advance or retire, as the fate of the day may decree.
There are long lines of glittering cannon pointed toward the opposite
hills, there are infantry, artillery and cavalry, a band of twelve thousand
men, all waiting for the signal word of fight.
On that clear space of green hill-side, between the Regiment of horse and
the Brigade in Reserve, General Howe and Lord Cornwallis rein their
steeds, encircled by the chieftains of the British host.
And from the trees along the opposite hills, pour the hurried bands of the
Continental Army, at the very moment that the British General is about to
give the word of battle, which will send an hundred Souls to Eternity!
There comes the Right Division of the army under the brave Sullivan,
the unfortunate Stephens, the gallant Stirling. They take their position in
hurry and disorder. They file along the hills in their coats of blue and
buff, they throw their rifle-bands into the Meeting House. With stout
hands, with firm hearts, this division of the Continental host confront the
formidable army, whose array flashes from yonder hill.
There mounted on his grey war-steed, Sir William Howe looked for a
moment over the ranks of his army, over their forest of swords and bayonets
and banners, and then slowly unsheathing his sword, he waved it in the
light.
That was the signal of battle.
An hundred bugles hailed that sign with their maddening peals, an
hundred
drums rolled forth their deafening thunderHark! The hill quivers
as though an earthquake shook its grassy bosom!
Along the British line streams the blaze of musquetry, the air is filled
with the roar of cannon!
Look down into the valley below! There all is shrouded in snow-white
smokesnow-white that heaves upward in those vast and rolling folds.
A moment passes!
That cloud is swept aside by a breeze from the American army. That
breeze bears the groans of dying men to the very ears of Howe!
That parting cloud lays bare the awful panorama of deathwounded
men falling to the earthdeath-stricken soldiers leaping in the air, with the
blood streaming from their shattered limbs.
Where solid ranks but a moment stood, now are heaps of ghastly dead!
Another moment passes, and the voice of Sullivan is heard along the
Continental line. From the southern heights there is a deafening report,
and then a blaze of flame bursts over the British ranks!
The piercing musquet shot, the sharp crack of the rifle, the roar of the
cannon, these all went up to heaven, and then all was wrapt in smoke on
the southern hills.
Then the white pall was lifted once again! Hah! The Quaker
Meeting
House has become a fortress! From every window, nook and cranny
peals the rifle-blaze, the death-shot!
And then a thousand cries and groans commingling in one infernal chorus,
go shrieking up to yon sky of azure, that smiles in mockery of this scene
of murder!And yonder, far in the west, the waters of the Brandywine
still laugh into light for a moment, and then roll calmly on.
Another moment passes! That loud shout yelling above the chorus of
deathwhat means it? The order rings along the British lineCharge,
charge for King George!
The Continental columns give back the shout with redoubled echo,
Charge, charge in the Name of God, in the name of Washington!
And then while the smoke gathers like a black vault overheadlike a
black vault built by demon hands, sweeping from either side, at the top of
their horses speed the troopers of the armies meet, sword to sword, with
banners mingling and with bugle pealing, fighting for life they meet. There
is a crash, a fierce recoil, and another charge!
Now the Red Cross of St. George, and the Starry Banner of the New
World, mingle their folds together, tossing and plunging to the impulse of
the battle-breeze.
Hurrah! The fever of blood is in its worst and wildest delirium! Now
are human faces trampled deep into the blood-drenched sod, now are glazing
eyes torn out by bayonet thrusts, now are quivering hearts rent from the
still-living bodies of the foemen!
Hurrah!
How gallantly the Continentals meet the brunt of strife. Rushing
forward
on horse and foot, under that Starry Banner, they seek the British
foemen, they pour the death-hail into their ranks, they throttle them with
their weaponless hands.
X.THE POETRY OF BATTLE.
Talk
not to me of the Poetry of Love, or the Sublimity of nature in
repose
,
or the divine beauty of Religion!
Here is poetry, sublimity, religion! Here are twenty thousand men
tearing each other's limbs to fragments, putting out eyes, crushing skulls,
rending hearts and trampling the faces of the dying, deeper down
Poetry
!
Here are horses running wild, their saddles riderless, their nostrils
streaming blood, here are wounded men gnashing their teeth as they
endeavor
to crawl from beneath the horses' feet, here are a thousand little
pools of blood, filling the hollows which the hoofs have made, or coursing
down the ruts of the cannon wheels
Sublimity
!
Here are twelve thousand British hirelings, seeking the throats of you
small band of freemen, and hewing them down in gory murder, because,
oh yes, because they will not pay tax to a good-humored Idiot, who even
now, sits in his royal halls of Windsor, three thousand miles away, with
his vacant eye and hanging lip, catching flies upon the wall, or picking
threads from his royal robeyes, yes, there he sits, crouching among the
folds of gorgeous tapestry, this
Master Assassin
, while his trained
murderers
advance upon the hills of Brandywinethere sits the King by right
divine, the Head of the Church, the British Pope!
Religion
!
How do you like this
Poetry
, this
Sublimity
, this
Religion
of George
the Third?
And now, when you have taken one long look at the Idiot-King, sitting
yonder in his royal halls of Windsor, look there through the clouds of battle,
and behold that warrior-form, mounted on a steed of iron-grey!
That warrior-form rising above the ranks of battle, clad in the uniform
of blue and buff and goldthat warrior-form, with the calm blue eye
kindling with such fire, with the broad chest heaving with such emotion
with the stout arm lifting the sword on high, pointing the way to the field
of deaththat form looming there in such grandeur, through the intervals
of battle-smoke
39
Is it the form of some awful spirit, sent from on high to guide the course
of the fight? Is it the form of an earthly King?
Tell me the name of that warrior-form?
Have your answer in the battle-cry, which swells from a thousand hearts
Washington
?
XI.LORD PERCY'S DREAM.
It
was at this momentthe darkest of the conflictthat Lord Cornwallis,
surveying the tide of a battle, turned to a young officer who had been
detained
for a moment by his side.
Colonel Percy said he The rebels have entrenched themselves
in yonder graveyard. Would that I had a brave man, who would dare to
plant the royal standard on those dark grey walls!
I will take it, said the young officer, as he gave his golden-hued steed
the spur, I will take it, or die!
And now as with his manly form, attired in a uniform of dark green
velvet, he speeds down the hill, followed by a band of thirty bold troopers,
his long dark hair flying back from his pale face; let me tell you the strange
story of his life.
Tradition relates, that accompanying the British host, urged by some
wild spirit of adventure, was a young and gallant spiritLord Percy, a near
connection of the proud Duke of Northumberland.
He was young, gallant, handsome, but since the landing of the troops on
the Chesapeake, his gay companions had often noted a frown of dark
thought shadowing his features, a sudden gloom working over his pale face,
and a wild unearthly glare in his full dark eye.
The cause had been asked, but no answer given. Again and again, yet
still no answer.
At last, Lord Cornwallis asked young Percy what melancholy feelings
were these, which darkened his features with such a strange gloom. With
the manner of a fated man, the young lord gave his answer.
(This scene occurred not ten minutes before the battle, when Cornwallis
was urging his way thro' the thick wood, that clothed the summit of
Osborne's
Hill.)
He had left the dissipations of the English Court, for the wilds of the
New World, at the request of the aged Earl, his father. That earl, when a
young man, had wandered in the wilds of South Carolinahe had tricked
a beautiful girl, in whose dark cheek there glowed the blood of an Indian
Kinghe had tricked this beautiful girl into a sham marriage, and then
deserted
her, for his noble bride in England.
And now, after long years had passed, this aged Man, this proud Earl,
had hurried his legitimate son to the wilds of America, with the charge to
seek out the illegitimate child of the Indian girl of Carolina, and place a
pacquet in his hands.
This, in plain words, was the object of Lord Percy's journey to America.
And as to the gloom on his brow, the deathly light in his eye? This
was the answer which Percy gave to Cornwallis
A presentiment of sudden deathhe saidwas on his mind. It had
haunted his brain, from the very first moment he had trodden the American
shores. It had crept like a Phantom beside him, in broad daylight, it had
brooded with images of horror, over the calm hours devoted to sleep. It
was ever with him, beside his bed and at his board, in camp and bouviac,
that dark presentiment of sudden death.
Whence came this presentiment? was the query of Lord Cornwallis.
One night when crossing the Atlantic, one night when the storm was
abroad and the thunderbolt came crashing down the mainmast, then, my
Lord, then I had a dream! In that dream I beheld a lovely valley, a rustic
fabric, too rude for a lordly church and a quiet graveyard, without a
tomb-stone
or marble pillar! And over that valley, and around that graveyard,
the tide of battle raged, for it was a battle fierce and bloody!
And therein that graveyard, I beheld a form thrown over a grassy mound,
with the life-blood welling from the death-wound near the heart! That
form was mine! Yes, yes, I saw the eyes glaring upon the blue heavens,
with the glassy stare of death! That form was mine!
Pshaw! This is mere folly, exclaimed Lord Cornwallis, as he
endeavored
to shake off the impression which the young Lord's earnest words
had producedThis is but a vain fancy
As he spoke they emerged from the thick wood, they reined their horses
upon the summit of Osborne's hillthe valley of the meeting-house lay
at their feet.
At this moment Lord Percy raised his faceat a glance he beheld the
glorious landscapea horrible agony distorted his countenance
My dream! My dream
! he shrieked, rising in his stirrups, and
spreading forth his hands.
And then with straining eyes he looked over the landscape.
That single small white cloud hovered there in the blue heavens! It
hovered in the blue sky right over the Meeting House! Hill and plain and
valley lay basking in the sun. Afar were seen pleasant farm houses
embosomed
in trees, delightful strips of green meadow, and then came the blue
distance where earth and sky melted into ONE!
But not on the distance looked Lord Percynot on the blue sky, or glad
fields, or luxuriant orchards.
His straining eye saw but the valley at his feet, the Quaker temple, the
quiet graveyard!
My dream! My dream! he shriekedThis is the valley of my
dreamand yonder is the graveyard! I am fated to die upon this field!
No words could shake this belief. Seeking his brother officers, Lord
Percy bestowed some token of remembrance on each of them, gave his
dearest friend a last word of farewell for his Betrothed, now far away in the
lofty halls of a ducal palace, and then, with a pale cheek and flashing eye,
rode forth to battle.
And now look at him, as with his dark hair waving on the wind, he
nears the graveyard wall.
He raised his form in the stirrups, he cast one flashing glance over his
trooper band, robed in forest green, and then his eye was fixed upon the
graveyard.
All was silent there! Not a shot from the windowsnot a rifle-blaze
from the dark grey wall. There was that dark grey wall rising some thirty
paces distantthere were the green mounds, softened by the rays of the
sun, pouring from that parted cloud, and there back in the graveyard, under
the shelter of trees, there is ranged a warrior-band, clad like his own in
forest green, and with the form of a proud chieftain, mounted on a
gold-hued
steed, towering in their midst.
That chieftain was Captain Waldemar, a brave partizan leader from the
wild hills of the Santee. His bronzed cheek, his long dark hair, his
well-proportioned
form, his keen dark eye, all mark his relationship to the
Indian girl of Carolina.
Little does Lord Percy think, as he rides madly toward that graveyard,
that there that half-Indian brother is waiting for him, with bullet and
sword.
On with the impulse of an avalanche sweep the British troopersbehind
them follow the infantry with fixed bayonetsbefore them is nothing but
the peaceful graveyard sward.
They reach the wall, their horses are rearing for the leap
When lo! What means this miracle?
Starting from the very earth, a long line of bold backwoodsmen start up
from behind the wall, their rifles poised at the shoulder, and that aim of
death securely taken!
A sheet of fire gleamed over the graveyard wall pouring full into the faces
of the British soldiersclouds of pale blue smoke went rolling up to heaven,
and as they took their way aloft, this horrid sight was seen.
Where thirty bold troopers, but a moment ago rushed forward, breasting
the graveyard wall, now were seen, thirty mad war-horses, rearing wildly
aloft, and trampling their riders' faces in the dust.
Lord Percy was left alone with the British Banner in his hand, his
horse's hoofs upon the wall!
On Britons, on, shrieked Percy, turning in wild haste to the advancing
columns of infantryOn and revenge your comrades!
At the same moment, from the farther extreme of the graveyard, was
heard the deep-toned shout
Riders of Santee upon these British robbers! Upon these British
robbers
,
who redden our soil with the blood of its children!
And then the British infantry, and then other bands of British troopers
came pouring over that fatal wall, upon the graveyard sward!
Then crashing onone fierce bolt of battlethat band of Rangers burst
upon the British bayonets; there was crossing of swords and waving of
bannerssteeds mingled with steedsgreen uniforms with green uniforms,
and scarlet with greennow right now leftnow backward now forward,
whirled the fiery whirlpool of that fightand there, seen clearly and
distinctly
amid the bloody turmoil of that battle, two forms clad in green and
gold, mounted on golden-hued steeds, with a gallant band of sworn brothers
all around them, fought their way to each other's hearts!
Percy and the dark-visaged Partizan Waldemar, met in battle!
Unknown to each other, the Brothers crossed their swordsthe child of
the proud English Countess, and the son of the wild Indian girl! Both
mounted on golden-hued steeds, both attired in dark green velvet, that
strange resemblance of brotherhood stamped on each face, they met in
deadly combat!
Say was not this Fate?
Their swords crossed rose and fellthere was a rapid sound of clashing
steel, and then with his brother's sword driven through his heart, Lord
Percy fell!
The Indian girl was avenged.
A wild whirl of the fight separated Captain Waldemar from his brother,
but when the battle was past, in the deep silence of that night, which
brooded over the battle-slain, this son of the Indian woman sought out the
corse of the English Lord from the heaps of dead. Bending slowly down
by the light of the moon, he perused the pale face of Lord Percy; he tore
the pacquet from his bosom, he read the testimonial of his mother's
marriage
,
he read the offers of favor and patronage, from the old Earl to the
Indian
woman's son.
Then he knew that he held the body of a dead brother in his arms.
Then he tore those offers of favor into rags, but placed the marriage
testimonial
close to his heart.
Then hethat half Indian man, in whose veins flowed the blood of a
long line of Indian kings mingling with the royal blood of England, he with
tears in his dark eyes, scooped a grave for his brother, and buried him
there.
And that fair young maiden gazing from the window of that ducal palace,
far away yonder in the English Isle, that fair young maiden, whose long
hair sweeps her rose-bud cheeks with locks of midnight darknesslook
how her deep dark eyes are fixed upon the western sky?
She awaits the return of her betrothed, the gallant Lord Percy. She
gazes to the west, and counts the hours that will elapse ere his coming!
Ah she will count the weeks and the months and the years, and yet he will
not come.
He will not come, for deep under the blood-drenched earth of
Brandywine
,
he the young, the gallant, the brave, rots and moulders into dust.
And she shall wait there many a weary hour, while her dark eye,
dilating
with expectation, is fixed upon that western sky! Ah that eye shall
grow dim, that cheek will pale, and yet her betrothed will not come!
Ah while her eye gleams, while her heart throbs as if to greet his coming
footstep, the graveworm is feasting upon his manly brow!
And there, in that lonely graveyard of Brandy wine, without a stone to
mark his last resting place, unhonored and unwept, the gallant Percy
moulders
into dust!
XII.THE LAST HOUR.
Meanwhile
the terror of the fight darkened around the Quaker Temple.
There is a moment of blood and horror. They fight each man of them
as though the issue of the field depended upon his separate hand and blow
but in vain, in vain!
The enemy swarm from the opposite hills, they rush forward in mighty
columns superior in force, superior in arms to the brave Continential
Yeomen
.
Again they advance to the chargeagain they breast the foethey drive
him backthey leap upon his bayonetsthey turn the tide of fight by one
gallant effortbut now! They waver, they fall back, Sullivan beholds his
Right Wing in confusionbut why need I pursue the dark history further?
Why need I tell how Washington came hurrying on to the rescue of his
army, with the reserve under General Greene? How all his efforts of
superhuman courage were in vain? How Pulaski thundered into the
British
ranks, and with his white-coated troopers at his back, hewed a way for
himself thro' that fiery battle, leaving piles of dead men on either side?
Suffice it to say, that overpowered by the superior force of the enemy,
the continental army retreated toward the south. Suffice it to say, that the
British bought the mere possession of the field, with a good round treasure
of men and bloodThat if Washington could not conquer the enemy, he
at all events saved his army and crippled his foe.
And there, as the American army swept toward Chester, there rushing
upon the very bayonets of the pursuing enemy was that gallant boy of
nineteen, imploring the disheartened fugitives to make one effort more, to
strike yet another blow!
It was in vain! While his warm arm was yet raised on high, while his
voice yet arose in the shout for Washington and freedom, La Fayette was
wounded near the ancle by a musket ball. The blood of old France
flowed warmly in the veins of that gallant boy!
That glorious French blood of Charlemagne, of Conde, of Navarre,
that glorious French blood, which in aftertime, making one wide channel
of the whole earth, flowed on in a mighty riveron to triumph, bearing
Napoleon on its gory waves!
Ah there was warm and generous blood flowing in the veins of that
gallant
boy of France!
Oh tell me you, who are always ready with the sneer, when a young
man tries to do some great deed, tries with a sincere heart and steady hand
to carve himself a name upon the battlements of timeoh tell me, have you
no sneer for this boy at Brandywine? This boy La Fayette, who left the
repose of that young wife's bosom, to fight the battles of a strange people
in a far land?
There was a General Howe, my friends, who invited some ladies to
take supper one night in Philadelphia, with this boy La Fayette, and then
sent his troops out to Barren Hill, to trap him and bring him in,but my
friends, that night the ladies ate their viands cold, for Sir William failed to
Catch the boy
.
There was a Lord Cornwallis, who having encircled the French
Marquis
with his troops, there in the forests of Virginia, wrote boastingly home
to his king, that he might soon expect a raree-show, for he was determined
to
Catch this Boy
, and send him home to London. The king had
his raree-show, but it was the news of my Lord Cornwallis's surrender at
Yorktown, but as for La Fayette, he never saw him, for my Lord
Cornwallis
failed to Catch the Boy.
XIII.PULASKI.
It
was at the battle of Brandywine that Count Pulaski appeared in all
his glory.
As he rode, charging there, into the thickest of the battle, he was a
warrior
to look upon but once, and never forget.
Mounted on a large black horse, whose strength and beauty of shape
made you forget the plainness of his caparison, Pulaski himself, with a form
six feet in height, massive chest and limbs of iron, was attired in a white
uniform, that was seen from afar, relieved by the black clouds of battle.
His face, grim with the scars of Poland, was the face of a man who had
seen much trouble, endured much wrong. It was stamped with an
expression
of abiding melancholy. Bronzed in hue, lighted by large dark eyes,
with the lip darkened by a thick moustache, his throat and chin were
covered
with a heavy beard, while his hair fell in raven masses, from beneath
his trooper's cap, shielded with a ridge of glittering steel. His hair and
beard were of the same hue.
The sword that hung by his side, fashioned of tempered steel, with a hilt
of iron, was one that a warrior alone could lift.
It was in this array he rode to battle, followed by a band of three
hundred
men, whose faces, burnt with the scorching of a tropical sun, or
hardened
by northern snows, bore the scars of many a battle. They were
mostly Europeans; some Germans, some Polanders, some deserters from
the British army. These were the men to fight. To be taken by the
British would be death, and death on the gibbet; therefore, they fought
their best and fought to the last gasp, rather than mutter a word about
quarter.
When they charged it was as one man, their three hundred swords
flashing
over their heads, against the clouds of battle. They came down upon
the enemy in terrible silence, without a word spoken, not even a whisper.
You could hear the tramp of their steeds, you could hear the rattling of their
scabbards, but that was all.
Yet when they closed with the British, you could hear a noise like the
echo of a hundred hammers, beating the hot iron on the anvil. You could
see Pulaski himself, riding yonder in his white uniform, his black steed
rearing aloft, as turning his head over his shoulder he spoke to his men:
Forwarts, Brudern, forwarts
!
It was but broken German, yet they understood it, those three hundred
men of sunburnt face, wounds and gashes. With one burst they crashed
upon the enemy. For a few moments they used their swords, and then
the ground was covered with dead, while the living enemy scattered in panic
before their path.
It was on this battle-day of Brandywine that the Count was in his glory.
He understood but little English, so he spake what he had to say with the
edge of his sword. It was a severe Lexicon, but the British soon learned
to read it, and to know it, and fear it. All over the field, from yonder
Quaker meeting-house, away to the top of Osborne's Hill, the soldiers of
the enemy saw Pulaski come, and learned to know his name by heart.
That white uniform, that bronzed visage, that black horse with burning
eye and quivering nostrils, they knew the warrior well; they trembled
when they heard him say:
Forwarts, Brdern, forwarts!
It was in the Retreat of Brandywine, that the Polander was most terrible.
It was when the men of Sullivanbadly armed, poorly fed, shabbily clad
gave way, step by step, before the overwhelming discipline of the British
host, that Pulaski looked like a battle-fiend, mounted on his demon-steed.
His cap had fallen from his brow. His bared head shone in an
occasional
sunbeam, or grew crimson with a flash from the cannon or rifle. His
white uniform was rent and stained; in fact, from head to foot, he was
covered with dust and blood.
Still his right arm was freestill it rose there, executing a British
hireling
when it fellstill his voice was heard, hoarse and husky, but strong in
its every toneForwarts, Brdern!
He beheld the division of Sullivan retreating from the field; he saw the
British yonder, stripping their coats from their backs in the madness of
pursuit. He looked to the South, for Washington, who, with the reserve,
under Greene, was hurrying to the rescue, but the American Chief was
not in view.
Then Pulaski was convulsed with rage.
He rode madly upon the bayonets of the pursuing British, his sword
gathering victim after victim; even there, in front of their whole army, he
flung his steed across the path of the retreating Americans, he besought
them, in broken English, to turn, to make one more effort; he shouted in
hoarse tones that the day was not yet lost!
They did not understand his words, but the tones in which he spoke
thrilled their blood.
That picture, too, standing out from the clouds of battlea warrior,
convulsed
with passion, covered with blood, leaning over the neck of his steed,
while his eyes seemed turned to fire, and the muscles of his bronzed face
writhed like serpentsthat picture, I say, filled many a heart with new
courage, nerved many a wounded arm for the fight again.
Those retreating men turned, they faced the enemy againlike
greyhounds
at bay before the wolfthey sprang upon the necks of the foe, and
bore them down by one desperate charge.
It was at this moment that Washington came rushing on once more to
the battle.
Those people know but little of the American General who call him the
American
Fabius
, that is, a general compounded of prudence and caution,
with but a spark of enterprise. American Fabius! When you will show
me that the Roman Fabius had a heart of fire, nerves of steel, a soul that
hungered for the charge, an enterprise that rushed from the wilds like the
Skippack, upon an army like the British at Germantown, or started from
ice and snow, like that which lay across the Delaware, upon hordes like
those of the Hessians, at Trentonthen I will lower Washington down
into Fabius. This comparison of our heroes, with the barbarian demi-gods
of Rome, only illustrates the poverty of the mind that makes it.
Compare Brutus, the ASSASSIN of his friend, with Washington, the
Saviour
of the People! Cicero, the opponent of Cataline, with Henry, the
Champion of a Continent! What beggary of thought! Let us learn to
be a little independent, to know our great men, as they were, not by
comparison
wiih the barbarian heroes of old Rome.
Let us learn that Washington was no
negative
thing, but all chivalry and
genius.
It was in the battle of Brandywine that this truth was made plain. He
came rushing on to battle. He beheld his men hewn down by the British;
he heard them shriek his name, and regardless of his personal safety, he
rushed to join them.
Yes, it was in the dread havoc of that retreat that Washington, rushing
40
forward into the very centre of the melee, was entangled in the enemy's
troops, on the top of a high hill, south-west of the Meeting House, while
Pulaski was sweeping on with his grim smile, to have one more bout with
the eager red coats.
Washington was in terrible dangerhis troops were rushing to the south
the British troopers came sweeping up the hill and around himwhile
Pulaski, on a hill some hundred yards distant, was scattering a parting
blessing among the hordes of Hanover.
It was a glorious prize, this
Mister
Washington, in the heart of the
British army.
Suddenly the Polander turnedhis eye caught the sight of the iron grey
and his rider. He turned to his troopers; his whiskered lip wreathed with
a grim smilehe waved his swordhe pointed to the iron grey and its
rider.
There was but one moment:
With one impulse that iron band wheeled their war horses, and then a
dark body, solid and compact was speeding over the valley like a
thunder-bolt
torn from the earththree hundred swords rose glittering in a faint
glimpse of sunlightand in front of the avalanche, with his form raised to
its full height, a dark frown on his brow, a fierce smile on his lip, rode
Pulaski. Like a spirit roused into life by the thunderbolt, he rodehis
eyes were fixed upon the iron grey and its riderhis band had but one
look, one will, one shout for
Washington
!
The British troops had encircled the American leaderalready they felt
secure of their preyalready the head of that traitor, Washington, seemed
to yawn above the gates of London.
But that trembling of the earth in the valley, yonder. What means it?
That terrible beating of hoofs, what does it portend?
That ominous silenceand now that shoutnot of words nor of names,
but that half yell, half hurrah, which shrieks from the Iron Men, as they
scent their prey? What means it all?
Pulaski is on our track! The terror of the British army is in our wake!
And on he camehe and his gallant band. A moment and he had swept
over the Britisherscrushedmangled, dead and dying they strewed the
green sodhe had passed over the hill, he had passed the form of
Washington
.
Another moment! And the iron band had wheeledback in the same
career of death they came! Routed, defeated, crushed, the red coats flee
from the hill, while the iron band sweep round the form of George
Washington
they
encircle him with their forms of oak, their swords of steel
the shout of his name shrieks through the air, and away to the American
host they bear him in all a soldier's battle joy.
It was at Savannah, that night came down upon Pulaski.
Yes, I see him now, under the gloom of night, riding forward towards
yonder ramparts, his black steed rearing aloft, while two hundred of his
iron men follow at his back.
Right on, neither looking to right or left, he rides, his eye fixed upon the
cannon of the British, his sword gleaming over his head.
For the last time, they heard that war cry
Forwarts, Brudern, forwarts!
Then they saw that black horse plunging forward, his forefeet resting on
the cannon of the enemy, while his warrior-rider arose in all the pride of
his form, his face bathed in a flush of red light.
That flash once gone, they saw Pulaski no more. But they found him,
yes, beneath the enemy's cannon, crushed by the same gun that killed his
steedyes, they found them, the horse and rider, resting together in death,
that noble face glaring in the midnight sky with glassy eyes.
So in his glory he died. He died while America and Poland were yet
in chains. He died, in the stout hope, that both would one day, be free.
With regard to America, his hope has been fulfilled, but Poland
Tell me, shall not the day come, when yonder monumenterected by
those warm Southern hearts, near Savannahwill yield up its dead?
For Poland will be free at last, as sure as God is just, as sure as he
governs
the Universe. Then, when re-created Poland rears her Eagle aloft
again, among the banners of nations, will her children come to Savannah,
to gather up the ashes of their hero, and bear him home, with the chaunt
of priests, with the thunder of cannon, with the tears of millions, even as
repentant France bore home her own Napoleon.
Yes, the day is coming, when Kosciusko and Pulaski will sleep side by
side, beneath the soil of
Re-created Poland
.
XIV.WASHINGTON'S LAST CHARGE AT BRANDYWINE.
They
tell us that he was cold, calm, passionless; a heart of ice and a
face of marble.
Such is the impression which certain men, claiming the title of
Philosopher
and Historian, have scattered to the world, concerning our own
Washington
.
They compare him with the great man of France. Yes, they say
Napoleon
was a man of genius, but Washington a man of talent. Napoleon was
all fire, energy, sublimity; Washington was a very good man, it is true, but
cold, calculating, common-place.
While they tell the mass of the people that Washington was a saint,
nay, almost a demi-god, they draw a curtain over his heart, they hide from
us, under piles of big words and empty phrases,
Washington the Man
.
You may take the demi-god if you like, and vapor away whole volumes
of verbose admiration on a shadow, but for my part, give me Washington
the Man.
He
was
a Man. The blood that flowed in his veins, was no Greenland
current of half-melted ice, but the warm blood of the South; fiery as its sun,
impetuous as its rivers. His was the undying love for a friend; his, the
unfathomable scorn for a mean enemy; his, the inexpressible indignation
when the spirit of partythat crawling thing, half-snake, half-apebegan
to bite his heel.
I like to look at Washington the Man. Nay, even at Washington the
Boy, dressed in plain backwoodsman's shirt and moccasins, struggling for
his life, yonder on the raft, tossed to and fro by the waves and ice of
Alleghany river.
Or at Washington the young General, sitting in his camp at Cambridge,
the map of the New World before him, as sword by his side, and pen in
hand, he planned the conquest of the Continent.
Or yet again, I love to behold Washington the Despised Rebel, sitting so
calm and serene, among those wintry hills of Valley Forge, while the
Pestilence thins his camp and Treason plots its schemes for his ruin in
Congress. Yes, I love to look upon him, even as he receives the letter
announcing
the Cabal, which has been formed by dishonest and ambitious
men, for his destruction; I see the scorn flush his cheek and fire his eye;
I hear the words of indignation ring from his lips; as I look, his broad
chest heaves, his clenched hand grasps his sword.
And yet in a moment, he is calm again; he has subdued his feelings of
indignation, not because they are unjust, but from the sublime reason that
the Cause in which he is engaged is too high, too holy, for any impulse of
personal vengeance.
Here is the great key to Washington's heart and character. He was a
Man of strong passions and warm blood, yet he crushed these passions,
and subdued this fiery blood, in order to accomplish the Deliverance of his
Country. He fervently believed that he was called by God to Deliver the
New World.This belief was in fact, the atmosphere of all his actions;
it moulded the entire man anew, and prepared the Virginia Planter, the
Provincial
Colonel, for the great work of a Deliverer.
They tell me that he was never known to smile. And yet there never
breathed a man, whose heart bounded more freely at the song and jest, than
his. But there was a cause for the deep solemnity, which veiled his face
when he appeared in public. The image of his Country bleeding on her
thousand hills, under the footsteps of British Tyranny, was ever before
him, calling as with the voice of a ghost, upon him, her Champion and
Saviour.
After the Revolution, there were as substantial and important reasons for
his solemnity of look and presence as before.
The country which he had redeemed, was torn by the fangs of
party-spirit
.
The wolves of faction, who had lain somewhat stilled and subdued
during the war, came out from their dens as soon as the day broke over
the long night, and howled their watch-words in the ear of Washington and
around the Ark of the Country's Freedom.
How to crush these creatures, without endangering that Ark, or
embroiling
the land in a civil warthis was the thought that always shadowed,
with deep solemnity, sometimes gloom, the countenance of Washington, the
President.
It is a bitter thought to me that the heart of this great, this good, this
warm-hearted man, was as much torn and pained during his Presidential
career, by the war of opposing factions, as it was in the Revolution by his
contest with a British foe.
To him there never came an hour of rest. His anxiety for his country
followed him to Mount Vernon, and ended only with his last breath. Too
pure for a party-man, soaring far above the atmosphere of faction, he only
held one name, one party dear to his heartthe name and party of the
American People
.
In order to reveal a new page in this man's character and history, let us
look upon him in the hour of battle and defeat. Let us pierce the
battlemists
of Brandywine, and gaze upon him at the head of his legions.
Pulaski
!
The noble countenance of the brave Pole stood out in strong relief from
the white smoke of battle. That massive brow, surmounted by the dark
fur cap and darker plume, the aquiline nose, the lip concealed by a thick
moustache, and the full square chin, the long black hair, sweeping to the
shouldersthis marked profile was drawn in bold relief, upon the curtain
of the battle-smoke. An expression of deep sadness stamped the face of
the hero.
I was thinking of Poland! he exclaimed, in broken accents, as he
heard his name pronounced by Washington.
Yes, said Washington, with a deep solemnity of tone, Poland has
many wrongs to avenge! But God lives in Heaven, yonderhe pointed
upward with his swordand he will right the innocent at last!
He will! echoed the Pole, as his gleaming eye reaching beyond time
and space seemed to behold this glorious spectaclePoland free, the cross
shining serenely over her age-worn shrines, the light of peace glowing in
her million homes.
Pulaski, said Washington, look yonder!
The Polander followed with his eye the gesture of Washington's sword.
Gazing down the hill, he beheld the last hope of the Continental Army
embosomed
among British bayonets; he saw the wreck of Sullivan's right
wing yielding slowly before the invader, yet fighting for every inch of
ground. He beheld the reserve under Greene, locked in one solid mass,
faces, hands, musquets, swords, all turned to the foe; an island of heroes,
encircled by a sea of British hirelings. The Royal Army extended far
over the fields to the foot of Osbourne's hill; the Red Cross banner waved
over the walls of the Quaker Temple. Far to the South, scattered bands
of Continentals were hurrying from the fields, some bearing their wounded
comrades, some grasping broken arms, some dragging their shattered forms
slowly along. Still that brave reserve of Greene, that wreck of Sullivan's
right wing, fought around the banner of the Stars, while the Red Cross flag
glared in their faces from every side.
The declining sun shone over the fight, lighting up the battle-clouds with
its terrible glow. It was now five o'clock. But one hour since the
conflict
began, and yet a thousand souls had gone from this field of blood up to
the throne of God!
The sky is blue and smiling yonder, as you see it through the rifted
cloudslook there upon the serene azure, and tell me! Do you not
behold
the ghosts of the dead, an awful and shadowy band, clustering yonder
ghastly with woundsdripping with bloodclustering in one solemn
meeting around that Impenetrable Bar?
At one glance, Pulaski took in the terrible details of the scene.
Now, shouted Washington, Let us go down!
He pointed to the valley with his sword. All his reserve, all his
calmness
of manner were gone.
Let us go down! he shouted again. The day is lost, but we will
give these British gentlemen our last farewell. Pulaskido you hear me
do you echo medo you feel as I feel? The day is lost, but we will go
down!
Down! echoed Pulaski, as his eye caught the glow flashing from the
eye of WashingtonGive way there! Down to the valley, for our last
farewell!
Washington quivered from head to foot. His eye glared with the fever
of strife. The sunlight shone over his bared brow, now radiant with an
immortal impulse.
His hand gathered his sword in an iron grasphe spoke to his steed
the noble horse moved slowly, on, through the ranks of Pulaski's legion.
Those rough soldiers uttered a yell, as they beheld the magnificent form
of Washington, quivering with battle-rage.
Come, Pulaski! Our banner is there! Now we will go down!
Then there was a sight to see onceand die!
Rising in his stirrups, Washington pointed to the fight, and swept down
the hill like a whirlwind, followed by Pulaski's band, Pulaski himself vainly
endeavoring to rival his pace, at the head of the iron men.
General Greene, turning his head over his shoulders, in the thickest of
the fight, beheld with terror, with awe, the approach of Washington. He
would have thrown his horse in the path of the chief, but the voice of
Washingtonterrible in its calmness, irresistible in its ragethundered
even amid the clamor of that fight.
Greenecome on!
Who could resist that look, the upraised sword, the voice?
The band of Pulaski thundered by, and Greene followed with horse and
foot, with steed and bayonet! The fire blazing in Washington's eye spread
like an electric flash along the whole column. The soldiers were men no
longer; no fear of bayonet or bullet now! The very horses caught the
fever of that hour.
One cry burst like thunder on the British host:Give way there!
Washington comes to battle!
Far down the hill, La Fayette and the Life Guard were doing immortal
deeds, for the banner of the stars.
Brows bared, uniforms fluttering in rags, they followed the Boy of
Nineteen
,
into the vortex of the fight, waving evermore that banner overhead.
They saw Washington come. You should have heard them shout, you
should have seen their swords how, dripping with blood, they glittered on
high.La Fayette saw Washington come, yes, the majestic form, the
sunlighted
brow! That sight inflamed his blood
Now, La Fayette, come on!
They were ranged beside the band of Pulaski, these children of
Washington
;
the gallant Frenchman led them on.
Thus Washington, Pulaski, Greene, La Fayette, thundered down into
the fight. It was terrible to hear the tramp of their horses' hoofs.
Captain Waldemarthe brave partizanwith the last twenty of his
riders, was holding a de perate fight with thrice the number of British
troopers.He too beheld Washington come, he too beheld that solid
column at his back; with one bound he dashed through the British band;
in another moment he was by the side of La Fayette. Washington turned
to him
Waldemar, we go yonder to make our last farewell! Come on!
And they went,yes, Washington at the head of the column led them
on. With banners waving all along the column, with swords and bayonets
mingling in one blaze of light, that iron column went to battle.
The British were in the valley and over the fields; you might count
them by thousands.
There was one horrid crash, a sound as though the earth had yawned to
engulph the armies.
Then, oh then, you might see this bolt of battle, crashing into the
British
host, as a mighty river rushing into the sea, drives the ocean waves far
before it. You might see the bared brow of Washington, far over swords
and spears; then might you hear the yell of the British, as this avalanche
of steel burst on their ranks! Men, horses, all were levelled before the
path of this human hurricane. Follow the sword of Washington, yonder,
two hundred yards right into the heart of the British army, he is gone,
gone in terrible glory! On either side swell the British columns, but this
avalanche is so sudden, so unexpected, that their proud array are for the
moment paralyzed.
And now Washington turns again. He wheels, and his band wheel with
him. He comes back, and they come with him. His sword rises and
falls, and a thousand swords follow its motion.
And downshrieking, torn, crushed,the foemen are trampled; another
furrow of British dead strew the ground. Vain were it to tell the deeds of
all the heroes, in that moment of glory. Greene, La Fayette, Pulaski,
Waldemar, the thousand soldiers, all seem to have but one arm, one soul!
They struck at once, they shouted at once, at once they conquered.
Now, he shouted, as his uniform, covered with dust and blood, quivered
with the glorious agitation that shook his proud frame,
Now, we can
afford to retreat
!
It was a magnificent scene.
Washingtonhis steed halted by the roadside, the men of Pulaski and
his own life-guard ranged at his backWashington gazed upon his legions
as they swept by. They came with dripping swords, with broken arms;
horse and foot, went hurrying by, spreading along the rode to the south,
while the banner of the stars waved proudly overhead. First, the legions
of Greene, then the band of Waldemar, with the gallant La Fayette riding
in their midst. He was ashy pale, that chivalrous boy, and the manly arm
of a veteran trooper held him in the saddle. His leg was shattered by a
musquet ball. Yet, as he went by, he raised his hand, still grasping that
well-used sword, and murmured faintly that word his French tongue
pronounced
so wellWashington! Washington beheld the hero, and smiled.
God be with you, my brave friend!
Then came the wreck of Sullivan's division, blood-stained their faces,
broken their arms, wild and wan their looks, sad and terrible their shattered
array. They swept by to the south, their gallant General still with his
band.
Now, said Washington, while the Life Guard and Pulaski's men
encircled
him with a wall of steel, Now we will retreat!
At this moment, while the British recovered from their late panic, were
rushing forward in solid columns, the face and form of Washington
presented
a spectacle of deep interest.
He sat erect upon his steed, gazing with mingled sadness and joy, now
upon the retrearing Continentals, now upon the advancing British. Around
him were the stout troopers; by his side the warrior form of Pulaski, far
away hills and valleys, clouded with smoke, covered with marching legions;
above, the blue sky, seen in broken glimpsesthe blue sky and the
declining
sun.
The blue and buff uniform of the Hero was covered with dust and blood.
His sword, lifted in his extended arm, was dyed with crimson drops.
You could see his chest heave again, and his eye glare once more:
On, comrades, now we can afford to retreat!
And the sunlight poured gladly over the uncovered brow of Washington.
This was the last incident of the battle! But an hour since the conflict
began, and yet the green valley is crowded with the bodies of dead men.
The Quaker temple throbs with the groans of the dying. The clear spring
of cold water, down in the lap of the valley, is now become a pool of blood,
its yellow sands clotted with carnage.
A thousand hearts, that one brief hour ago, beat with the warmest
pulsations
of life, are now stilled forever. And at this dread hour, as if in
mockery of the scene,
while the souls of the slain thronged trembling
to their dread account, the sun set calmly over the battle field, the blue
sky smiled againthe Brandywine went laughing on!
Let us group together these Legends of the past, illustrative of the
Romance and Tragedy of Brandywine.
XV.THE HUNTER-SPY.
Not
in the dim cathedral aisle, where the smoke of the incense ascends
for evermore, and the image of the Virgin smiles above the altarnot in
the streets of the colossal city, where the palace and the hut, the beggar and
the lord, are mingled in the great spectacle of lifenot even in the quiet
home of civilization, where the glow of the hearth-side flame lights up the
face of the mother as she hushes her babe to slumber
But among the mountains, where sky, and rock, and tree, and cataract,
speak of the presence of their God,Nature, with her thousand voices,
sings forever, her anthem of thankfulness and prayer.
It is a sublime anthem which she sings out yonder, in the untrodden
wilderness. The cataract thunders it, as in all the glory of its flashing
waters, it springs from the cliff into the darkness below. The breeze, too,
softly murmuring among the tops of the evergreen pines, in the calmness
of the summer morn, in the shadows of the summer eve, whispers that
anthem, as with an angel's voice. The sky writes it upon her vault, not
only in the sun and stars, and moon, but in every feathery cloud that skims
over its blue dome, in the deep silence of a summer noon.
But at night, when the storm comes out, and mingles cataract and rock,
forest and sky, in one fierce whirlpool of battle; then the thunder sings the
anthem, and the lightning writes it on the universe.
It was noon among the mountains, nearly a hundred years ago, when the
sun shone down through the woods upon the waters of a cataract,
trembling
in tumultuous beauty on the verge of a granite cliff, ere it dashed into
the abyss below.
Let us pause upon the verge of this cliff, and gaze upon Nature as she
41
stands before us, clad in the wild glory which she has worn since the hour
when Let there be Light! from the lips of Divinity, thundered over the
chaos of the new-born world.
Upon the verge of the cliff. Grey and hoary, overgrown with vines, and
clumps of moss. It trembles beneath our feettrembles as with the pulse
of the cataract. Look yondera mass of waters, not fifty yards in width,
emerging from the foliage, gliding between walls of rocks, gleaming for a
moment in bright sunshine on the edge of darkness, and then dashing in one
long stream of light and spray, far down into night.
Look belowah! you tremble, you shrink back appalled. That void
is terrible in its intense blackness. And from that abyss, for evermore,
arises a dull, sullen sound, like the whispering of a thousand voices. It is
the cataract, speaking to the rocks which receive it.
There is a rugged beauty in the spectacle. The woods all around, with
grey cliffs breaking from the canopy of leaves; the sky, seen there, far
above the cataract and its chasm; the cataract itself, bridged by fallen
tree.
A massy oak, rent from the earth by the storm, extends across the
cataract
,
just where it plunges into darkness. Here, on the western side, you
behold its roots, half torn from the groundyonder, on the eastern side,
its withered branches, strongly contrast with the waving foliage all around.
And between the rocks and the fallen tree, glide the waters, ere they dash
below.
As we stand here, on this rock, leaning over the darkness, tell me, does
not the awful silence of these primeval woodsonly broken by the eternal
anthem of the mountain streamstrike your hearts with a deep awe?
Another music shook the woods an hour ago. Strange sounds, scarce
ever heard in these woods before; sounds deeper than the roar of the
cataract
,
yet not so loud as thunder. Distant shouts, too, like the yell of
maddened
men, were borne upon the breeze, and, for a moment, the cataract
seemed to hush itself into silence, as a horrible chorus of groans broke over
the woods.
What meant these sounds, disturbing the sanctity of the Almighty's
forest? We cannot tell; but, only yesterday, a brave band of men, attired
in scarlet and gold, with bayonets gleaming over their heads, passed this
way in solid columns.
Only yesterday, their commandera man of courtly look and glittering
apparelrode through these woods, pointing gaily with his sword, as the
warm hope of victory flushed his face: while at his side, journeyed a young
man, with thoughtful eye and solemn face. The commander was clad in
scarlet and goldthe young man, in blue and silver. The commander was
General Braddock; the young man, Colonel Washington.
All day long the sounds of battle, borne from afar by the breeze, have
shrieked through the woods, but now all is still.
Yet holdthere is a crashing sound among the branches, on this western
side of the waterfalllook! A face is seen among the leaves, another, and
another. Three faces, wan, and wild, and bloody. In a moment, three
forms spring from the covert and stand upon this rock, gazing around upon
chasm, and wood, and sky, with the wild glare of hunted tigers.
The first form, standing on the verge of the cliff, with the blue uniform,
fluttering in ribbands over his broad chest, and spotted with blood on the
arms. A man in the prime of life, with brown hair clustering around his
brow, and a blue eye lighting up his sunburnt face. Though his uniform is
rent and torn, you can recognize the Provincial Sergeant in the native troops
of General Braddock's army.
At his back stand two British regulars, clad in scarlet, with long military
boots upon each leg, and heavy grenadier caps upon each brow. As they
gaze aroundtheir weaponless hands dripping with blooda curse breaks
from each lip.
Don't swear, exclaims the Sergeant, as he turns from the chasm to
his brother soldiers. It's bad enough as it is, without swearing! It's
like to drive me mad when I think of it! Only yesterday we hurried on,
through these very woods, and nowugh! D'ye remember what we saw,
by the banks of the river, not an hour ago? Piles of dead men, those men
our comrades, each brow with the scalp torn from the sculllittle rivers of
blood, each river running over the sod, and pouring into the Monongahela,
until its waves became as red as your uniform. Ah! I tell you, boys, it
makes a man sick to think of it!
And them Injins, exclaimed the tallest of the British soldiers, how
like born devils they screech! The fightin' I don't mind, but I confess the
screechin' hurts one's feelin's.
The other soldier, with a darkening brow, only muttered a single word,
hissing it, as with the force of his soul, through his set teeth:
The
Spy
!
At that word, the Sergeant started as though bitten by a rattle-snake.
His face, so frank in its hardy manliness of expression, was violently
contorted
,
his hands clenched.
Aye, the Spy! he growled: Would that I had him here!
He bent over the chasm, his blue eye glaring with dangerous light, as his
fingers quivered with the frenzy of revenge.
Would that I had him here, on this rock! By that home which I never
hope to see again, I would give my life to hold him, for one moment only,
on the verge of this rock, and then
Send him yelling down into the pool below! added the tall soldier.
The other soldier merely wiped the blood from his brow, and muttered
a deep oath, coupled with the ominous wordsThe Spy!
Come, my boys, we must hurry on! cried the Sergeant, his form
rising proudly in the sunlight.Them Injin devils are in our rear, and
you know the place where all us fellows, who dont happen to be killed, are
to meet! Aye, aye! Come on! Over this fallen tree be our way!
Followed by the regular soldiers, the Provincial Sergeant crosses the
fearful bridge. You see them quivering there, with but a foot of unhewn
timber between them and the blackness of the chasm; the sunbeam lights
up their tattered uniform and blood-stained faces.
In the centre of the fallen tree, even while the roar of the cataract deafens
his ears, the Sergeant suddenly turns and confronts his comrades:
Did n't he look beautiful? he shouts; and his eye flashes, and his
cheek glowsYes, beautiful's the word! I mean our young Virginia
Colonel, charging in the thickest of the fight, with his sword uplifted, and
his forehead bare! Did you see his coat, torn by the bullets, which pattered
about him like hail-stones? And then, as he knelt over the dyin' General,
shielding him from bullet and tomahawk, at the hazard of his life,I vow
he did look beautiful!
As he speaks, his form trembles with the memory of the battle, and the
tree trembles beneath him. The British soldiers do not speak a word
their position is too fearful for wordsbut with upraised arms they beseech
the Sergeant to hurry on.
Across the perilous bridge, and along this eastern rocka murmur of joy
escapes from each lip.
Then, through the thickly-gathered foliage, into this forest-arbor, formed
by the wild vines, hanging from the limbs of this centuried oak.
A quiet place, with gleams of sunshine escaping through the leaves, and
lighting up the mossy sod, and the massive trunk of the grand old tree.
What means that half-muttered shriek, starting from each heart, and
hushed by the biting of each lip?
The Sergeant starts back, places a hand on the mouth of each soldier, and
his deep whisper thrills in ears
In the name of Heaven be still!
Then every breath is hushed, and every eye is fixed upon the cause of
that strange surprise.
There, at the foot of the tree, his head laid against its trunk, his limbs
stretched along the sod, slumbers a man of some fifty years, one arm bent
under his grey hairs, while the other clasps the barrel of a rifle. Gaze
upon that sunburnt face, pinched in the lips, hollow in the cheeks, the brow
narrow and contracted, the hair and eyebrows black, sprinkled with grey,
and tell me, is it not the index of a mean heart, a cankered soul?
The form, clad in the shirt, leggins and moccasins of one of the outcasts
of civilization, in whom were combined the craft of the pale face, with the
ferocity of the savage, is lean, straight and angular, with the sinews gathered
around the bones like iron thongs.
And while the three soldiers, with darkening faces, gaze upon him, he
sleeps on, this wild hunter of the wild woods.
Do you see that silken purse, slightly protruding from the breast of the
coarse hunting shirt. Lookeven as the sunbeam falls upon it, the gleam
of golden guineas shines from its net-work.
There is a strange story connected with that silken purse, with its golden
guineas.
Not ten days ago, the British General was encountered in the wild forest
of the Alleghany mountains, by a tall hunter, who offered to act as his guide
to Fort Pitt, where the French held their position. The offer was accepted
the reward fifty guineas. The young Colonel Washington distrusted this
huntertraitor was stamped on his facebut Braddock laughed at his
distrust.
The guide led them forwardled them into the ambush of this morning,
and then disappeared.
At this moment, five hundred hearts are cold on Braddock's fieldthere
are an hundred little rills of blood pouring into the waves of Monongahela
river; Braddock himself lies mangled and bleeding in the arms of
Washington
;and
here, in this arbor of the wild wood, lulled to rest by the
anthem
of the cataract, sleeps the hunter-guide, with the silken purse and its
fifty guineas, protruding from his breast. Every guinea bears on its surface
the head of King Louis. Every guinea was given as the price of a life,
and yet there is no blood upon them; but the sun, shining through the
foliage lights them with a mild, warm glow.
And all the while the three soldiers stand there, biting their lips, and
clenching their hands together. There is something fearful in this ominous
silence.
At last the Sergeant advances, stealthily, it is true, yet the sound of his
footstep echoes through the wood. Still the Hunter sleeps on. Then with
a rude knife he severs a piece of the wild vine, ties one end around a
projecting
limb of the oak, pushes the leaves aside, and you behold the other
end dangling over the chasm.
A flood of sunlight rushes in through the opening, bathes with its glow
the darkened face of the Sergeant, and the withered face of the sleeping
man. Around the form of the Sergeant, so vigorous in its robust manhood,
extends the mass of foliage, like a frame around a picture. For a moment,
he stands there, on the edge of the eastern rock, the grape vine dangling in
one hand, while his straining eye peruses the darkness of the abyss.
As he turns to his comrades again, he utters this singular sentence in a
whisper:
Does n't it seem to you that a man tied to this grape-vine by the neck,
and forced to leap from the rock, would stand a mighty good chance of
beinghung?
A grim smile passes over each facestill the hunter sleeps on; he sleeps
the sound slumber of hardship and toil.
Presently the Sergeant advances, shakes him roughly by the shoulder,
and shouts in his ear
Come, Isaac, get up. To-day you die!
The sleeping man quivered, opened his eyes, beheld the darkened face
above, and then clutched for his rifle.
With a sudden movement, the Sergeant flings it beyond his reach.
You know me, Isaac. You see the blood upon my coat. You know
your doom. Get up, and say your prayers.
This was said in a very low voice, yet every word went to the Hunter's
heart. In silence he arose. As he stood erect upon the sod, it might be
seen that he was a man of powerful frame and hardened sinews. He gazed
from face to face, and then toward the cliffhis countenance changed from
sunburnt brown to asky paleness.
What d'ye mean? he falters. You don't intend mischief to an
old man?
Paler in the face, tremulous in each iron limbah! how cowardice and
crime transform a man of iron sinews into a trembling wretch!
Say your prayers, Isaac, was the only answer which awaited him.
As the Sergeant spoke, the light in his blue eye grew wilder; he trembled
from his heart to his finger-ends, but not with fear.
Again the Hunter raised his stealthy grey eye, ranging the arbor with a
glance of lightning-like rapidity. All hope of escape was idle.
Let me finish him with the knife! growled the tall soldier.
Say the word, Sergeant, and I'll send a bullet from his own rifle through
his brain!
I know'd ye when ye was a boy, down yander in the hills of old
Virginny
,
Isaac, said the Sergeant; and know'd ye for a liar and thief.
Now ye're grown to a tolerable good agegrey hairs, and wrinkles, too,
I know ye for a traitor and a murderer!
But, Jacob, you won't kill me here, like a dog? exclaimed the Hunter,
in a hollow voice.
There's a matter of five or six hundred men dead, this hour, on yonder
battlefield. Not only dead, but mangledtheir skulls peeledugh! It's
an ugly word, I know, but it's a facttheir skulls
peeled
, and their bodies
cut to pieces by musquet balls and tomahawks. You did it all, Isaac. You
sold your countrymenyour flesh and blood, as I might say, and sold 'em
to the French and Injins.Come, Isaac, say your prayers!
There was a strange contrast between the broad, manly figure of the
Sergeant, rising to its full stature, and the slender form of the Hunter,
cringing as from the danger of a threatened blow. The sunlight fell over
both faces, one flushed with a settled purpose, the other livid with the
extremity
of fear. In the shadows of the woody arbor the British soldiers
stood, awaiting in silence the issue of the scene.
And ever and anon, in the pauses of the fearful conversation, the cataract
howled below.
I've no prayers to say, said the Hunter, in a dogged tone. Come
murder meif you like, I'm ready!
There was something sublime in the courage of the Coward, who
trembled as with an ague fit, as he said the words.
The words, the tone, the look of the man seemed to touch even the
determined
heart of the Sergeant.
But you may have a wife, Isaac, or a child he falteredYou may
wish to leave some message?
I may have a wife and child and I may not, said the Hunter, quietly
baring his throat. Come, if you're goin' to murder me, begin!
Then commenced a scene, whose quiet horror may well chill the blood in
our veins, as we picture it.
The Sergeant advanced, seized the end of the grape-vine, and, while the
wretch trembled in his grasp, knotted it firmly about his neck, gaunt and
sinewy as it was.
The doomed man stood on the edge of the cliff.Below him boiled the
watersabove him smiled the sky. His deathsman was at his side.
For a moment, the Hunter turned toward the comrades of the Sergeant.
Kill him like a dog! growled one of the soldiers.
Remember the battle, and choke him until his eyes start! exclaimed
the other.
The eye of the miserable man wandered to the face of his Executioner.
Calm and erect the Sergeant stood there; the only signs of agitation which
he manifested, were visible in a slight tremulous motion of his lip, a sudden
paleness of his cheek.
Ain't there no pity? whined the Hunter. Ye see I'm not fit to die
the waterfall skeers me. No pity, did ye say?
None! thundered the Sergeant, and with one movement of his arm
pushed the doomed man from the rock.
Thenas the limb quivered with the burden of the fearful fruit which it
boreas the blackened face and starting eyes, and protruding tongue glowed
horribly in the sunlightas one long, deep cry of agony mingled with the
roar of the cataractthe Sergeant seized the purse of guineas and hurled it
far down into the darkness of the chasm.
Let the traitor's gold go with his soul! he cried, as the coin, escaping
from the purse, sparkled like spray-drops through the air.
The level rays of the setting sun streamed over the dead man's face.
All was desolate and silent in the forestthe Sergeant and his comrades
had passed on their waythe deep anthem of the waterfall arose to the
sunset Heaven.
There was a footstep on the fallen tree, and a boy of some twelve years,
bearing a burden on his back, came tripping lightly over the cataract. He
was roughly clad, in a dress of wild deer's hide, yet there was a frankness
about his sunburnt face, a daring in his calm grey eye, which made you
forget his uncouth attire. As he came bounding on, as fearlessly as though
the floor of some quiet home were beneath himthe breeze tossed his
brown hair aside from his face, until it waved in curls of glossy softness.
Father! his young voice resounded through the woods, clear and shrill
as the tones of careless boyhood. Father, do you sleep yet? he cried,
as he crossed the tree. You know I went this morning to the Indian's
wigwam to procure food and drink for you. Here it isI'm safe back
again. Father, I say!
Again he called, and still no answer.
He stood on the astern side of the waterfall, near the forest arbor.
Ah! I know what you're about! he laughed, with childish gaiety.
You want me to think you're asleepyou want to spring up and frighten
me! Ha, ha, ha!
And gaily laughing, he went through the foliage, and stood in the forest
arborstood before the DEAD MAN.
His FATHER, hanging by the grape-vine to the oaken limb, his feet above
the chasm, the sunset glow upon his face. That face as black as ink; the
eyes on the cheek; the purpled tongue lolling on the jaw
his father!
Every breath of air that stirred waved his grey hairs about his brow, and
swayed his stiffened body to and fro.
The boy gazed upon it, but did not weep. His father might be a thief,
traitor, murderer, but the son knew it not. The old man was kind to him
yes, treacherous to all the world, he loved his motherless child!
Father!
the boy gasped, and the bread and bottle which he bore on
his shoulders, fell to the ground.
He approached and gazed upon the body of the dead man, You might
see a twitching of the muscles of his young face, a strange working of the
mouth, an elevation and depression of the eye-brows, but his grey eyes
were undimmed by a tear. There was something terrible in the silent
sternness with which the child gazed into his murdered father's face.
There was a paper pinned to the breast of the dead man, a rough paper
scrawled with certain uncouth characters. The boy took the paperhe
could not readbut carefully folding it, he placed it within the breast of his
jacket, near to his heart.
Twenty years afterward, that paper was the cause of a cold-blooded and
horrible murder, wild and unnatural in its slightest details.
Long and earnestly the boy stood gazing upon that distorted face. The
same sunbeam that shone upon the visage of the dead, lighted up the
singular
countenance of the boy.
At last, approaching the edge of the cliff, he took his father's hands within
his own. They were very cold. He placed his hands upon the old man's
face. It was clammy and moist. The boy began to shudder with a fear
hitherto unknown to him. For the first time, he stood in the presence of
Death.
His broken ejaculations were calculated to touch the hardest heart.
Father! he would whisper, you aint dead, are you? If you are
dead what'll I do? Come, father, and tell me ye aint dead? Father! I
say, father!
As the sun went down, that cry quivered through the woods.
The moon arose. Still by her pale light, there on the verge of the cliff,
stood the boy, gazing in his father's face.
I'll cut him down, that's what I'll do! he said, taking a hunter's knife
from his girdle.
Standing on tip-toe he hacked the grape-vine with the knife; it snapped
with a sharp sound: she boy reached forth his arms to grasp his father's
body; for a moment he held it trembling there, the blackened face silvered
by the light of the moon.
But his grasp was feeble, compared to the weight which it sustained, and
the body passed from his hands. There was a hissing sound in the aira
dead pausea heavy splash in the waters below.
The boy knelt on the rock and gazed below. I confess, as I see him
kneeling there, the light of the moon upon his waving locksthe silence of
night only broken by the eternal anthem of the cataract,that I cannot
contemplate without a shudder, that sad and terrible picture:
The Boy, leaning over the rock, as he gazes with straining eyes, far down
into the darkness of the abyss, for the DEAD BODY OF HIS
Father
!
XVI.THE SON OF THE HUNTER-SPY.
The
gleam of the hearthside taper flashed far over the valley of the
Brandywine
.
From the upper window of that peaceful home, it flamed a long
and quivering ray of golden light.
The old house stood alone, some few paces from the road, at least an
hundred yards from the waters of the Brandywine. A small fabric of dark
grey stone, standing in the centre of a slope of grassy sod, with steep roof,
narrow windows, and a rustic porch before the door. On either side of the
grassy slope, the woods darkened, thick and luxuriant; above, the universe
of stars shed their calm, tranquil light, over the slumbering valley; from
afar, the musical murmur of the waves, rolling over their pebbled bed, broke
the deep silence of the night.
Let us look through the darkness, and by the clear starlight, behold this
small two-storied fabric, in all its rustic beauty, while yonder, not twenty
yards distant, a hay-rick rises from the level of the sod. All is still around
this home of Brandywine,the house, the gently-ascending slope, the
conical
hay-rick, the surrounding woods, present a picture of deep repose.
42
We will enter the home, yes, into the upper room, from whose narrow
window the ray of the fireside taper, gleams along the shadowy valley.
An old man, sitting easily in his oaken arm-chair, the glow of the candle
upon his wrinkled face and snowy hairs. The smoke of his pipe winds
around his face and head; his blue eyes gleaming with calm light, and
composed features, and attitude of careless ease, all betoken a mind at peace
with God and man.
On one side you behold his couch, with its coverlid of unruffled white;
yonder a rude table, placed beneath a small mirror, with a Bible, old and
venerable, laid upon its surface. There is a narrow hearth, simmering with
a slight fire of hickory faggots; beside the hearth, you see the door of a
closet, its panels hewn of solid oak, and darkened into inky blackness by
the touch of time.
In the centre of the room, his calm face glowing in the light of the candle,
sits the old man, coat and vest thrown aside, as he quietly smokes his
grateful pipe. As he knocks the ashes from the bowl, you may see that
he is one-armed; for the right arm has been severed at the shoulder: the
sleeve dangles by his side.
You will confess that it is but a quiet, nay, a tame picture, which I have
drawn for youan old and one-armed man, smoking his evening pipe, ere
he retires to rest, his wrinkled face melowed with unspeakable content, his
blue eyes gleaming from beneath the thick grey eye-brows, as with the
light of blessed memories.
And yet this scene, placed beside another scene which will occur ere an
hour passes, might well draw tears from a heart of granite.
Suddenly the old man places his hand against his brow, his mild blue
eye moistens with a tear. His soul is with the pastwith the wife who
now sleeps the last slumber, under the sod of the Quaker graveyardwith
the scenes of battle in the dim forests, where the rifle-blaze streams redly
over the leaves, and the yell of the Indian mingles with the war of the
cataract.
All at once there comes a memory which blanches the old man's cheek,
fills with wild light his calm blue eye. Looking back into time, he beholds
a dim recess of the forest, perched above the waters of the cataract, the
sunbeam
playing over its moss, while the face of a dead man glares horribly in
the last flush of the sunset hour.
The old man rises, paces the floor, with his only hand wipes the moisture
from his brow.
It was right, he murmursHe had betrayed a thousand brave men
to death, and he died!
And yet, look where he might, through that quiet room, he beheld a dead
man, suspended to the limb of a forest oak, with the sunlightthat last red
flush of sunset, which is so beautifulplaying warmly over the livid features.
This you will confess, was a terrible memory, or a strange frenzy. An
old man whose life for at least twenty years, had been spent in the scenes
of a quiet home, to behold a livid face, working convulsively in death,
wherever he turned!
I know not why it is, but wherever I turn, I seem to seeyes, I do
seea dead man's face! And whenever I try to think of my dead wife, I
hear a voice repeating`
this night, this night you die!
'
As the old man spoke, resuming his pipe, a slight sound disturbed the
silence of the room. He turned, and there, like a picture framed by the
rough timbers of the doorway, beheld the form of a young girl, clad slightly,
in her night-dress with a mass of brown hair about her neck and shoulders.
One hand was raised, the finger to her lip, and the round white arm,
gleaming in the light; the other grasped the handle of the door.
There was something very beautiful in the sight.
Not that her dress was fashioned of silk or purple, or that her white
neck shone with the gleam of diamonds or pearls. Ah, no! Her dress
was made of coarse homespun cloth; it left her arms, and neck, and feet,
bare to the light. Still there was a beauty about her young face, which
glowed on the lips and cheeks, with the warmth of a summer dawn, and
shone in the deep blue eyes, with the tranquil loveliness of a starlight
night.
Her hair too; you cannot say that it gathered in curls, or floated in
tresses; but to tell the sober truth, in color it was of that rich brown which
deepens into black, and waving from her white forehead, it fell in one glossy
mass, down to the white bosom, which had never been ruffled by a thought
of sin.
With regard to the young form, whose outlines gleamed on you, even
from the folds of her coarse dress, you could not affirm that it rivalled the
dream of the Sculptor, the Venus de Medici, or burst forth in all the
majestic beauty of one of Raphael's Painted Poems. It was but the form
of a Peasant Girl, reminding you in every hue and outline, of a wild forest
rose, that flourishing alone amid large green leaves, trembles on the verge
of its perfect bloom; not so gorgeous as a hot-house plant, still very warm,
and very loveable, and very beautiful.
And she stood there, even on the threshold, her finger to her lip, gazing
with a look of wild alarm, upon the wrinkled face of her father, the
one-armed
schoolmaster of Brandywine.
Mary! the old man exclaimed, his eyes expanding with wonder.
Hush, father! Do you not hear the tread of armed men? Listen!
Do you not hear the rattling of arms? Hark! That deep-toned whisper,
coupled with an oath`
Mayland the spybreak the doorarrest, and
bear him to the British camp!
'
And while the word trembled on her lip, a dull, heavy sound broke like
a knell upon the air. It was the crashing of a musket-stock against the
door of the schoolmaster's home.
Fly! For God's sake, fly! exclaimed Mary, darting forward, and
laying her white hand on the old man's arm.
Fly! he echoed, with a bewildered lookWherefore? Whom
have I wronged, that I should fly from my own home at midnight, like a
hunted beast?
In brief words, uttered with gasping breath and tremulous bosom, the
Daughter revealed the strange secret:
A week ago, you gave shelter to an old man, clad in the garb of
forest-hunter
.
That man left in your charge a pacquet, which you promised to
transmit without delay, to the Camp of Washington!
And did so, this very morning.
That pacquet was stolen from the camp-chest of General Howe. It
contained his plans of battleNow do you guess wherefore the British
soldiers
surround your house, whispering your name as `Mayland the Spy?'
The old man's countenance fell.
Oh, that I had my own good right arm again! he cried, after a
moment's
pauseI would defy the whole pack of red-coat hounds!
Harsh language, this! But it must be confessed that the old
school-master
was prejudiced against the British; he had seen but one side of the
questionaye, read it too, in the smouldering ruins of the homes they had
burned, in the livid faces of the farmers they had butchered.
The Peasant Girlclad lightly as she was, in her night dresstripped
softly to the opposite side of the room, and opened the closet door. In a
moment, she had torn the loose boards from the floor.
Father, the way of escape lies before you! This ladder descends
from the closet into the cellar; from the cellar a subterranean passage leads
to the side of the hill! Quickthere is no time to be lost! For
God's
sakefly!
`The ladder was used as a stairway in the old times; the underground
passage was made in the time o' the Injings, murmured the old man.
But my daughter, who will protect you?
They seek not to harm me, she hurriedly exclaimedHark! Do
you hear their shouts?
And, as if in answer to her words, there came a hoarse and murmuring
cry from beneath the windows.
One blow, and we'll force the door! a deep voice was heard
Remember
,
comrades! a hundred guineas, if we catch the Spy!
The old man hesitated no longer. Placing a foot on the ladder, he began
to descend. His daughter bending over him, held the light in her extended
hand; its rays lighted his grey hairs, and warmed the soft outlines of
her face.
Quick, father! she gaspingly whisperedThe passage leads out on
the hill-side, near the hay-stack! Ha! he descendsone moment more
and he will stand in the passage! Another moment, and he will be free!
Holding the light above her head, she swept her brown hair aside from
her face, and gazed into the darkness beneath with dilating eyes.
Still from beneath the windows arose that hoarse cry; again the crash of
musquet-stocks against the door.
In truth, thee father is in great danger, said a mild voice, which made
the young girl start as though she had trod on a serpent's fang.
She turned, and beheld a man of slender frame, clad in the plain garb of
the Quaker faith. Gaze upon him and tell me, in that contracted face, with
sharp nose and hawk-like grey eyes, thin lips and brown hair, curling to
the shoulders, do you recognize some Memory of the Past?
Does it look like the face of the Hunter-Spy, who hung above the
chasm, long years ago, or like the countenance of his Son, the laughing boy,
whose blood was congealed to ice, by the vision of the murdered man?
Gilbert Gates! exclaimed Mary; here, too, in this hour of peril!
Then indeed, does evil threaten us!
Maiden, thee wrongs me, exclaimed that soft and insinuating voice.
Passing along the valley, on the way to my farm, whichas thee knows
lies near Brenton's ford, I beheld thee father's house surrounded by
armed men, who clamored for his blood. I found entrance by a back
window, and am here to save thee.
Burst open the door! arose the shout from beneath the windows.
We'll trap the Rebel in his den!
You here to save me? exclaimed Mary, as she blushed from the
bosom to the brow with scorn. I tell you man, there is Traitor on your
forehead and in your eye!
Look thee, maidenbut two hours ago, thee father did reject the offer
of marriage which I made to thee, with words of bitterness and scorn.
Now he is threatened with deathnay, smile not in derisionthy honor is
menaced with ruin! Be mineyea, consent to receive my hand in
marriage
,
and I will save ye!
Ah! his footsteps are in the cellarhe gains the passagehe is saved!
exclaimed Mary, as she flung the rays of the light into the gloom below.
Be yours! and while every pulse throbbed tumultuously with loathing,
she turned to the strange man by her sideNeither your assumed dress,
nor awkward attempt at the Quaker dialect, can deceive me! I know you
scorn you! Nay, do not advanceI am but a weak girl, but dare to
pollute me, with but a finger's touch, and as heaven nerves my arm, I will
brain you with this oaken brand!
She stood on the verge of the closet, one hand grasping the light, while
the other raised aloft a solid piece of oak, which she had seized from the
floor.
You can see the man of slender figure and Quaker dress shrink back
appalled
.
A wild light blazes in his grey eye; his long, talon-like fingers are
pressed convulsively against his breast. Suddenly his hard features were
softened by a look of emotion, which played over his face like a sunbeam
trembling on a rock of granite.
Maiden, did thee know my lifeMY OATHthee would not taunt me
thus.
He
died alone in the wild woodah, even now, I see the sunset
flush upon his icy face!
My fatherthe only friend I ever hadthe only
thing I ever loved. Maiden, become mine, and all shall be forgottenall,
even my OATH!
Clasping his hands, while his cold grey eyes were wet with tears, he
advanced
,
and gazed upon the warm bloom of the maiden's face.
For a moment, she gazed upon him, while the flush of scorn, which
reddened
her cheeks, was succeeded by a look of deep compassion.
Again that deep roar beneath the windowshark! A crasha wild yell
We have the Rebel up stairs, and the guineas are ours!
Does thee consent? exclaimed Gilbert Gates, advancing a single step.
Ha! The door between the cellar and the passage is unfastened!
But I will save my father at the hazard of my life!
With one bound she flung herself upon the ladder, and with the light
above her head, descended into the darkness of the cellar. As she went
down, her hair fell wavingly over her neck and shoulders, over the bosom
which heaved tumultuously into the light.
Gilbert Gates in his Quaker garb, with his hands folded over his narrow
chest, stood alone in the darkness of the school-master's bed-room. All
was darkness around him, yet there was a light within, which burned his
heart-strings, and filled his blood with liquid fire.
Darkness around him; no eye to look upon the writhings of his face; and
yet, even there through the gloom, he beheld that fearful visiona dead
man swinging over the abyss of a cataract, with the sunset flush upon his
icy face.
Suddenly there was the sound of trampling feet upon the stairs; then the
blaze of torches flashed into the room, and some twenty forms dressed in
the attire of Tory Refugeeshalf-robber, half-soldiercame rushing over
the threshhold.
The schoolmasterwhere is he? exclaimed their leader, a burly
ruffian
,
with crape over his face, and a white belt across his breast. Speak,
Gilbert!
The Spy! echoed the deep voices of the Tories, as they waved their
torches, their rifles, and their knives, above their heads.
Yes, Smoothspeech, where's the schoolmaster, and the purty robin his
daughter, Polly? cried a voice which issued from a mass of carbuneled
face, which in its turn, surmounted by a huge form clad in scarlet. A
hundred guineas for the lass, you know; eh, comrades?
The answer of Gilbert was short and concise.
In truth, it seems to me, the old man Mayland and his daughter Mary,
are even now in the cellar, attending to their household affairs!
With one movement, the Tory Captain and his comrades rushed down
the stairway.
Gilbert approached the closet; a light, gleaming from the cellar below,
bathed his face in a red glare.
He will emerge from the passage on the hillside, near the hay-stack,
he muttered, while a demoniac look worked over his contracted face.
Fairer tombs have I seenbut none so warm!
As he gazes down the narrow passage, the light from beneath, reddening
his face, while his slender form quivers with a death-like agony: Let us
go back through the vista of twenty years, and behold the boy gazing into
the darkness of the chasm, in search of his father's corse.
Who, in the cold-featured, stony-eyed Gilbert Gates, would recognize the
boy with laughing eyes and flowing hair?
The blaze of torches illumined the cellar.
Before a door of solid oak, which separated the cellar from the
subterranean
passage, the Tories paused. Then deep-muttered oaths alone disturbed
the midnight silence.
Quickwe have no time to losehe is hidden in the underground
passagelet us force the door, before the people of the valley come to his
rescue!
Thus speaking, the Tory leader, whose face was hidden beneath the folds
of crape, pointed with his sword towards a heavy billet of wood, which
laid on the hard clay of the cellar floor.
Four stalwart Tories seize it in their muscular grasp; they stand
prepared
to dash the door from its hinges.
One good blow and the Spy is ours! shouts the Tory leader, with
an oath.
And the guineasdon't forget the guineas, and the girl! growled the
red-faced British Sergeant.
The torch-light fell over their faces, frenzied by intoxication and rage,
over their forms, clad in plain farmer's costume, with a belt across every
chest, a powder horn by each side.
And at this moment, as they stand ready to dash the door into fragments,
on the other side stands Mary, the peasant girl, her round white arm
supplying
the place of bar and fastening. Yes, with the light in her extended
right arm, she gazes after the retreating form of her father, while her left
arm is placed through the staples, in place of the bar.
One blow, and the maiden's arm will be rent in fragments, even to the
shoulder, one blow, and over her crushed and trampled body, will be made
the pathway of the ravager and robber!
Heaven, pity me! My father has not sufficient strength to roll the
rock from the mouth of the passage! I hear their voicestheir threats
they prepare to force the door, but I will foil them even yet! They shall
not pass to my father's heart, save over the dead body of his child!
Meanwhile, on the opposite side of the door, the four ruffians stood ready
with the billet of oak, in their iron grasp.
Now! shouted the Tory Captain, one good blow, and it is done!
They swayed the log slowly to and froit moved forward,all the
impulse
of their iron sinews concentrated in the effortwhen a heavy body
fell from the narrow window of the cellar and beat the billet to the ground.
The curse of the Tory leader echoed through the vault.
In a moment, ere they could raise a hand, up from the darkness there
rose the form of a giant negro, bared to the waist, his broad chest heaving,
while his eyes rolled wildly in his inky face.
Black Sampson! growled the Tory. Stand aside charcoal, or I'll
cut you down!
Look heah! shouted the Negro, confronting the armed Tories with
his bared arms and breast, while his teeth grated convulsively. Stan' off
I say s-t-a-n' off! Ole Massa Maylan' kind to Sampsongib him bread
when he hungrymed'cin' when he sick! Now you gwain to hurt de ole
man? I 'spose not, while Sampson hab an arm! Stan' offI'm
dangerous
!
And the black Hercules towered aloft, his sinews writhing, his teeth
clenched, his featuresmoulded with the aquiline contour of the Ashantee
racequivering with rage.
There was a strugglethe gleam of armsshouts and cursesyet still
the Negro beat them backdashing their swords aside with his weaponless
hands.
Still, true to that wild fidelitywhich burned in his savage heart like a
gleam from Heavenhe shouted his hoarse war-cry.
De ole man kind to Sampson! 'Spose you hurt him? You mus' kill
dis nigga fust!
Again he beat them backbut at last, by a simultaneous effort they bore
him to the earth.
At the same moment, the door flew open, and a shriek quivered through
the cellar.
Savedmy fathersaved!
There, beneath the glare of the torches, lay the form of the fainting girl
her bosom pulseless, her face as white as death.
This way! cried the Tory Captain. We will secure the Spy first,
and then his daughter!
They rushed after their leadertheir shouts and cries, echoed far along
the passage.
In another moment, a light shone over the cellar and a man of some
twenty-six years, attired in the brown dress of a farmer, with blue eyes and
flaxen hair, advanced toward the unconscious girl.
Here's a purty business! he exclaimed, with a strong German accent
De nigga kilt, and Polly half dead!
And thus speaking, honest Gotleib Hoff knelt before the unconscious
girl.
On the green slope, which arose from the school-master's home, toward
the woods, on the hill-top stood the strange being whom we have known as
the son of the Hunter-Spy, and the Pretended QuakerGilbert Gates.
Above him arched the universe of starsaround him, slumbered the
peaceful valley of Brandywinewithin him, burned the tortures of a lost
soul.
In his talon-like fingers he crushed a much-worn paper; it had been
pinned to the dead man's breast some twenty years ago.
There were cold drops of sweat upon his brow; he trembled from his
heart to his finger ends.
They are on his track, the dupes, the tools of my vengeance! Mine
minefather and daughter, both mine! For him a death of horrorfor
her a life of shame! Hah! I hear their shoutsthey pursue him to the
death!
As he spoke, a long column of light was flung over the green sward
where he stood, as if from the bosom of the earth. A huge rock was rolled
from the mouth of the mound, and the shouts and yells of the ruffian band
swelled on the air.
A figure sprang from the shelter of the mounda weak and aged man
his attire covered with earth, and torn in fragmentshis blue eyes,
wandering
in their glance, his grey hairs tossing to the impulse of the night breeze.
As he sprung out upon the sod, he muttered the name of God:
It is hard for an old man like me to be hunted to death like a mad dog!
Let me see, which way shall I turn? I must take to the woods!
Nay, friend Mayland, nay, said a mild and conciliating voice: Thee
has never trusted in me, yet now will I save thy life. Not to the woods,
for the bloodhounds are too near; in truth they are. But to the hay-stack!
Behold this cavity, which I have made to conceal thee, amid this pile of
hay!
Gilbert Gates! cried the old man, starting back. I trust you not
there is Traitor written on your face!
Hark! Does thee hear the shouts of thee pursuers? `Death, death
to Mayland the Spy!' Will thee trust to them?
To the hay-stack be it, then! cried the bewildered old man; Bless
me, what does this mean? A hole hollowed out in the centre of the stack!
I'll tell thee when thou art saved! cried Gilbert, with his peculiar
smile. In, friend Mayland, in! They will never suspect thee
hiding-place
I
will conceal it with this loose hay!
In a moment Jacob Mayland disappeared, while Gilbert Gates stood alone
in the centre of the sward.
43
The hay-stack, round, compact and uniform in appearance, rose darkly
in the dim light of the stars. Within its centre, cramped, confined, scarce
able to breathe, crouched Jacob Mayland, the one-armed schoolmaster.
A shout from the mound, a flash of light, and some twenty forms leap
one by one, from the mouth of the passage.
Ha! Gilbert Gates! shouted the Tory leaderwhich way went
they spy?
To the woods! to the woods! cried Gilbert, as his sharp features
glowed in the light of twenty torches.
Look, you smooth-speech! cried the huge British Sergeant, stumbling
forwardI don't trust you. Your broad-brimmed hat don't hide your
villainous face. By, I believe you've helped this Spy to escape!
A hoarse murmur arose from the bravoes, who with ominous looks, came
grouping round the False Quaker.
Now, friend Hamsdroff, do not get into a passion, said Gilbert, in his
mildest tonesor if thee does get into a passion, I beseech' his face
assumed an expression which, in its mingled mildness and hatred, chilled
even the drunken Sergeant to the heartdo not, I beseech thee,
fire the
poor man's hay-stack!
Ha, ha! Won't I though? shouted the Sergeant. The old fox
has escaped, but we'll burn his nest!
He seized a torch and dashed it along the hay.
Fire the hay-stack, my boys! shouted the tory leader: Fire the
hay-stack, every man of you! Burn the rebel out of house and home!
As you look, twelve of the band rush forward and encircle the hay-stack
with a belt of flame. Another momenta sudden breeze from the forest
the hay-stack glows from the sward a mass of living flame.
The fire whizzed, and crackled, and hissed, winding around the cone of
hay, and shooting in one long column, into the midnight sky. Abroad over
the meadow, abroad over the forest, crimsoning each leaf with a blood-red
glow, high and higher, fierce and madder, it whirled and rose, that column
of flame.
Now the Tories, half in rage and half in drunken joy, mingled hand in
hand, and danced around the burning pile.
Hurrah for King George! shouted the Sergeant, leaping from the
ground. Death to all Rebels!
So perish all rebels! echoed the Tories.
And higher and higher rose the flame.
Up to the heavens, paling the stars with its burning redover the green
of the meadowsdown upon the waters of the Brandywineup the
hill-side
along
the woods, it rose, that merry flame!
As in the blaze of noonday, lay the level sward, the grey stone house of
the schoolmaster, the frame barn with its fences and outhouseswhile
around the burning pile, merrier and gayer danced the soldiers, flinging their
swords in the blood-red light, and sending the name of the Good King
George to the skies!
Retired in the background, some few yards from the burning stack, his
arms folded on his breast, his head turned to one side, stood Gilbert Gates,
the Son of the Hunter-Spy. A smile on his pinched lips, a cold gleam in
his eye.
Fire the house! shouted the Tory leader.
They turned to fire the house, but a low, moaning sound broke on the
airit caused the troopers, brutal as they were, to start with horror. The
leader of the Tories wheeled suddenly round bending his head to catch the
slightest whisper; the face of the Sergeant grew white as his sword
belt.
That low, moaning sound swelled to a shrieka shriek that curdled their
blood. It came from the bosom of the burning hay-stackalong the breeze
it yelled, and died away. Another shriek and another! Three sounds
more horrible never broke on the ears of man. In a moment all was still
as deaththe hay-stack crashed down with a deadened sound. Nothing
was left but a pile of smouldering embers. All was still as death, but a dim
object moved amid the last remains of the burning haymoved, struggled,
and was still.
For the last time, the flame glared into the midnight sky.
Disclosed by that red glare, stood Gilbert Gates, perusing the crushed
paper which he grasped in his talon-fingers.
These are the words which he read by the glare of the hay-stack, words
written in a cramped handperhaps in bloodand dated more than twenty
years before this, September day in 1777:
Isaac Gatesa Traitor and SpyHung by three soldiers of his
Majesty's Army
.
Jacob Mayland
.
He died alone in the wild woodsand Ihis son, and his avenger!
With these words, the son of the Hunter-Spy passed behind the barn,
and was lost to sight.
And from the accursed pile of death fled the soldiers, spurring their horses
to their utmost speedwith the fear and horror of coward guilt they fled
while far over the plain, far over the valley, came the men of Brandywine,
roused from their sleep by the burning hay-stack. Yes, from the hill-top
and valley they came, as the last embers of the fire were yet glowing on
the green sward.
And two figures emerged from the door of the schoolmaster's house, the
form of a stout and muscular man, and the form of a trembling maiden.
Gotlieb, it seems like a dream, said the maiden. The flight of my
father, the chase in the passagethe swoon! Thank God, my father has
escaped! But what means this sudden stillnessyon flickering fire?
They reached the burning embers on the hill-side and stood for a moment
gazing upon the scene.
A mass of burning hay, a pile of ashes, the wreck of some splintered
boards, were all that remained to tell of the location of the hay-stack.
What is that dark thing in the fire? exclaimed Mary Mayland
Quick, Gotliebhold the light nearerit seems to move, to stir!
Gotlieb held the light over the darkened mass. Here let me pause for a
single moment.
You may charge me with painting horrors that never existed.
And yet there is not a hill or a valley in any one of the old Thirteen
States unstained with the blood of peaceful men, shed by the hirelings of
King George.
Not only on the soil of Brandywine, but in a quiet home of Germantown,
was a deed similar to the one in question, committed by American Tories
and their British brethren.
An old man burned to death in cold blood by the soldiers of King George:
it is horrible, but having occurred in the course of that beautiful game of
War, which Kings and Tyrants have played for some four thousand years;
let us write it down, aye, in its darkest and bloodiest details, so that the
children of our day may know the features of
Civil War
.
War has been painted too long as a pretty thing, spangled with buttons,
fluttering with ribbons, waving with plumes.
Let us learn to look upon it as it is; a horrible bandit, reeking with the
blood of the innocent, the knife of murder in his hand, the fire of carnage
in his eye.
The war which Washington waged, was not
war
, in the proper sense of
the term. It was only the
defence of one's hearthside against the robber
and murderer
.
But of all the hideous murders which have been done, for two thousand
years, the war waged by the British King, against the American People,
was the foulest, the dastardliest, the bloodiest.
It was a massacre of eight years, beginning to kill at Bunker Hill, and
ending its work of butchery, only when it was crushed at Yorktown.
Let no mawkish sympathy for Great Britain shake this truth from our
souls. The Englishman we do not hate; he is the countryman of
Shakspeare
and Milton, he is our brother.
But it will take a thousand years of good deeds to wash from the History
of England, the horrid and merciless butcheries which she perpetrated in
the Eight Years' War.
To forgive these crimes is our duty, but to forget them
Can a child forget the wretch who butchered his mother?
Why, at the thought, the dead of our battlefields bleed againaye, from
the shades of Mount Vernon, armed for the combat, starts the solemn ghost
of Washington!
Let us follow this tragedy to the end, and at the same time, rememberit
is only one among a thousand.
Gotlieb held the light over the darkened mass.
Yes, while the men of Brandywine formed a circle about the scene,
grouping around the form of the farmer and the maiden, the light streamed
over that hideous object among the embers.
Mary, the daughter advanced, her face glowing mildly in the light,
advanced
andlooked
There are some sights which it is blasphemy to paint, and this is one
of them!
Some Angel of Mercy, at the sight, took from her sense and consciousness.
She fell: her white hands outstretched, touched the mangled form of her
father.
Then one groan heaving from an hundred hearts, swelled on the air.
A dark form came rushing to the scene; breasting the spectators aside,
Sampson, the Giant Negro stood there, gazing upon the horrid mass at
his feet.
And he knelt there, and his lips moved, and murmured a vownot in
Englishbut in his wild Ashantee tongue. A heathen, with but an
imperfect
notion of the Christian Truth, dragged from his native land into
slavery when but a child, the son of a savage king, he murmured above
the old man's skeleton his horrible vow, devoting the murderers to his
Moloch God.
How that vow was kept let the records of Brandywine witness!
At the moment while stout Gotlieb, appalled and stricken into stone, stood
holding the light over the deadas Mary, pale and beautiful, lay beside
that
which was her father, only an hour agoas the huge negro bent above
the witness of murder, his sinews quivering, lips clenched and eyes glaring,
as he took the vowat this moment, while the spectators stood alternately
melted into tears and frozen into the dead apathy of horror.
There came a peaceful man, gliding silently through the crowd, his bosom
trembling with deep compassion, his eyes wet with tears.
Ah, this is a terrible thing! said a tremulous voiceIn truth is it!
And the
Son of the Hunter-Spy
stood gazing on the miserable remains
of his
Father's Executioner
.
XVII.BLACK SAMPSON.
How beautiful in yonder graveyard, the wild flowers bloom, above the
Mother's grave!
Fond hopes are buried here, yes, beneath the rank grass and the dark
mould, a true heart that once throbbed with the pulsations of that passion
which is most like Heavena Mother's Lovemoulders into dust.
And yet from the very rankness of the mould, that encloses the Mother's
form, from the very eyes and skull of Death, fair flowers bloom beautifully
into light, and with their fragrance sanctify the graveyard air.
So from the very blood and horror of the battle-field, many a tender
virtue is born, yes, from the carnage which floods the green meadow with
the life-current of a thousand hearts, many a god-like heroism springs
gloriously into life.
War is the parent of many virtues. Not Invading War, which attracts
ten thousand crimes with its blood-red sword, and fills the land with the
dead bodies of its children. No!
Invading
War is the Vulture of the
Andes, gorgeous in its plumage, bloody and merciless in its hatred,
loathsome
in its appetite. It feeds only on the bodies of the dead.
But War for Home, and for Home's holiest altar, honest war waged with
a sword, that is taken from its resting place above the poor man's hearth,
and sanctified with the tears of his wife. War that is fought beneath a
clear sky, on a native soil, with the eyes of angels watching all the while;
this is a holy thing in the sight of Heaven.
From such a war, fought on the Continent of America, during the long
course of Eight years, and extending its battle-field from the rock of
Quebec
to the meadows of Savannah, a thousand unknown virtues rushed into
birth.
I speak not now, of the sublime virtue of Washington, the heroism of La
Fayette, the wild energy of Anthony Wayne. No! The hero whose
savage virtue is yet recorded in every blade of grass, that waves above the
field of Brandywine, was a poor man. A very humble man who had toiled
from dawn until dusk, with the axe or spade. A rude man withal, who
made his home in a miserable hut, yet still a Hero!
The virtue that he cherished was a savage virtue, meaning in plain words,
Fidelity unto Death and after Death, yet still a virtue.
Start not when I tell you, that this hero wasa Negro! His hair
crisped into wool, his skin blackened to the hue of ink, by the fiery sun of
his clime and race, his hands harsh and bony with iron toil.
He was a Negro and yet a Hero!
Do not mistake me. I am no factionist, vowed to the madness of treason,
under the sounding name ofHumanity. I have no sympathyno scorn
nothing but pity for those miserably deluded men, who in order to free
the African race, would lay unholy hands upon the American Union.
That American Union is a holy thing to me. It was baptized some
seventy years ago, in a river of sacred blood. For that Union thousands
of brave men left their homes, their wives, all that man holds dear in order
to die, amid ice and snows, the shock of battles, the dishonor of gibbets.
No one can count the tears, the prayers, the lives, that have sanctified this
American Union, making it an eternal bond of brotherhood for innumerable
millions, an altar forever sacred to the Rights of Man. For seventy years
and more, the Smile of God has beamed upon it. The man that for any
pretence, would lay a finger upon one of its pillars, not only blasphemes
the memory of the dead, but invokes upon his name the Curse of all ages
yet to come. I care not how plausible his argument, how swelling his
sounding periods, how profuse his `
sympathy for suffering humanity
,'
that man is a Traitor to the soil that bore him, a Traitor to the mother
whose breast gave him nourishment, a Traitor to the Dead, whose very
graves abhor the pollution of his footsteps.
All that such a person can plead in extenuation, is the miserable excuse
of cowardice combined with folly. Arnold was a hero, a man of genius,
although a Traitor. The man who would taint with one unhallowed word
the sanctity of THE
Union
, stands arrayed in the leprosy of Arnold's
Treason, without one redeeming ray of his heroism, one spark of his
genius.
For the American Union is to Political Freedom, what the Bible is to
Religious Hope. There may be differences of opinion in relation to the
sacred volume, various creeds may spring from misconstruction of its pages,
defects of translation may mar the sublimest of its beauties.
Would
you
therefore blot the Bible from the earth? Give us a better, a
holier book, before you take this from our homes and hearts!
So the American Union may be the object of honest differences of
opinion
;
it may be liable to misinterpretation, or be darkened by the smoke of
conflicting creeds; yes, it may shelter black slavery in the south, and white
slavery in the north.
Would
you
therefore destroy it? Give us a better, a holier Union,
before
you sweep this into chaos!
With this protest against every illegitimate creation of a feverish
philanthrophy
,
whether it takes the shape of affection for the suffering African, or
like the valorous bull who contended with the steam enginepitches with
head down, eyes closed, horns erect, against the Happiness of Millions, let
me turn to my hero. A negro Hero, with hair like wool, skin as black
as ink.
Against the porch of the murdered Schoolmaster's home, just before the
break of day, on the Eleventh of September, 1777, there leaned the figure
of a tall and muscular man.
You can see him yonder through the dimness of the day-break hour,
resting
with bent arms against the railing of the porch. His attire is very
simple; rough coat and trowsers of plain homespun, yet through their loose
folds, you can discern the outlines of a noble, yes, magnificent form.
It is not his form however, with its breadth of chest, its sinewy arms, its
towering height, or Herculean outline of iron strength, that arrests your
attention.
His head placed erect upon his shoulders, by a firm bold neck. His face
with its unmistakable clearness of outline. The brow full and prominent,
the nose aquiline with slight and tremulous nostrils, the lips not remarkable
for thickness, set together with a firm pressure, the chin square and bold,
the cheek-bones high and angular.
And yet he is a Negro, and yet he has been a slave!
A Negro, without the peculiar conformation, which marks whole tribes
of his race. Neither thick lips, flat nose, receding chin or forehead, are
his. He stands in the dimness of this hour, a type of the war-like
Ashantee
race, whose forms remind you at once of Apollo and Hercules, hewn
from a solid mass of anthraciteblack in hue yet bold in outline, vigorous in
the proportions of each manly limb.
Black Sampsonso they called himstood leaning against the porch of
his murdered master's home, while around him, certain white objects arose
prominently in the dim air, and a vague murmur swelled above the meadow
of the Brandywine.
These white objects were the tents of the Continential Encampment,
stretching over the valley afar. That murmur was the omen of a terrible
event. It meant that brave men, with stout hearts in their bosoms, were
sharpening their swords, examining their rifles, and eating their last meal
before the battle.
But Sampson looked not upon the white tents, nor heard the murmur.
Nor did he gaze upon a space of earth, some few paces up the hill-side,
where a circle had been described on the soft sward, by the action of fire.
There, the night before last, his friend, his master, the veteran who had
served with Washington in Braddock's war, had been
burned to death
.
Nor did the eye of Black Sampson, rest upon a rude hut, which you can
see, down the meadow yonder, half way between the stream, and the foot
of the hill. That was Black Sampson's homethere, when sick and at
death's door, he had been fed by the old schoolmaster, and there, his dreams
of Pagan Superstition had been broken by the prayers of the schoolmaster's
child.
Sampson's thoughts were neither with the murdered man and his
blue-eyed
daughter, nor with the army whose murmur swelled around.
No! Gathering his coarse garb, to his breast, he folded his arms, and
talked to himself.
Now you will understand me, this Negro, could not speak ten clear
words of our English tongue. He could not master the harsh elements of
our northern language. But when he
thought
, it was in the musical
syllables
of his native Ashantee: shall we translate his thoughts into English?
YearsyearsO, years of horrible torture, how ye glide away!
Back into my native land againthe land of the desert and the sun, the
land of the Lion and the Tiger,back once more into my father's
kraal!
Yonder it stands among those trees, with the large green leaves, and many
colored birds upon each bough! Yonder by the deep river, whose waves
are white with lilliesyonder beneath the shadow of the palm, yonder
with its roof, evergreen with vines!
And my father is here! Yes, with his people and his children round
him, he sits before his palace gate, gold bracelets on his wrists, the iron
spear in his hand, a chain of diamonds and pearls about his neck. But
Ka-Loloo, the king of the Ashantee has grown old; he mourns for his son
his son, who was stolen away, long yearsah, long, long years ago by
the pale face! Look! The old man weepshe loved that sonsee! the
rays of the setting sun light up his aged browhe weeps! His people in
vain attempt to comfort him. My son, my son, he cries, who shall
lead the Ashantees to battle, when I am gathered to the Kroal of the dead?
So speaks Ka-Loloo king of the Ashantees, sitting with his people round
him at his palace gate!
Laugh if you please, at these strange memories of the Negro, but I assure
you, there were tears in the rude fellows eyes, even as he stood there
leaning
against the porch.
For his Father was a Kinghe was the Prince of three thousand
warriors
he,
whose native name was now lost in the cognomen,
Black
Sampson
had been sold from his home into slavery.
The People of the valley of Brandywine knew but little about him.
About five years ago, he had appeared in the valley, a miserable skeleton,
covered from head to foot with scars. It was supposed that he was a slave
from the far south. No one asked his history, but the old veteran, even
Jacob Mayland, gave him a home. Therefore, Black Sampson clung to
the memory of his murdered master with all his soul.
The day began to dawn; light clouds floating over the eastern horizon,
saw the sun approach, and caught his golden smile upon their snowy
breasts.
It was at this hour, that Black Sampson, leaning against the porch of the
murdered man's home, beheld a strange figure come slowly over the sward,
toward him.
Was it a Ghost? So strangely beautiful, with those white feet, pressing
the soft grass, taht flowing brown hair sweeping over the bared arms?
At a second glance, he recognized the daughter of the schoolmaster, warm
and lovable and bewitching Mary Mayland, whom Gotlieb Hoff, the rough
farmer loved with all his heart.
Warm and lovable and bewitching no longer! For she came with her
blue eyes fixed and glassyshe came, clad in her night dress as a shroud
she came, the image of a Woman, whose dearest hope has all at once
been wrecked, whose life has suddenly been transformed from a garden of
virgin hopes, into a desert of blasted ashes.
Sampson was a Negroa rude man, who had an imperfect idea of the
Blessed Saviour, mingling
His
Religion with the dreams of Pagan
superstition
and
yet, as he beheld this pale girl come slowly toward him, with
her white arms folded over her almost pulseless bosom, he, the black man,
shuddered.
44
Still the young woman came on, and stood before hima miserable wreck
telling in her mad way, the story of her unutterable wrong. She did
not see Sampson, for her glassy eyes looked on the vacant air, but still she
told her story, making the honest negro's blood run cold in his veins.
The night before she had been lured from her home, and . The
story cannot be told. All that we can know is, that she stands before us, in
the light of the breaking day, a mad and ruined girl. In her ravingsoh,
that name is too harsh! In her mild, deep voice, she told the story of her
wrong, and murmured the name of Gilbert Gates, and the name of a British
officer.
You can see Sampson start forward, gather her gently in his rude arms,
and place her quietly on the seat of the porch.
Dis am berry bad, Missa Polly he said, and you will remember that
he spoke very uncouth EnglishEnuf to break a nigga's heart! And
dey took you from yer home, and
The negro did not utter another word, for he saw the stout form of
Gotlieb
Hoff coming briskly over the sod, a rifle on his shoulder, an oaken sprig
in the band of his hat. Gotlieb whistled gaily as he came, his light curling
hair waving about his ruddy face.
He did not dream of the agony in store for him.
And while he came, the poor girl sat on the porch of her Home, folding
her white arms over her bosom, and muttering in that low deep voice, the
story of her wrong.
The negro Black Sampson, could not endure the sight. Even as Gotlieb
came gaily on, the black man bounded from the porch, and hastened toward
yonder barn.
If hethe negroturned away from the agony of this meeting between
the Plighted Husband and his Ruined Bride, shall we take hearts of stone
to our bosoms, and gaze upon the horror of that interview?
Black Sampson approached the barn whose walls of logs you see piled
up yonder, on the side of the hill.
He opened a narrow door and called for his dog. The dog bounded
forth, a noble animal, in shape something like the kingly dogs of St.
Bernard, yet white as the driven snow. He came with fierce eyes and
formidable teeth, ears and head erect, and crouched low at his master's
feet.
Then Sampson entered the barn, and in a moment appeared, holding a
scythe in his right arm. He wound one arm around the handle, and with
the fingers of his other hand, tested the sharpness of the edge.
Then a low, deep, yet unnatural chuckle passed the African's lips.
Look heah, Debbil that was the name of his dogHah, yah!
Sampson am gwain a-mowin' dis day!
The dog darted up, as with mingled rage and joy.
You will admit that Sampson's movements are peculiar. In order to
understand this strange magnetic sympathy between the master and the dog,
let us follow Sampson's steps into the barn.
He flings open the large door, and by the dim morning light you behold
a strange object in the centre of the threshing floor among heaps of straw.
Is it a man, or an image?
It is a British uniform, stuffed with straw and glittering with epaulettes
of gold. There is a gay chapeau placed on the shoulders of the figure,
military boots upon its legs.
The moment that `Debbil' beholds it, he howls with ungovernable rage,
displays his teeth, and shoots fire from his eyes.
But Sampson holds him by the collar, talking merrily to him all the
while
Look heah Debbil, we am gwain a-mowin' dis day! De ye know
what we gwain to mow? I tells ye. De night afore last, de dam British,
dey burn your Massa alived'ye hear dat, ye stupid Debbil? Dis berry
hour dey abuse your young Missusyou understand me Debbil? Dat's
de reason we am gwain a-mowin'! Dat is! An' whenebber ye see
anyting
like dat Debbil pointing to the figureDen at 'em trote, and lap
um blood!
He loosed the collar of the Dog and suffered him to go.
You hear a deep howl, you see the dog spring forward. Look! His
teeth are fixed in the throat of the figure; he tears it, drags it, crushes it in
his rage, while Black Sampson stands laughing by.
Laughing a low, deep laugh, that has something else than mirth in its tone.
Dat's de way we am gwain a-mowin' dis day!
He turned from the barn followed by the spotless dog. He stood amid
the cinders of the burned haystack, where his master had died in bitter
agony the night before last.
Then, while the armies were mustering for the conflict, while over the
valley of the Brandywine the Continentals formed in columns, their starry
banner waving overhead, while on yonder porch Gotlieb listens to the story
of the veteran's child, here, on this circle of withered grass, Black Sampson
prepared for battle.
The manner of his preparation was singular.
The sun came onthe gleam of British arms shine on the opposite hills
the battle was about to commence its Liturgy of yells and groans, yet
still Sampson stood there, in the centre of the blasted circle.
On the very spot where the veteran's bones had laid, he stood.
Muttering again that terrible oath of vengeance to his Moloch God, he
first stripped from his form his coat of coarse homespun. Then, with his
broad, black chest glittering in the sunlight, he wound his right arm around
the handle of his scythe.
He laid the other hand upon the head of his dog. His eye gleamed with
deadly light.
Thus, scythe in hand, his dog by his side, his form, in all its herculean
proportion, bared to the waist, Black Sampson stood prepared for battle.
Look yonder over the valley! Behold that sweep of level meadow, that
rippling stream of water. On these eastern hills, you see the men of Mad
Anthony Wayne, ranged in battle-order. Yonder, from the western woods,
the gleam of Kniphausen's arms, shoots gaily over the leaves,
Suddenly there is a sound like thunder, then white columns of smoke,
then a noise of trampling hoofs.
Black Sampson hears that thunder and quivers from head to foot. He
sees the white smoke, and lifts his scythe. The trampling hoofs he hears,
and speaks to his dogDebbil, dis day we am gwain a-mowin'!
But then, through the clamor of battle, there comes a long and ringing
cry. It is the battle-shout of Anthony Wayne.
Black Sampson hears it, darts forward, and with his dog by his side,
rushes into the folds of the battle-smoke.
You see him yonder, far down the valley, you see him yonder, in the
midst of the stream; now he is gone among the clouds, now he comes forth
again, now the whirlpool of battle shuts him in. Still the white dog is by
his side, still that scythe gleams aloft. Does it fall?
At last, yonder on the banks of the Brandywine, where a gush of sunlight
pours through the battle-clouds, you see Black Sampson stand. A strange
change has passed over himself, his scythe, his dog. All have changed
color. The color they wear is a fiery redlook! You can see it drip
from the scythe, crimson Sampson's chest and arms, and stain with gory
patches, the white fur of his dog.
And the word that Sampson said, as he patted his noble dog, was
something
like this:
Dat counts
one
for Massa!
Had the scythe fallen? Had the dog hunted his game?
Through the entire battle of Brandywine, which began at break of day,
and spent its last shot when the night set in, and the stars came smiling out
upon the scene of murder, that Black Hercules was seen, companioned by
his white dog, the sharp scythe flashing in dazzling circles above his head.
On the plain or meadow, extending in a lake of verdure where the battle
begun; four miles away in the graveyard of the Quaker Meeting house,
where thousands of contending foemen, fought until the sod was slippery
with blood; at noon, at night, always rushing forward that Negro was seen,
armed only with a sharp scythe, his only comrade a white dog, spotted
with flakes of blood.
And the war-cry that he ever shouted, was in his rude way
Dat counts one for Massa, Debbil!
Whenever he said this, the dog howled, and there was another mangled
corse upon the ground.
The British soldiers saw him comehis broad black chest gleaming in
the sunhis strange weapon glittering overheadhis white dog yelling by
his side, and as they looked they felt their hearts grow cold, and turned
from his path with fear. Yes fear, for with a superstition not unnatural,
they thought they beheld, not a warrior armed for the fight, but a Demon,
created by the horror of battle, rushing on with the fiend-animal by his
side.
Many a British throat that had been fondly pressed by the hands of
mother, wife, or sister, that day felt the teeth of the white dog! Many a
British eye that had gazed undismayed into the muzzle of American
cannon
,
quailed with involuntary cowardice at the sight of that circling scythe.
Many a British heart that had often beat with mad pulsations, in the hour
when American homes had been desolated, American fathers murdered,
American mothers outraged, that day lay cold in the bosom which was
pressed by the foot of Black Sampson, the Prince of the Ashantee.
Do not impute to me a morbid appetite for scenes of blood. I might
pourtray to you in all their horrors, the several deaths of the murderers of
Jacob Mayland, the veteran of Braddock's war. How this one was hurled
from his horse by the white dog, while the scythe of Sampson performed
its terrible office. How another, pursuing the Americans at the head of
his men, uttered the shout of victory, and then heard the howl of the dog
and died. How a third gentleman, while in the act of listening to my Lord
Cornwallis, (who always went out to murder in clean ruffles and a wig,
perfumed with
Marechale
powder,) was startled by the apparition of a
giant negro, a whirling scythe, a white dog crimsoned with blood, and how
when he saw this apparition a moment only, he never saw or felt anything
more.
But I will not do it. My only object is to impress upon your minds,
my friendsfor sitting alone in my room, with but this pen in my hand, I
can talk to you all; you, the half-a-million readers of this page and call you
friends
the idea of Black Sampson's conduct, his religion, his ruling
motive.
It was this: The old man Mayland and his daughter, had been very
kind to him. To them in his rude negro heart, he had sworn eternal
fidelity. In his rude African religion,
to revenge the death of a friend,
was not only a duty, but a solemn injunction from the lips of the dead
.
Therefore arming himself but with a scythe, he called his dog, and went
out to hunt Englishmen, as he had often hunted wild beasts.
Pass we then the carnage of that fearful day.
It was in the calm of twilight, when that sweet valley of Brandywine
looks as lovely as a young bride, trembling on the threshold of the Bridal
Chambera blushing, joyous, solemn thing, half-light, half-shadowthat a
rude figure stumbled into a room, where a dead woman lay.
It was in a house near Dilworth corner, one or two miles from the
battle-field
of the meeting house.
A quiet chamber filled with silent people, with hushed breath and deeply
saddened faces, and the softened glow of a glorious sunset pouring through
the closed curtains of yonder window.
Those people gathered round a bed, whose snow-white coverlet caught a
flush of gold from the setting sun. Stout men were in that crowd, men
who had done brave work in that day's battle, and tender girls who were
looking forward with hope to a future life of calm, home-born joys, and
aged matrons, who had counted the years of their lives by the burial of dear
friends. These all were there.
And there at the foot of the bed, stood a man in the dress of a farmer, his
frank honest face, stained with blood, his curling hair curling no longer, but
stiffened with clotted gore. He had been in battle, Gotlieb Hoff striving
earnestly to do some justice on these British spoilers, and now at the
evening
hourafter scenes that I may picture at some future timecame to
look upon the burden of that bed.
It was no wonder that honest Gotlieb muttered certain mad sentences, in
broken English, as he gazed upon this sight.
For believe me had you been there, you would have felt your senses
gliding from you at that vision. It was indeed, a pitiful sight.
She
looked so beautiful as she lay there upon the bed. The hands that
were gently clasped, and the bosom that had heaved its last throb, and the
closed eyelids that were never to open more, and  you see they wept
there, all of them, for she looked so sadly beautiful as she lay dead, even
Mary sweet gentle lovable Mary, with the waving brown hair and the
laughing blue eyes.
She was dead now. About the hour of noon when the battle raged most
horribly, the last chord of her brain snapt, and on the altar of her outraged
life the last fire went out. She was dead, and O, she wore the saddest,
sweetest smile about her young face as she lay there, that you ever saw.
That was what made them weep. To have looked stiff and cold and
dismal, would have seemed more like Death, but to smile thus upon them
all, when her honor, her reason, her life, had all in one hour been trampled
into nothingness, to smile thus peacefully and forgivingly as she lay dead,
in her simple night-dressah! It cut every heart with a sudden sharp
pain, and made the eyes overflow with bitter tears.
I have said that a rude figure stumbled into a room, where a dead
woman lay.
Yes, in the very moment when the last ray of the sunthat never more
should rise upon the dead girlwas kissing her closed lids as if in pity,
there came a rude figure, breasting his way through the spectators.
Black and grimalmost horrible to look uponbleeding from many
wounds, the scythe in his hand, Sampson stood there. He looked long and
fixedly upon the dead girl. They could see a tremulous motion at his
nostrils, a convulsive quivering about his mouth.
At last with an oathand O, forgive it kind Heaven, for it was but
sworn to hide the sincere feeling of his hearthe laid his hand upon the
head of the dog, which had crept silently to his side, and told the faithful
animal
Debbil you am a rale brute, and no mistake! Dars Missa Maylan'
layin' deadstone deadshe dat feed you and your Massa, many a hunder
timeand you no cry one dam' tear!
Two large tears rolled down his face as he spoke, and the last sunbeam
kissed the eyelids of the dead girl, and was gone.
Some three or four years since, a ploughshare that upturned the soil
where a forest had stood in the Revolution, uncovered the grave of some
unknown man. In that grave were discovered the skeleton of a human
being
,
the bones of an animal, and the rusted and blood-clotted blade of a scythe.
Did the hand of the Avenger ever strike the tinselled wretch who had
crushed into dishonor, the peasant-girl of Brandywine?
Even in the presence of Washington, while encircling the Chieftain with
British soldiers he fell, stricken down by the quiet Gilbert Gates, who
whispered
in his freezing ear Thou didst dishonor herthou, that hadst no
father's blood to avenge!
As the handsome Captain writhed in the dustWashington amazed, the
British soldiers maddened by the sightthe pretended Quaker true to his
instinct of falsehood, whispered to the one, Washington I have saved
thee! and to the othersBehold the order of friend Cornwallis,
commanding
this deed!
Need we gaze upon the fate of this strange man, Gilbert Gates the Son
of the Hunter-Spy? His crimes, his oath, his life, were all dyed with
innocent
blood, but the last scene which closed the page of this world to him
forever, is too dark and bloody to be told.
In a dim nook of the woods of Brandywine, two vigorous hickory trees
bending over a pool of water, in opposite directions, had been forced by
strong cords together, and firmly joined into one. Those cords once
separatedthe knot which combined them once untiedit was plainly to
be seen that the hickory trees would spring back to their natural position,
with a terrific rebound.
The knot was untied by a rifle-ball. But the moment, ere the trees
sprung apart with a sound like thunder, you might see a human form lashed
by the arms and limbs, to their separate branches.
It was the form of Gilbert Gates, the Son of the Hunter-Spy. The ball
that untied the knot, was sped from the rifle of Gotlieb Hoff, the plighted
husband of the dishonored girl.
We have followed to its end, the strange and varied career of Gilbert
Gates, the False Quaker of Brandywine. Now let us look upon a Friend
of another kind. The day before the battle, there stood in the shadows
of the forest, at a point where two roads met, a man of some fifty-eight
years, one hand resting on the bridle-rein of his well-fed nag, and the other
pressed against his massive brow. He was clad in the Quaker dress. A
man of almost giant stature, his muscular limbs clad in sober drab, his
ruddy face and snow-white hairs crowned by a broad-rimmed hat. The
leaves formed a canopy above his head, as he stood wrapped in deep and
exciting thoughts, while his sleek, black horsea long known and favorite
animalbending his neck, cropped the fragrant wild grass at his feet.
The stout Quaker felt the throes of a strange mental contest quivering
through his veins. The father butchered by his hearthstone, the mother
dishonored
in the presence of her children, the home in flames, and the hearth a
Golgothathese are not very Christian sights, and yet the old Quaker had
seen them all. And now with his heart torn by the contest between his
principles and his impulses,his principles were `
Peace!
', his impulses
shrieked `
Washington!
'he had come here to the silent woods to think
the matter over. He wished to shoulder a rifle in the Army of freedom,
but the principles of his life and creed forbade the thought. After much
thought, and it must be said, severe though silent Prayer, the stout Quaker
resolved to test the question by a resort to the ancient method of ordeal or
lottery. Now, said he, as the sunlight played with his white hairsI
stand here, alone in the woods, where two roads meet. I will turn my favorite
horse, even Billy, loose, to go wherever he pleaseth. If he takes the road
on the right, I will get me a rifle and join the Camp of Friend Washington.
But in case he takes the road on the left, I will even go home, and mind
my own business. Now, Billy, thee is freego where it pleaseth thee
and mind what thee's about!
The loosened rein fell dangling on Billy's sleek neck. The patriotic
friend beheld him hesitate on the point where the two paths joined; he
saw him roll his large eyes lazily from side to side, and then slowly
saunter
toward the road on the leftthe `
Home
' road.
As quick as thought, the stout Quaker started forward, and gave the rein
almost imperceptible, but powerful inclination toward the `Washington
Road,' exclaiming in deprecatory tones
Now thee stupid thing! I
verily thought thee had better sense!
Whether the words or the sudden movement of the Quaker's hand,
worked a change in Billy's mind, we cannot tell, but certain it is, that while
the grave Friend, with his hands dropped by his side, calmly watched the
result, the sagacious horse changed his course, and entered the `
Washington
road.'
Verily, it is ordered so! was the quiet ejaculation of the Quaker, as
he took his way to the camp of Washington. We need not say, that he
did a brave work in the battle of Brandywine.
XVIII.THE MECHANIC HERO OF BRANDYWINE.
Near
Dilworth corner, at the time of the Revolution, there stood a quiet
cottage, somewhat retired from the road, under the shade of a stout chesnut
tree. It was a quiet cottage, nestling away there in one corner of the forest
road, a dear home in the wilderness, with sloping roof, walls of dark grey
stone, and a casement hidden among vines and flowers.
On one side, amid an interval of the forest trees, was seen the rough
outline of a blacksmith's shop. There was a small garden in front, with a
brown gravelled walk, and beds of wild flowers.
Here, at the time of the Revolution, there dwelt a stout blacksmith, his
young wife and her babe.What cared that blacksmith, working away there
in that shadowy nook of the forest, for war? What feared he for the peril
of the times, so long as his strong arm, ringing that hammer on the anvil,
might gain bread for his wife and child!
Ah, he cared little for war, he took little note of the panic that shook the
valley, when some few mornings before the battle of the Brandywine, while
shoeing the horse of a Tory Refugee, he overheard a plot for the surprise
and capture of Washington. The American leader was to be lured into the
toils of the tories; his person once in the British camp, the English General
might send the
Truitor
Washington home, to be tried in London.
Now our blacksmith, working away there, in that dim nook of the forest,
without caring for battle or war, had still a sneaking kindness for this
Mister
Washington, whose name rung on the lips of all men. So one night,
bidding
his young wife a hasty good-bye, and kissing the babe that reposed on
her bosom, smiling as it slept, he hurried away to the American camp, and
told his story to Washington.
It was morning ere he came back. It was in the dimness of the
autumnal
morning, that the blacksmith was plodding his way, along the forest
road. Some few paces ahead there was an aged oak, standing out into the
roada grim old veteran of the forest, that had stood the shocks of three
hundred years. Right beyond that oak was the blacksmith's home.
With this thought warming his heart, he hurried on. He hurried on,
thinking of the calm young face and mild blue eyes of that wife, who, the
night before, had stood in the cottage door, waving him out of sight with a
beckoned good-byethinking of the baby, that lay smiling as it slept upon
her bosom, he hurried onhe turned the bend of the wood, he looked upon
his home.
Ah! what a sight was there!
Where, the night before, he had left a peaceful cottage, smiling under a
green chesnut tree, in the light of the setting sun, now was only a heap of
black and smoking embers and a burnt and blasted tree!
This was his home!
45
And there stood the blacksmith gazing upon that wreck of his
hearth-stone
;there
he stood with folded arms and moody brow, but in a moment
a smile broke over his face.
He saw it all. In the night his home had taken fire, and been burned to
cinders. But his wife, his child had escaped. For that he thanked God.
With the toil of his stout arm, plying there on the anvil, he would build
a fairer home for wife and child; fresh flowers should bloom over the
garden walks, and more lovely vines trail along the casement.
With this resolve kindling over his face, the blacksmith stood there, with
a cheerful light beaming from his large grey eyes, whena hand was
laid upon his shoulder.
He turned and beheld the face of a neighbor.
It was a neighbor's face; but there was an awful agony stamping those
plain featuresthere was an awful agony flashing from those dilating eyes
there was a dark and a terrible mystery speaking from those thin lips,
that moved, but made no sound.
For a moment that farmer tried to speak the horror that convulsed his
features.
At last, forcing the blacksmith along the brown gravelled walk, now strewn
with cinders, he pointed to the smoking embers. There, thereamid that
heap of black and smoking ruins, the blacksmith beheld a dark mass of
burnt flesh and blackened bones.
Your wife!
shrieked the farmer, as his agony found words. The
British they came in the night theyand then he spoke that outrage,
which the lip quivers to think on, which the heart grows palsied to tell
that outrage too foul to nameYour wife, he shrieked, pointing to that
hideous thing amid the smoking ruins; the British they murdered your
wife, they flung her dead body in the flamesthey dashed your child
against the hearthstone!
This was the farmer's story.
And there, as the light of the breaking day fell around the spot, there
stood the husband, the father, gazing upon that mass of burned flesh and
blackened bones
all that was once his wife
.
Do you ask me for the words that trembled from his white lips? Do
you ask me for the fire that blazed in his eye?
I cannot tell you. But I can tell you that there was a vow going up to
Heaven from that blacksmith's heart; that there was a clenched hand,
upraised
,
in the light of the breaking day!
Yes, yes, as the first gleam of the autumnal dawn broke around the spot,
as the first long gleam of sunlight streamed over the peeled skull of that
fair young wifeshe was that last nightthere was a vow going up to
Heaven, the vow of a maddened heart and anguished brain.
How was that vow kept? Go there to Brandywine, and where the
carnage
gathers thickest, where the fight is most bloody, there you may see a
stout form striding on, lifting a huge hammer into light. Where that
hammer
falls, it killswhere that hammer strikes, it crushes! It is the
blacksmith's
form. And the war-cry that he shouts? It is a mad cry of
vengeance
half
howl, half hurrah? Is it but a fierce yell, breaking up from
his heaving chest?
Ah no! Ah no!
It is the name of
Mary
! It is the name of his young wife!
Oh, Marysweetest name of womenname so soft, so rippling, so
musical
name
of the Mother of Jesus, made holy by poetry and religion
how strangely did your syllables of music ring out from that blacksmith's
lips, as he went murdering on!
Mary
! he shouts, as he drags that red-coated trooper from his steed:
Mary! he shrieks, as his hammer crashes down, laying that officer in
the dust. Look! Another officer, with a gallant face and formanother
officer, glittering in tinsel, clasps that blacksmith by the knees, and begs
mercy.
I have a wifemercy! I have a wife yonder in Englandspare
me!
The blacksmith, crazed as he is, tremblesthere is a tear in his eye.
I would spare you, but there is a form before methe form of my
dead wife! That form has gone before me all day! She calls on me to
strike!
And the hammer fell, and then rang out that strange war-cryMary!
At last, when the battle was over, he was found by a wagoner, who had
at least shouldered a cartwhip in his country's servicehe was found sitting
by the roadside, his head sunken, his leg brokenthe life blood welling
from his many wounds.
The wagoner would have carried him from the field, but the stout
blacksmith
refused.
You see, neighbor, he said, in that voice husky with death, I never
meddled with the British till they burned by home, till they he could
not speak the outrage, but his wife and child were there before his dying
eyesAnd now I've but five minutes' life in me. I'd like to give a shot
at the British afore I die. D'ye see that cherry tree? D'ye think you
could drag a man of my build up thar? Place me thar; give me a
powder-horn
,
three rifle balls an' a good rifle; that's all I ask.
The wagoner granted his request; he lifted him to the foot of the cherry
tree; he placed the rifle, the balls, the powder-horn in his grasp.
Then whipping his horses through the narrow pass, from the summit of
a neighboring height, he looked down upon the last scene of the
blacksmith's
life.
There lay the stout man, at the foot of the cherry tree, his head, his
broken leg hanging over the roadside bank. The blood was streaming from
his woundshe was dying.
Suddenly he raised his heada sound struck on his ears. A party of
British came rushing along the narrow road, mad with carnage and thirsting
for blood. They pursued a scattered band of Continentals. An officer led
the way, waving them on with his sword.
The blacksmith loaded his rifle; with that eye bright with death he took
the aim. That's for Washington! he shouted as he fired. The officer
lay quivering in the roadside dust. On and on came the British, nearer and
nearer to the cherry treethe Continentals swept through the pass. Again
the blacksmith loadedagain he fired. That's for mad Anthony Wayne!
he shouted as another officer bit the sod.
The British now came rushing to the cherry tree, determined to cut
down the wounded man, who with his face toward them, bleeding as he
was, dealt death among their ranks. A fair-visaged officer, with golden
hair waving on the wind, led them on.
The blacksmith raised his rifle; with that hand stiffening in death, he
took the aimhe firedthe young Briton fell with a sudden shriek.
And that, cried the blacksmith, in a voice that strengthened into a
shout, and that's for
His voice was gone! The shriek died on his white lips.
His head sunkhis rifle fell.
A single word bubbled up with his death groan. Even now, methinks I
hear that word, echoing and trembling there among the rocks of
Brandywine
.
That word was
Mary
!
XIX.ANTHONY WAYNE AT BRANDYWINE.
On
a cold winter's dayfar back in the olden timein front of a rude
stone school-house, that arose from among an orchard, whose leafless
branches stood out against the clear blue sky, a crowd of school boys
might have been seen hurrying to and fro, in all the excitement of battle.
Their cheeks glowed crimson with the fever of the fight, as armed with
little globes of snow, they raised their battle shout, they met in conflict,
now rallying here, now retreating yonder, one party defending the
entrenchments
of ice and snow, while another band came on, the forlorn hope of
the mimic fray.
It was true, the weapons that they hurled, the fort, which was at once
the object of attack and defence, were all of frozen snow, yet the conflict
was carried on with an energy and skill worthy of many a bloodier fight.
You see the fort, rising before the dark school-house wall, a mound of
ice, over a waste of snow, its summit lined with the brave defenders,
while the forlorn hope of the enemy come rushing to the conflict, resolved
to force the entrenchments and put the conquered soldiers to the sword.
Not sword of steel, but a formidable blade carved with a pen-knife from a
branch of oak or hickory.
The hearty shouts of the combatants, ring out upon the air, their cheeks
flush, their eyes fire; the contest deepens and the crisis of the fight is near.
You see that boy, not more than ten years old, standing erect upon the
fortress wall, his hazel eyes rolling like sparks of fire, in his ruddy face,
while his curly hair, white with snowy fragments, is blown around his brow,
by the winter wind?
He is the Master Spirit of the scene.
He urges his comrades with his merry shout, now bending to gather new
balls of snow, now hurling them in the face of the enemy, while his chest
heaves, expands, his nostrils quiver, his lips curl with the excitement of
the hour.
It was he that raised this fort, and leading his comrades from their books,
marshalled them in battle array.
It is he, that retreating behind the wall, lures the enemy to the attack,
and then suddenly starting into view, with flushed cheeks and sparkling
eyes, shouts the word of command, and pours confusion in their ranks.
Backed by his comrades, he springs from the fortagain that shoutone
charge more and the day is ours! Not a moment does he allow the enemy
to recover their broken ranks, but piles the snow upon their heads, and
sends the battle home. The air is thick with bombs of snow; a frosty
shower whitens their cheeks, and dangles in glittering gems from their
waving hair.
Still that hearty shout, still that brave boy in front, still his little hands
are raised, wielding the missiles of the fight, as with his chest heaving and
one foot advanced, he stands upon the frozen snow, and shouts his
comrades
to the charge.
The enemy break, they scatter, they fly!
The boy with the clear eye of hazel, the curling hair of chesnut brown,
is victor of the field.
You may smile at this contest, laugh at the gloom of the gruff
school-master's
visage, projecting from yonder window, and yet the day will come,
when the enraged Pedagogue will hear this boy's name rung in the lips of
the nation, as the hero of an hundred bloody battles! The day is coming,
when that little hand will yield an iron sword, while the hazel eye, flaming
from a face bathed in sweat and blood, will, with frenzied joy, survey the
mists, the glare, the hurrying ranks, the awful panorama of no mimic fight.
Time passed on, and the people of the good old county of Chester often
noted, a stripling, with his gun on his shoulder, wandering through the
woods of Brandywine, or sitting beside these still waters, holding the fishing
rod, from the brow of a projecting rock, his bare feet dipping in the waves,
as his hazel eye shone with visions of the future.
Time passed on, and there came a day, when this boy, grown to
manhood
,
stood on the summit of a mound that rose from the meadows of the
Brandywine.
It was in the early morning time, when the light of the stars was scarcely
paled by the glow of the autumnal dawn.
Looking from the height of the fortified knoll, defended by a deep ditch
and grim with cannon, General Wayne awaited the approach of the enemy.
Beneath him spread the valley, gleaming with American arms; yonder
rippled the stream, so soon to be purpled in its every wave, with the
life-drops
of human hearts. On the opposite shore of the Brandywine, arose
wooded steeps, to wering abruptly from the bed of the rivulet, crowned from
the ripple to the sky with forest trees.
Wayne stood on the summit of the knoll, his face flushed with deep
anxiety. He was about to fight, not like La Fayette, for a strange people
of a far land, not like Pulaski, as an Exile and a Wanderer, nor yet like
Washington, the leader of a People. No! Surrounded by the memories
of childhood, his foot upon his native soil, his chest swelling with the air
that came rich and fragrant over the orchards of his native valley, he had
buckled on the sword to fight for that soil, he stood prepared to spend his
blood in defence of that valley.
By his side stood his gallant roan, caparisoned for the battle.
Tradition tells us, that it was a noble steed, with small head, broad chest
and tapering limbs. When he rushed into the fight, it was with neck arched,
eye rolling in fire, and dark mane quivering on the battle breeze. But when
his master's shout rung on the air, sounding the charge which mowed the
foemen down like stubble before the flame, then the gallant roan uttered his
battle neigh and went through the smoke and into the fire like a bomb shell,
hurled from the mortar along the darkened sky.
Wayne stood with his hand resting on his sword hilt. In stature, not
more than an inch above the middle heigth, in form displaying a hardy
energy, an iron vigor in every outline, was clad in a blue coat faced with
buff, and falling open on his broad chest. There was a belt of dark leather
over his breast, military boots on his limbs, a plain chapeau, surmounted by
a plume of mingled red and white, surmounted his brow.
Beneath that plume you might behold the broad forehead, the aquiline
nose, the clear, deep hazel eyes. It was the face of a warrior, nurtured
from boyhood to love the blaze of cannon, and hail the clang of contending
swords, as the bridegroom hails the marriage music.
Surrounded by his brave men, Wayne looked upon the opposite steeps,
and looked for the bayonets of the foe.
At last they came. By the first gleam of morning light, he saw the
Hessian soldiers, burly in form, loaded with ornaments and armed to the
teeth, emerge from the shadows of the trees. Their heavy accoutrements,
their lofty caps, bushy with fur, their well-filled knapsacks, were all clearly
perceptible in the morning light. And the same sun that shone over their
bayonets, revealed not only the British banner, waving slowly in the
morning
air, but the flags of Hesse and Anspach fluttering above their hordes of
slaves.
Wayne beheld them come, and spoke to the cannoniers, arrayed in their
faded uniform of blue and buff.
In a moment, those cannon at his feet uttered a volume of smoke, that
rolled in folds of gloomy grandeur, high upward into the azure heavens.
He spoke to the Riflemen, in their rude hunting shirts of blue, with the
powder horn and knife at their sides.
He saw them rush from the embankment, he beheld them overspread the
meadow. Here, the steel cap of Porterfield, with its bucktail plume, there,
the short sword of Maxwell, gleaming over the heads of his men.
Bending
from the fortified knoll, Wayne watched their career, with an interest
that fired his eye with deeper light.
Over the meadow, into the trees,a solitary rifle shot yelled on the air,
a solitary death-groan shrieked into the clear heavens.
The battle had begun.
Then crash on crash, peal on peal, the bands of Maxwell and Porterfield
poured their balls into the faces of the Hessian foe.
Wayne beheld them glide among the trees, he saw the enemy recoil in
the midst of the waters, he heard their cries, but did not hear the shouts of
his Riflemen. For these Riflemen, in the hour of battle, scarcely ever
spoke a word with their lips. When they had a message to send, it spoke
out from the tubes of their rifles. And these rifles always spoke to the heart!
For the first time, that blue sky was clouded by the smoke of conflict.
For the first time, the groans of Christians hewn down by Christians, yelled
on the air. For the first time, the Brandywine was stained with blood of
the white man; for the first time, dead men, borne onward by its waves,
with their faces to the light, looked up with glassy eyes and glided on!
Wayne beheld it all!
While the Hessian cannon answered to his own, while the fire from this
knoll was answered by the blaze yonder, Wayne bent forward, laid his
hand on the neck of his steed and watched the current of the fight.
He was about to spring on his steed and rush into the conflict, when he
saw his Riflemen come out from the woods again, their arms dimmed, their
faces dabbled with blood. They had driven the Hessians back step by step,
foot by foot they had hurled them back upon the opposite shore, and now
while the water dripped from their attire, silently lined the banks, awaiting
the next onset of the foe.
The morning passed away, and the enemy did not resume their attack.
Their arms gleamed far over the hills, their banners waved on every side,
between the leaves of the forest oaks, and yet they dared not cross the
Brandywine again. Five thousand strong, they held their position in
silence
,
planted their cannon, arrayed their columns, and silently prepared the
destruction of the Rebel Foe.
The morning passed. Shaken by a thousand conflicting emotions,
Washington hurried along the eastern heights of Brandywine, his grey
horse, now seen among the trees of Brenton's Ford, now darting through
the battle-smoke of Chadd's Ford, now halting beside the gallant roan of
Anthony Wayne. He knew not, whether the attack of Kniphausen was a
mere feint; at one moment he anticipated the approach of the British in
full force, eighteen thousand strong, across the Brandywine, at another,
turning his eye away from the waters of the stream, he awaited the gleam
of Cornwallis' arms, from the northern woods.
Wayne and Washington stood on the summit of the fortified knoll,
talking
long and earnestly together. The same expression of suspense and
anxiety animated the lineaments of each warrior face.
The morning passed away.
Meanwhile, pausing on their arms, the Americans awaited the renewal
of the attack, but they waited for hours in vain. It was not made when
eleven o'clock came, and the sun was rising towards his noonday height;
and Sullivan looked anxiously and eagerly from the heights were he was
stationed, for the appearance of the enemy at Brinton's Ford, but they came
not; nor could his scouts give him any intelligence of the movements of
Howe or Cornwallis.
General Kniphausen, he well knew, had made the attempt to cross at
Chadd's Ford, and had been nobly and gallantly repulsed; but the larger
divisions of the enemywhere were they? What was their plan of
operations
?
Where would Howe appear, or in what quarter would Cornwallis
commence the attack?
All was wrapt in mystery to the minds of Washington, Wayne and the
leader of his right wing. This silence of Howe and Cornwallis they feared
had something of
omen
dark and fearful omenof defeat and dismay, for
its explanation.
Eleven o'clock came, and Washington, with Sullivan by his side, stood
gazing from an elevated knoll, about half-way between Brinton's and Chadd's
Ford.
A horseman was observed riding up the hill-side at the top of his horse's
speed. His attire seemed to be that of a substantial yeoman, his coat hung
on his arm, his hat was extended in his upraised hand; his dress was
disordered
,
his face covered with dust, and, as he rode up the hill-side, he sank
the spurs in the flanks of his horse, whose eye glared wildly, while the
dust and foam on his limbs showed that he had borne his master long and
far.
In a moment the horseman flung himself from his horse, and rushed to
the side of Washington. In hurried words he told his story, his manner
was warm, urgent even to agony. He was a farmerhis name was
Chaytor
he
lived some miles northward of Kennet's Squareearly on that
morning he had been aroused by the tread of armed men and the tramp of
war steeds.
He looked from his window, and beheld the British army passing
northward
General
Howe and Lord Cornwallis were with them.
He believed it to be the intention of the enemy to make the passage of
the Brandywine at Trimble's Ford and Jeffrey's Ford, some miles above
the forks of the riverto occupy the high hills to the northward of
Birmingham
meeting-house, and thus having the entire right wing of the
Continental
forces laid open to his attack, Howe thought he might accomplish
an easy victory.
This was the story of the farmer, and Washington would have given it
credence, were it not for one fearful doubt that darkened over his mind.
The surrounding country swarmed with toriesmight not this be a tory
spy in disguise? He discredited the story of the farmer, though he
enforced
its truth by an appeal to an oath, and even continued to utter it, with
tears in his eyes, yet still under the influence of this fearful suspicion,
Washington refused his credence to the story of Farmer Chaytor.
This
mistake lost the battle of the Brandywine
.
Soon after this incident, Sullivan received information by the hands of
Lieutenant Colonel Ross, that the enemy had just passed the forks of the
Brandywine, some two or three miles above the Fork, five thousand strong,
and provided with sixteen or eighteen field pieces.
No sooner was this information transmitted to Washington, than he
ordered Sullivan to advance towards the Forks, and attack this division of
the enemy. But as Sullivan is about to undertake this movement, fresh
scouts come in, and report no intelligence of the British army whatever in
the quarter named. The movement was postponed; and while Sullivan
was thus shifting from one opinion to another, while Washington, with
Wayne, was expecting the attack at Chadd's Ford, through this unfortunate
contradiction of conflicting intelligence, the enemy was allowed to take a
secure and powerful position, some three miles north-east of Brinton's
Ford, and some four miles from Chadd's Ford.
We have seen the battle which ensued, and gone through its varies phases
of ferocity and chivalry.
While Washington with his Generals, Sullivan, Greene, and La-Fayette
was doing immortal deeds in the valley of the Quaker Temple, alone on the
heights of Chadd's Ford, stood Anthony Wayne, breasting the
overwhelming
force of the Hessian army, with his little band of heroes.
With a thousand half-armed Continentals, he opposed five thousand
hirelings
,
prepared in every respect for the game of war, their cannon glooming
in every steep, their bayonets gleaming on every hill.
It was at four o'clock, that the valley of the Brandywine near Chadd's
Ford, presented a spectacle worthy of the brightest days of chivalry.
46
At first looking from the steep where Wayne watched the fight, his hand
laid on the neck of his steed, you behold nothing but vast clouds of smoke
rolling like the folds of an immense curtain over the valley. Through
these clouds, streamed every instant great masses of flame. Then long and
arrowy flashes of light, quivered through their folds. Now they wore the
blackness of midnight, in a moment they were changed into masses of
snow.
And as they swayed to and fro, you might behold a strange meeting
which took place in the lap of the valley. Pouring from the woods above
the stream, the Hessian hordes in their varied and picturesque costume,
came swarming over the field. As they advanced, the cannon above their
heads on the western hills, belched volumes of fire and death, and lighted
them on their way. As they came on, their musquets poured volley after
volley, into the faces of the foe. Their wild battle-shout was heard, in the
din of conflict. Altogether the war of cannon, the sharp clang of musquetry,
the clouds now rolling here, now floating yonder, the bayonets gleaming
like scattered points of flame, far along the field, presented a scene at once
wild and beautiful.
And there in the centre of the valley, under the very eye of Wayne, a
band of men, some clad in plain farmer's attire, some in the hunting shirt
of the backwoodsman, stood undismayed while the Hessians swarmed on
every side. No shout broke from their sturdy ranks. Silently loading
their rifles, they stood as though rooted to the sod, every one selecting a
broad chest for his target, as he raised his piece to the shoulder.
The sod beneath was slippery with blood. The faces of dead men
glared horribly all around. The convulsed forms of wounded soldiers
whose arms had been torn off at the shoulder, whose eyes had been
darkened
forever, whose skulls had been crushed from the crown to the brow
were beneath their feet.
And yet they fought on. They did not shout, but waiting patiently until
they might almost touch the bayonets of the Hessians, they poured the
blaze of rifles in their faces. And every time that blaze lighted up the
cloud, a new heap of dead men littered the field.
Still the Hessians advanced. Sold by their King to Murder, at so much
per day, very brutes in human shape whose business it was to Kill, they
trampled the dead bodies of their own comrades into the sod, uttered their
yell and plunged into the ranks of the Continental soldiers.
In vain the gleam of their bayonets which shone so beautiful, in vain their
hoarse shout, which echoed afar like the howl of savage beasts, mangling
their prey, in vain their elegantly arranged columns, displayed in the most
approved style of European warfare!
The American riflemen met them breast to breast, and sent their bullets
home. Their faces darkened by powder, spotted with blood, their uncouth
attire fluttering in rags, they did not move one inch, but in stern silence only
broken by the report of their rifles, these Continental heroes met the onset
of the foe.
Suddenly the sun broke through the clouds, and lighted up the theatre of
battle.
Almost at the same moment a venerable mansion rising among the woods
on yonder shore of the Brandywine, ascended to the sky, in a whirling
cloud of smoke and flame. Blown up by the explosion of powder, it shot
a long column of fire and blackness into the sky, and then its fragments
strewed the battle-field, mingled with the mangled wrecks of human forms.
Anthony Wayne, resting his hand on the neck of his steed, beheld it all.
He quivered in every nerve with the excitement of the combat, and yet
pressing his lip between his teeth, awaited the moment when his sword
should flash from the scabbard, his roan war-horse dash like a thunderbolt
into the storm of battle.
That moment came at last. It was when the bloody contest had rolled
over the valley for an hour and more, that the crisis came.
Look yonder along the summit of the western hills, where the Hessian
banner darkens through the trees! Look yonder and behold that gallant
company of warriors wind slowly down the hill, their swords, their helmets,
their plumes, brightening in the glow of the setting sun. Four hundred
strong, all attired in midnight black, relieved by gold, each helmet bearing
the ominous skull and cross bones emblazoned on its front, the dragoons of
Anspach came to battle.
At their head mounted on a snow-white steed, whose uplifted head and
quivering nostrils denote the fever of the strife, rides a man of warrior
presence
,
his steel helmet shadowed beneath a mass of dark plumes, his broad
chest clad in a rich uniform, black as the raven's wing, glittering with stars
and epaulettes of gold. It is Kniphausen, the General of the Hessian horde,
riding at the head of veteran troopers, the bravest assassins of his hireling
band.
In their rude faces, darkened by the heavy mustachio and beard, cut and
hacked by scars, you read no gleam of pity. The cry of Quarter! falls
unheeded on the ears of men like these. No matter how just or infamous
the cause, their business is war, their pastime butchery. Unfurling the
black flag of their Princeyou see the Skull and Cross bones glittering in
the sunthey descend the hill, dash through the stream, and pour the
avalanche of their charge upon the Continental host.
Wayne saw them come, and glanced for a moment on their formidable
array. Then turning he beheld the steeds of some two hundred troopers,
scattered through the orchard at his back, the swords of their riders
touching
the ripe fruit which hung from the bending boughs.
Wayne silently removed his plumed chapeau, and took from the hands
of a soldier at his side, his trooper's helmet, faced with steel and adorned
with a single bucktail plume.
Then vaulting in the saddle, he unsheathed his sword, and turning to the
troopers shouted in his deep, indignant tones, the simple battle-word
Come on!
He plunged from the embankment, and ere his gallant roan had reached
the base of the knoll, forth from the orchard trees burst that band of tried
soldiers, and with their swords steadily gleaming, thundered in one solid
mass down into the whirlpool of the fight.
Their banner, a White Horse painted on a blue field, and surrounded
with Thirteen Stars, fluttered out upon the breeze; that single peal of the
trumpet sounding the charge, shrieked far along the meadow.
Right through the battle Kniphausen crashes on, the swords of his men
describing fiery circles in the air, the riflemen fall back, cut by their steel,
crushed by their horses hoofs, panic stricken by their Hessian hurrah.
But courage, brave yeomen! Wayne is coming; his banner is on the
breeze, his sword rises above his head, a glittering point of flame amid that
sea of rolling clouds.
The soldiers who remained on the embarkment, beheld a strange and
stirring sight.
Anthony Wayne, at the head of two hundred brave troopers, dashing
toward the centre of the meadow, from the eastthe Hessian Kniphausen,
at the same moment advancing to the same point from the west. Between
the Generals lay heaps of dead and dying; around them, the riflemen and
Yagers, these in the hunting shirt, the others in a gaudy dress of green,
waged a desperate and bloody contest.
Wayne turned his head over his shoulder, and waved his swordCome
on! the deep words rung through his clenched teeth.
They knew his voice, knew the glare of his battle eye, knew that uplifted
arm, and dented sword!
Never has Kniphausen, crashing on, in the full current of impetuous
slaughter, beheld the trooper at his side, fall dead on the neck of his steed,
the marks of the rifle-ball oozing from his brow, he also looked up and
beheld
the coming of Mad Anthony Wayne!
It cannot be said that Wayne fought after the most approved style of
European tactics.
But there was an honest sincerity about his manner of fighting, an
unpretending
zeal in the method of his charge, when riding the enemy down,
he wrote his name upon their faces with his sword, that taught them to
respect the hardy son of Chester.
Upon them! he shouted, and at once his two hundred troopers went
into the heart of the Hessian column. They did not move very slowly
you will observe, nor advance in scattered order, but four abreast, a solid
bolt of horses, men and steel, they burst upon the foe, just as you have
seen a rock hurled from an enormous height, crush the trees in the valley
beneath.
The banner of the White Horse and Stars, mingled with the Black Flag
of Anspacha cloud of men, horses and swords, whirled like the last effort
of a thunderstorm along the valley. In a moment, you can see nothing,
but the points of swords, gleaming from the confusion of the conflict.
Then, troopers bending over the mane of their steeds, their good swords
quivering together, ere the fatal blowhorses themselves, fired with the
fury of the hour, tearing each other's necks with their teethwounded
men, plunging from their saddles to the sodthe banners of the foemen
waving over all!
It was in the centre of that whirling fight, that Kniphausen and Wayne,
cutting their way with their swords, silently confronted each other. The
dark figure on the white steed drew near and nearer to the form, attired in
blue and buff, and mounted on a roan war-horse. Each man beheld his
foe, and their eyes met in a look, as searching as it was momentary.
The appearance of Wayne indicated violent emotion. His lip compressed
between his teeth, his hazel eye firing beneath the frontlet of his cap, he
grasped his sword, and for one moment looked around.
It was a hideous spectacle that met his eye. The Continentals
scattering
over the meadow, in broken array; the ground heaped with the bodies
of the dead; the Brandywine, ghastly with the forces of the slain, thrown
into light by its crimson waves.
That look seemed to make the blood within him, boil like molten lead.
For raising himself in his stirrips, he called to his brother knightsto
Marshall
of Virginia, to Proctor of the Land of Penn, to the heroic riflemen,
Maxwell and Porterfieldhe shouted, the day was not yet lost, and then,
with one impulse, himself and his horse, charged Kniphausen home.
No human arm might stand the fury of that charge. In a moment
Kniphausen found himself alone in the midst of his enemies, the sword of
Wayne, glaring near and nearer to his heart, the faces of the Continentals
darkening round.
He appealed to his men, but in vain. To drive them back on the rivulet,
to hurl them, horses and men together, into the red embrace of the waves,
to cut the banner staff, and trail their banner in the mire, to sabre them by
tens and twenties, as they strove to recover their battle orderthis was a
brilliant thing to do, but right brilliantly it was done, by Mad Anthony and
his men.
That sight thrilled like electric fire along the field. In a moment the
Continentals rallied; the riflemen advanced; the artillery began to play,
the air thundered once more with the battle shout!
Reining his roan war-horse on the banks of the Brandywine, his sword
in sober truth dripping with blood, Anthony Wayne, his face quivering with
the intoxication of the battle, shouted to his soldiers, cheered them to the
charge, saw them whirl the whole Hessian force into the stream.
How brilliantly the fire of hope and glory, lit up the hazel eye of
Wayne!
At the instant, while the Hessian army in all its varied costume thronged
the bed of the rivulet and scattered in dismay along the western shore, while
Kniphausen mad with chagrin, hurried from rank to rank, cursing the men
who would not fight, while Marshall and Proctor, Maxwell and Porterfield
were hurrying their forces to the charge, the sun shone out from the
western
sky and lighted up the Brandywine, the valley, the forces of the living
and the crushed countenances of the dead.
The sudden gush of sunlight bathed the brow of Anthony Wayne, as
thrilling to his inmost heart, he waved his sword, and once more sounded
the charge.
At the very moment, in the very flush of his triumph, a strange sound
from the east growled on the ears of the General. It was the tramp of
the right wing under Washington, Sullivan and Greene, retreating from the
field of the Quaker Temple. Wayne saw their broken array, and knew
that the field, not the day was lost.
His sword sank slowly to his side, with his face to the foe, he pointed
the way to old Chester; he uttered the deep words of command.
The soldiers of the right wing have been forced to retreat before
superior
numberswe will protect their retreat!
With surprise, indeed with awe, Kniphausen beheld the victorious band,
who had just hurled his forces back upon the stream, slowly form in the
order of retreat, their swords and banners gleaming in the sun.
And as the Continental forces slowly wound along the eastern hillsas
Kniphausen proceeded to occupy the ground which they had deserteda
solitary warrior, the last of the rebel army, reined his steed on the knoll of
Chadd's Ford, and with his blood-stained face glowing in the sunshine
looked back upon the field, and in one glance surveyed its soil, transformed
into bloody mire, its river floating with dead, its overlooking hills glittering
with Hessian steel!
That one look, accompanied by a quivering of the lip, a heaving of his
broad chest, the last gaze over, and the roan war-horse turned away,
bearing
from the field of Brandywine its own hero, Mad Anthony Wayne!
From the rising to the setting of the sun, he had maintained the fight;
on the hills of his childhood, he had worked out his boyhood's dream, and
wrote his name on the column of ages, with his battle sword.
[14]
[14]
Note
.Among the many ridiculous anecdotes which are told of great men, none
are more contemptible than two stories which are gravely written in connection with
the name of Anthony Wayne. It is said on one occasion, when Washington desired
the presence of Wayne, at his council, the latter sent this message
You plan, and
I'll execute! Plan an attack on Hell, and I'll storm the gates!
Whether the wit of
this consists in its gross profanity, or drunken bravado, those grave gentlemen, who
record it in their pages, may best answer. It is an insult on the memory of the
chivalric
Pennsylvanian, whose glory is the treasure of our history. The other anecdote,
reads something like this: Can you take that battery, Wayne, said Washington.
I will take it
by the Lord!
Do not swear, Anthony,
Then, with or without the
Lord, I'll take it!
Can anything be more utterly unlike, Wayne? He was not a
ruffian, but a gentleman. Why will these journeymen historians, transform a brave
and heroic man, into a braggart and blasphemer?
XX.FORTY-SEVEN YEARS AFTER THE BATTLE.
It
was a calm and lovely day in summerthe time was morning, and
the place the valley of the Birmingham meeting house. The place was
calm and lovely as on the battle morn, but forty-seven long years had past
since that day of terror, and yet the bye roads the hills and the plains, were
all alive with people clad in their holiday costume. A long procession
wound with banners and with the gleam of arms, around the base of
Osborne's
Hill, while in their front the object of every eye, there rolled a
close carriage, drawn by six magnificent steeds, and environed by civic
soldiers
who rent the air with shouts, and flung wreaths of flowers and laurel
beneath the horses' hoofs.
Slowly and with peals of solemn musicthe summer sun above, shining
serenely from a cloudless skythe carriage wound along the ascent of the
Hill and in a few moments, while valley and plain below were black with
people, the elegantly caparisoned steeds were reined in on the broad
summit
of that battle-mount.
There was a pause for a moment, and then an aged man, a veteran
tremulous
with the burden of seventy years, and grim with scarsclad in the
costume of the Revolution, approached and opened the carriage door.
The crowd formed a silent circle around the scene.
A man of some sixty years, tall in stature, magnificent in his bearing,
stepped from the carriage, his form clad in a plain dress of blue, his
uncovered
brow glowing in the sun, with the grey hairs streaming to the
breeze.
He stepped on the sod with the bearing of a man formed to win the hearts
of men; he advanced with the manner of one of nature's Kings. For a
moment he stood uncovered on the brow of the hill, with the sun shining
on his noble brow, while his clear blue eye lighted up, as with the
memories
of forty-seven years.
And then from plain, from hill, from valley, from the lips of ten thousand
freemen arose one shoutthe thunder of a Peoples' gratitudeloud,
prolonged
and deafening. The soldiers waved their swords on highthey
raised their caps in the airand again, and again, the shout went up to the
clear heavens.In that chorus of joy, only a word was intelligible, a word
that bubbled from the overflowing fountains of ten thousand hearts:
La Fayette
!
The Stranger was observed to tremble with a strange emotion. He who
had fought undaunted in the battle of that valley forty-seven years ago,
trembled like a child. The Hero of Two Revolutions, the Boy of
Brandywine
,
the Prisoner of Olmutz, who flung his broad lands and princely
revenues
in the lap of freedom, now bowed his head, leaned upon the shoulder
of the veteran and veiled his eyes from the light.
When he raised his face again, there were tears in his eyes.
So beautiful that country bloomed before him, so darkly on his memory
rushed the condition of blighted France! The land of his birth trodden
under the hoofs of the invader, the Bourbon-Idiot on her Throne, the
Napoleon
of her love, dead in his island-gaol of St. Helena. And here an
Exilealmost a homeless Wandererstood the Man of Two Revolutions,
gazing upon the battle plain, which forty-seven years before had been
crowded by British legions, but now bloomed only with the blessings of
peace, the smile of an all-paternal God!
The contrast between the Land of Washington and the Land of
Napoleon
,
was too much for La Fayette.
He gazed upon the hills crowned with woodlands, the farms blooming
with cultivation and dotted with Homes upon the level plains, green as with
the freshness of spring, the wide landscape glowing in the sun, the very
Garden of the Lordhe gazedhe thought of
France
. The tears
streamed freely down his cheeks.
Then his blue eye surveyed the Quaker temple, rising on its far-off hill,
surrounded by its grassy mounds. As on the battle-day it looked so with
its grey walls and rude roof and narrow windows it now arose, the trees
around it, quivering their tops in the morning light.
Again the shout of that dense crowd thundered on the air, Welcome,
welcome
the friend of Washington, La Fayette!
But it fell unheeded on his ear. His soul was with the Past. There
forty-seven years before, he had seen Washington in all his chivalric
manhood
;
there Pulaski in his white array and battle-worn face, thundering on,
in his hurricane charge; there Sullivan and Wayne and Greene, with all
the heroes doing deeds that started into history ere the day was gone; he
had seen, known them all, and loved the Chief of all.
And
now
He stretched forth his arms, and clasped the veteran of the Revolution to
his heart.
They're all gone, now were the earnest words that bubbled from
his full heart: All comrade, but you! Of all the chivalry of Brandywine
that forty-seven years ago, blazed along these hills, what now remains?
Then as the vision of his blighted France, rushed once again upon his
soul, he murmured incoherently, My God! My God! Happy country
happy People!
There on the summit of the Battle-Hill he leaned his arm upon his
brother veteran, not trusting his tongue with further speech. His heart
was too full for words. As he stood overwhelmed by his emotions, the
shout of the people was heard once more
Welcome the Champion of Freedom in two Worlds, the hero of
Brandywine
and friend of Washington, welcome La Fayette!
BOOK FIFTH.
THE FOURTH OF JULY, 1776.
MEN AND THEIR MISSION.
The Declaration; its source; its action upon mankind in the
Revolutions of America and France
.
THE FOURTH OF JULY, 1776.
I.THE DAY.
Let
me paint you a picture on the canvass of the Past.
It is a cloudless summer day. Yes, a clear blue sky arches and smiles
above a quaint edifice, rising among giant trees, in the centre of a wide city.
That edifice is built of red brick, with heavy window frames and a massy
hall door. The wide-spreading dome of St. Peter's, the snowy pillars of
the Parthenon, the gloomy glory of Westminster Abbeynone of these, nor
any thing like these are here, to elevate this edifice of plain red brick, into
a gorgeous monument of architecture.
Plain red brick the walls; the windows partly framed in stone; the
roofeaves
heavy with intricate carvings; the hall door ornamented with pillars
of dark stone; such is the State House of Philadelphia, in this year of our
Lord, 1776.
Around this edifice stately trees arise. Yonder toward the dark walls of
Walnut street gaol, spreads a pleasant lawn, enclosed by a plain board fence.
Above our heads, these trees lock their massy limbs and spread their leafy
canopy.
There are walks here, too, not fashioned in squares and circles, but
spreading in careless negligence along the lawn. Benches too, rude benches,
on which repose the forms of old men with grey hairs, and women with
babes in their arms.
This is a beautiful day, and this a pleasant lawn: but why do those
clusters of citizens, with anxious faces, gather round the State House walls?
There is the Merchant in his velvet garb and ruffled shirt; there the
Mechanic
,
with apron on his breast and tools in his hands; there the bearded
Sailor and the dark-robed Minister, all grouped together.
Why this anxiety on every face? This gathering in little groups all
over the lawn!
Yet hold a moment! In yonder wooden steeple, which crowns the red
brick State House, stands an old man with white hair and sunburnt face.
He is clad in humble attire, yet his eye gleams, as it is fixed upon the
ponderous
outline of the bell, suspended in the steeple there. The old man
tries to read the inscription on that bell, but cannot. Out upon the waves,
far away in the forests; thus has his life been passed. He is no scholar;
he scarcely can spell one of those strange words carved on the surface of
that bell.
By his side, gazing in his freethat sunburnt facein wonder, stands a
flaxen-haired boy, with laughing eyes of summer blue.
Come here, my boy; you are a rich man's child. You can read.
Spell me those words, and I'll bless ye, my good child!
And the child raised itself on tip-toe and pressed its tiny hands against the
bell, and read, in lisping tones, these memorable words:
Proclaim Liberty to all the Land and all the Inhabitants
thereof
.
The old man ponders for a moment on those strange words; then
gathering
the boy in his arms, he speaks,
Look here, my child? Wilt do the old man a kindness? Then haste
you down stairs, and wait in the hall by the big door, until a man shall give
you a message for me. A man with a velvet dress and a kind face, will
come out from the big door, and give you a word for me. When he gives
you that word, then run out yonder in the street, and shout it up to me.
Do you mind?
It needed no second command. The boy with blue eyes and flaxen hair
sprang from the old Bell-keeper's arms, and threaded his way down the dark
stairs.
The old Bell-keeper was alone. Many minutes passed. Leaning over
the railing of the steeple, his face toward Chesnut street, he looked anxiously
for that fair-haired boy. Moments passed, yet still he came not. The
crowds gathered more darkly along the pavement and over the lawn, yet
still the boy came not.
Ah! groaned the old man, he has forgotten me! These old limbs
will have to totter down the State House stairs, and climb up again, and all
on account of that child
As the word was on his lips, a merry, ringing laugh broke on the ear.
There, among the crowds on the pavement, stood the blue-eyed boy,
clapping
his tiny hands, while the breeze blowed his flaxen hair all about his face.
And then swelling his little chest, he raised himself on tip-toe, and shouted
a single word
Ring
!
Do you see that old man's eye fire? Do you see that arm so suddenly
bared to the shoulder, do you see that withered hand, grasping the Iron
Tongue of the Bell? The old man is young again; his veins are filled
with new life. Backward and forward, with sturdy strokes, he swings the
Tongue. The bell speaks out! The crowd in the street hear it, and burst
forth in one long shout! Old Delaware hears it, and gives it back in the
hurrah of her thousand sailors. The city hears it, and starts up from desk
and work-bench, as though an earthquake had spoken.
Yet still while the sweat pours from his brow, that old Bell-keeper hurls
the iron tongue, and stillboomboomboomthe Bell speaks to the city
and the world.
There is a terrible poetry in the sound of that State House Bell at dead
of night, when striking its sullen and solemn
One
!It rouses crime from
its task, mirth from its wine-cup, murder from its knife, bribery from its
gold. There is a terrible poetry in that sound. It speaks to us like a voice
from our youthlike a knell of God's judgmentlike a solemn yet kind
remembrancer of friends, now dead and gone.
There is a terrible poetry in that sound at dead of night: but there was
a day when the echo of that Bell awoke a world, slumbering in tyranny
and crime!
Yes, as the old man swung the Iron Tongue, the Bell spoke to all the
world. That sound crossed the Atlanticpierced the dungeons of Europe
the work-shops of Englandthe vassal-fields of France.
That Echo spoke to the slavebade him look from his toiland know
himself a man.
That Echo startled the Kings upon their crumbling thrones.
That Echo was the knell of King-craft, Priest-craft, and all other crafts
born of the darkness of ages, and baptised in seas of blood.
Yes, the voice of that little boy, who lifting himself on tip-toe, with his
flaxen hair blowing in the breeze, shouted
Ring!
had a deep and
awful meaning in its infant tones!
Why did that word
Ring!
why did that Echo of the State House
Bell speak such deep and awful meaning to the world? What did that
Ring!
the Echo of that Bell to do with the downfall of the Dishonest
Priest or Traitor King?
Under that very Bell, pealing out at noonday, in an old hall, fifty-six
traders, farmers and mechanics, had assembled to shake the shackles of the
world.
Now let us look in upon this band of plain men, met in such solemn
council It is now half an hour previous to the moment when the
Bell-Ringer
responded to the shout of the fair-haired boy.
This is an old hall. It is not so large as many a monarch's ante-room;
you might put a hundred like it within the walls of St. Peter's, and yet it
is a fine old hall. The walls are concealed in dark oaken wainscotting,
and there along the unclosed windows, the purple tapestry comes drooping
down.
The ornaments of this hall?
Over the head of that noble-browed manJohn Hancock, who sits calm
and serene in yonder chairthere is a banner, the Banner of the Stars.
Perched on that Banner sits the Eagle with unfolded wings. (Is it not a
precocious bird? Born only last year on Bunker Hill, now it spreads its
wings, full-grown, over a whole Continent!)
Look over the faces of these fifty-six men, and see every eye turned to
that door. There is silence in this hallevery voice is hushedevery face
is stamped with a deep and awful responsibility.
Why turns every glance to that door, why is every face so solemn, why
is it so terribly still?
The Committee of Three, who have been out all night, penning a
Parchment
,
are about to appear.
The Parchment, with the Signatures of these men, written with the pen
lying on yonder table, will either make the world freeor stretch these
necks upon the gibbet, yonder in Potter's-field, or nail these heads to the
door-posts of this hall!
That was the time for solemn faces and deep silence.
At last, hark! The door opensthe Committee appear. Who are
these three men, who come walking on toward John Hancock's chair?
That tall man, with the sharp features, the bold brow and sand-hued hair,
holding the
Parchment
in his hand, is the Virginia Farmer, Thomas
Jefferson
.
The stout-built man with resolute look and flashing eye? That is a
Boston manone John Adams. And the calm-faced man, with hair
drooping
in thick curls to his shouldersthat man dressed in a plain coat, and
such odious home-made blue stockingsthat is the Philadelphia Printer,
one Benjamin Franklin.
The three advance to the table. The Parchment is laid there. Shall it
be signed or not?
Then ensues a high and stormy debatethen the faint-hearted cringe in
cornerswhile Thomas Jefferson speaks out his few bold words, and John
Adams pours out his whole soul.
Then the deep-toned voice of Richard Henry Lee is heard, swelling in
syllables of thunder-like music.
But still there is doubtand that pale-faced man, shrinking in one corner,
squeaks out something about axes, scaffolds, and aGIBBET!
Gibbet
! echoes a fierce, bold voice, that startles men from their seats,
and look yonder! A tall slender man rises, dressedalthough it is
summer timein a dark robe. Look how his white hand undulates
as it is stretched slowly out, how that dark eye burns, while his words ring
through the hall. (We do not know his name, let us therefore call his
appeal)
THE SPEECH OF THE UNKNOWN.
Gibbet? They may stretch our necks on all the gibbets in the land
they may turn every rock into a scaffoldevery tree into a gallows, every
home into a grave, and yet the words on that Parchment can never die!
They may pour our blood on a thousand scaffolds, and yet from every
drop that dyes the axe, or drips on the sawdust of the block, a new martyr
to Freedom will spring into birth!
The British King may blot out the Stars of God from His sky, but he
cannot blot out His words written on the Parchment there! The works
of God may perishHis Word, never!
These words will go forth to the world when our bones are dust. To
the slave in the mines they will speak
Hope
to the mechanic in his
workshop
Freedom
to the coward-kings these words will speak, but not
in tones of flattery? No, no! They will speak like the flaming syllables
on Belshazzar's wall
the days of your pride and glory are numbered!
The days of Judgment and Revolution draw near
!
Yes, that Parchment will speak to the Kings in a language sad and
terrible as the trump of the Archangel. You have trampled on mankind
long enough. At last the voice of human woe has pierced the ear of God,
and called His Judgment down! You have waded on to thrones over
seas of bloodyou have trampled on to power over the necks of millions
you have turned the poor man's sweat and blood into robes for your delicate
forms, into crowns for your anointed brows. Now Kingsnow purpled
Hangmen of the worldfor you come the days of axes and gibbets and
scaffoldsfor you the wrath of manfor you the lightnings of God!
Look! How the light of your palaces on fire flashes up into the
midnight
sky!
Now Purpled Hangmen of the worldturn and beg for mercy!
Where will you find it?
Not from God, for you have blasphemed His laws!
Not from the People, for you stand baptized in their blood!
Here you turn, and lo! a gibbet!
Thereand a scaffold looks you in the face.
All around youdeathand nowhere pity!
Now executioners of the human race, kneel down, yes, kneel down
upon the sawdust of the scaffoldlay your perfumed heads upon the block
bless the axe as it fallsthe axe that you sharpened for the poor man's
neck!
Such is the message of that Declaration to Man, to the Kings of the
world! And shall we falter
now?
And shall we start back appalled when
our feet press the very threshhold of Freedom? Do I see quailing faces
around me, when our wives have been butcheredwhen the hearthstones
of our land are red with the blood of little children?
What are these shrinking hearts and faltering voices here, when the very
Dead of our battlefields arise, and call upon us to sign that Parchment, or
be accursed forever?
Sign
! if the next moment the gibbet's rope is round your neck!
Sign
!
if the next moment this hall rings with the echo of the falling axe!
Sign
!
By all your hopes in life or death, as husbandsas fathersas mensign
your names to the Parchment or be accursed forever!
Signand not only for yourselves, but for all ages. For that
Parchment
will be the Text-book of Freedomthe Bible of the Rights of Man
forever!
Signfor that declaration will go forth to American hearts forever, and
speak to those hearts like the voice of God! And its work will not be
done, until throughout this wide Continent not a single inch of ground owns
the sway of a British King!
Nay, do not start and whisper with surprise! It is a truth, your own
hearts witness it, God proclaims it.This Continent is the property of a
free people, and their property alone. God, I say, proclaims it! Look at
this strange history of a band of exiles and outcasts, suddenly transformed
into a
People
look at this wonderful Exodus of the oppressed of the Old
World into the New, where they came, weak in arms but mighty in
God-like
faithnay, look at this history of your Bunker Hillyour Lexington
where a band of plain farmers mocked and trampled down the panoply of
British arms, and then tell me, if you can, that God has not given America
to the
free?
It is not given to our poor human intellect to climb the skies, to pierce
the councils of the Almighty One. But methinks I stand among the awful
clouds which veil the brightness of Jehovah's throne. Methinks I see the
Recording Angelpale as an angel is pale, weeping as an angel can weep
come trembling up to that Throne, and speak his dread message
`Father! the old world is baptized in blood! Father, it is drenched
with the blood of millions, butchered in war, in persecution, in slow and
grinding oppression! Fatherlook, with one glance of Thine Eternal eye,
look over Europe, Asia, Africa, and behold evermore, that terrible sight,
man trodden down beneath the oppressor's feetnations lost in blood
Murder and Superstition walking hand in hand over the graves of their
victims, and not a single voice to whisper, `
Hope to Man!
'
He stands there, the Angel, his hands trembling with the black record
of human guilt. But hark! The voice of Jehovah speaks out from the
awful cloud`Let there be light again. Let there be a New World. Tell
my peoplethe poorthe trodden down millions, to go out from the Old
World. Tell them to go out from wrong, oppression and bloodtell them
to go out from this Old Worldto build my altar in the New!'
As God lives, my friends, I believe that to be HIS voice! Yes, were
my soul trembling on the wing for Eternity, were this hand freezing in death,
were this voice choking with the last struggle, I would still, with the last
impulse of that soul, with the last wave of that hand, with the last gasp of
that voice, implore you to remember this truth
God
has given America to
the free!
Yes, as I sank down into the gloomy shadows of the grave, with
my last gasp, I would beg you to sign that Parchment, in the name of the
God
, who made the Saviour who redeemed youin the name of the
millions
whose very breath is now hushed in intense expectation, as they look
up to you for the awful words`
You are free
!'
48
O, many years have gone since that hourthe Speaker, his brethren, all,
have crumbled into dust, but it would require an angel's pen to picture the
magic of that Speaker's look, the deep, terrible emphasis of his voice, the
prophet-like beckoning of his hand, the magnetic flame which shooting from
his eyes, soon fired every heart throughout the hall!
He fell exhausted in his seat, but the work was done. A wild murmur
thrills through the hall.Sign? Hah? There is no doubt now. Look!
How they rush forwardstout-hearted John Hancock has scarcely time to
sign his bold name, before the pen is grasped by anotheranother and
another! Look how the names blaze on the ParchmentAdams and Lee
and Jefferson and Carroll, and now, Roger Sherman the Shoemaker.
And here comes good old Stephen Hopkinsyes, trembling with palsy,
he totters forwardquivering from head to foot, with his shaking hands he
seizes the pen, he scratches his patriot-name.
Then comes Benjamin Franklin the Printer, and now the tall man in the
dark robe advances, the man who made the fiery speech a moment ago
with the same hand that but now waved in such fiery scorn he writes his
name.
[15]
[15]
The name of the Orator, who made the last eloquent appeal before the Signing
of the Declaration, is not definitely known. In this speech, it is my wish to
compress
some portion of the fiery eloquence of the time; to embody in abrupt sentences,
the very spirit of the Fourth of July, 1776.
And now the Parchment is signed; and now let word go forth to the
People in the streetsto the homes of Americato the camp of
Mister
Washington, and the Palace of George the Idiot-Kinglet word go out to
all the earth
And, old man in the steeple, now bare your arm, and grasp the Iron
Tongue, and let the bell speak out the great truth:
Fifty-six Traders and Farmers and Mechanics have this day shook
the shackles of the World
!
Hark! Hark to the toll of that Bell!
Is there not a deep poetry in that sound, a poetry more sublime than
Shakspeare or Milton?
Is there not a music in the sound, that reminds you of those awful tones
which broke from angel-lips, when the news of the child of Jesus burst on
the Shepherds of Bethlehem?
For that Bell now speaks out to the world, that
God has given the American Continent to the freethe toiling
millions of the human raceas the last altar of the rights of man
on the globethe home of the oppressed, forevermore
!
Let us search for the origin of the great truth, which that bell proclaimed,
let us behold the great Apostle who first proclaimed on our shores,
all
men are alike the children of God
.
II.THE APOSTLE TO THE NEW WORLD.
We
are with the Past again.
Yes, we are yonderfar over the Ocean of Time, where the Ages like
Islands of eternal granite, rear their awful forms.
At this hour on the shores of the Delaware, just where the glorious river
rich with the tribute of mountain and valley, widens into a magnificent bay,
at this hour along yonder shore, on the slope of a gentle ascent blooms a
fair village, whose white houses rise in the summer air from among gardens
and trees. Away from this hamlet spreads fields, golden with wheat, or
emerald green with Indian corn; away among these fields rank marshes
wind here and there, in all the luxuriance of their untamed verdure; away
and away from marsh, and field, and coast, and bay, green woods arise, their
thick foliage sweeping into the summer sky.
A pleasant village, a glorious country, a green island, and a lordly bay.
Such it is now. But we will back into the past. We will wander into
the shadows of ages. We will stand face to face with the dead.
There was a day when no village bloomed along this coast, nor
white-walled
farm-house arose from among the orchard trees. There was a day
when standing on this gentle ascent, you might look forth, and lo! the
waves were dashing to your feet. Yonder is the green aisle, yonder far
away, the dim line of land which marks the opposite shore of the bay, and
there, heaving, and glistening, and roaring, the wide waters melt by slow
degrees into the cloudy sky.
Look to the south! You behold the level coastwhite sand mingled
with green reedsthe wide-spreading marshthe thick woods, glorious
with oak, and beech, and chesnut, and maple. Enclosed in the arms of the
green shore, the bay rolls yonder, a basin of tumultuous waves.
It is noon: above your head you behold the leaden sky. It is noon, and
lo! from the broad green of yonder marsh a pale column of blue smoke
winds up into the clouds. It is noon, and hark! A shrill, piercing,
hissing
sounda footstepa form! A red man rushes from yonder covert,
bow in hand, while the stricken deer with one proud bound, falls dead at
his feet.
A column of blue smoke from the marshan arrow hissing through the
aira red man's form and a wounded deer? What does all this mean?
Where are we now?
Hist! my friend, for we are now in Indian land. Hist! for we are now
far back among the shadows of two hundred years.
Yet we will watch the motions of this Red Man. He stoops with his
hatchet of flint upraised, he stoops to inflict the last blow on the writhing
deer, when his eye wanders along the surface of the bay. The hatchet
drops from his handhe stands erect, with parted lips and starting eyes,
his hands half-raised, in a gesture of deep wonder.
He stands on this gentle ascent, the waves breaking at his feet, the proud
maple spreading its leaves overhead. He stands there, an Apollo, such as
the Grecian artist never sculptured in his wildest dream, an Apollo fashioned
by the Living God, with a broad chest, faultless limbs, quivering nostrils,
and a flashing eye. No robes of rank upon that tawny breast, ah, no! A
single fold of panther's hide around the loins, graces without concealing, the
proportions of his faultless limbs.
Tell uswhy stands the lone Indian on this Delaware shore, gazing in
mute wonder across the sweep of yonder magnificent bay.
Look, yes, far over the waters look! What see you there? The bay,
its waves plumed with snowy foam: yes, the rolling, dashing, panting bay,
rushing from the horizon to the shore. Look again, rude Red Man; what
see you now?
The Red Man cannot tell his thoughts; his breast heaves; he trembles
from head to foot.
Strangeyes, terrible spectacle!
A white speck gleams yonder on the horizon; it tosses into view, on that
dim line where waves meet the sky. It enlarges, it spreads, it comes on
gloriously over the waters!
The Red Man standing beneath the giant maple, chilled to his rude heart
with a strange awe.
That white speck is dim and distant no longer. It is nearer now. It
spreads forth huge wings of snow-white; it displays a massive body of
jet-black
;
it comes on, this strange wondrous thing, tearing the waves with its
beak. Beak? Yes, for it is a bird, a mighty bird, sent by Manitto from
the Spirit-Land, sent to save or to destroy!
Gloriously over the bay it comes. Larger and larger yet it grows.
White and beautiful spread its fluttering wings over the dark waters.
The Red Man sinks aghast. He prays. By the rustling in the leaves,
by the voice of his own heart, he knows that Manitto hears his prayer.
The White Bird comes for good!
Leaving the rude Indian to gaze upon the sight of wonder with his own
eyes, let us also look upon it with ours.
A noble ship, dashing with wide-spread sails over the waters of the
Delaware
Bay! Such is the sight which two hundred years ago, excited the
wonder and awe of the rude Indian, who never beheld ship or sail before.
Ship and sail had tossed and whitened along this bay full many a time
before
,
but the Indian dwelling in the fastnesses of impenetrable swamps, had
never laid eyes upon this wondrous sight until this hour.
It is near the Indian now. It comes dashing over the waters toward the
Island, triumphing over the waves, which roar and foam in its path. Look!
you can see the people on its deck, the sailors among its white wings.
And now the anchor is cast overboard; there is the rude chant of the
sailor's song; and a boat comes speeding over the waters, urged along by
sinewy arms.
Yes, while the noble ship rides at anchor, under the shelter of yonder
isle, that small boat comes tossing over the waters. It nears the spot
where the Indian stands; he can see the bearded faces and strange costume
of the sailors, he can see that Form standing erect in the prow of the boat.
That Form standing there under the leaden sky, with the uncovered
brow, bared to breeze and spray! Is it the form of a spirit sent by
Manitto
?
The Indian sees that formthat face! He kneelsyes, beneath the
maple tree, by the bleeding deer, tomahawk in hand he kneels, gazing with
fixed eyes upon that face. As the boat comes near let us look upon that
face, that form.
A man in the prime of life, with the flush of manhood upon his cheek,
its fire in his eye, attired in a brown garb, plain to rudeness, stands in the
prow of the boat, as it comes dashing on.
And yet that Man is the
Apostle of the Living God to the New
World
.
Yes, on a mission as mighty as that of Paul, he comes. His coat is
plain, but underneath that plain coat beats a heart, immortal with the
pulsations
of a love that grasps at all the human race.
He is an Apostle, and yet his eyes are not hollow, his cheeks not gaunt
and cadaverous, his hair not even changed to grey. An Apostle with a
young countenance, a clear blue eye, a cheek flushed with rose-bud hues,
a broad brow shadowed by light brown hair, a mouth whose red lips curve
with a smile of angel like love.
An Apostle with a manly form, massive chest, broad shoulders, and
bearing
far beyond the majesty of kings.
He stands in the prow, his blue eye flashing as the boat nears land.
Splash, splashdo you hear the oars? Hurrahhurrah! How the
waves shout as they break upon the beach.
The boat comes on, nearer and nearer. A swelling wave dashes over
the dying deer, whilst the spray-drops wet the face of the kneeling Indian.
The keel grates the sand.
For a moment that man with the fair countenance and chesnut hair,
stands in the prow of the boat, his blue eyes upraised to God. For a
moment
he stands there, and behold! The clouds are severed yonder. A
gush of sunshine pours through their parting folds, and illumines the
Apostle's brow. In that light he looks divine.
Say through those parting clouds, cannot you see the face of the Saviour
bending down, and smiling eternal love upon his Apostle's brow?
For a moment the Apostle stood there, and thenwith no weapon by his
side, nor knife, nor pistol, nor powder-hornbut with love beaming from
his brow, that man stepped gently on the sand.
The Indian looked up and saw that face, and was not afraid. Love,
gentleness, Godthese were written on that face.
Was it not a beautiful scene?
The kneeling Indian, his knife sunken in the earth, the dying deer by
his side, looks up with a loving awe gleaming from his red face. The
Apostle standing there upon that patch of sod, the surf breaking round his
feet, the sunlight bursting on his brow. The bearded sailors, their faces
hushed with deep awe; while their oars hang suspended in mid-air. On
one side the leafy mapleon the other the river, the ship, the island, and
the wide extending bay.
And then the blue sky, looking out from amid a wilderness of floating
clouds, as though God himself smiled down his blessing on the scene.
That was the picture, my friends, and O, by all the memories of Home
and Freedom, paint that picture in your hearts.
Columbus, with his eye fixed on landthe land of the New World
Pizarro gazing on the riches of Peru, Cortez with the Temples of
Montezuma
at his feetthese are mighty pictures, but here was a mightier than
them all.
Mighter than that historic image of Columbus gazing for the first time
on land? Yes! For Columbus but discovered a New World, while this
Apostle first planted on its shores the seed of a mighty tree, which had lain
buried for sixteen hundred years, beneath an ocean of blood.
The shade of that tree is now cast abroad, far over this Continent, far
over the World. That tree was called
Toleration
. In the day of its
planting, it was a strange thing. The Nations feared it. But now watered
by God it grows, and on its golden fruit you may read these words:
Every man hath a right to worship God after the dictates of
his own conscience
.
For a moment, spell-bound, the Indian looked up into the Apostle's face.
Then that Apostle slowly advancing over the sod, beneath the shade of the
Maple tree, clasped him by the hand, and called him
Brother
!
Soon a fire flamed there upon the sod. Soon columns of blue smoke
wound upward, in the thick green leaves of the Maple tree.
Roar O, surf! roll ye clouds! beam O, sun! For now beneath the
Maple tree, on the shores of the Delaware, the Apostle in the plain garb
shares the venison and corn of the rude Indian, sits by his side, while the
red woman stealing from the shadows, prepares the pipe of peace, as her
large dark eyes are fixed upon that manly face.
Around scattered over the sod, were grouped the stout forms of the
sailors. In the distance the ship, like a giant bird, tossed slowly on the
waves. The summer breeze bent the reeds upon the green isle, and played
among the leaves of the Maple tree. The sky above was clear, the last
cloud huge and snowy, lay piled away, between the water and the sky, on
the distant horizon.
It was a calm hour.
The Pipe of Peace was lightedits smoke arose, curling around the
beaming face of the Apostle, while the red man looked upon him in rude
love, and the woman, her form thrown carelessly on the sod, her long hair
showering in glossy blackness to her waist, gazed in his blue eyes with a
mute reverence, as though she beheld the Messenger of God.
That Apostle built a Nation without a Priest, without an Oath, without a
Blow. Yet he never wronged the poor Indian.
[16]
[16]
Note
.It is stated, (whether by history or by tradition only I am not informed,)
that William Penn first put his foot on New World soil, on the shore opposite Reedy
Island, at the head of Delaware Bay, where now stands and flourishes the pleasant
village of Port Penn. From this legend of William Penn, we will pass to the life
of his Divine Master, who first asserted the truth which the Declaration of
Independence
promulgated, after a lapse of eighteen hundred yearsALL MEN ARE
ALIKE THE CHILDREN OF
God
.
That Apostle reared the Altar of Jesus, on the Delaware shore, and
planted the foundations of a Mighty People, amid dim old forests. Yet he
never wronged the poor Indian.
He died, with his pillow smoothed by the blessings of the rude Indian
race. To this hour the Indian Mother, driven far beyond the Mississippi,
driven even from the memory of the Delaware, takes her wild boy upon
her knee, and tells him the wild tradition of the
Good Miquon
.
My friends, when I think of this great man who in a dark age, preached
Toleration
, or in other words, the Love of Jesus, a dream rushes upon
my soul.
One night in a dream, I beheld a colossal rock, a mountain of granite,
rising from illimitable darkness into bright sunshine. Around its base was
midnight; half-way up was twilight; on the very summit shone the light of
God's countenance.
A voice whisperedThis awful rock, built upon midnight, girdled by
twilight, with the light of God's face shining upon its brow, this awful rock
is The
History of the World
.
Far down in blackest midnight, I beheld certain lurid, horrible shapes,
going wildly to and fro. These, said the voice, these are the butchers of
the human race, called
Conquerors
.
Half-way up in the dim twilight, a multitude of Popes, Reformers,
Pretended
Prophets and Fanatics, were groping their way with stumbling
footsteps
,
darkness below and twilight around them. These, said the voice, are
the numerous race of
Creed-Makers
, who murder millions in the name
of God.
But far up this terrible rock,yes, yonder in the eternal sunshine, which
broke upon the highest point of its summit, side by side with
Saint Paul
,
and the Apostles, stood a commanding form, clad in an unpretending garb,
with a mild glory playing over his brow; that form, the Apostle of God to
the New World,
William Penn
.
III.BACK EIGHTEEN HUNDRED YEARS!
Ere
we come down to the days of the Revolution, let us go on a journey
into a far country and a long past age.
Kings and Priests have asked us, from whence do you derive the
principle
All
men in the sight of God are equalfrom what work of
philosophy
,
from what dogma of musty parchments, or thesis of monkish schools.
From none of these! We go higher, for the origin of the noble words
contained in the Declaration of Independence, even to the foot of that
Judean mount, which one day beheld a universe in mourning for the crimes
of ages.
We pass by our Kings and Priests; we leave behind us the long column
of crowned robbers, and anointed hypocrites; to the altar where the light
burns, and the truth shines forever, we hasten, with bended head and
reverent
eyes.
Come with me to a far distant age.
There was a day when the summer sun shone from the centre of the
deep blue sky, in the far eastern clime.
It was the hour of high noon.
Come with meyeswhile the noonday sun is pouring his fierce rays
over the broad landscape, let us for a moment turn aside into the deep woods
the deep green woods, not far from yonder town.
What see you here?
Here sheltered from the rays of the sun by a thick canopy of leaves, a
quiet stream stretches away into the dim woods.
Is it not beautiful? The water so deep, so cleartrembling gently
along its shores, fragrant with myrtlethe thick canopy of leaves overhead
the white lilies on yonder bank, dipping gently into the still waves!
There is the balm of summer flowers, the stillness of noonday, the
tranquil
beauty of calm waters and stout forest treesall are here!
And look yonder! There, under the boughs of that spreading cedar, a
fountain of dark stone breaks on your eye.
It is but a pile of dark stone, and yet, cool water, trickling from the rock
above, shines and glimmers thereand yet, hanging from the boughs of
that giant cedar, thick clusters of grapes dip into the waters of that spring,
and lo! a single long gleam of sunlight streams through the thick boughs
upon the cold water, and the purple grapes.
Is it not a beautiful picture, nestling away here in dim woods, while the
noonday sun pours its fierce rays over hill and valley, far along the land?
And yet we must leave this scene of quiet beauty, for the hot air and the
burning sun.
Look there, at the foot of yonder giant cedar, beside the fountain,
murmuring
such low music on the air, look yonder and behold a path winding
up, into the still woods.
We will follow that path, up and on with tired steps we go, we leave the
woods, we stand in the open air under the burning sun.
There, not a hundred paces from our feet, the white walls of a quiet town
break into the deep blue of the summer sky.
Come with me, to that town; over the hot dust of the flinty road, come
with me!
Let us on through the still streetsfor the heat is so intense that the
rich and the proud have retired to their homesnay, even the poor have
fallen exhausted at their labor. Let us on; without pausing to look in upon
that garden, adorned with temples, musical with fountains, with the rich
man reclining on his bed of flowers.
Let us not even pause to look in through the doors of yonder gorgeous
temple, where pompous men in glittering robes, and long beards are mumbling
over their drowsy prayers.
Here we are in the still streetsstill as midnight, even at broad noon
and around us rise the white walls of rich men's mansions, and the
glittering
dome of the synagogue.
Let us ask the name of this town! Let us ask yonder solitary man, who
with his hands folded among his robes of fine linen, his long beard
sweeping
his breasthis calm self-complacent brow is striding haughtily along the
deserted streets.
Tell us good sir, the name of this town! That richly clad way-farer
answers one question with a haughty scowl, and passes on.
You perceive that man is too holy to answer the question of sinful men
his robe is too rich, his phylactery too broadhis knowledge of the law
too great to speak to men of common garb. That is a holy man, a
Pharisee
.
And this town is the town of Nazareth; and we stand here tired and
fainting in the dusty streets; with the drowsy prayers from that synagogue,
the music of rich men's fountains breaking on our heavy ears.
But hark! The deep silence of this noonday hour is broken by sharp,
quick soundthe clink of a hammer, the grating of a saw!
Let us follow that sound!
Look there, between those two massive domes of rich men, there, as if
crouching away from the hot sun, in the thick shadow, nestles the rude hut
of a Carpenter. Yes, the rude hut of a Carpenter, with the sound of
hammer
and saw, echoing from that solitary window.
We approach that windowwe look in! What is the strange sight
we see?
49
Strange sight? Call you this a strange sight, when it is nothing more
than a young man, clad in the laborer's garments, the laborer's sweat upon
his brow, bending down to his labor, amid piles of timber and unhewn
boardsCall you this a strange sight?
Why it is but a sight of every day lifea common sight, a familiar thing,
a dull, every day fact.
But hold a moment,
Look as that young man raises his head, and wipes the thick drops from
his browlook upon that face! Look there, and forget the Carpenter's
shop, the boards, the hammer, the saw, nay, even the rough laborer's dress.
It is is a young facethe face of a boybut O, the calm beauty of that
hair, flowing to the shoulders in waving locksmingling in its hues, the
purple of twilight with the darkness of midnightO, the deep thought of
those large, full eyes, O, the calm radiance of that youthful brow!
Ah, that is a face to look upon and loveand kneeland worshipeven
though the form is clad in the rough carpenter's dress. Those eyes, how
deep they gleam, more beautiful than the stars at dead of night; that brow,
how awfully it brightens into the Majesty of God!
And now, as you are looking through the windowhold your breath as
you lookdo not, O, do not disturb the silence of this scene!
As that boythat apprentice boystands there, with a saw in one hand,
the other laid on a pile of boardsa strange thought comes over his soul!
He is thinking of his brothersthe Brotherhood of Toil! That vast
family, who now swelter in dark mines, bend in the fields, under the hot
sun, or toil, toil, toil on, toil forever in the Workshops of the World.
He is thinking of his brothers in the huts and dens of cities; sweltering
in rags and misery and disease. O, he is thinking of the Workmen of the
World, the Mechanics of the earth, whose dark lot has been ever and yet
everto dig that others may sleepto sow that others may reapto coin
their groans and sweat and blood, into gold for the rich man's chest, into
purple robes for his form and crowns for his brow. This had been the fate
of the Mechanicthe Poor man from immemorial ages!
Never in all the dark history of man, had the Mechanic once looked from
his toilhis very heart had always beat to that dull soundToilToil
Toil!
Never since the day when Jehovah gave the word, By the sweat of thy
brow thou shalt live! never had that Great Army of Mechanics once looked
up, or felt the free blood dance in their veins.
By the sweat of the brow? Was it thus the Poor man was to live? And
how had he lived for four thousand years?
Not only by the sweat of his brow, but the blood of his heart, the groans
of his soul.
This had been the fate of the Mechanicthe Poor Man, for four thousand
years.
And now, that Young Carpenter stood there, in the Carpenter's shop of
Nazareth, thinking over the wrongs of the Poor, his brothers, his sisters,
THE
Poor
!
At that moment, as if a flood of light from the throne of God, had poured
down into his soul, that young Mechanic stood there, with an awful light
hovering over his brow.
At that moment he felt the Godhead fill his veinsat that moment he
stood there a God. Yes, a God in a Mechanic's gaberdine; with
carpenter's
tools in his hand.
At that moment he felt the full force of his mission on earth; yes,
standing
there, his brow gleaming, his eyes flashing with Eternal light, Jesus the
Carpenter of Nazareth, resolved to redress the wrongs of the Poor.
And as he stands there, behold. A mildly beautiful woman, steals from
yonder door, and pauses on tip-toe at the very shoulder of the young man;
herself unseen, she stands with hands half-raised, gazing upon her son, with
her large full eyes.
That mildly beautiful woman is Mary the Virgin-Mother.
Is it not a picture full of deep meaning?There stands the Bride of
the Living God, gazing upon that young Carpenter,
whose body is human
whose soul is very God!
From that moment, these words became linked in one
Jesus and Man
.
Yes, follow the Blessed Nazarene over the dust of the highway, hehold
him speaking hope to the desolate, health to the sick, life to the dead,
eternal
life to the Poor! Last night he had his couch on yonder mountain-top
to-night he shares you poor crust; to-morrow he goes on his way again;
his mission still the Redemption of the Poor.
Does he share the rich man's banquet or the rich man's couch? Is he
found waiting by rich men's elbows, speaking soft things to their drowsy
souls! Ah, no! Ah, no!
For the rich, the proud, the oppressor, his brow darkens with wrath, his
tongue drops biting scorn.
But to the Poorto his poor. Ah, how that mild face looks in upon
their homes, speaking within dark huts, great words, which shall never die;
ah, how the poor love him; their Apostle, their Redeemer, more than all,
their brother.
Follow him there by the pool of Siloamlook! A man clad in a faded
garb, with long hair sweeping down his face,that face covered with sweat
and duststamped with the ineffable Godheadgoes there by the waves
of dark Galileecommunes there at night with his soulspeaks to the stars
which he first spake into being!
Or far down in the shades of Gethsemane, there he kneels pleading, with
bloody drops upon his brow, for his brothers, his sisters
the poor
Or yonder on that grim heighth frowning over Jerusalem, nailed to the
Cross in scornpain, intense pain quivering through his racked sinews
blood dripping from his hands and from his thorn-crowned browlook
there, at the moment when it is made his fierce trial, to doubt his Divine
Mission!
Look as the Awful Godhead is struggling with his human nature. Hark
to that groan going up to God, from that Man of Nazareth, stretched there
upon the cross!
EloiEloilama Sabacthani
!
My God! My God! Why hast thou forsaken me!
I could bear the scorn of these High Priests; I could bear this cross;
these bloody hands, this streaming brow!
Nay, I could bear that very People, whose sick I have healed, whose
dead I have raised, the very People, who yesterday strewing palm branches
in my way, shouted Hosannah to my name; I could bear that these People
these brothers of my soulshould have been the first to shriekCrucify
him, Crucify him.
But Thou O GodWhy hast thou forsaken me!
Ah, was not that a dark hour, when the Man of Nazareth doubted his
mission
to the Poor, to Manwhen God in human flesh doubted his Divinity?
And why this life of Toilthis bloody sweat in Gethsemanethis awful
scenethese bloody hands, this thorn-crowned browthis terrible Doubt
on Calvary?
Was it only to root the Kings more firmly on their thronesto grind the
faces of the poor yet deeper in the dust!
No! No! The bloody sweat of Gethsemanethe groans of Calvary
the soul of Jesus answers no! no! no!
Yes, to-day from that Carpenter's shop in Nazareth, a Voice speaks out
to the workshops of the worldthat voice speaks to Toilyes, to dusty,
tired, half-clad, starving Toilthat voice speaks, and says,
Look up
brother, for the day of your redemption draweth near
!
Ere we survey the result of this great mission of the Saviour, its action
upon Man, after the lapse of eighteen hundred years, we will behold two
scenes in his life, and learn the solemn lesson which they teach.
V.THE WILDERNESS.
The Wilderness
, dark and vast, illumined by the faint light of the
breaking
dawn!
It is a wild place, this broken plain, gloomy by day, terrible by night;
ghostly when the cold moonbeam shines over these rugged rocks. On
every side, from the barren earth, rude shapes of granite rock, struggle into
the dim light of morning. Here are grand old trees, towering aloft, strong
with the growth of ages, their colossal trunks looming through the mists of
the dawn, like the columns of some heathen temple, made unholy by the
rites of bloody sacrifice.
It is the early dawn, and yonder beyond this dreary plain, rugged with
scattered masses of antediluvian rock, yonder beyond those aged trees, the
oaks grouped in a venerable circle, the palm rising in solitary magnificence,
we behold a gloomy waste of dark water, heaving sullenly in the first beam
of the day.
Ah, that waste of dark water is invested with a fearful gloom; silence
deeper than the grave broods over its impenetrable deep, like a raven over
the breast of the dead. Here and there, along the black shores, are
scattered
dismal trees, stunted in their growth, blasted by lightning, withered in
trunk and branch, as with the weariness of long ages. Here and there,
from the edge of its sullen waters, huge masses of dark rock arise, their
fantastic shapes presenting images of hideous meaning, some rising like
fabled demons, some like beasts of prey, some like men, transformed by
infernal passions, into monuments of despair.
Altogether this dread, dark lake, this silent wilderness, strikes your heart
with a strange awe.
Let us seat ourselves upon this rude stone, and see the morning come
on, in solitary grandeur. Let us behold those snowy mists moving slowly
over the dark waters, like spirits of the blest over shades of unutterable
woe. Harka sound, harsh, crashing, and loud as thunder. In a moment
it is gone. It was but the last groan of an aged oak, which, eaten by the
tooth of ages, has fallen with one sudden plunge into the waters of the
lake. All is silent again, but such a silenceO, it chills the blood to dwell
in this place of shadows!
Tell us, do fair forms ever visit these gloomy wastes, do the voices of
home ever break in upon this heavy air, do kind faces ever beam upon these
rugged rocks? Tell us, does anything wearing the form of man ever press
this barren earth with a footstep?
The raven croaking from the limb of a blasted tree, the wolf, gaunt and
grim, stealing from his cave by the waters, the hyena howling his unearthly
laugh, these all may be here, but manwhy should he ever dare this
solitude
,
more terrible than the war of battle?
Well may this place seem terrible by day, ghostly by night, blasted, as
with the judgment of God at all times! For yonder beneath those dark
waters, heaving with sullen surges on the blackened shore lies entombed
in perpetual judgment, the Cities of the Plain!
Yes, there beneath those waves are mansions, streets, gardens, temples
and domes, all crowded with people, all thronged with a silent multidude,
who stand in the doors, or throng the pathways, or kneel in the halls of
worship, ghostly skeleton people, who never speak, nor move, nor breathe,
but they are there, deep beneath the bituminous waves, petrified monuments
of Almighty vengeance. The cities of the Plain are there, Sodom and
Gomorrah.
Therefore is this desert so silent, so breathlesly desolate; therefore does
the cry of yonder raven, washing his plumage in the dark waters, come
over the waste, like the knell of a lost world.
We are in the desert, and the lake before us, is the Dead Sea.
Yet holdthere is a footstep breaking upon the silence of the desert air.
Lo! From behind yonder granite rock, a form comes slowly into view,
a form rounded with the outlines of early manhood, attired in the rude
gaberdine of toil.
Who is he that comes slowly on, with gently-folded arms and downcast
head, framed in the curling beard and flowing hair?
Let us look well upon him!
He wears the garb of labor; his feet from which the worn sandals have
fallen away, are wounded by the desert flint. Slowly he comes, his head
upon his breast, his eyes fixed on the earth. Yet we may see that his
form combines in one view, all that is graceful in outline, or manly in vigor,
or beautiful in gesture.
Holdand gaze! For he lifts his head.
Ah why do we desire to kneelto loveto worship him, this man in
the rude garb? Why do our eyes seek that face with a glance of deep and
absorbing interest? Why do broken ejaculations bubble from our full
hearts, while our souls, all at once, seem lifted beyond these houses of
clay?
Look upon that face and find your answer.
O, the rapture of that calm white brow, O, the speechless love of those
large full eyes, O, the eloquence of those gently-parted lips! It is a young
face, with flowing hair, and curling beard, whose hues combine the
darkness
of midnight, the rich purple of a summer's eve, while the brow is
clear as alabaster, the eyes dark with that excess of melting radiance. That
face touches your inmost soul.
Let us kneel, let us worship here, for the Carpenter of Nazareth comes
near us, clad in the garments of toil, yet with the Godhead beaming serenely
from his radiant brow.
Here, in this desert he has wandered forty days and forty nights. Not
a crust has passed those lips, not a cup of water moistened that throat,
whose beautiful outline is seen above the collar of his coarse garb.
Here he has dwelt for forty days companioned by day with silence, by
night with the stars, at all times by an Almighty presence, shining
unutterable
images of beauty into his soul.
Ah, in this time, his heart has throbbed for man; yes, in the workshop
degraded by oppression in the mine, burdened by the chain, in the field with
the hot sun pouring over his brow, still Man his Brother!
Yesbeneath the calm light of the stars, amid the silence of noonday,
at twilight, when the long shadows of the palms, rested upon the bosom of
the Dead Sea, has his great mission come home to his soul, calling him
with its awful voice, to go forth and free his brother!
And the serene moon, shining from the sky of impenetrable blue, has
oftentimes revealed that earnest face stamped with unutterable thoughts,
lifted up to God, glowing already with a consciousness of the dim future.
O, my friends, when I follow this pure Being on his desert way, and
mark his tears as they fall for the sorrows of Man, and listen to his sighs,
as his heart beats with warm pulsations for the slave of toil, or see him
standing on yonder cliff, his form rising in the moonbeams, as he stretches
forth his hands to the sky and whispers an earnest prayer to God, for the
Millions of the human race, who have been made the sport of Priest and
King, for a dreary length of agesthen I feel my heart also warm, with
Hope that the Day is near, when Labor shall bless the whole earth, when
Man shall indeed be free!
This Jesus of Nazareth, dwelling for forty days and nights, alone with
his Soul, has ever for me, a calm, divine beauty.
But lo! he hungers, he thirsts at last. Where shall he find bread or
water? Not from these rocks, covered with rank moss, shall grow the
bread that nourishes, not from the dead wave of yonder sea, shall the bent
palm-leaf be filled with pure water.
Jesus hungers, thirsts; the hot sky is above, the arid earth below. But
neither bread nor water meet his gaze.
At this moment, hark! A footstep is heard, and a man of royal
presence
,
clad in purple robes, glistening with gems and gold, and contrasted
with the snowy whiteness of fine linen, comes striding into view, with the
air of majesty and worldly power. His ruddy countenance blushes with
the genial glow of the grape; his eyes sparkle with the fire of sensual
passion; his dark hair curls around a brow, which lofty and massive, is
stamped with that cunning, which among the people of this world, often
passes for Intellect.
In fact, he stands before us the inpersonation of Worldly Power, a goodly
looking man withal, whom it were policy and prudence to bow down and
reverence.
With his sandalled feet, glittering with diamonds that gleam as he walks,
he comes on: he stands before the humbly-clad Jesus. At a glance, he
reads the light of Godhead on that brow, he feels the immeasurable power
of those earnest eyes.
Come! he cries, taking Jesus of Nazareth by the hand, come! And
the desert is passed, and rocks are gone, and the Dead sea has faded from
the view. Come! repeats the Prince of this World, and as he speaks,
behold! A mountain swells before them, towering above the plain, green
with the venerable cedars and grey with colossal rocks.
Come! re-echoes the Prince, and up the steep mountain paths, and
through the deep mountain shadows, and along the dark mountain ravines,
they hurry on. Now they are in the clouds, now the mists of the summit
gather them in.
At last, upon this rock, projecting over an awful abyss, they stand, Jesus
of Nazareth in his laborer's garb, and the Prince of this world in his royal
robes.
Ah, what a doleful mockery of speech and common sense, was that
which painted the Incarnation of Evil, in a hideous shape, with all the
grotesque mummery of satyr's hoof and tail, poor as the poorest of earth's
toiling children! Whom could Satan ever tempt in a garb like this? No,
the Prince of this World, when he comes to tempt Man from the voice of
God, speaking forever in his inmost soul, comes in purple robes and fine
linen, with the flash of grapes upon his cheeks, the well-filled purse in his
fair hands, the marks of good cheer and rich banquets upon his portly form.
So, in all his pride and glory, stood he before the humbly-clad Jesus of
Nazareth.
Look!
he cries, pointing with his hand towards that sublime panorama
of Empire crowded on Empire, which spreads far into the haze of distance,
from the foot of this colossal cliff;
Look! All these will I give thee, if
thou wilt fall down and worship me!
Jesus bends from that awful cliff and gazes in mute wonder upon that
scene. Ah, who may describe that spectable, what power of imagery
depict the majestic drapery of glory which floated around that boundless
view?
There, rising into golden sunlight, were cities, glittering with
innumerable
spires, grand with swelling domes, rank after rank, they grew into space,
and shone with the glory of all ages. Yes, the glory of the past, the glory
of the present, the glory of the future were there! Nineveh of old, rising
from a boundless plain, scattered with palms, her giant walls looming in
the light, her solitary temple towering over her wilderness of domes
Nineveh was there! And there the Romes of all ages swelling in
contrasted
glory. Imperial Romebehold her! Magnificent with colosseum
and theatre, her streets crowded with the victorious legions, her white
temples
encircled by the smoke of incense, her unconquered banner S. P. Q. R.
floating over the heads of kneeling millionsImperial Rome, clad in the
drapery of the Csars, was there.
By her side arose another Rome; the Papal Rome of after years, with
her immense cathedral breaking into space, over the ruins of the ancient
city, while solemn Pontiffs, carried in gorgeous canopies, on the shoulders
of liveried guards, through the long files of kneeling worshippers, pointed to
the Cross, the Image and the Sword, and waved their heavy robes, rich
with lace and gold and jewels, as they swelled the anthem to the praise of
Rome, Papal Rome, the mistress of the souls of men!
Jesus beheld it all.
Renounce thy mission, forsake the Voice which now calls thee forth, to
serve this creature Man, who will afterwards trample on thee, and lo!
Behold thy rewardall these, and more than these will I give thee, if
thou wilt fall down and worship me!
Then from the unbounded field of space, high over Rome the Imperial,
Rome the Papal, high over Babylon the great, yes, above gorgeous empires,
whose names have been lost in the abyss of ages, there rose another Empire,
terrible to behold in her bloody beauty.
She rose there, towering into light; an immense sea seemed to shut her
cities in its girdle of blood-red waves.
The white sails of her ships were on that sea, the tread of armed
warriors
,
crowding in millions, was heard in her palace gates, along her marts
of commerce, nay, in her temples of religion! She had grown strong with
the might of ages. Mightier than Imperial Rome, her dominion ended only
with the setting sun, her banners were fanned by every breeze that swept
the earth, the ice-wind of the north, the hot blast of the tropics, the summer
gales of more lovely climes.
She was terrible to behold that unknown empire, for her temples were
built upon the skulls of millions, her power was fed on human flesh, her
Red Cross Flag was painted with the blood of martyrs, moistened with the
tears of the widow, fanned by the sighs of the orphan!
Dismal in her lurid grandeur, she towered there, above all other nations,
claiming their reverence, nay, her loftiest dome pierced the sky, blazing
with texts from the Book of God, as though she would excuse her crimes in
the face of Divinity himself, glossing Murder over, with a soft word, and
sanctifying Blasphemy with a prayer!
O, it was a terrible picture, drawn by the hand of Satan, there on the
golden haze of infinite space.
These, these will I give thee, if thou wilt fall down and worship me!
Only renounce the Voice which calls thee forth to the relief of suffering
Man, only forsake this dream of Gooda beautiful Dream it may be, yet
still only a dreamwhich tells thee that thou canst lift up the toiling
Millions of the human race, and the glory of all ages, the grandeur of all
empires shall be thine!
As the Tempter speaks in that soft persuasive voice, fluttering his
jewelled
robes as he prayed this Jesus of Nazareth, clad in his humble garb, to
descend into the herd of Conquerors and Kings, to become like them a
drinker of human blood, a butcher of human hearts, let us look upon the
face of the
Tempted one
.
Lo! At that moment, as if the light of God's presence shone more
serenely in his soul, this Man of Nazareth stands there, with a lofty scorn
upon his brow, an immortal glory in his eyes.
Solemnly he lifts his hand, his voice swells on the air:
Get thee hence Satan
, he exclaims in that voice of deep-toned music,
50
now terrible in its accent of reproof,
For it is written thou shalt
worship
Jehovah thy God, and him only shalt thou serve
!
It is written not only in the Page of Revelation, but here upon the heart,
thou shalt not worship Gold nor Superstition, nor tinselled Hypocrisy;
thou shalt not bow down to Pomp, whose robes are stained in blood, nor
reverence Power, whose throne is built on skulls, but thou shalt worship
Jehovah the Father. To do good to Man is to worship God.
Ahblasted on the brow, trembling in each limb, the abashed
Devil
attired as he is, in all the pomp of the worldcrawls from the presence of
that humbly clad Jesus of Nazareth.
My friends shall we leave this beautiful passage in the life of Jesus,
without
listening to its moral, without taking to our hearts the great truth which
it teaches?
To you, O, Man of Genius, to you, O, Student, to you O, Seeker after
the Beautiful, it speaks in a voice of strange, solemn emphasis:
There will come a time in your life, when like Jesus, you will be led up
from the wilderness of neglect and want, by the Prince of this world, into
the eminence of Trial. You will have the good things of this world spread
out before you, you will hear the voice of the Tempter:
Crush the voice that is now speaking to your soulthat voice which
bids you go out and speak boldly and act bravely for the rights of man
drown every honest thoughttrample on every high aspiration, and
Lo! These shall be thine! The praise of men, the flattery of
sycophants
,
the pleasure of rich men's feasts and the hum of mob applause!
These shall be thine, if thou wilt fall down and worship me!
Does he not speak thus to you, O, Student, this purple-robed tempter,
with his soft persuasive voice?
Do you tell him, in tones of scorn, like your Jesus before you:
Get thee
hence! I will obey the voice which impels me to speak out for ManI
will go on my dread way, my only object the Welfare of the Millions! I
will worship the Lord Jehovah!
Then the Prince of this World, tells you with a sneer
Go on! Go on
with your imaginary schemes for the good of man, and yonder in the
distance the Cross awaits you! Go on! and behold your reward for this
honesty of purpose, as you call it! You will be despised in the
synagogue
,
stoned in the mart, spit upon in the halls of the great, crucified to
public scorn, as a robber and a murderer!
So spake the Tempter to the Man of the Revolution, the signers of the
Declaration. Is it not true?
Does not the Tempter in this our day, appeal to the most bestial emotion
of the human heart
Fear
?
Yes, the truth must be told, it was the curse of public opinion in the day
of '76,as it is nowthat shivering dread of the pompous Name, or the
infalliable Synagoguein press and church and homealike it rulesthat
crawling obeisance to creed and council, best syllabled in one emphatic
word
Fear
.
Let but the Reformer of our time, who feels that God has given him
powers for the good of his brethren, dare to be honest, dare to speak out
boldly in his own way, against hideous evils, which glared in his face
Behold his reward! Scorn, hissed from serpent-tongues, malice howled
from slanderous throats, the portentous bray of a Public Opinion, made up
by men whose character and name, would not stand in the light of a
farthing
candle.
Does the Author in the pages of a book, dare to picture the character of
some lecherous Pharisee, who has crawled up into a pulpit, clothing his
deformities with sacerdotal robes? Beholdevery lecherous Pharisee who
may possess a pulpit, or mouth the holy name of Jesus for his thousand
per year, assails that Reformer from his cowardly eminence,
excommunicates
him from the synagogue, with bell, book, and candle, and more terrible
than all, stamps on his brow, the portentous word
Infidel
!
Or does that Author with the honest impulse of a full heart, dare to drag
up from the obscurity of undeserved scorn, some great name of the Past,
and render justice to martyred intellect, which in days by-gone, shone into
the hearts of millions with holy and refreshing light, then the vengeance of
these worshippers of the Prince of the World, knows no bounds. The
Pharisaical pulpit, the obscene Press, work hand in hand to accomplish
that young man's ruin. No lie is too base, no slander too gross, no epithet
too malignant for the purpose of these atoms of an hour. If they cannot
charge the patriot with Crime, they charge him with Poverty. If they
cannot
say that he is an Adulterer in holy robes, or a Scurvy Politician,
feeding
on the drippings of office, or a Forger clothing himself with the fruits
of fraud, they wreak their vengeance in one word, and say, as their
proto-types
of old said of the Lord Jesus;
He is poor
!
Thus in the Revolution, spoke the liveried and gowned pensioners of
King George, against the Signers and their partners in the work of freedom.
The British pulpit, and the British Press, joined their voices and spoke of
the
Infidel
Jefferson who denied the divine right of Kings; the Traitor
Washington who at the head of his Ragmuffin Mob in poverty and
rebellion, held the huts of Valley Forge.
Far be it from me, my friends, to say one word against that pure Minister
of the Gospel, who follows reverently in the footsteps of his Lord. Far be
it from me to whisper a breath against that high-souled Editor, who never
prostitutes his press to the appetites of the malignant and obscene. Such a
Minister, such an Editor I hold in reverence; they are worthy of our
respect and honor.
Yet we cannot disguise the fact, that there exists now as in the
time of the Revolution, a band of creatures calling themselves Ministers, a
congregation of reptiles who assume the position of Directors of Public
Opinion, while in their microscopic souls they have no more sense of a pure
Religion, than the poor wretch who sold his Master, for thirty pieces of silver.
Who made these fellows Ministers of Almighty God? Who clothed
them with all the solemn gravity of the portentous nod, the white cravat,
and the nasal twang? Who lifted them from their obscurity into Priests
of the Altar, qualified to minister the holy rites of the sacrament, admonish
the living, bury the dead? Who!
We do not wish to investigate their title, for our search might end on the
same rock where the Prince of this World tempted the Lord Jesus.
Then my friends, there is species of the genus reptile, calling himself
an Editor, who merits a passing word. The servile tool of some corrupt
politician, paid to libel at so much per line, he is always the first to fear the
cause of Religion. Reeking with the foul atmosphere of the brothel, he is
the first to shudder for the danger of public morals. Fresh from the boon
companionship of lewd fellows of the baser sort, he is a virulent moral
lecturer. Were this creature alone in his work of infamy, not much fear
need be taken on his account. Like the rattlesnake he can but leap his
own slimy length. Yet a hundred reptiles together, hissing and stinging in
chorus may appal the stoutest heart, so does this Reptile Editor join himself
to other reptiles, and form an association of venom which poisons the
life-springs
of many a noble soul, and distils its saliva even in the fountains of
home. This viper of the Press is not peculiar to our dayhe hissed and
stung, in the time when our freedom was but dawning from the long night
of ages. The Tory Press of the Revolution, from Rivington of the New
York Royal Gazette, down to his less notorious compeers of the
Philadelphia
loyalist Press, in their malignant attacks upon Washington, did not
even spare his private life. Forged letters were published day after day,
in their papers, signed with the name of Washington, in which the very
heart-strings of the chieftain were torn, by the leprous hand of Editorial
pestilence! The Father of his Country avoided these things, the Reptile
Editor and the Reptile Preacher, as he would have shunned a rabid dog.
He turned their path, as you would from the path of a viper. Had the
generous indignation of his soul found vent in words, he might have said
like the Saviour to their Judean proto-types
O! Scribes, Pharisees, Hypocrites, how shall ye escape the damnation
of hell!
With the vengeance, or rather the venom of men like these, Jesus was
assailed in his day, because he refused to worship their master. So
Washington
was assailed because he refused obedience to the King. Think not
my friends, to escape the trial of your Saviour, if you follow in his footsteps.
Think not, be honest and bold in your actions and your words, without
feeling the fang of the viper in your soul. But in the darkest hour of your
life, when slander poisons your soul, and persecution blasts your frame, then
remember these blessed words:
Then the devil leaveth him, and behold! Angels came and ministered
unto him.
Yes, after hunger and thirst and temptation, behold the Blessed Jesus,
sitting on yonder granite rock, while forms of beauty group about him, their
beaming eyes fixed upon his divine countenance. Forms of beauty, yes
the most beautiful of formsall that is pure in woman, lovely in the bloom
of her face, beaming in the glance of her eye, rounded and flowing in the
outlines of her shape,bend there before the Saviour, in the guise of Angels!
Lo! one radiant form with floating tresses of golden hair brings the cup
of water; another, with those eyes of unutterable beauty presents the wild
honey-comb, the purple grapes, the fragrant fruit of the fig-tree, a third,
gliding
around him, with steps that make no sound, soothes his brow with the
pressure of soft, white hands.
Behold, angels ministered unto Him!
It is before me now, that beautiful picture, created in the wild desert, with
the background of the Dead Sea; Jesus sitting calm and serene on the
rugged rock, while angel-forms kneel at his feet, bend over his shoulders,
smile in his face, group in shapes of matchless loveliness around him.
Hark, that song? was ever hymn so soft and dreamy, heard in this desert
wild before? It swells over the dark mass of rocks, it glides along the
sullen waters of the lake, it bursts up to the morning sky in one choral
murmur of praise.
Angels cheer the Lord Jesus with their hymns.
So, O, man of genius, O, Student, O, Seeker after the beautiful, shall
angels cheer thee, and bless thee, and sing to thee; after thou hast passed
the fiery ordeal of hunger, thirst, neglect and temptation. From the book
of God, Jesus speaks to thee, and his word is given; it shall be.Behold
Washington and Jefferson, with all the heroes and signers, rise triumphant
through all time, over the Tempter and Pharisees of the Revolution!
VI.THE OUTCAST.
We
will now behold another scene in the Divine Master's life. To the
very rock of Nazareth, we will trace the truths of the immortal Declaration.
The scene changes yet once more. We are in Nazareth, that city built
on a cliff, with the white walls of its synagogue arising in the calm blue
sky, above the mansions of the rich, the cottages of the poor. Let us still
our hearts with awe, let us hush our breath with deep reverence, for it is the
Sabbath
, and we are in the
Synagogue
.
Yonder from the dome overhead, a dim, solemn light steals round the
place, while a sacred silence pervades the air.
Four pillars support that dome, four pillars inscribed with burning words
from the book of God.
In the centre of the place behold the ark, in which is placed the holy
scroll of the law. Beside the ark a small desk arises where the reader of
the Synagogue may stand and utter the Sabbath prayers. Around this ark
and desk, from the light of the dome to the darker corners of the place,
throng the people of Nazareth sitting on benches which encircle the centre
of the temple. Yonder, behind the ark and desk, on loftier benches are
the elders, their white beards trailing on each breast, the flowing robes
wound about each portly form, the broad phylactery on each wrinkled brow.
These are the rich men that rule the synagogue.
In the dark corners, you see the gaunt faces, the ragged forms of the poor,
who have skulked into the temple, ashamed of their poverty, yet eager to
hear the word of the Lord. Around the altar are seated all classes of life,
the merchant with his calculating face, the mechanic with his toil-worn
hands, the laborer with his sunburnt visage.
But here, on the right of the altar, amid that throng of women, beheld a
matron seated in front of the rest, her form, with its full outlines, indicating
the prime of womanhood, just touched, not injured by age, while her serene
face, relieved by brown hair, silvered with grey, is lighted by large blue
eyes. There are wrinkles on that brow, yet when you gaze in those
earnest
eyes, you forget them all.
This is
Mary
the mother of Jesus. The sunbeam stealing from yonder
dome, light up her serene face, and reveals that smile, so soft, and sad, and
tender.
Her son is to preach to day in the Synagogue; his fame is beginning to
stir the world. The mother awaits his appearance with a quiet joy, while
yonder, in that toil-wrung man with the grey hair and sunburnt face, who
leans upon his staff with clasped hands, you behold Joseph the Carpenter.
A deep silence pervails in the temple.
Yonder, in front of the elders is seated the Minister (or Reader) of the
Synagogue, venerable in his beard, broad in his phylactery, with the scroll
of the law in his hand. He has just finished the prayers of the Sabbath;
and all is silent expectation. They wait for the appearance of this Jesus,
who the other day, was toiling with his father, at the carpenter's bench.
Now
, it is said he has become an eloquent Preacher; his name is bruited
on every wind; it is even said that he worked miracles yonder in Galilee.
He
, Jesus, the carpenter's son!
A murmur deepens through the synagogue. Eyes are cast toward the
door; faces turned over the shoulder; whispers resound on every side.
The mother yonder rises from her seat; how her blue eye fires! The
father lifts his head from his staff; a flush warms his wrinkled brow.
He comes! Yes, his rude garments, travel-worn, his long hair floating
to his shoulders, embrowned by the roadside dust, he comes, the object of
every eye, walking through the agitated crowd towards the altar.
The poor, yes the ragged, toil-trodden poor, bend over the shoulders of
the rich, eager to catch the gleam of those mild deep eyes, the silent
eloquence
of that white brow, the love of those smiling lips. For it is said,
this Jesus has dared to espouse the cause of the poor, even against the
pomp of broad phylacteries and venerable beards. So the rumor runs.
Jesus advances; one glance to that Dear Mother, and their eyes kindle
in the same blaze, one reverent inclination to that Father, and he passes into
the desk.
Every eye beholds him!
Do you not see him also, standing calm and erect, as his large earnest
eyes slowly pass from face to face, while his countenance already glows
with inward emotion? He is there before me, one hand laid upon the
unopened
scroll, while the other rises in an earnest gesture.
The silence grows deeper.
He opens the scroll; it is the book of the Prophet Isaiah, that Poet and
Seer, whose burning words are worth all your Virgils and Homers, were
their beauties multiplied by thousands.
Hark, that voice, how it rings through the temple:
The Spirit of Jehovah is upon me!
' he exclaims, as he stands there,
glowing with Divinity;
He hath anointed me to preach good tidings to
the Poor!
A deep murmur fills the synagogue. The Elders bend forward in
wonder, the Poor start up from their dark corners with a silent rapture.
Mary clasps her hands and looks into the face of her Son. Still that bold,
earnest voice rings on the Sabbath air.
He
hath sent me to heal the broken-hearted, to preach deliverance to
the captive, sight to the blind, liberty to them that are bruised!
Then while the murmur deepens, while the Elders start from their seats,
and the Poor come hurrying forward, do you see that frame dilate, that eye
burn, as his voice swells again through the temple,
To preach the acceptable Year of the Lord
.
Yes, freedom to the slave, hope to the Poor, the Great Millenium of God
when Beauty shall dwell on earth foreverto all the Sons of Men!
Then while wonder and indignation and rapture and scorn thrill round
the temple, this Jesus closes the book and from that desk, proclaims
himself
the ANOINTED ONE of God, the Redeemer of the Poor!
Ah, what eloquence, what soul, what fire! How he pictures the
degradation
of Man, now crouching under the foot of Priest and King, how he
thunders indignant scorn into the face of Pharisee and scribe, how, stretching
forth his arms, while his chest heaves and his eye burns, he proclaims the
coming of that blessed day, when Man shall indeed be free!
He stood there, not like an humble pleader for the right, but with the
tone and look and gesture of Divinity, who exclaims, Let there be light and
light there was!
Yet look! Those bearded men with broad phylacteries, have started
from their seats; they encircle him with flushed faces and eyes gleaming
scorn.
I see the most reverend of them all, stand there, with the sneer
deepening
over his face, while his straightened finger points to the face of Jesus
Look
! he cried, turning to his brethren,
Is not this Joseph the
Carpenter's
son?
Is not this the man of toil, who, the other day was working at a rude
bench? Behold his mothera poor woman! Behold his fathera
carpenter
?
Does he come to teach us, the Elders of the synagogue, broad in
our phylacteries, flowing in our robes, voluminous in our prayers?
But the Poor press forward too, and one rude son of toil kneels there
before him, pressing the hem of his gaberdine, while his eyes are lifted to
his face. Maryah, let us pity the poor Mother now!for starting to her
feet, she clasps her hands, while her lips part and her eye dilates as she
awaits the end.
Joseph has buried his head upon his bosom.
Jesus rises supreme above them all. Yes, unawed by the scowling
brows, unmoved by the words of scorn, he spreads forth his arms, his
voice rings on the air once more!
A Prophet is not without honor save in his own country and his own
house!
These words have scarce passed his lips, when the uproar deepens into
violence.
Forth with him! the cry yells through the synagogue, Forth with him,
blasphemer! Forth with him from the synagogue and the city! To the
rock, to the rock with the
Infidel
!
With one accord they hurl him from the desk, they, the venerable elders,
with the broad phylacteries. Rude hands grasp him, demoniac voices yell
in his ear. At this moment, even as they drag him from the desk, a little
child, with flowing hair and dilating eyes, affrighted by the clamor, steals
up to Jesus, seizing his robe with its tiny hands. His face, alone calm and
smiling in the uproar, seems to promise shelter to the startle child.
Through the passage of the synagogue they drag him, and now he is in
the open air, with the Sabbath sun pouring upon his uncovered brow. Along
the streets, from the city, over the flinty stonesto the rock with the
blasphemer!
The city is built upon a rock, which yawns over an abyss. Plunged
from this rock, dashed into atoms on the stones below, this blasphemer shall
blaspheme no more!
All the while, poor Mary, weeping, trembling, clasping her hands in
anguish
,
follows the crowd, imploring mercy for her son. Do you see the
finger of scorn pointed at her face, the brutal sneer levelled at her heart?
Joseph humbled and abashed, has gone quietly away, perhaps to his
carpenter
shop, to weep that this bold Jesus ever dared to beard the Synagogue.
Out from the city with shouts and yells and curses! Out along the
flinty pathbehold the crowd attains the rock.
Surrounded by these forms, trembling with passion, these faces scowling
with rage, Jesus looks calmly over the abyss, while a rough hand pinions
each arm. It is an awful sight, that steep wall of rock, rising from the
ravine below. Even the elders, who hold this Carpenter's son on the verge
of the rock, start back affrighted. The dizzy heighth appals their souls.
The shouts, cries, curses, deepen. Man never looks so much like a
brute, as when engaged in an act of violence, but when this act is mob
violence
,
where many join to crush a solitary victim, then man looks like a
brute and devil combined.
There is not one face of pity in that frenzied crowd. From afar some
few poor men, slaves of the rich and afraid to brook their anger, gaze upon
the crowd with looks of sympathy for Jesus stamped upon their rude faces.
Mary too, do you not see her kneeling there, some few paces from the
crowd, her hands uplifted, while her brown hair, slightly touched with grey,
floats wildly to the breeze. She has sunken down, exhausted by the
conflict
of emotions, even yet she shrieks for mercy, mercy for this Jesus,
her Son!
Jesus looks over the dizzy rock.
Nearer they urge him to its verge, nearer and nearer; ahhe is on the
edgeanother inch and he is gonehark! his foot brushes the earth from
the brink; you hear it crumbling as he stands there, looking into the abyss,
At this moment, pinioned by rude arms, he turns his face over his
shoulder
;
he gazes upon that crowd.
O, the immortal scorn, the withering pity of that gaze! His brow glows,
his eyes fire, his lips wreathe in a calm smile.
As one man the crowd shrink back, they cannot face the lustre of those
eyes. Beholdthe Pharisees who grasp the arm of Jesus, fall on their
knees with their faces to the flint. That radiant brow strikes terror to their
souls.
In a moment he is free, free upon the edge of the cliff, the glory of
Divinity
radiating in flashes of light around that white brow, while the rough
carpenter's robes seem to change into new garments, flowing as the morning
mist, luminous as sunshine. Even his long hair, falling to his shoulders,
seems to wave in flakes of light.
Give way ye Pharisees, give way ye bearded Elders, give way ye makers
of long prayers, with your flowing robes and broad phylacteries, for Jesus
the Carpenter's son would pass through your midst!
And he comes on from the verge of the cliff, even through their midst.
Jesus comes in silent grandeur.
Where are these men who shouted InfidelDogBlasphemera
moment
ago? Crouching on the earth, their faces to the flint, their flowing
robes thrown over their heads, there they are, these solemn men, with
venerable
beards and broad phylacteries.
Jesus passes on.
51
Silently, his beautiful countenance beaming with immortal love, his arms
folded on his breast, he passes on.
Yes, it is written in the book of God;
He passing from the midst of
them, went his way
.
He is gone from their city. They raise their affrighted faces, while
malice rankles in their hearts, and follow his form with flashing eyes.
Mary gazes upon him, also, weeping bitterly for
Jesus, her Outcast son
,
now a wanderer and exile from the home of his childhood.
Can you imagine a picture like this?
Yonder on the summit of a hill, the last which commands a view of
Nazareth, its synagogue and rock, just where the roadside turns and follows
the windings of a shadowy valley, stands
Jesus
, resting his clasped hands
on his staff, while his eyes are fixed upon the distant city.
Who may picture the untold bitterness of that gaze?
It is home, the town in which he was reared, beneath the fond light of a
Mother's eyes. There is the carpenter shop in which he toiled; there the
walks of his solitary hours, nay, the temple in which he was wont to kneel
in prayer.
And now, with scorn and curses and rude hands, they have thrust him
forth, AN OUTCAST from his home.
It was his earnest, yearning desire to do good in that town; to reveal
his high mission there; to proclaim the great year of Jehovah, to the people
of his childhood's home.
And now he stands there, gazing upon the town, while the mark of their
rude grasp yet reddens on his arms, while the words, Blasphemer, Infidel,
Dog, yet echo in his ears.
He is an
Outcast
, this
Jesus the Carpenter's son
.
O, if there is one drop in the cup of persecution more bitter than another,
it is the galling thought of neglect and wrong which sinks into the heart of
that Man, who has been driven forth like a venomous snake, from his
childhood's
home, even in the moment when his soul burned brightest with its
love for God and Man!
Welcome indeed is the grasp of a friend in a foreign land, but dark and
terrible is the blow which hurls us from the threshhold of our HOME!
God in all his dispensations of affliction, with which he visits us for our
good, has no darker trial than this!
My friends, I confess from the fulness of my heart, as I behold the
solemn lesson which this passage in our Saviour's life, has for the man of
genius, the student, the seeker after the beautiful, I am wrapt in wonder, in
pity, in awe, that one man of intellect ever doubted the truth of this
Revelation
.
Behold the lesson!
Here on this rock of the hill-top, stands Jesus the Outcast, gazing on his
childhood's home. Godly Pharisees have thrust him forth; sanctimonious
Elders have hissed the words, Infidel, dog, blasphemer in his ears!
The day will come, when the beards and phylacteries of these men will
have crumbled in the same forgotten grave, where their flesh and bones rot
into dust. Their paltry town will be the abiding place of the Gentile and
the scoffer; their religion crushed beneath the horse's hoofs of invading
legions.
That town will claim a name in history, only because it was once the
Home of Jesus. That religion be remembered only, because it prepared
the way for the Religion of Jesus. Yes, the name of the Outcast, who now
stands upon this hill, gazing upon the distant town, will one day cover the
whole earth; it will throb in the heart of Universal Man, like the Presence
of a God!
Who will remember the Pharisees, who record the names of the Elders?
Into what dim old grave shall we look for their dust?
Where are the hands that smote the Lord Jesus, where the tongues that
hissed Blasphemer! in his ears?
Eighteen centuries have passed, and the name of this Jesuswhere
does it not shine?
Shouted on the scaffold, with the last gasp of martyrs, whose flesh was
crumbling to cinder, breathed by the patriot, dying on the battlefield for the
rights of man, echoed by millions of worshippers, who send it up to Heaven,
with prayer and incense, every hour of the day, every moment of the hour,
that NAME has dared the perils of untrodden deserts, ascended hideous
mountains, traversed unknown seas, encompassed the globe with its glory.
It has done more than allit has survived the abuses with which
Pharisees
and Hypocrites, like their fathers of old, have not hesitated to darken
its light, through the long course of eighteen hundred years.
Even the fang of the Dishonest Priest has failed to tear that name from
the heart of
Man
.
Even long and bloody
religious
wars, crowding the earth with the bodies
of the dead, darkening the heaven with their blood-red smoke, have not
effaced this name of Jesus!
Not even the fires of Smithfield, nor that Hell revealed on earth, the
Inquisition
,
nor that cold-blooded murder, done by a remorseless Bigot, in the
open square of Geneva, the victim a weak and unoffending man, nor a
thousand such fires, inquisitions and murders, all working their barbarities
in this Holy Name, have been able to drag it from the altar where it shines,
the only hope of Man.
Still the Name of Jesus lives; who shall number the hearts in which it
throbs, with every pulsation of love and joy and hope? Who shall number
the sands on the shore, or count the beams of the sun?
And when that blessed day shall comeand come it will, as sure as
Jehovah lives!When Kings and Priests shall be hurled from their thrones
of wrong and superstition, when Labor shall be no longer trodden down, by
the feet of task-masters, when every man who toils shall receive his equal
portion of the fruits of the earth, when a church gorgeously appareled in
all the splendor of lofty temples, uncounted revenues, hosts of pensioned
ministers shall be demanded no more, when this Earth shall indeed be the
Garden of God, and men indeed be Brothers
Then crowning the great work with its awful and blessed benediction,
one name shall swell to the sky, echoed by the voices of innumerable
Millions
,
the name of Him whom Pharisees and Elders thrust ignominiously
forth, from the synagogue of Nazareth, the Friend of the Poor, the God of
Washington and the signersthe name of
Jesus
.
VII.THE HOPE OF EIGHTEEN HUNDRED YEARS.
Now
let us see how the Great Hope of the Redeemer's Life was fulfilled,
after the lapse of some eighteen hundred years!
We will come down to the year 1775we will make a rapid journey
over the earth
Saviour of the world where are thy People, where are the millions for
whom thou didst suffer, and bleed, and die?
Let us look over Europewhat see we there?
Magnificent templescrowds of Priestsrivers of blood!
But thy millions, Saviour of the Worldwhere are they? The children
of Toilthose who wear the Mechanic's garbthose for whom thou
didst weep such bitter tears, in the Ages long agowhere are they?
In the deep minesin the hot fieldsin the hotter workshopsbending
beneath heavy burdenscrouching beneath the lashthese, these are thy
People, O Redeemer of the World!
And was it for this, that the tears of Gethsemane fellthe groans of
Calvary arose?
Was it to build these templesto rear these thronesto crush these
toiling
millions into dust?
Here, in Rome where St. Paul spoke forth words that made
Emperors
tremble for their throneshere you see nothing but lordly priests
walking on to power, over a strange highwaythe necks of a kneeling and
down-trodden People!
But this is RomebenightedPagan Romelet us go to liberal
enlightened
,
Protestant Europe!
Go to Germanygo to the scene of the Reformationwhat see you
there?
Why the tears of persecuted Innocence rain down upon the very grave
of Martin Lutheryes, the sweat, the blood of the millions sink into the
Great Reformer's grave, and drench his bones!
But ah, this is Germanydoubtless Protestant Persecution rages here,
and dyes the land in bloodbut still there is a hope for the human race!
Let us pass by benighted France, with its Monarch, its Priests, its slaves
its throneits templesits huts and its Bastilelet us go over the
channel to Christian England!
Here Saviour of the world, here thy Religion has found a homefor is
not the broad Isle crowded with churchesis there an hour in the day
unsanctified
by a Prayer?
It is true, for every church there is a factory, a poor-house, or a jailit
is true for every prayer that ascends to heaven, a miserable convict is
pitched from some gibbet into Eternityit is true, that if every groan
wrung from the Poor Man's heart, could harden into a pebble, then might
these Priests build them a church, as large as ten thousand St. Pauls heaped
on each other
But is not this enlightened, liberal, Protestant, Reformed England!
Look, in yonder palace of Windsor, sits a man with a glassy unmeaning
eyea drivelling lipa man buried in robes of Purple, a crown on his
receding
brow, a sceptre in his gouty hand!
And this is Thy Representative, O, Man of Nazareth! This is the
Head of the ChurchDefender of the Faiththis, this is the British
Pope!
Yes, this is the Defender of the Faith!And let us look at this faith
so kind, so merciful, so beautiful!
So anxious is Pope George to defend the Faith, that even now he is
gathering Missionaries, who will carry this faith across three thousand
miles of ocean!
Go there to the barracksthe dockyardsgo there and find his
missionaries
,
preparing for their high duties with bayonets in their hands!
A goodly band of Missionaries! Looktheir numbers are swelled by
convicts from the jailnay even the Murderer on the gibbet comes down
takes the rope from his neekputs a red coat
on
his back, a musquet on
his shoulderand stands fortha Holy Missionary of Pope George!
And whom are these Missionaries to convert?
Blessed Redeemer look yonder, far over the waters! Look yonder,
upon that New World, where the Outcasts of the old world have built a
Home, a Nation, a Religion! That Home a refuge for the oppressed of
all the earththat nation a Brotherhood founded by the Men of Plymouth
rockby the Catholic of Baltimoreby the Quaker of the Delaware!
That Religion, Hope to Man! Hope to Toil! Hope to Misery in its
hutDespair in its cell!
And now after this nationthis homethis religonhave built the altar
of the rights of man in the wildernessbehold George the Pope of
England
is sending his missionaries far over the waters to the New World, to
butcher its men, to dishonor its women, to drench its soil in blood!
Already the brothers of these missionaries have begun their work
already they have endeavored to teach their mild persuasive doctrines to the
people of the new worldbut these heathens reject the British
Missionaries
yes,
on Bunker Hill, Concord, Lexington, the heathens of the new
world, trample the flag of England into dustand bury that flag beneath
the dead bodies of these Missionaries of the British Pope!
And while these new crowds of Missionaries are leaving the shores of
England, look yonder I pray you, and behold that solitary man, short in
stature, clad in a plain brown coatsee him embark on shipboard, behold
him leave the shores of England.
Do you know that yonder solitary man in the brown coat, is destined
to do more harm to the British Pope, than centuries will repair? Did
George of Hanover but know, what great thoughts are stirring in the
brain of this little man, as leaning over the side of the receding ship, he
gazes back upon the white cliffs of Albionhe would tear his royal robes
for very spite, nay offer the little man an earldom, a title, wealth, baubles,
power, rather than he should depart from the English shore with such great
thoughts working in his great soul.
Let us follow this unknown man in the brown coat.
We are in Philadelphia in 1775it is the time when a body of rebels
who impudently style themselves, the Continental Congress, hold their
sessions, on yonder edifice somewhat retired from Chesnut Street, called
Carpenter's Hall.
You may have seen this building? It still is standing thereyes, up a
dark alley in Chesnut Street, between Third and Fourth it stands, the hall of
the
first
Continental Congress, now used as the sale room of an auctioneer!
We have a great love for antiquities in Philadelphiawe reverence the
altars of the past, for lest any lying foreigner should charge us with the
deseretion
of holy places, we tear down the old house of William Penn, sell
chairs and clocks and ponies in Carpenter's Hall, and degrade Independence
Hall, that altar of the world, into a nest for squabbling lawyers!
VIII.COUNCIL OF FREEMEN.
It
was in the time when a band of rebels sate in Carpenter's Hallwhen
the smoke of Lexington and Bunker Hill, was yet in the sky, and the
undried
blood of Warren and the martyrs, was yet upon the groundthat a
scene of some interest took place, in a quiet room, in the city of William
Penn.
Look yonder, and behold that solitary lamp, flinging its dim light around
a neatly furnished room.
Grouped around that table, the full warmth of the light, pouring full in
their faces, are five personsa Boston Lawyer, a Philadelphia Printer, a
Philadelphia Doctor, and a Virginia Farmer.
Come with me there to that lonely roomlet us seat ourselves there
let us look into the faces of these menthe one with the bold brow and
resolute look, is one John Adams from Boston; next to him sits the
calm-faced
Benjamin Rushthen you see the marked face of the Printer, one
Benjamin Franklin, and your eye rests upon a man, distinguished above all
others by his height, the noble outlines of his form, the calm dignity of his
forehead, the quiet majesty of his look. That man is named Washington
one Mr. George Washington, from Mount Vernon.
These men are all members of the Rebel Congress; they have met here
to night to talk over the affairs of their country. Their talk is deep-toned
cautioushurried. Every man seems afraid to give free utterance to the
thoughts of his bosom.
They talk of Bunker Hillof Lexingtonof the blood-thirsty British
Ministryof the blood-thirsty British King!
Then, from the lips of Franklin comes the great questionWhere is this
War to end? Are we fighting only for a change in the British Ministry,
ororfor the Independence of our land?
There is silence in that room.
Washington, Adams, Rushall look into each other's facesand are
silent!
Bound to England by ties of ancestrylanguagereligionthe very
idea of separation from Her, seems a Blasphemy!
Yes, with their towns burnt, their people murderedBunker Hill smoking
there, and Lexington bleeding yonderstill, still, these Colonists cling to
the name of England, still shudder at that big word, that chokes their throats
to speakIndependence.
At this moment, while all is still, a visitor is announcedlook there! As
that unknown man in the brown coat entersis introduced by Franklintakes
his seat at the tableis informed of the topic in discussionlook there upon
his brow, his flashing eye, as in earnest words he speaks forth his soul!
Washington, Rush, Franklin, Adams, all are hushed into silence! At
first the little man in the brown coat startleshorrifies them with his
political blasphemy!
But as he goes on, as his broad, solid brow warms with fire, as his eye
flashes the full light of a soul roused into all its life, as those deep earnest
tones speak of the Independence of Americaher glorious futureher
destiny
,
that shall stride on over the wrecks of thrones, to the Universal Empire
of Western Continent, then behold!
They start from around the tablethey press that stranger in the brown
coat, by the handthey beg him for God's sake, to write these words in a
book,a book that shall be read in all the homes, thundered from all the
pulpits of America!
Do you see that picture, my friends?
That little man in the brown coat, standing there, flushed, trembling with
the excitement of his own thoughts; the splendidly formed Virginia
planter on one side, grasping him by the hand; those great-souled men
encircling him on the other side, John Adams the Lawyer, Benjamin Rush
the Doctor, Benjamin Franklin the Printer.
Let this scene pass: let us follow this little man in the brown coat, thro'
the year 1775.
The day after this scene, that modest Virginia Planter, George
Washington
,
was named Commander-in-Chief of the Continental Armies.
IX.THE BATTLE OF THE PEN.
And
on the summer days of '75, that stranger in the brown coat, was
seen walking up and down, in front of the old State House, his great
forehead
shown in full sunlight, while with hands placed behind his back, he
went slowly along the pavement.
Then that humble man would stride to his lonely garret, seize the quill,
and scratch down the deep thoughts of his brain! Then forth again, for
a walk in the State House squareup and down under these old trees, he
wanders all the afternoonat night, there is a light burning in yonder
garret window, burning all night till break of day!
Let us look in that garret windowwhat see you there?
A rude and neglected rooma little man in a brown coat, sitting beside
an old table, with scattered sheets of paper all about himthe light of an
unsnuffed candle upon his browthat unfailing quill in his hand!
Ah, my friends, you may talk to me of the sublimity of your battles,
whose poetry is bones and skullsbut for me, there is no battle so awfully
sublime, as one like this, now being fought before our eyes.
A poor, neglected Author, sitting in his garret,the world, poverty, time,
and space, all gone from himas with a soul kindled into one steady blaze,
he plies that fast-moving quill. That quill puts down words on that paper,
words that shall burn into the brains of Kings, like arrows winged with fire,
and pointed with vitriol!
Go on brave Author, sitting in your garret alone, at this dead hourgo
onon through the silent hourson, and God's blessings fall like breezes
of June upon your damp browon, and on, for you are writing the Thoughts
of a Nation into Birth!
For many days, in that year '75, was that little man in a brown coat,
seen walking up and down the State House squarelook yonder! There
in you garret, night after night, burns that solitary lightburns and burns
on, till the break of day.
At last the work is done! At last grappling the loose sheets in his
trembling handstrembling, because feverish with the toil of the brain
that author goes forth. His book is written, it must now be printed
scattered to the Homes of America! But look yenot one printer will
touch the booknot a publisher but grows pale at the sight of those dingy
pages! Because it ridicules the British Poperidicules the British
Monarchy
because
it speaks out in plain words, that nothing now remains to
be done, but to declare the New World free and Independent!
This shocks the trembling printers; touch such a mass of treasonable
stuff
never!
But at last a printer is founda bold Scotchman, named
Robert Bellhe consents to put these loose pages into typeit is done;
and on the first of January, 1776,
Common Sense
burst on the People of
the new world! Bursts upon the hearts and homes of America, like a light
from heaven! That book is read by the Mechanic at his bench, the
Merchant
at his desk, the Preacher in his pulpit reads it, and scatters its great
truths with the teachings of Revelation!
It burst from the Presssays the great Doctor Rush,with an
effect which has rarely been produced by types or paper, in any age or
country!
That book of Common Sense said strange and wonderful things: listen
to it for a moment:
But where, say some, is the King of America? I'll tell you, friend, he
reigns above, and doth not make havoc of mankind, like the Royal Brute of
Britain! Yet that we may not appear to be defective in earthly honors, let
a day be solemnly set apart for proclaiming the Charter, let it be brought
forth, placed on the divine law, the Word of God; let a crown be placed
thereon, by which the world may know, that so far as we approve of
Monarchy
,
that in
America the law is King
. For as in absolute governments
the king is law, so in free countries the Law ought to be king, and there
ought to be no other. But lest any ill use should afterwards arise, let the
crown at the conclusion of the ceremony, be demolished, and scattered
among the People, whose
Right it is
!
Was not that bold language, from a little man in a brown coat, to a great
King, sitting there in his royal halls, at once the Tyrant and the Pope of
America?
Listen to COMMON SENSE again:
A greater absurdity cannot be conceived of, than three millions of
people, running to their sea coast, every time a ship arrives from London,
to know what portion of Liberty they should enjoy.
Or againhere is a paragraph for George of England to give to the
Archbishops of Canterbury, to be read in all churches after the customary
prayers for the Royal Family:
No man, says Common Sense, was a warmer wisher for a
reconciliation
,
than myself, before the fated 19th April, 1775,the day of the
Massacre of Lexingtonbut the moment the event of that day was made
known, I rejected the hardened, sullen-tempered Pharoah of England
52
forever; and disdain the wretch, that with the pretended title of Father
of his People, can unfeelingly hear of their slaughter, and composedly sleep
with their blood upon his soul.
Listen to the manner in which this great work concludes:
* * * Independence is the only bond that can tie us together. * * * * *
Let the names of Whig and Tory be extinct; and let none other be heard
among us, than those of a good citizen; an open and resolute friend: and
a virtuous supporter of the rights of Mankind, and of the Free and
Independent
States of America.
Need I tell you, my friends, that this work, displaying the most intimate
knowledge of the resources of Americathe nerve of her men, the oak of
her forests, the treasures of her mines,displaying an insight into the future
greatness of the American Navy, that was akin to Prophecy, need I tell
you, that this work, cutting into small pieces the cobwebs of Kingship and
Courtiershipthe pitiful absurdity of America being for one hour dependent
upon Britainstruck a light in every American bosomwas in fact the
great cause and forerunner of the Declaration of Independence!
And is there a heart here that does not throb with emotion, at the
name of the author of that Declaration, Thomas Jefferson, the
Statesman-Hero
?
And do your hearts throb at the mention of his name, and yet refuse to
pay the tribute of justice to the memory of his brother-patriot, his forerunner
in the work of freedom, the Author-Hero of the Revolution
Thomas
Paine
?
X.THE AUTHOR-SOLDIER.
Now let us follow this man in the brown coat, this Thomas Paine,
through the scenes of the Revolution.
In the full prime of early manhood, he joins the army of the Revolution;
he shares the crust and the cold, with Washington and his menhe is with
those brave soldiers on the toilsome marchwith them by the camp-fire
with them in the hour of battle!
And why is he with them?
Is the day darkhas the battle been bloodydo the American soldiers
despair? Hark! That printing press yonder, that printing press that
moves with the American host, in all its wanderingsis scattering pamphlets
through the ranks of the army!
Pamphlets written by the author-soldier, Thomas Paine, written
sometimes
on the head of a drumor by the midnight fire, or amid the corses
of the deadPamphlets that stamp great Hopes and greater Truths in Plain
words, upon the souls of the Continental Army!
Tell me, was not that a sublime sight, to see a man of Genius, who might
have shone as an Orator, a Poet, a Novelist, following with untiring
devotion
,
the footsteps of the Continental army?
Yes, in the dark days of '76, when the soldiers of Washington tracked
their footsteps on the soil of Trenton, in the snows of Princetonthere,
first among the heroes and patriots, there, unflinching in the hour of defeat,
writing his
Crisis
, by the light of the camp-fire, was the Author-Hero.
Thomas Paine
!
Yes, look yonderbehold the Crisis read by every Corporal in the army
of Washington, read to the listening group of soldierslook what joy, what
hope, what energy, gleams over those veteran faces, as words like these
break on their ears:
These are the times that try men's souls! The summer soldier and
the sunshine patriot, will in this CRISIS, shrink from the service of his
country
;
but he that stands it NOW, deserves the love and thanks of man and
woman. Tyranny like hell, is not easily conquered; yet we have this
consolation with us, that the harder the conflict, the more glorious the
triumph!
Do not words like these stir up the blood?
Yet can you imagine their effect, when read to groups of starved and
bleeding soldiers, by the dim watch-fire, in the cold air of the winter dawn?
Such words as these stirred up the starved Continentals to the attack on
Trenton, and there, in the dawn of glorious morning, George Washington,
standing sword in hand, over the dead body of the Hessian Ralle, confessed
the magic influence of the Author-Hero, Thomas Paine!
The lowest libeller that ever befouled a pen, a vulgar and infamous
fellow,we need not name himwho has written a Lie of some 347
pages, and called it, The Life of Thomas Paine, this libeller, who spits
his venom upon the memory of Franklin and Jeffersonin fact, combines,
in his own person, more of the dirty in falsehoodthe disgusting in
obscenity
the
atrocious in perjurythan any penster that ever wrote for
British Gold, at the dictation of a British Courtthis Biographer, I say,
who after the object of his spite was dead, sought out for something
eneffably
disgusting, with which to befoul the dead man's memory, and finding
nothing so foul as his own base soul, poured out that soul, in all its native
filth, upon the dead man's bonesthis creature, whom it were a libel upon
human nature to callManAtheist, Blasphemer, libeller of the dead as
he waseven He confessed, that the Pen of
Tom Paine
was as
formidable
to the British, as the cannon of Washington!
X.THE PEOPLE AND THE CRIMINAL.
Now, my friends we will change the scene.
Come with me over three thousand miles of waves, come with me to
Paris.
Come with me, past yon heap of rocks and burnt embers:the ruins of
the Bastilecome with me, through these scattered crowds who murmur
in the streetshush! hold your breath as you enter this wide hall.
What see you now?
A splendid chambersplendid, because encircled with the architectural
trophies of four hundred yearsa splendid chamber, crowded by one dense
mass of human beings. Hereand herewherever you look, you see
nothing but that wall of human faces.
Does not the awful silence that broods here, in this splendid saloon, strike
upon your hearts, with an impression of strange omen?
Tell me, oh tell me, and tell me at once, what means the horror that I
see brooding and gathering over this wall of faces? Listen!
Here in this hall, the people of France have gathered, yes, from the dear
vallies of Provence and Dauphinefrom the wilds of Bretagnefrom
the palaces and huts of Paris, the people have gathered to try a great
Criminal.
That criminal sits yonder in the felon's seata man of respectable
appearance
sitting
there, with a woman of strange loveliness by his side
sitting there, with the only uncovered brow in all this vast assemblage!
That criminal is Louis Capet, he is to be tried here to day, for treason to
the people of France.
And when you look upon that mild-visaged man, sitting there, with the
beautiful woman by his side, and feel inclined to pity himto weep for
that tender womanas you see the lowering looks, of this vast crowd
directed
to the pairas you feel that this awful silence, brooding and
gathering
on every side, speaks a terror, a horror more to be feared than the
loudest
words.
Then as pity, sympathy, gather over your hearts, then I pray you in the
name of God to remember, that this man here, sits clothed with the groans,
the tears, the blood of fifteen million peopleyes, that the mildly beautiful
pearls, that rise and fall, with every pulsation of that woman's bosom, if
transformed into their original elements, would flood the wide hall with two
riversa river of tears, a river of blood!
And now, as the great question is about to be decidedShall Louis the
Traitor-King, live or die!let us for a moment, I beseech you, look at
the great moral, the great truth of this scene
Ah, is it not a sublime sight, this that breaks upon our eyea King on
Trial for treason to his People! For ages, and for ages, these Kings have
waded up to thrones, through rivers of blood, yes built their thrones upon
islands of dead bodies, centered in those rivers of bloodand now, and
now, the cry of vengeance, rising from fifteen millions up to God, has
pierced the eternal ear, and called his vengeance down!
It is a sublime sight that we have herea King on trial for his crimes
his people the judges and the executioners.
Do you know the regret that seizes my soul, when I contemplate this
scene?
That we Americans, after our Revolution, did not bring our Traitor-King.
George the Third, to Independence Hall! and there, while the dead of the
Revolution gathered around himyes crowded the hall and darkened far
over Independence Squareand there while the widows and the orphans
of the Massacred heroes came to the bar, blasting the Kingly Murderer,
with their cries and tearsI do regret, that we, the people, did not try the
Traitor-King, the Murderer-Pope for his crimes.
Ah would not that have been a solemn scene! While the deep groans
the orphans wail sadly like organ-music pealing from the grave, while the
dead gather round thronging to the witness-seatyes, here, come the
Ministers
of Religion kneeling around the Felon-Kingwith the Book of God
in their hands, they pray for his guilty soulthey bid him prepare for the
judgment of the people. They point to yonder squarethey point to the
Scaffold
the AXE! George of England, prepare! This day convicted of
Treason to the people, convicted of wholesale Murder, committed upon a
whole Nation
This day you die!
Ah, would not that have been a sight for a world to see? To have laid
his anointed head upon the blockto have sent him down, the shades
death, the dead around him, and the curses of millions in his ears!
Then to have written over his grave
Here lies the Traitor-King,
convicted
of
Murder
and sentenced to death one month after the capture of
Yorktown
!
But we are in Paris againagain we stand in that wide hall, where Louis
of France, awaits his fate.
Hark! at this moment as the vote is about to be taken, a man short in
stature, yet with a bold brow rises yonderrises and pleads for the life of
the Traitor-King!
Yes, with outstretched hands, an earnest voice, a gleaming eye, that man
pleads for the life of Louis of France!
Let us not, he exclaims, stain our glorious cause, even with the blood of
a King! all punishments of death, are abhorrent in the eyes of God! Let
us tell to the world that we found this King guilty of Treason, Treason to
his People! But that we scorned to take his guilty life! Punishment by
death is a libel on God and Manlet us spare the Traitor-King! Let us
remember that his Government with its ocean of crimes, had one
redeeming
traitit was this King who gave arms and men to Washington, in the
war of the American Revolution!
Let then these United States be the safeguard and asylum of Louis
Capet.There, far removed from the miseries and crimes of royalty, he
may learn that the system of government, consists not in Kings but in the
People.
And who was the unknown man, who companioned only by men like La
Fayette, stood there pleading for the life of the King? Who was this
Stranger, that while all around were scowling death in his face, dared to beg
the life of the Traitor-King?
Ah that little man who stood there, alone in that breathless hall, with
such mighty eloquence warming over his lofty brow?
That little man was one of that illustrious band, who had been made
citizens of FranceFrance the Redeemed and New Born! Yes, with
Macintosh, Franklin, Hamilton, Jefferson and Washington, he had been
elected a citizen of Francewith these great men he hailed the era of the
French Revolution as the dawn of God's Millenniumhe had hurried to
Paris, urged by the same deep love of man, that accompanied him in the
darkest hours of the American Revolution,and there, there pleading for
the Traitor-King, alone in that breathless hall he stood, the Author-Hero,
Thomas Paine
!
XI.KING GUILLOTINE.
Need
I tell you that his pleading was in vain? Need I tell you that ere
the last word died on his lip, up, up, from a thousand soulsup, up, to the
coiling arose the terrible syllable
Death
!
And the People without, the legions of new-born freemen, extending far
through the streets of Paris, took up the word
Death
,
Death, Death
!
Now Louis of Francenow take from your anointed brows, the holy
crown, for to day it will not save your royal head!
Now Marie Antoinette, fair woman whose soft form has hitherto reposed
on beds of down, now take from your snow-white bosom that string of
pearls, for this day they will not save your queenly neck!
Need I picture my friends, the terrible scenes, which followed the
condemnation
of Louis Capet?
Now Louis Capet being dethroned, there reigned in Paris another King
let us go there through the streets black with People, and look at him!
There in the centre of this dense crowd, he raises his gory headthere the
sun streams over his bloody outlinesthere gleams his dripping axethere
there, towering above the heads of millions behold his Bloody Majesty,
the new Lord of Paris,
King Guillotine
!
A strange king have we hereand look there, standing on the scaffold, a
burly ruffian towers into light, his bared arms red with blood, his hot brow
covered by a hideous scarlet cap! That half-clad ruffian is one of the
Courtiers of the new king, that is The Hangman, Prime Minister to
King
Guillotine
!
Now let us take our station by his throne; let us behold the offerings
which are brought to King Guillotine!
Seethe crowd gives wayhark! That shout! Louis of France
kneels, lays his head upon the blockthe axe falls! Behold the first
offering to the Bloody Majesty of France
King Guillotine
!
Lookanother scene breaks on our view! The soft light of morning
breaks over these palaces, over the spires of Notre Damethe crowd give
way.
Great Heaven, what sight is this!
The crowd give waya lovely woman comes trembling up the
scaffoldsteps
!
Oh, how beautiful! Life in her eyes, on her dewy lip, life in her young
veins, life on the white bosom, that heaves tremulously into light.
Look! with one rude grasp the Hangman tears aside the robes from that
white bosomshe kneelsOh, God!
Is not that a fair and beautiful neck to lay upon the block? She kneels
the axe glimmersfalls!
Ah, can that head rolling there like a football, beneath the Executioner's
feet, that head with the long hair dabbled in blood, can that be the head of
Marie Antoinette of France?
Now let us wait by King Guillotine all day longhere, from the
death-carts
tumbled out upon the scaffoldhere old man and maid, here Poet,
Warrior, Felon, here they come! They kneelhark! The sound of the
falling axe! The sawdust of the scaffold is drunk with bloodthere is a
pile of human heads rising in the light! Behold the offerings to King
Guillotine!
Thus from morning till night, that axe glimmers and falls! Thus from
morning till night, King Guillotine plies his taskthe gutters of Paris run
blood, down to the waters of the Seinethe graveyards are full. King
Guillotine knows not where to bury his deadthe stones of the prison
yards are taken updeep pits are dughere bring your dead-carts, here
into these yawning cavities, pitch them all, the warrior with his mangled
form, the old man with his grey hair, the maiden with her trampled bosom
here pitch them all, and let the earth hide these offerings to King
Guillotine.
Now search the streets of Paris for the noblest and pure-souled Patriots
of the Revolutionand search in vain! They are goneLa Fayette and
Paine, and all the heroes are gone. In their place speaks that great orator,
King Guillotine
.
XII.TRUTH FROM THE CARNAGE.
And
here, my friends, let us for a moment pause, even amid these rivers
of blood, to look the Great Truth of the French Revolution in the face:
Shall I, because the blood is yonder in curdling pools, shall I declare that
the Principle of the French Revolution was wrong?
No! No! No!
For it was for this same principle that Jesus toiledendureddied! It
was for this Principle that every man is alike the child of God, that the
tears of Gethsemane fell, that the groans of Calvary arose!
Shall I, because the blood flows in rivers in the streets of France, declare
truth to be a liarprate of the atrocities of the Revolutionor sing psalms
over the graves of tyrants and kings?
Remember, my friendsand O, write this truth upon your heartsthat
this French Revolution was the first effort of Man, to assert his rights since
the crucifixion of the Saviour.
Remember, that between the Death of the Blessed Redeemer and the Era
of the French Revolution, every atrocity that the imagination of the devils
could invent, had been heaped upon mankind, by Kings and Priests in the
name of God.
Rememberwherever Bigotry has reared her temples, there has the
name of God been polluted by the foul lips of Priests
The Hindoo Mother gives her child to the Ganges, in the name of God
the car of the Juggernaut crushes its thousands, in the name of God!
In a single wara war that swept over Germany and Bohemianine
million souls went down to one bloody grave, because their King and his
Priests quarrelled in relation to this great questionwhether a Church
should have a cross, whether a Preacher should say his prayers in Latin
or Dutch! And then after the war was over, booted Priests and gowned
troopers, shouted the holy name of God, over a land which could show no
fruits, than the graves of nine million people!
In this fair land of the New World, the children of the forest were hunted
and butchered in the name of God! That name mingled with the
blood-hound's
yell. In this land, helpless women and aged men were scourged
and burnt to death by grim sectarians, who calmly gazed upon the writhing
and blackened flesh of their victims, and shouted Glory to the name of
God!
In this name, earth has been desolated ten thousand times, and ten
thousand
times again. In this name, the gardens of the world have been
transformed
into howling deserts; the heart of man changed into the heart of a
devilin this name home has been made a hell.
These things have been done in the name of God! You may say that
they were the work of ignorance, of superstition, of fanatacism, but still that
blistering fact stands out from the brow of historyThese things were
done in the name of God!
And shall I therefore declare, that God is a Lie? Shall I therefore
declare
,
that his Book is a Fable? Shall I, because the name of God has
been polluted, his holy word profaned, shall I declare, that there is no God
no Revelation?
As well these absurdities, as declare that the Principle of the French
Revolution
all men are alike the children of God
is false, because that
Principle was profaned by deeds of Massacreby his bloody Majesty,
King Guillotine.
Remember, my friends, as you are gazing here, upon this immense crowd,
in whose midst that Guillotine is butchering its hundreds and thousands,
remember also to gaze upon yonder balcony, projecting from the wall of
the Palace of the Kings of France?
Wellwhat of that balcony
Why, my friends, on that balcony, not a hundred years ago, stood Royal
Charles of France, while the darkness of night was broken by the flames
of St. Bartholomew!
Yes, there he stood, gazing with a calm religious joy, upon the murder
old men, women, little children,going forward in the streets below! Yes,
there, with that Woman-Fiend, Catharine of Medici, by his side, there stood
the King, with his musquet in his hand, shooting down his own people
and as that old man is writhing there, as that woman falls, crushed by his
shotwhile the groans of three hundred thousand human beings, murdered
in a single night, between the setting and the rising of the sun, go up to
Heaven, He, the King, solemnly calls upon Jesus and on God!
Multiply the victims of the French Revolution by ten myriads, and they
will not make a mole hill, beside the mountain of victims of Religious
bigotry, who have been murdered in the name of GOD.
XIII.THE REIGN OF THE KING OF TERROR.
But
while the orgies of the Revolution are filling Paris with horror, let
us search for Thomas Paine!
He is not in his homenor in the Convention, nor in the streetsthen
where is he?
Come with me, at dead of night, and I will show you a strange
scene.
In the central chamber of yonder Royal palace, a solitary, dim, flickering
light burns in the socket.
Yes, a solitary light stands in the centre of that chamber, stands on the
table there, flinging its feeble rays out upon the thick darkness of that room.
It is a spacious chamber, but you can discover nothing of its lofty doors
nothing of the tapestry that adorns its wallsfor all save that spot in the
centre of the chamber, where the light is burning, all is darkness.
I ask you to steep your souls in the silence, in the gloom of this place,
and then listen to that creaking sound of an opening doorthat low
stealthy
footstep.
Behold a figure advancesstands there with one hand on the table
It is the figure of a slenderly formed man dressed in the extreme of
dandyisma jaunty blue coatspotless white vest, lined with crimson
satina faultlessly white cravat.
There is a diamond on his bosomruffles round his wrists.
Look for a moment at his facethe features small and meanthe hue a
discolored yellow; the eyes bleared and blood-shot. Who is this puny,
53
trembling dandy, who stands here, with that paper in his hand at dead of
night?
That puny dandy, is the King of King Guillotine, that is Maximilian
Robespierre! The paper that he grasps in his sallow hands, is a letter
from King Robespierre to King Gullotine! Eighty victims are to feed the
sawdust and the axe to-morrow: their names are on that paper.
And now as we stand here in this Palace Hall, gazing upon this
Blood-thirsty
dandy, let us look at his malicious lip, how it writhes, at his
blood-shot
eye, how it gleams with spite and hate. These eighty victims
sacraficed
;
eighty of the noblest and the best of France; then the Guillotine
can be locked up forever, then the name of Robespierre, will be lost in the
name of his supreme equality, Maximillen, the First, King of France!
And as he stands there, the full light of the lamp, streaming over his
discolored
face; let us look over his shoulder; let us read the names on this
death-scroll!
There are the names of Hero-men, of Hero-women, and first in the
scroll, you see the names of Madame La Fayette and
Thomas Paine
.
Yes, the eye of Robespierre gleams with a terrible light, as he it rests
upon that name; the name of the most determined foe.
Thomas Paine! To night he paces the damp floor of his sleepless-cell
to-morrow into the death-cart, and on to the Guillotineho, ho, so ends
the Author-hero,
Thomas Paine!
XIV.THE FALL OF KING GUILLOTINE.
Let
us take one bold look, into the Hall of the National Assembly, on
the next day! What see we here?
Here are the best, the bravest, aye and the bloodiest of all France, sitting
silentspeechlessawed, before that orange-visaged dandy, who crouches
on the Tribune, yonder!
Not a man in that crowd, dares speak! Robespierrethe Guillotine,
Terror, have taken fast hold upon their hearts! Every man in that
densely-throunged
hall looks upon his neighbor with suspicion; for every other
man, there is already singled out as the victim of the orange-faced King, in
the snow-white vest! It is not known who the next victim shall be;
where the tyrant will next strike and kill!
Robespierre has carried his list of death; has made his fiery speech:
France, the people, the bloody and the brave, sit crouching in that hall,
before that slender man, with blood-shot eyes!
Robespierre in fact is Kingdo you see, that biting smile stealing over
his withered face! There is triumph in that mockery of a smile!
At this awful moment, when all is silence in the crowded hallbehold
that unknown man, rising yonder, far from the Tribunethat unknown man,
who trembling from head to foot, pale as a frozen corpse,rises and speaks
a word that turns all eyes upon him:
Room! he whispers; and yet his whisper is heard in every heart
Room there ye dead!
He pauses, with his eye fixed on vacancy.All is stillthe
Convention
hold their breatheven Robespierre listens
Room there ye dead!
[17]
[17]
This phrase occurs in Bulwer's Zanoni.
again whispers that unknown man; and then
pointing to the white-vested Tyrant, his voice rises in a shriekRoom ye
dead! Room thereRoom ye ghostsroom in hell for the soul of
Maximilien
Robespierre!
Like a voice from the grave, that word startles the Conventionlook!
Robespierre has risencoward as he is, that voice has palsied his soul.
But the unknown man does not pause! In that some deep tone, he heaps
up the crimes of Robespierre in short and fiery words, he calls the dead
from their graves to witness the atrocities of the Tyrant; trembling with
the great deed he has taken upon himself, he shrieks, Go, tyrant, go!
Go, and wash out your crimes on the gory sawdust of King Guillotine!
From that hour, Robespierre the Tyrant was Robespierre, the convicted
criminal! Look! Covered with shames and scorns, he rushes from the
hallHark! The report of a pistol! What does it mean?
Let us away to King Guillotine and ask him!
Ha! Give way there Paris, give way, who is it that comes herecomes
through the maddened crowd; who is it, that more dead than living, comes
on, shrinking, crouching, trembling, to the feet of Holy King Guillotine?
Ah! That horror-stricken face, yes, that face with that bloody cloth
bound around the broken jawlook! even through that cloth, the blood
drips slowly; he bleeds, it is Robespierre!
Grasped in the arms of men, whom the joy of this moment has
maddened
into devils, he is dragged up to the scaffold
One look over the crowdgreat Heaven, in all that mass of millions,
there is no blessing for Maximilien Robespierre!
Water! shrieks the Tyrant, holding his torn jaw, Water, only a cup
of water!
Lookhis cry is answered! A woman rushes up the scaffolda woman
who yesterday was a mother, but now is widowed, because Robespierre and
Death have grasped her boy.
Water? she echoes; Blood, tyrant, blood! You have given France
blood to drinkyou have drank her blood! Now drink your own!
Lookoh, horrorshe drags the bandage from his broken jawhe is
bathed in a bath of his own blood. Down on the block, tyrant! One
gleam of the axehurrah for brave King Guillotine!
There is a head on the scaffoldand there, over the headless corse,
stands that Widow, shrieking the cry she heard in the Convention to-day:
Room ye dead! Roomfor the Soul of Maximilien Robespierre!
XV.THE BIBLE.
We
have seen Thomas Paine standing alone in the Judgment Hall of the
French Nation, pleadingeven amid that sea of scowling facesfor the life
of King Louis.
We have seen him with Washington, Hamilton, Macintosh, Franklin,
and Jefferson, elected a Citizen of France. With these great men, he
hailed the dawn of the French Revolution as the breaking of God's
Millennium
;
as the first great effort of Man to free himself from the lash and
chain, since the crucifixion of the Saviour.
But soon the dawn was overcast; soon the light of burning rafters flashed
luridly over scenes of blood; soon all that is grotesque, or terrible, or
loathsome
in murder, was enacted in the streets of Paris. The lantern posts
bore their ghastly fruit; the streets flowed with crimson rivers, the
life-blood
of ten thousand hearts, down even to the waters of the Seine. King
Louis was dead; but this was not all. Liberty was dead also; butchered
by her fireside.
In her place reigned an orange-faced Dandy, with shrivelled cheeks and
blood-shot eyes. La Fayette and Paine, and all the heroes were gone from
the councils of France, but in their place, aye, in the place of Poetry,
Enthusiasm and Eloquence, spoke a mighty orator
King
Guillotine
!
For eleven months, Thomas Paine lay sweltering in a gaol, the object of
the fierce indignation of Maximilien Robespierre. At last there came a day
when he was doomed; when his name was written in the Judgment List
of the orange-faced Dandy.
Let us go to the prison, even to the Palace Prison of the Luxemburg. It
is high noon. A band of eighty, clustered around that prison door, silently
await their fate. Here amid white-haired old men, here amid trembling
women, all watching for the coming of the death-messenger,here, silent,
stern, composed, stands the author-hero, Thomas Paine
Soon that prison door will open; soon the death cars will roll; soon the
axe will fall, and these eighty forms, now fired with the last glow of life,
will be clay.
But lookthe gaoler comes! A man of dark brow and savage look; his
arms bared to the shoulder, displaying the sinews of a giant. He comes,
trudging heavily through the crowd of his victims, the massive key of the
Palace Prison in his hand. He stands for a moment, looking gloomily over
the faces of his prisoners; he places the key in the lock. Then the gloom
vanishes from his rough face; a look of frenzied joy gleams from his eyes;
his brawny chest swells with a maniac shout.
Go forth! he shrieks, rushing the first through the opened gates; go
forth, young and old; go forth all!
for Catiline Robespierre is dead!
And forthwhile the air is filled with frenzied shrieks of joyforth from
the Palace Prison walks the freed hero, the Man of Two Revolutions,
Thomas Paine.
Now comes the darkest hour of his life. Now comes the hour when we
shall weep for Genius profaned; when we shall see the great and mighty,
fallen from the pedestal of his glory into the very sink of pollution.
Now let us follow the path of Thomas Paine, as his first step is to reclaim
the Manuscript of a work which he wrote eleven months ago, before his
entrance into prison. He grasps that package of Manuscript again; let us
look at its title:
The Age of Reason
.
Here, my friends, let us pause for a moment. Let us ask that man of
the high brow, the eloquent eye, the face stamped with a great soullet us
ask Thomas Paine, as he goes yonder through the streets of Paris, to do a
great and holy deed?
That deedwhat is it?
Let us ask him to take the Manuscript in his hand, to tear it in twain,
and hurl the fragments there, beneath the dripping axe of the Guillotine.
Yes, let the Guillotine do its last work upon this Manuscript of Falsehood;
let the last descent of the gory axe fall on its polluted pages. For while
this Age of Reason speaks certain great Thoughts, announcing the author's
belief in a God and Immortalitythoughts derived from the Bibleit is
still a jest book, too vile to name.
It is true, it speaks of God and Immortality; but it also heaps its vile
jests, its vulgar scorn upon Jesus, the Redeemer of Man, and Mary the
Virgin Mother.
Let me tell you at once, my friends, that I stand here to-night, a
prejudiced
man. Let me at once confess, that it has ever been my study, my
love, to bend over the dim pages of the Hebrew volumeto behold the
awful form of Jehovah pending over chaos; to hear that voice of
Omnipotence
resound through the depths of space, as these words break on my
soul:
Vayomer Aloheim: yehee aur vayehee aur
!
Then spake
God: let there be light and light there was!
Or yet again, to behold that Jehovah, descended from the skies, walking
yonder with the Patriarchs, yonder where the palms arise, and the tents
whiten over the plain. Or, in the silence of night, to look there, through
the lone wilderness, where the Pillar of Fire beacons Moses the Deliverer
towards the Promised Land; or to enter the solemn temple of Jerusalem,
and behold the same Jehovah, shining in the holiest place, shining over the
Ark of the Covenant, so awfully serene, yet sublime.
Let me tell you, that I have been with the Arab,
Job
, as he talked face
to face with God, and in images of divine beauty, spoke forth the writhings
of his soul; as in words that your orators of Greece and Rome never spoke
or dreamed, he pictures the littleness of life, the Majesty of Omnipotence,
the sweet, dear rest of the untroubled grave. There the wicked cease
from troubling and the weary be at rest.
I have bent over this New Testament, and traced the path of God as he
walked the earth enshrined in human flesh. Is there no beauty here, to
warm the heart and fire the brain? Even as we read, does not the face
of Jesus start from the pagethat face that painter never painted, with its
serene Divinity looking out from the clear, deep eyes. That face which
we may imagine, with its flowing hair falling gently down from the brow
where
God
is written in every outline, with the lips wreathing with such
eternal love for poor forsaken man, whether he sweats in the workshop or
grovels in the mine. Yes, I have followed that face, as it appeared above
the hill-top at even, in the golden twilight of Palestine, and approached the
Poor Man's hut, and shone in the dark window, upon the hard crust of the
slave. How the Poor rose up to welcome that face; how rude men bent
down before it and wept; how tender women knelt in its light and gazed
in those Divine eyes! Then how the voice of Jesus rung out upon the
air, speaking in dark huts great words that shall never die!
Yes, I have followed that Man of Nazareth over stony roads, by the
waves of Galilee, into the Halls of Pilate; and thereyes, up the awful
cliffs of Calvary, when Jerusalem poured through its gates by tens of
thousands
,
under the darkened heavens, over the groaning earth, to look upon
the face of the dying God, as the heavy air rung with that unspeakable
agony: My God, my God, why hast thou forsaken me!
Let me at once confess, that if the Bible is a Fable, it is a Fable more
beautiful than all the classics of Greece and Rome. Paint for me your
Cicero and Demosthenes in all their glory, and I will paint you that bold
forehead and those earnest eyes of Saint Paul, as, rising from his midnight
toil, his voice echoes the words he has just written; those words that live
forever, as though each word was an Immortal Soul
In a moment, in a twinkling of the eye, at the last trump, for the
trumpet shall sound, and the dead shall be raised incorruptible, and we
shall be changed
.
For this corruption must put on incorruption, and this mortal must
put on immortality
.
Search your Poets for scenes of that quiet pathos which at once melts
and elevates the soulsearch your Homer, your Shakspeare; search them
all, the venerable Seers of Ages, and I will point you to a single line that
puts them all to shame! It is in the New Testament, where Jesus the
Christ is dead and buried. It is on that serene morning, when the
sunbeams
shine over the sepulchre of the Saviour. Three women, the blessed
Maries, come there to weep over the body of their Lord. Yes, all the
world has forsaken him: all save Peter the Faithless yet Lion-hearted,
John the Beloved, and these three women. They look into the sepulchre
it is empty. The grave-clothes are there, but the Lord is gone. At
this moment, a poor, abandoned woman, whom the good Christ had lifted
up to virtue and forgave, even as she washed his feet with her tearsyes,
at this moment, sad, tearful, Mary Magdalene approaches a being whom she
mistakes for the gardener. Listen to the words of scripture. This being
speaks:
Woman, why weepest thou?
She, supposing him to be the gardener, said unto him,
Sir, if thou hast borne him hence, tell me where thou hast laid him,
and I will take him away.
Jesus saith unto her, Mary!
She turned herself and said unto him, Master!
This is all the gospel says of the matter, but is not this one line full of
eternal beauty: Jesus saith unto her, `Mary!' No long explanations,
no elaborate phrase, no attempt to awe or surprise; but one simple word,
that word her name, spoken in the tones she loved to hear.
Can you not hear his voice, speaking in those well-remembered tones?
Can you not see his hand extended in a gesture of benediction, as his eye
lights up with an expression of brotherly tenderness?
That one scene by the sepulchre, where the Magdalene, an image of
beauty purified by religion, bends delighted before the serenely divine face
of the risen Jesus, while the sunbeams of that calm dawn fell gently over
the grave-clothes which no longer clasp the deadthat one scene, sublime
in its very simplicity considered as a mere composition, is worth all the
pathos of Greece and Rome.
Yes, if the Bible is a fable, it is a fable more beautiful than all the
iron-hearted
sophistry of your cold-blooded Philosophersit is a Fable that
through all time has girded up the hearts of patriots on the scaffold and the
battle-fieldit is a Fable that has shone like a glory over ten thousand
dying beds. If that Bible is a Fable, then is it a Fable that bursts like a
blaze of love and beauty through the dark cloud of human guilt, and lights
a way from the dull grave up to Immortality and God.
Ah, had I been Thomas Painehad his great brain, his great soul been
mine, then would I have taken my stand here on the Bible with Jesus.
Then from this book would I have told the host of hypocrites who like
slimy lizards, crawl up on the Altar of God and sit there in all their
loathsomeness
,
then would I have told these mockers of God, that here from this
Bible, even the mild spirit of Jesus is rousedto rebuketo scornto speak
terror to their souls!
Because hypocrites have made merchandize of God's Book, and split his
cross into pedlar's wares, shall I therefore heap scorn upon that serenely
beautiful face, looming out from the Bible; that face of Jesus, the Redeemer
of Man? Because hypocrites and kings have taken the seamless robe of
Christ and parted it into cords, to bind men's necks and hands and hearts,
am I to deride that Christ, scorn that Jesus, who stands there forever above
the clouds of human guilt, the only Redeemer of Man, the only Messiah
of the Poor?
Here was the terrible mistake of Thomas Paine. He mistook the cloud
which marred the sun for the sun itself; he mistook the abuses of men, the
frauds of hypocrites, the lies of fabulists, which have been done and uttered
in the name of Christianity, for Christianity itself.
He lived in an age when Light and Darkness struggled together, when
the earth was convulsed from cottage to throne. He had done a great deed
when he wrote that book of Common Sense, which derives its strongest
arguments from the Bible, for it quotes the memorable words of the prophet
Samuel against Monarchy and King-worshippers. This book of Common
Sense, founded on the Bible, was the forerunner of the Declaration of
Independence
.
But now Paine fell into the deplorable error of mistaking certain wolves,
who assumed the fleece of religion, for the true sheep of the Lord Jesus.
He attacked Christianity in this ribald book, written in that style of
controversial
blackguardism, which was first used by pretended followers of Christ,
who reduced their Master to an Enigma, his religion to a sophistry. This
pitiable style which makes up in filth what it wants in grandeur, and
mistakes
a showy falsehood for a solid truth, was used by Paine in his Age of
Reason. It was beneath him; far beneath the genius of the man who
wrote Common Sense. It has left his name, as the author of this work,
but a wreck on a desert shore; while that name, when known as the author
of Common Sense, is cherished by the wise and good all over the
land.
The position which I have assumed in this history is a plain one. No
one but a fool can mistake it. I found the character of Thomas Paine,
Author of Common Sense, wronged and neglected. I took up that
character
,
defended it, placed it on the pedestal where Washington and
Jefferson
had placed it once before. No selfish motive actuated me in this work.
Paine has no relatives living to thank me; norif my object was money
has he any rich friends to pay me for the task. I think, therefore, that the
most prejudiced man will acknowledge that my motives here have been
pure, honest, above all mercenary considerations.
A fact that speaks for itself, is this:
while an
Atheistical paper
abuses
me as a Bigot, another paper, governed by no particular morality or
belief
,
but supplying the place of Religion with Bigotry, calls me an
Infidel
!
Does not this speak volumes? In this case extremes meet, for the
snake puts his tail in his mouth.
Without one sordid motive, without one base fear, have I called up the
records of the past, the voices of the dead, to testify the character and
genius of Thomas Paine, the Author of Common Sense.
And now, without one sordid motive, without one base fear, do I record
my sorrow that a man like this should have written so paltry a book as the
Age of Reason; my detestation of the style and principles of that work;
my pity for the individual who, in our day, could be turned from his
Saviour
by arguments and sneers so puerile as are written in its pages.
For the Religion of Jesus is not a thing of an hour or a day, that it
should be undermined by a sneer or crushed by a falsehood. It is built up
in too many hearts, it brings too much hope to poor desolate man, it holds
out too glittering beacons of Immortality, ever to die. When it survived
the wounds it received from pretended friends during a course of eighteen
hundred years, shall it die of a single Voltaire or Paine? The Christianity
of the heart, which cheers us in toil, lights our homes with a gleam from
God's heaven, smoothes our pillow in sickness, and in the sad, stern hour
of death, sings hymns to our parting soul and leads it gently home to
Immortality
Can
this Religion of the heart ever die?
Speak, Mother, bending over your child, as you tell him of the Jesus who
gathered the little children to his breastcan this Religion die? Speak,
Father, old man, now bending beside your daughter's corse, gazing upon
that face cold in death, with your earnest eyes, speak and tell us! Can a
Religion that comforts you in an hour like this, that assures you your child
is
not dead but gone home
, can this Religion die! Speak, slave of the
workshop and mine, now toiling on for a hard crust, with the sweat on
your brow, the agony in your heartcan this Religion die? This Religion
which tells you that God himself did not disdain to take the form of a man
of toil, in order to make your fate better in this world, and give you
Immortality
in the next?Speak, Bigoteven you, whom Christ pities and
forgiveseven you, last object of imbecility and malicespeak and tell us!
Can a Religion that stoops so far in its mercy, as to
save you
, ever die?
Speak, Universal Man, and answer us! Can a Religion which binds
itself to your heart, links its eternal form with your joys and sorrows, hopes
and fears, soothes you in toil and sickness, appeals to your imagination
with its images of divine loveliness, elevates you with its Revelation of
Immortality
from a mere lump of clay almost into GodheadCan this Religion
of the heart ever die?
Here is the mournful lesson of Thomas Paine's life:
A great man, when
he utters a great truth, raises himself to the dignity of an Angel: the
same great man, uttering a Lie, degrades himself below the beast
.
When Thomas Paine wrote Common Sense, he uttered a Truth,
(founded on the Bible,) which aroused a whole Continent to its destiny.
For this we honor him.
When the same Thomas Paine wrote the `Age of Reason,' he uttered an
Error, opposed to the Bible and in direct contradiction of his former work,
Common Sense
. For this we pity him.
The effect of the Age of Reason, has long since passed away, but the
good work of Common Sense, is seen in this great spectacle of
Twenty-nine
54
Commonwealths, combined in one great Republic, extending from the
Aroostook to the Rio Grande.
Have I made myself sufficiently plain?Has that man a well-balanced
mind who can now mistake my position? If there is such a man within
sound of my voice, I would remind him that it is my duty to supply him
with information, but a Divine Power alone can furnish with brains.
Again I repeathad I been Thomas Paine, I would have learned this
great truth: The path of the true Reformer is not against, but ever and
evermore
with
Jesus
.
XVI.THE DEATH-BED OF THOMAS PAINE.
Come
with me to that Long Island shorecome with me to the farm of
New Rochelle, where an old man is dying.
Let us enter this rude and neglected room. There, on yonder bed, with
the June breezeoh, it is sweet with the perfume of land and ocean,with
the June breeze blowing softly through the open windowwith gleams of
June sunlight upon his browthere, propped up by pillows, on his
deathbed
,
sits an old man.
That form is shrunkthat face stamped with the big wrinkles of age and
alcoholyet the brow still looms out, a tower of thought, the eye still glares
from that wreck of a faceglares with soul.
He is dying. Death in the trembling handsdeath in the brightening
eyesdeath in every bead of sweat upon the brow.
And who is here to comfort that old man? Wife, child? Ah, none of
these are here! No softly-whispered voice speaks love to the passing
soulno kind and tender hand puts back the grey hair from the damp
brow.
Yet still that old man sits there against the pillow, silent, calm, firm.
Softly blow the June breezessoftly pours the mild sunlightsunlight
and breezes, he is about to leave forever, and yet he is firm.
Oh, tell me, my friends, why does this death-room seem so awfully still
and desolate?
It is not so much because there is no wife, no child herenot because
there is no kind hand to smooth back the grey hairs from the damp brow
but O, Father of souls
Here in this still room, with its poor furniture, its stray sunlight, and its
summer breeze,here, in this still room, there is no mildly-beautiful face
of
Jesus
, the redeemer, to look upon the old man, to gleam beside his bed,
to smile immortality in his glazing eyes.
This makes the room so awfully still and desolate.
There is no
Jesus
here!
Yes, without a word of recantation on his lipfirm to his beliefone
God, and no Jesusfirm to his stoical creed, which is all reason and no
faith, the old man, Thomas Paine, picks at the coverlid, and takes death
calmly by the hand.
Now look, in this dread hour two men come forward, a Doctor and a
Preacher. What is their mission here! Do they take the old man's hands
within their own, and chafe away the death-chill? Oh, no!
While one has note and pencil in hand, the other leans over the bed.
Don't you see his pitiful, whining face? He leans over the bed and
whispers
,
or rather screeches,Mister Paine, we wish to know whether you
have changed your religious opinions? Do you believe in our creed?
And while the Doctor is ready, with his pencil, the Preacher leans
gaspingly
thereawaits his answer!
Does not this scene disgust you? There are two pedlars of death-bed
confessions, waiting to catch the last gasp of poor Tom Paine!
Do you think, my friends, that the cause of Christ depends upon
narrow-souled
bigots like thesewho, instead of placing the cup of cold water to
the lips of the death-stricken, come here, around the death-bed, smelling of
creeds, and breathing cant all the whileand insult, with their paper and
pencil, the last hours of a dying old man?
Would your Fenelon, your Luther, your Wesley, have done thus?
Would your Bishop White, or your Channing, talked to a dying man, with
paper and pencil in hand, instead of moistening his lips with the cup of
water, or soothing his soul with the great truths of Christ! Naywould
the blessed Redeemer himself, who ever lifted up the bowed head, ever
forgave
the trembling sinner, ever reached forth the arms of his Godhead to
snatch despair from its sins and woeswould he have entered thus the
chamber of a dying man, to talk of creeds, when there was a soul to be
redeemed! The thought is blasphemy!
Now listen to the only answer, what these bigots could expect. The
old man looked in their faces, stamped with the petty lines of sectarian
Pharicaism, and answered
I have no desire to believe in anything of the kind!
says the old man,
and turned his face to the wall.
At this moment, look! Another man appears on the scene. He is
dressed in the garb of a Quaker. He pushes the bigots asidewaves these
Pencillers from the room, and thenGod's blessing upon his headtakes
the old man by the hand, and silently smooths back the damp hair from his
brow.
Paine looks his speechless thanks to that stout-hearted Quaker's face.
Friend Thomas, says the Friend, trust in Christ. He died for thee.
His mercy is fathomless as the sea!
Never did the plain coat and broad-brimmed hat look more like an Angel's
garb than then. Not even in the hour when William Penn, under the Elm
of Shackamaxon, spoke immortal words to rude red men. Never did the
Quaker thee and thou sound more lovely, more like an angel's tongue,
than then! Not even when, from the lips of Apostle William, it sent forth
from the shores of Delaware, to all the world, the great message of Peace
and Toleration.
Thomas Paine grasped that Quaker by the hand, and gazed in his face
with dim eyes.
Now, my friends, do not let your hearts falter, but go with me to the end
of this scene. What is the mission of this Quaker to the author of
Common
Sense? Why, he has been abroad all the morning, trying to secure
a gravea quiet, secluded, unknown resting-place for Tom Paine. He has
been to all the churchesall! For a dark thought troubles the last hours
of Paine, the thought that his remains will rest unhonored, above ground,
unsheltered by the repose of a grave.
This was but human, after all. He believed his soul would not die. He
did not wish the aged clay which enshrined that soul to be the object of
contempt or insult, after his death.
Now lookwhile the Quaker grasps his hand, the dying man looks in
his face.
Will they, he murmurs in a husky whisper, will they give me a
grave?
The Quaker turns his head away. He cannot answer. Still Paine
clutches that handstill repeats the question. At last, with tears in his
eyes, with choking utterance, the Quaker gasps a syllable:
No! Friend Paineno! I have been to them allto all the Christian
churchesall! And allyea, all of these followers of Jesus, who forgave
the thief on the Crossall refuse thy bones a grave!
That was a crushing blow for poor Tom Paine. That was the last drop
in the full cup of his woe; the last kick of Bigotry against the skull of a
dying old man.
He never spoke again.
As if this last scorn of these Infidel-Christians had gathered his heart
and crushed it like a vice, then the old man silently released his hand from
the grasp of the Quakersilently folded his arms over his breastdropped
his head slowly down, and wasDEAD!
Now look yonder, as the soul of that old man goes up to judgmentlook
there, as the soul of Thomas Paine stands arrayed before that face of
Infinite
Mercy, and answer me!
Who would not sooner be Tom Painethere, before that bar of Jesus
with all his virtues and errors about him, than one of the misguided
bigots who refused his bones a grave?
Think of the charity which Jesus preached before you answer!
And as we quote the terrible truth of those words, which I found written
in an old volume, in the dim cloisters of the Franklin Library
He has no name. The country for which he labored and suffered,
knows him not. His ashes rest in a foreign land. A rough, grass-grown
mound, from which the bones have been purloined, is all that remains on
the Continent of America, to tell of the Hero, the Statesman, the friend
of Man!
I say, as we quote the terrible truth of these words, let us go yonder to
that deserted spot, near New Rochelle. Let us bend over that deserted
mound, covered with rank grass, read the inscription on that rough stone,
and thenwhile the Unbeliever is with his God, into whose awful councils
nor bigotry nor hate can enterlet us remember, that this simple
monument
is the only memorial on the Continent of America, of that
Author-Hero
who first stood forth the Prophet of our rights, the compatriot of
Jefferson, the friend of Washington, the author of Common Sense,
poor
Tom Paine
!
Remember, then, that the hand which mouldered to dust, beneath this
stone, was the first to write the words
The Free and Independent States of America
.
XVII.REVIEW OF THE HISTORY.
This
is a strange and crowded history. Not only the great day on which
the Declaration was signed, and a Continent declared free, has been described,
but the eternal cause of that Declaration, reaching over a dark chaos of
eighteen hundred years, has been recognized in its characters of light and
beauty. From the day of July the Fourth, 1776, we have gone to the day
when the world was in mourning for its Godincarnating in the form of a
mechanic, by the death of shame, on the felon's cross. We have traced the
great facts of the Rights of Man, from humble Independence Hall, to the
awful cliff of Calvary. From Christ the Redeemer, we have followed the
track of light through the mist of ages, down to his great apostle, the Paul
of the seventeeth century, William Penn. From Penn to Washington and
Jefferson and Adams and Paine, all human, yet rising into heroes through
the majesty of their intellect. The career of Paine,now writing his bold
book in darkness, hunger and cold, now following the footsteps of
Washington's
army, striking mortal blows with his pen, into the very heart of
British crueltyhas led us into the vortex of the French Revolution, the
glorious and bloody child of our own. Through the cloud of that fearful
time, we have endeavored to follow the track of light, separating its rays
from the dark shadow of the Guillotine, and beholding its omen of good,
even above the crimson waves of the Seine.
Nor have we faltered, when it became our sad task to witness the
downfall
of Thomas Paine. An awful lesson is conveyed in his sad history. So
bright the dawning of that star, so dark its going out into hopeless night!
Now, the intimate friend of Washington and the other heroes, and again, a
desolate old man, withered by the bigot's breath, and dyingdesolate, O!
how desolate and alone!
It becomes our task now, to follow four of the Signers, in their way
through the valley of the shadow of death. We have not space nor time
to picture the lives of all the signers; from among the host of heroes, we
will select but four immortal names.
From the death-chamber of Paine, to other scenes where the voice of the
messenger falls on the freezing ear, and his cold finger seals the glassy
eye.
XVIII.THE LAST DAY OF JEFFERSON AND ADAMS.
Fifty years passed away: the Fourth of July, 1776 had been made
Immortal by its Declaration; the Fourth of July, 1826 was to be forever
rendered a Holy Day by the hand of Death.
On that serene morning, the sun rose beautifully upon the world, shining
upon the great brotherhood of States, extending from the wilds of Maine
to the Gulf of Mexico, with the Atlantic glittering like a belt of waves and
beams along its eastern shore, the Mississippi winding four thousand miles
through its western border, while ruggedly sublime, the Alleghanies towered
in the centre of the land.
The same sun, fifty years before, and lighted up with its smile of good
omen, a little nation of Thirteen provinces, nestling between the Alleghanies
and the Atlantic, and fighting even for that space, bounded by mountains
and waves, with the greatest and bloodiest power in the world.
The battle of eight years had been fought; England foiled in the
Revolution
,
had been humbled in the dust again; fifty years had passed away;
the thirteen Provinces of this bloody Monarchy, had swelled into
Twenty-Four
States of a Free People. The banner that had waved so gloriously in
the Revolution, unveiling its Thirteen stars to the blood-red glare of battle,
now fluttering in the summer morning air, from Home and Church and
Council Hall, flashed from its folds the blaze of Twenty-Four stars, joined
in one Sun of Hope and Promise.
The wild Eagle, who had swooped so fiercely on the British host, some
fifty years ago, now sat calmly on his mountain crag, surveying his Banner,
crimsoned with the light of victory, while the peaceful land, beautiful with
river and valley, blossomed on every side.
It was the Fourth of July, 1826. From little villages, came joyous bands,
white-robed virgins and sinless childrenscattering flowers by the way;
in the deep forests, the voice of praise and prayer arose to God; from the
Pulpit the preacher spoke; beside the old cannon, which had blazed at
Germantown, stood the veteran of the Revolution, as battered as the cannon
which he fired; in the wide cities ten thousand hearts throbbed with one
common joy: and the flowers that were scattered by the way, the words
that the Preacher spoke, and the hymn that the forest echoes sent to
Heaven, the blaze of the cannon and the joy of the wide city, all had one
meaning:
This land that was once the Province of a King, is now
the Homestead of a People
!
And yet, even while the hearts of fourteen million people palpitated with
the same joy, there came an unseen and shadowy Messenger, who touched
two brave hearts with his hand, and froze them into clay.
Even while the Jubilee of Freedom rung its hosannas from every wood
and hill, Death was in the land. Silently, with that step that never makes
a sound, with that voice which speaks the language of eternityand which
we never hear translated until we dieDeath glided into the chambers of
two heroes, and bade them Home to God!
Almost at the same moment, almost within the compass of the same hour,
two heartsthat once warmed with the passion of freedom, the frenzy of
eloquencewere stopped in their beatings forever.
We will go to the room of old age, we will stand beside the bed of death,
we will see the sunbeams of July the Fourth, 1826, playing over the clammy
brows of the Brother Heroes.
The First Home!
Does it not look beautiful, the very picture of rustic comfort and
unpretending
wealth, as it rises yonder on the soil of Massachusetts, the land of
Hancock and Warren, that mansion with many windows, a porch extending
along its front, fair flowers and richly foliaged trees blooming from its
hall-door
to the roadside gate? The hour is very still. It is near high noon.
You can see the roof, with corniced eaves and balustraded summit marked
boldly out, against the deep blue summer sky.
While the thunder of cannon is in our ears, we will pass the gate, enter
the hall-door, and glide softly up the stairs. Softly, for death is here, in this
Home of Quincy.
With heads bowed low and stealthy tread, we enter the darkened room.
The sound of gasping breath, the sob of manhood in its agony, the wail of
women, the music of the summer air among the leaves, all at once rush on
our ears.
We enterand gazeand start back, awed and dumb.
All the windows of this room, save one, are dark. Yonder to the east,
you see that window, its white curtains flung aside, the perfume of the
garden and the joy of the sunshine gushing through its aperture, into the
shadowy Death-Chamber.
Yonder on the thickly curtained bed, an old man is dying.
Resting against the pillow, his shrunken form lost in the folds of the
silken coverlet, he awaits the hour of his summons, while the softened
sunlight
plays gently on his brow and the summer breeze plays with his hair.
That brow is withered into wrinkles, and moistened by the death-sweat,
yet as you gaze it lights up with the fire of fifty years ago, and the lips
move and the unclosed eye blazes as though the heart of the Hero was
back again with the Immortal band of Signers.
It is stout-hearted John Adams, sinking calmly into the surges of death.
Every moment the waves come higher; the ice of the grave comes slowly
through the congealing veins, up the withered limbs; the mist of death
gathers about the old man's eyes.
At this moment, while all is still, let us from the crowd of mute
spectators
,
select a single form. Beside the death pillow, on which his right hand
rests, gazing in his father's face, his own noble brow bathed in a solitary
gleam of the sun, he stands, the Son, the Statesman and President.
Fifty years ago, his father, in the State House of Philadelphia, uttered
words that became History as they rung from his indignant lips, and now
wielding the Presidential Sceptre, which his father received from the hand
of Washington, the Son of the Hero gazes with unspeakable emotion, in the
face of the dying old man.
Again our eyes wander from the faces of the encircling spectators, to the
visage of the departing hero. So withered in the brow, so ghastly pale, so
quivering in the lips, so sunken in the cheeks, and yet for all, it shines as
with the last ray of its closing hour!
Hark! The thunder of cannon, softened by distance, comes through the
window. The old man hears it; at once, his eye fires, he trembles up in
the bed, and gazes toward the light.
It is  his dying voice rings with the fire of fifty years agoIt is
the Fourth of July!
That old man, sitting erect in his death-couch, his ghastly face quivering
into youth again, may well furnish a picture for the painter's art. Gaze
upon him in this hour of his weakness, when with his fingers blue with the
death-chill and his brow oozing with the death-sweat, he starts up, and
knows the voice of the cannon, and answers its messageIt is, it is the
Fourth of July! Gaze upon that wreck of a body, now quivering with
the soul about to leave it forever, quivering and glowing into youth again,
and tell me, if you can the soul is not immortal?
It was a sight too holy for tears! The spectatorsman and woman and
child,feel their hearts hushed with one common feeling, admiration
mingled with awe. The son winds his arm about his Father's neck, and
whispers, Fifty years to-day, you signed the Declaration, which made us
Free!
How the Memory of the old time rushes upon the old man's heart!
Fifty years agothe Hall thronged with the Signersthe speech that rung
from his lips, when his Country's destiny hung palpitating on his words
the eloquence of his compatriots, Jefferson standing in the foreground of a
group of heroes, Hancock smiling serenely over the crowd, in front of the
old State House hallit rushed upon his soul, that glorious memory, and
made him live again, with the men of '76.
Higher rose the waves of death! Higher mounted the ice of the grave!
Bluer the fingers, damper the brow, hollow and faint the rattling voice!
The old man sank slowly back on the bed, while the arm of his son, the
President, was about his neck. His eyes were closed, his hands placed on
his breast. He was sliding gently, almost imperceptibly into Death. The
belt of sunlight that poured through the window over the floor, moved along
the carpet like the shadow of a dial shortened, and was gone. Still he
lived: still a faint fluttering of the shrunken chest, showed that the soul
was not yet gone home.
It would have made you grow in love with death, to see how calmly he
died. Just as the shadows of the trees were cast far over the meadow by
the declining sun, just as the shout of the People, the thunder of cannon,
the tone of the orator came softened on the breeze, the old man raised his
head, unclosed his eyes
Jefferson yet survives!
he said, and the wave of Death reached his
lips, and he breathed no more.
55
It was four o'clock on the afternoon of July 4th, 1826, when John Adams
closed his life of glorious deeds.
Jefferson yet survives!
While the words of the venerable Adams yet linger in our ears, let us
hasten away to the Second Home, where Death has crossed the threshhold.
Emerging from the shadows of this beautiful valley of Virginia, we
ascend
a slight elevation, and by the light of the morning sun, behold a strange
structure, standing amid a grove of forest trees. But one story in heighth,
with elegant pillars in front, and a dome rising above its roof, it strikes you
with its singular, almost oriental style of Architecture, and yet seems the
appropriate Hermitage of Philosophy and Thought.
That structure, relieved by the background of towering trees, is the Home
of a Hero. Beneath that Grecian portico, the Poets, Artists and
Philosophers
of the old world have often passed, eager to behold the Statesman of
the New World, the author of the Declaration of Independence.
It is noonday now; the summer sun streams warmly on yonder dome;
the leaves are scarcely stirred into motion by the faintest breath of air.
Uncovering our heads, we will prepare to look upon Death, and with our
hearts subdued in awe, we will enter
Monticello
.
There is a group around the death-bed in yonder room. Every eye is
centred on the visage of a dying man; the beautiful woman, whom you
behold standing near his pillow, her eyes eloquent with emotion, is his
beloved child.
As he rests before us, on the bed of death, the centre of the silent group,
we will approach and look upon him. A man of tall and muscular frame;
his face denoting in every marked feature, the power of a bold and fearless
intellect, his lip compressed with stern determination, his blue eye flashing
with the light of a soul, born to sway the masses of men, by the magic of
Thought.
As we approach, he looks up into the face of the beautiful woman, and
utters these memorable words:
Let no inscription be placed upon my tomb but this: Here rests
Thomas Jefferson, the author of the Declaration of Independence,
and the Friend of Religious Freedom
.
As he speaks, he describes a faint gesture, with his withered right hand.
That hand, fifty years ago, wrote the Declaration of Independence. It is
feeble and withered now; time was, when it wrote certain words that sank
into the heart of universal man, and struck the shackles from ten thousand
hearts.
Against the frauds practised by priests and kings from immortal time
against the tricks of courtiers, the malice of bigots, the falsehoods of
time-servers
who are paid to be religious, hired to be greatagainst all manner of
barbarity, whether done by a New Zealand cannibal, who eats the wretch
whom he has butchered, or the Spanish Inquisition, which after burning its
victims, consigns them pleasantly to an eternal torture after death, or by
John Calvin, who calmly beheld the skull of an unoffending man crumble
into ashes, and then wiped his bloody hands and praised his God, that he
was such a holy managainst all wrong, worked by the infamous or the
weak upon Man the child of Divinity, was directed the eloquence of his
Pen. The hand that once wielded that pen of power, is now chilled with
the damps of death!
As we stand gazing upon the dying manheld enchained by the majesty
of that intellect, which glows brightly over the ashy face, and flashes vividly
in the clear blue eyethe beautiful woman takes the icy hands within her
own, and kisses the cold brow.
The hand of Death is on him now.
Thank God that I have lived to see this glorious day! he utters in a
firm voice; and then raising his glazing eyes, he gazes in his daughter's
face, while the death-rattle writes in his throat
Nunc dimmitis domine
!
were the last words of Thomas Jefferson.
At the same hour of noon, when the fervid sun poured straight down on
the dome of his hermitage, when not a breath of air ruffled the leaf or
stream, when in the midst of a weeping throng, stood his beloved daughter,
placing her soft fingers on his glassy eyeballs, pressing her warm mouth to
his cold lips, died Thomas Jefferson, the author of the Declaration of
Independence
.
He died some four hours before Adams surrendered his soul. When the
Patriot of Quincy gasped Jefferson still survives, the soul of Jefferson
was already before his God.
It would have been deemed a wonderful thing, had either of these men
died on the Fourth of July, just half a century after the day of 1776.
But that the Brothers in the work of freedom, the master spirits of the
Council, who stirred up men's hearts with godlike impulses, and moved
their arms in glorious deeds, in the dark hour of Revolution, should have
died not only on the Fourth of July, but on the same day, within a few
hours of each other, while bodily separated by hundreds of miles, their souls
borne to Heaven by the hymns of a People, freed by their labors, looks to
me as though Almighty God had sent his Messenger and called his Servants
home, thus sanctifying by this two-fold death, the Fourth of July
forevermore
.
They met before the Throne of God, and stood, solemn and awful, amid
the throng of heroes clustered there.
Compare the death-beds of these men, with the closing hour of their
compeer in the work of freedom,
Thomas Paine
! They surrounded by
friends, who smiled fondly on their glazing eyes; encircled by beautiful
women, who pressed their warm hands to the icy brow, and kissed the
freezing lips: He, utterly desolate and alone, with no friend, save one aged
Quaker; no hope, save that which dropped from the envenomed tongues
of the Pharisees, who came to feast their eyes with his death struggles, even
as savages amuse their idle hours by torturing the wretch whom they
purpose
to burn to death.
Pity Thomas Paine, my friends, and ask yourselves the questionTried
by the same kind of justice, that has darkened his errors into sins worse
than murder or incest, and converted his heroic virtues into crimes, what
would become of Jefferson and Adams?
Imagine the biography of Jefferson and Adams, written by one of those
ignoble wretches, who heaped their slanders on the grave of Thomas Paine!
I stand upon the grave of this deeply wronged hero, and ask my
countrymen
to do him justice! I admit his errors, and pity them, for the sake of
his substantial virtues. I boldly point to the records of the past for proof,
when I state, that Thomas Paine was the co-worker of Jefferson and Adams,
in the great deed of Independence. My voice may fall unheeded now, but
one hundred years hence, the name of the Infidel will be forgotten in the
glory of the Patriot,
Thomas Paine
.
XVIII.THE NAMELESS DEATH.
There
is another of the Signers, whose death I would like to picture, but
am afraid.
In the fearful hour of the Revolution, when our army was without arms,
our treasury bankrupt, this Signer, by the force of his personal character
alone, gave muskets, swords and cannon to the soldiers, hundreds of
thousands
of dollars to the Continental Congress. He was the life, the blood,
the veins of our financial world. To him the Congress looked for aid, to
his counting house Washington turned his eyes, in his direst peril, and was
not denied. The dollars of this Signer fed our starving soldiers; his
personal
credit gave us throughout this world, that which is worth more than
gold
confidence
.
And yet, he diedhow? Not in a duel, like Button Gwinett, nor
surrounded
by the peaceful scenes of home, like Jefferson and Adams. Nor
did he meet his fate in battle. But he died
I am ashamed, afraid to tell it.
Not two hundred yards from the old State House, there rose some years
ago, an edifice, whose walls were black, whose only echoes were sobs and
groans, whose ornaments, some iron manacles and a stout timber gibbet. It
seemed like a Curse frozen into stone, a Pestilence impersonified in bars
and bolts and black walls. In the Revolution, while the British held the
city, this edifice rung all day and night, with the horrible cries of rebel
prisoners
,
dying the death of dogs, their heart eaten up by a Plague, which
had been created by the filth and corruption of the den. After the
Revolution
,
the place made hideous by a thousand murders, was the residence
of thieves, pirates, assassins, felons of every grade. Among the various
groups of felons, who blasphemed all day in this stone Pandemonium, there
was a certain class, distinguished from the others by their silence, their pale
faces stamped with mental agony, their evident superiority in point of
appearance
and education.
Some of this latter class were men, some were women; torn from their
homes by the hands of brutes, in the shape of officers of the law, they were
hurled through the gates, and left to rot in the company of the robber, the
pirate, the murderer.
This class of felons were guilty of a hideous crime, deserving of worse
penalties than theft or murder.
They were called
Insolvent Debtors
.
To me, this law of imprisonment for debt has ever seemed a holy thing,
worthy of the golden age of New Zealand, when burning little children and
innocent women, was a pleasant pastime for the jocular cannibals. It is
indeed a blessed law, worthy of the blood and tears which were shed in the
Revolution to establish our liberties. It merely converts your honest man
into a felon, inviting him most cordially to commit robbery, forgery or
murder
,
for these things are not punished with half the severity that visits the
head of your Unfortunate Debtor. Your forger can buy his Law
sometimes
his Judgeyour Murderer may procure a pardon from a merciful
Governor, but what mercy is there for the wretch who owes money, which
he cannot pay?
In order more effectually to demonstrate the beauty of this law as it
existed some thirty years ago, in all its purity, let me beseech you to look
through the grated windows of Walnut street gaol, in the quiet of this
evening
hour.
It is a cell that we behold; four bare walls, a chair or too, a miserable
couch. There is some sunshine here. Yes, the evening sun shines through
the grates, on the floor of the cell, and lights up the sad face of the Mother,
who with her children bends over the couch. You must not mind their
tears; you must laugh at their sobs, for the Husband, the Father, who
writhes on that couch, is an Insolvent Debtor.
He was once a man of noble presence, somewhat tall in stature, with a
frank, ingenious countenance, deep tranquil eyes, and a brow that bore the
marks of a strong intellect.
Now, the mere wreck of a manface, form, brow, all withered, eyes
dimmed, and jaw fallenhe quivers on the couch of this Walnut street
gaol.
Why this change? For long years, pursued by honest gentlemen, with
thin lips, pinched faces, eyes bleared with the lust of gain, this Manfor he
is
still
a Manhas went through all the tortures with which poets, in their
imaginary hells, afflict the damned. They have hounded him in the streets,
in the church, in the house, yelling a kind of bloodhound's bay all the while,
and at last driven him into the gaol.
He is there, dying; his wife, his children by his side. The curses of
pirates, thieves, pickpockets, murderers, echo through the iron-banded
door.
Mother! Take your children by the hand; lead them to the window;
bid them look through the green trees, and behold yonder steeple glittering
in the sun. That is Independence Hall.
And here, on the debtor's couch, in the felon's gaol, lies one of the
Signers of the Declaration of Independence. Here, dying in slow agony,
writhes the man who gave arms to Washington, money to Congress; and
by his resolute energy, saved his country in the darkest hour of peril.
Robert Morris
dying in a felon's gaol
It is too much! For the honor of our country, for the sake of that
respect which honest shame and honorable poverty claims in every clime,
among all men, we cannot go on.
But those times, when Men were made felons by the holy law of
Imprisonment
for Debt have passed away. The law exists no longer in any
civilized community. It is true, that in two or three barbarous despotisms
we cannot call them statesthis law does yet remain in force, but this
merely leaves us to infer, that the majority of its
honest
citizens are felons,
needing infamous enactments to keep them in order.
No man can call himself an American citizen, who dwells in such a
community, or submits to such a despotism.
What beautiful words these are for history, to be read in connection with
each other
Robert Morris! A felon's gaol
!
XX.THE LAST OF THE SIGNERS.
Come
to the window, old man!
Come, and look your last upon this beautiful earth! The day is dying;
the year is dying; you are dying; so light and leaf and life, mingle in one
common death, as they shall mingle in one resurrection.
Clad in a dark morning gown, that revealed the outlines of his tall form,
now bent with ageonce so beautiful in its erect manhoodhe rises from
his chair, which is covered with pillows, and totters to the window,
spreading
forth his thin white hands.
Did you ever see an old man's face, that combines all the sweetness of
childhood, with the vigor of matured intellect? Snow-white hair falling in
flakes around a high and open brow, eyes that gleam with mild clear light,
a mouth moulded in an expression of benignity almost divine?
It is the Fourteenth of November, 1832; the hour is sunset, and the man
Charles Carroll of Carrolton, THE LAST OF THE SIGNERS.
Ninety-five years of age, a weak and trembling old man, he has
summoned
all his strength and gone along the carpeted chamber to the window,
his dark gown contrasted with the purple curtains.
He is the last!
Of the noble Fifty-Six, who in the Revolution stood forth, undismayed
by the axe or gibbet, their mission the freedom of an age, the salvation of a
country, he alone remains!
One by one the pillars have crumbled from the roof of the temple, and
now the lasta trembling columnglows in the sunlight, as it is about to fall.
But for the pillar that crumbles there is no hope, that it shall ever tower
aloft in its pride again, while for this old man about to sink in the night of
the grave, there is a glorious hope. His memory will live. His soul will
live, not only in the presence of its God, but on the tongues and in the
hearts of millions. The band in which he counts one, can never be
forgotten. The last!
As the venerable man stands before us, the declining day imparts a warm
flush to his face, and surrounds his brow with a halo of light. His lips
move without a sound; he is recalling the scenes of the Declaration, he is
murmuring the names of his brothers in the good work.
All gone but him!
Upon the woodsdyed with the rainbow of the closing yearupon the
stream, darkened by masses of shadow, upon the homes peeping out from
among the leaves, falls mellowing the last light of the declining day.
He will never see the sun rise again.
He feels that the silver cord is slowly, gently loosening; he knows that
the golden bowl is crumbling at the fountain's brink. But Death comes on
him as a sleep, as a pleasant dream, as a kiss from beloved lips!
He feels that the land of his birth has become a Mighty People, and
thanks God that he was permitted to behold its blossoms of hope, ripen into
full life.
In the recess near the window, you behold an altar of prayer; above it,
glowing in the fading light, the Image of Jesus seems smiling even in
agony, around that death-chamber.
The old man turns aside from the window. Tottering on he kneels
beside
the altar, his long dark robe drooping over the floor. He reaches forth
his white hands; he raises his eyes to the face of the Crucified.
There in the sanctity of an old man's last prayer, we will leave him.
There where amid the deepening shadows, glows the Image of the Saviour,
there where the light falls over the mild face, the wavy hair, and tranquil
eyes of the aged patriarch.
The smile of the Saviour was upon the Declaration on that perilous day,
the Fourth of July, 1776, and now that its promise has brightened into
fruition,
He
seemshe does smile on it againeven as his sculptured
image meets the dying gaze of Charles Carroll of Carrolton,
THE LAST OF THE SIGNERS.
THE VIOLATOR OF THE GRAVE.
A SEQUEL TO THE FOURTH OF JULY, 1776.
56
SEQUEL TO THE FOURTH OF JULY, 1776.
THE VIOLATOR OF THE GRAVE.
Among
the many wretches who skulk in the dens of a large city, there
is one whose very name excites a sensation of overwhelming disgust.
It is not the Thief, for even he driven mad by hunger and pilfering a
crust, to keep life in him, may have some virtues. Nor is it the Murderer,
who plunges his knife from a dark alley into the back of the wayfarer,
returning
home to his wife and children. Nor yet the Hangman, who for a
few dollars, puts on a mask of crape, mounts a gibbet, and chokes a human
being in slow agony to death, all in the name of the Law. Nor is it the
miserable vagabond of the large city, who covered with rags and sores,
sleeps at night in the ditch, picks his food from the gutter's filth, and is
found dead some morning with a bottle of alcoholic poison beside him, and
no one, not even a dog, to claim his corse.
The Wretch of whom we speak, must in point of ignominy claim
precedence
over all these, Thief, Murderer, Hangman, Vagabond. He goes at
dead of night, into the silence of the graveyard, and with spade and axe in
hand, roots out from the consecrated earth the coffin of some one, fondly
belovedit may be a Father, a Sister, a Wife, a Motherand coolly
splintering the lid drags forth the corse, huddles it grotesquely in his
sack, and sells it for a few dollars.
Polite language has no name for this wretch, who like a fiendish beast
makes a meal from the dead, but in the language of those who purchase his
wares, he is called a
Body-Snatcher
.
A great painter once maintained a learned argument in favor of the
strange fancy, that every human face bore a striking resemblance to the face
of some animal. I am not disposed to affirm the truth of this supposition,
but a fancy has often arisen in my mind, that for every depraved wretch
whom we find skulking in rags in the holes of a large city, there may be
found another wretch precisely similar, in the fine mansions, and beneath
the broadcloth garments of the wealthy and educated classes.
The thief who shivering in rags and gnawed with hunger rots in the
ditch, has his parallel in the Thief who dressed in satin, sits perched on a
banker's desk, robbing widows and orphans with religious deliberation. So
the Hangman who chokes to death for a few dollars, reminds us of the
Bribed Judge, who for his pricesay a thousand dollarswill sentence to
the gallows an innocent man, or set free the murderer of a mother.
But where shall we find the fellow of the grave-violatorthe
Body-Snatcher
of polite life?
Look yonder, my dear friend, and behold a magnificent saloon brilliantly
lighted, and crowded with one dense mass of ladies and gentlemen, who
wear rich apparel and come elegantly in carriages, with liveried negroes,
and coats of arms, and all other indications of an excessively refined
aristocracy.
These ladies and gentlemen all turn their eyes to one point. Behold the
point of interest! While silks rustle, and plumes wave, and eye-glasses
move to and fro, behold under the glare of the chandelier, a man of middle
age, clad in sober black, with a roll of paper in his hand. He lays the roll
of paper on the desk, erected in the centre of the platform, covered with
green baize, and lifts his head.
It is a striking face! The hue yellow, its texture parchment, the eyes
pale grey, the lips pinched until they are invisible, the whole physiognomy
reminding you of a skull, dressed up for a Christmas pantomime by the
buffoon of a circus.
Who is this individual? Hark? He speaks in a soft silvery voice, with
a gesture that reminds you of a hyena prowling round the fresh mould of a
new made grave.
That my friends, is the
Body-Snatcher
of polite life. He does not, like
his brother, the grave-violator of the hut, steal a corse and sell it for a few
dollars, but he does something more. He takes up the Memories of the
Dead, and so covers them with his venom, that History can no more
recognize
her heroes, than you can the corse which lies mangled on the
dissecting table.
This Body-Snatcher of the lecture room does not ravage graveyards; no!
History is a graveyard to him, and he tears souls from their shrines, and
withers hearts into dust. He would be very indignant, were you to
introduce
him to his brother, the Body-Snatcher of the hut, and yet the
graveyard
mould, on the hands of the ragged wretch, is holy in the sight of
Heaven, compared with one shred of the apparel worn by the finely-dressed
Body-Snatcher of the lecture room.
Behold him as he stands there, before his aristocratic audience, in his
sober black apparel and skull-like face; listen to his voice, as for a weary
hour, he belabors dead men with libels, calls their corsesCoward! and
lets his base soul forth, to slander among the graves of heroes.
How far these remarks will apply to a recent Reviewer of
Thomas
Paine
, we will leave to the judgment of the impartial reader.
This Reviewer, whom it is not necessary to name, as he merely forms
one in the large class of lecturers and essayists to which he belongs,
determined
to deliver before an American audience, a sketch of the life, writings,
and death of the author of Common Sense. It must be confessed, that
he had made ample preparations for the task. To a knowledge of the law,
he had added an intimate acquaintance with the arts and mysteries of
banking
,
and all the ways and windings of the science of politics. The
complete
statue of his character, moulded from the bar, the bank, and the
barroom
,
shapen of the most incongrous materials, was mellowed and refined
by a warm glow of morality. This was what made it so charming to hear
the lecturer discourse of Thomas Paine; he was so eminently moral, so
financially pure, so legally just and politically religious!
As he rises before us, with his green bag in one hand, his last political
letter in the other, let us hear him discourse of the man whom Washington
delighted to call his friend.
He observed:
`That to dig from an almost forgotten grave, the intellectual character of
Thomas Paine, the object of violent obloquy during life, and of contumely
after death, might not be without its uses. It might be done now, without
offence, without injustice. Many a teacher of pernicious doctrine, had by
the purity of his domestic relations, left behind him a sort of protective
character.There were surviving relatives and friends, or those who knew
surviving relatives and friends, who disarmed even just criticism, and
standing
around the grave claimed pity for themselves if not for the poor
inhabitants
below.'
This is beautiful, considered merely as a classic sentiment, but divine as
a moral apothegm. Let us illustrate its force by an exanple. We all
know that there were other Traitors beside Arnold in the Revolution, who
escaped disgrace and the gallows, made money by chaffering with both
parties, and died in the odour of a suspicious sanctity, leaving a dubious
fame to their children. Suppose I was to go forth on some dark night, to
the grave of one of those Traitors, take up his corse, strip from it the mark
of patriotism, and show it by the light of history, a base and dishonored
thing, for all its thick coating of gold? Would not this be perfectly fair,
admirably just?
Yes
, shrieks a Relative of the Traitor, who stands palsied
and trembling on the brink of his Ancestor's grave, `
It is fair, it is just!
But spare the traitor for the sake of his descendants! It is true, he
bargained
with both parties, it is true he heaped up gold by his double treason,
it is true that these facts are written down by men who never lied, and
only kept in the shade by the wealth of the Traitor's descendants, but
spare him for the sake of those descendants! Spare him for the sake of
his respectable connections! Spare him for the sake of his Gold!
And I would spare him. Who can doubt it? The lecturer himself,
with all his serene purity, and severe love of morality, would deal gently,
very gently with the memory of a Masked Traitor, who died wealthy and
left a dubious glory to his children.
But continues our gifted friend, Thomas Paine had none of these.
He was childless, friendless. Nor was there a human being in this wide
world, who cared a jot for him or his memory.
Yes, it is just! Go to the grave of this childless, friendless man; lift
from his ashes the coffin lid; bring forth his skull, and cover it with the
saliva of an honest lawyer's indignation! He has no gold to buy immunity
from history; no friends to stand beside his grave, beseeching pity for the
poor inhabitant below. `The Lion is dead, and a dog may rend him now.'
It may be true, eloquent and honest Reviewer, that not a
human being
in the wide world cares a jot for him or his memory now
, but there was
a time, when Washington, Jefferson, Adams called him friend, and
Benjamin
Rush styled him the forerunner of Jefferson, in the great work of
Independence
.
These men after a fashion, may be called human beings.
But what estimate do you place on the phrase `
human being?
' Does it
mean, in your way of thinking, an artful pettifogger, who fattens on the
frauds of banks, and grows famous in the annals of political iniquity? Then
not a `
human being
' in the wide world cares a jot for Thomas Paine or
his memory. For Thomas Paine, with all his errors, ever directed the
lightning of his pen against such human beings.
Or, by `human being,' do you mean a man who gets his bread by honest
toil, and scorns to bow down to treason, though it comes masked in gold, and
refuses to reverence a Traitor's blood, though it has been diluted in the veins
of some half dozen generations?
Ten thousand such `human beings,' scattered through this Union, at this
hour, `care a jot' for the memory of Thomas Paine. Ten thousand noble
hearts pity his faults, admire his virtues, and throb with the strong
pulsations
of scorn, when they behold his skull polluted by the leper's touch.
The lecturer, in his career about the grave of Paine, exhibits two
remarkable
qualities in great perfection, critical acumen and love of truth. So well
does he love truth, that he dangles at her heels continually, his deep passion,
for the coy beauty filling with modest blushes, and preventing him forever,
from any actual contact with her. So fine is the temper of the critical steel
which he wields, that even while he is supposed to be flashing it before your
eyes, you cannot see it. He seems indeed to have made an art, perfect in
all its parts, of avoiding a solemn truth, without seeming to do so, and
criticising
a book or passage into nothing, apparently unconscious of the maxim:
It is a base thing to lie at all, but to lie like truth, or lie by insinuation
is the work of an intellectual assassin
.
Our Reviewer, in his attempts to display his great powers, occasionally
rises into the sublime, or at all events, into something very near it, the
ridiculous: he reminds us of Paine's remark:
The sublime of the critics, like some parts of Edmund Burke's sublime
and beautiful, is like a wind-mill just visible in a fog, which imagination
might distort into a flying mountain, or an archangel, or a flock of wild
geese.
Let us look at his criticism: He calls Common Sense a diatribe
against king, queens and prelates.
There is a great deal in a word. It would not do for our lecturer to call
this book a vulgar attack against kings, queens and prelates, for he is well
aware, that its most violent passages, in relation to these holy personages,
are copied, word for word, from the Book of God; Samuel's eloquent
appeal
to the Hebrews, against the monstrosites of monarchy, being quoted in
full. But he calls it a `
diatribe
.' Choice word! Let us see how it will
look in another connection. `The Declaration of Independence was a
diatribe
against King George,' or `Washington's farewell address a
diatribe
against the evils of party spirit.' There is about as much vulgarity in either
of those productions, as in Paine's Common Sense; the word `diatribe'
would, in the mouth of our lecturer, eminently apply to them.
Again, with a gravity as commendable as that of the Italian friar, who
addressed his cap as Martin Luther, and completely vanquished his
speechless
antagonist, who of course, did not utter a word in reply,the Reviewer
of Paine observes:
Common Sensea book of no particular merit, owing its celebrity and
power to its being well-timed
.
Very good. Washingtons attack at Trenton, was by no means, such a
great affair as Napoleon's battle of Waterloo, yet still it had one meritit
was
well-timed
. Napoleon's coming back from Elba, was remarkably
common-place, but
well-timed
. Cortez burning his ships, did a very tame
thing, imitated from Alexander the Great, yet withal it was
well-timed
.
That Common Sense should have been well-timed, seems a small thing
in our reviewer's eyes. To be sure, it aroused a nation into Thought, or
rather, gave its burning thought a tongue as deep and tempestuous as the
voice of thunder; to be sure, it wrote the word Independence in every
heart, by one bold effort, prepared the way for the Declaration, yet still it
is a very tame affair: merely well-timed.
We wish we could say as much of our lecturer's production. It may be
as powerful as a speech in the Criminal Court, adroit as a banker's
speculation
,
impetuous as a politician's letter, offering to bribe voters, by whole
counties, yet still it is not
well-timed
. The day may come when it will
merit that praise. In some distant golden age, when the temples of religion
will bear the inscription `To lie is to worship God,' and the only capital
offence, punishable with death, will be the utterance of a Truth, and then
but not till thenthis Reviewer's lecture will be
well-timed
.
Let us look at this book of no particular merit: for a work so weak,
this is a somewhat forcible sentence.
Government, like dress, is the badge of lost innocence; the palaces of
kings are built upon the ruins of the bowers of paradise.
Listen to Common Sense on Monarchy:
For monarchy in every instance is the Popery of government. To the
evil of monarchy we have added that of hereditary succession; and as the
first is a degradation and lessening of ourselves, so the second, claimed as a
matter of right, is an insult and imposition on posterity. For all men being
originally equals, no
one
by
birth
, could have a right to set up his own
family, in perpetual preference to all others for ever, and though himself
might deserve
some
decent degree of honors of his cotemporaries, yet his
descendants might be far too unworthy to inherit them. One of the strongest
natural
proofs of the folly of hereditary right in Kings, is that nature
disapproves
it, otherwise she would not so frequently turn it into ridicule, by
giving mankind an
Ass for a Lion
.
Here is an opinion which no doubt shocked King George, and our
eloquent
reviewer, with the same deep horror:
Of more worth is one honest man to society, and in the sight of God,
than all the crowned ruffians that ever lived.
With regard to the oft-repeated watch-word of American admirers of
EnglandGreat Britain is the Mother country,thus speaks Common
Sense:
But Britain is the parent country, say some. Then the more shame
upon her conduct. Even brutes do not devour their young, nor savages
make war upon their families; wherefore, the assertion, if true, turns to her
reproach; but it happens not to be true, or only partly so, and the phrase
parent
or
mother country
hath been jesuitically adopted by the king and
his parasites, with a low papistical design of gaining an unfair bias on the
credulous weakness of our minds. Europe, and not England, is the parent
country of America. This new world hath been the asylum for the
persecuted
lovers of civil and religious liberty from
every part
of Europe. Hither
have they fled, not from the tender embraces, but from the cruelty of the
monster; and it is so far true of England, that the same tyranny which
drove the first emigrants from home, pursues their descendants still.
Speaking to those persons who still advocated a reconciliation with
England:
But if you say, you can still pass the violations over, then I ask, hath
your house been burnt? Hath your property been destroyed before your
face? Are your wife and children destitute of a bed to lie on, or bread to
live on? Have you lost a parent or a child by their hands, and yourself
the ruined and wretched survivor? If you have not, then are you not a
judge of those who have. But if you have, and can still shake hands with
the murderers, then are you unworthy the name of husband, father, friend,
or lover, and whatever may be your rank or title in life, you have the heart
of a coward, and the spirit of a sycophant.
Again:
Ye that tell us of harmony and reconciliation, can ye restore to us the
time that is past? Can ye give to prostitution its former innocence? Neither
can ye reconcile Britain and America. The last cord now is broken, the
people of England are presenting addresses against us. There are injuries
which nature cannot forgive; she would cease to be nature if she did. As
well can the lover forgive the ravisher of his mistress, as the continent
forgive
the murders of Britain. The Almighty hath implanted in us these
inextinguishable feelings, for good and wise purposes. They are the
guardians
of his image in our hearts, and distinguish us from the herd of common
animals. The social compact would dissolve, and justice be extirpated
from the earth, or have only a casual existence were we callous to the
touches of affection. The robber and the murderer would often escape
unpunished
,
did not the injuries which our tempers sustain, provoke us into
justice.
O! ye that love mankind! Ye that dare oppose, not only the tyranny,
but the tyrant, stand forth! Every spot of the old world is overrun with
oppression. Freedom hath been haunted around the globe. Asia, and
Africa, have long expelled her. Europe regards her like a stranger, and
England hath given her warning to depart. O! receive the fugitive, and
prepare in time an asylum for mankind.
This rude author of Common Sense had some idea of our resources;
hear him in his iron-handed style:
In almost every article of defence we abound. Hemp flourishes even to
rankness, so that we need not want cordage. Our iron is superior to that
of other countries. Our small arms equal to any in the world. Cannon
we can cast at pleasure. Saltpetre and gunpowder we are every day
producing
.
Our knowledge is hourly improving. Resolution is our inherent
character, and courage hath never yet forsaken us. Therefore, what is it
we want? Why is it that we hesitate? From Britain we can expect
nothing but ruin. If she is once admitted to the government of America
again, this continent will not be worth living in. Jealousies will be always
arising, insurrections will be constantly happening; and who will go forth
to quell them? Who will venture his life to reduce to own countrymen to
a foreign obedience? The difference between Pennsylvania and Connecticut,
respecting some unlocated lands, shows the insignificance of a British
government
,
and fully proves that nothing but continental authority can regulate
continental matters.
One passage more, in order to prove the puerility of the work:
We have it in our power to begin the world over again. A situation,
similar to the present, hath not happened since the days of Noah until now.
The birthday of a new world is at hand, and a race of men, perhaps as
numerous as all Europe contains, are to receive their portion of freedom
from the events of a few months. The reflection is awfuland in this
point of view, how trifling, how ridiculous, do the little paltry cavilings, of
a few weak or interested men appear, when weighed against the business
of a world.
Here is a specimen of Paine's advice to great men. It was originally
applied to Sir William Howe, but will eminently suit our reviewer:
But how, sir, shall we dispose of you? The invention of a statuary is
exhausted, and Sir William is yet unprovided with a monument. America
is anxious to bestow her funeral favors upon you, and wishes to do it in a
manner that shall distinguish you from all the deceased heroes of the last
war. The
Egyptian method of embalming
is not known to the present
age, and hieroglyphical pageantry hath outlived the science of decyphering
it. Some other method, therefore, must be thought of to immortalize the
new knight of the windmill and post. Sir William, thanks to his stars, is
not oppressed with very delicate ideas. He has no ambition of being
wrapped up and handed about in myrrh, aloes and cassia. Less expensive
odors will suffice; and it fortunately happens, that the simple genius of
America hath discovered the art of preserving bodies, and embellishing them
too, with much greater frugality than the ancients. In balmage, sir, of
humble
tar, you will be as secure as Pharoah, and in a hieroglyphic of feathers,
rival in finery all the mummies of Egypt.
Do you not think that these passages indicate a work of some particular
merit?The Reviewer continues his critical excursion in this style:
He next wrote the Crisis, a series of papers, sixteen in number; and
designed as popular appeals. They bore the signature of Common Sense.
The first words of the first number, written two days before the battle of
Trenton, have become part of our household words:These are the
times that try men's souls. Yet, it is manifest that with all Paine's
aptitude at coining popular phrases, there was no spring of true eloquence
in him. And when he wrote under immediate and outward pressure, and
without an opportunity of revision and slow elaboration, no matter how
great the occasion or intense the excitementhe wrote feebly and
impotently
.
The fourth paper dated the day after the battle of Brandywine is
given as an instance.
These remarks made in the face of day, in the Nineteenth Century, can
only be answered with a sentence of Thomas Paine: There is dignity in
the warm passions of a whig, which is never to be found in the cold malice
of a Tory. In the one nature is only heatedin the other she is
poisoned.
We must admit that the lecturer has the best right to think meanly of
Paine, for as we see by this sentence, Paine had but an inferior opinion of
the party to which our critical friend appertains.
You will perceive that he gives this short article, published the day after
the battle of the Brandywine, as an instance of impotence in style.
This impotent essay, written in the fear of British occupation amid the
palpitations of popular panic, comprises this weak line:
We fight not to enslave, but to set a country free, and to make room
upon the earth for honest men to live in.
There was no spring of true eloquence in him! Pity poor Tom
Paine! The fountain of his thoughts did not flow from the marble portals
of a bankchartered to rob by wholesalenor from the miasmatic
corridors
of a Criminal Court. There was no spring of true eloquence in
him! Weep for Tom Paine! Had he but wielded a green bag, and
written letters on the eve of a popular election, kindly offering to pay for a
handsome majority, there might have been a spring of true eloquence in his
breast, but as the case stands in history, he was but an Author and Poor!
Our rich, and of course virtuous reviewer, thus disposes of a work which
Washington and La Fayette did not hesitate to honor with their names on
the dedication page:
It was not long before he began to write again; and in rapid succession,
a batch of revolutionary pamphlets were published. Among them was the
Rights of Man, in reply to Mr. Burke's Reflections; and though the
reader of the present day may smile at the contrast, it is idle to deny that
Paine made an impression in Great Britain. His grotesque and often
vigorous phrases told on the excited mind of the populace.
A batch of revolutionary pamphlets! Singular felicity of phrase!
Take all the addresses issued by Conventions in 1775, all the papers
penned by Jefferson or Henry, all the eloquent appeals impressed with the
power of Adams or the weight of Washington's name, and you have not a
selection of the noblest gems of patriotism and literature, but a`batch of
revolutionary pamphlets!'
Our lecturer's morality and patriotism all must admire. To slander the
childless dead is no sin. To write Common Sense, and awake a Nation
into a sense of their rights, is merely to pen `a diatribe.' To defend the
57
rights of man against the elegant sycophant of royalty, Edmund Burke, who
thought the carcass of monarchy was beautiful because he flung flowers
upon its festering pollution, and concealed the worms upon its brow with
the mushroom blossoms of metaphor, is not to do a noble deed, but simply
to write one of abatch of revolutionary pamphlets.
But it seems the fellow'sgrotesque and vigorous phrases told on the
excited
mind of the populace. Yes: so the grotesque and vigorous phrases
of Samuel Adams told on the excited mind of the
populace
, who in Boston
Harbor disguised as Indians, drowned a cargo of British tea.
Here is one of the grotesque and vigorous phrases of Thomas Paine,
selected at random from the Rights of Man:
If systems of government can be introduced less expensive, and more
productive of general happiness, than those which have existed, all attempts
to oppose their progress will in the end prove fruitless. Reason, like time,
will make its own way, and prejudice will fall in the combat with interest.
If universal peace, harmony, civilization and commerce are ever to be the
happy lot of man, it cannot be accomplished but by a revolution in the
present system of governments. All the monarchical governments are
military. War is their trade, plunder and revenue their objects. While
such governments continue, peace has not the absolute security of a day.
What is the history of all monarchical governments but a disgustful picture
of human wretchedness, and the accidental respite of a few years repose?
Wearied with war, and tired of human butchery, they sat down to rest and
called it peace. This certainly is not the condition that heaven intended
for man; and if
this be monarchy
, well might monarchy be reckoned among
the sins of the Jews.
Doubtless the reader of the present day, will smile at the contrast
between
Mr. Burke's reflections and Thomas Paine's Rights of Man. Burke
was an elegant gentleman in a court dress, with a nosegay in his
button-hole
.
Paine but a man, with the garb of a freeman upon his form. Burke
with his pretty figures and dainty words, wept for the French King and
cried his eyes out of their sockets for Marie Antoinette. Paine the vulgar
fellow, reserved his tears for the hundred millions of France, who had been
ground into powder by this king and his predecessors in iniquity, for the
women, the poor women of that enslaved land, who for ages had been
made the tool of a tyrant's lust or the victims of his power. Burke reminds
us of a spectator of a barbarous murder, who instead of defending the
prostrate
woman from the knife of the assassin, coolly takes paper and pencil
from his pocket and begins a sketch of the scene, exclaiming as the blood
streams from the victim's throatWhat a striking picture! Paine is
merely an honest member of the populace, for while Burke makes his
picture, he springs at the murderer's throat, and rescues the bleeding woman
from his knife.
Meanwhile our lecturer stands quietly by, and `smiles at the contrast'
between the elegant Burke and the vulgar Paine.
We might crowd our pages with illustrations of Thomas Paine's power.
We might suffer him to speak for himself, in his clear-thoughted,
iron-tongued
style. And yet whole pages, extracted from his works, stamped
with genius and glittering with beauties, bear no more comparison to the
full volume of his intellect, than a drop to the ocean, orto use an
imperfect
comparisonthan the instinctive malignity of a hyena, to the
cold-blooded
malice of our Reviewer.
They have been more read, more quoted, more copied, than any political
papers ever written. We hazard nothing, when we state, that our ablest
statesmen, for the last fifty years, have freely used the pages of Paine, in
their best papers, in some instances without a word of credit. Such phrases
as These are the times that try men's souls, have become republican
scripture in every American heart.
You will be surprised, reader, after perusing these passages, at the
hardihood
of our lecturer, who with all his love of truth, prepers Burke to Paine,
King George to Washington, the applause of an aristocratic audience to the
good opinion of the populace.
You will be somewhat indignant withal; while the strong throb of honest
anger,if the bite of a reptile can excite angerswells your bosom, you
will be induced to ask this Reviewer`Could you not be a man for once
in your life? Scorned by the living, could you not leave the dead alone?
Were there not other graves to desecrate, other skulls on which to vent
your venom. Nay! Why, in your ferocious appetite for dead men's
bones, you did not dis-inter a Traitor of the Revolution, who has come
down to our time, baptised in a miserable glory?'
But these words would have been lost on the Violator of the Grave. He
wished to build a character for religion and morality. Paine was the author
of a deistical work; Paine died childless. The Grave-Violator beheld this
glorious opportunity! He could abuse the deistical author, and slander the
childless dead! His reputation as a defender of religion would be
established
;
he, the coiner of falsehoods as base as a Malay's steel, would be
quoted as aChristian!
Christianity was to be indebted for a character to him, who in sober
charity, had none to spare.
But he overshot his mark. While he dealt a just rebuke to the Infidel,
he should have spared the Patriot. While he took the last years of Paine's
life, and held them up to the laughter of the cold and heartless crowd, he
should have stepped lightly over his Revolutionary career. For in the sound
of his voice, there was an old man, who remembered Thomas Paine, writing
his Crisis, in 1776, and tracking his bloody footsteps in the snow, while a
certain officer of the Continental army, was basely bargaining with the
enemy and hungering to be bought.
While he struck his coward's blow upon the dead man's skull, he should
have heard the whisper of prudenceTake care! There are other dead
than Thomas Paine! There are other traitors than Benedict Arnold!
As a specimen of our Reviewer's love of truth, we need only make a
reference to the passage of his lecture, in which he states, that Paine, in
Paris, `
voted for the abolition of Royalty, and the trial of the King
.'
This is all he tells us. He does not say how he voted on the trial of the
King; that would not serve his purpose. He merely voted. He may
have voted life! or death! but the lecturer dares not condescend to say a
word. His object is to leave the impression on your mind, that Paine voted
for the execution of the Monarch, when the fact is notorious, that he nobly
defended Louis from the penalty of death, and in the most lowering hour of
the Convention, pointed to the United States as an asylum for guilty Royalty.
Which is most contemptible, the bold utterance, or the snake-like
insinuation
of a Lie? The bite of the bull-dog, or the hiss of the viper?
The hatred which the lecturer bears to Paine, does not even cease with
his death. Listen
About ten years after Paine's death, Cobbett made a pilgrimage to New
Rochelle, disinterred the mouldering bones, and removed them to Great
Britain. It was a piece of independent and ineffectual mockery.
The
bones of the scoffer were looked on by such of the British people as knew
any thing about them, with no more regard than the anatomical student
bestowed on the unknown carcass before him
.
I do not know your opinion, but were I to meet the wretch who wrote
the italicized sentence, on a dark night, by the lonely roadside, I would at
once look for the knife or pistols in his hands, and prepare to defend my
life from the attack of an assassin.
The unknown carcass had once embodied a soul which Washington
recognized in words like these:
Rocky-Hill
,
Sept., 10th, 1783.
I have learned since I have been at this place, that you are at
Bordentown
.
Whether for the sake of retirement or economy, I know not. Be
it for either, for both, or whatever it may, if you will come to this place,
and partake with me, I shall be exceedingly happy to see you.
Your presence may remind congress of your past services to this
country
;
and if it is in my power to impress them, command my best exertions
with freedom, as they will be rendered cheerfully by one, who entertains a
lively sense of the importance of your works, and who, with much pleasure
subscribes himself,
Your sincere friend,
G. WASHINGTON.
If it were possible at this late day, to recover the skeletons of Judas
Iscariot and Benedict Arnold, much as I despise these melancholy examples
of human frailty, I would not insult even their bones, by placing the
carcass of this Reviewer in their company.
The wretch who can thus insult the dead, is not worthy of a resting
place, even among traitors. Did I believe the Pythagorean doctrine of
transmigration of souls, I would know where to look for the soul of this
Reviewer, after death. There is an animal that fattens on corses: it is
called the hyena.
But our task is done. We have gone through the nauseous falsehoods,
the vulgar spite, the brutal malignity of this man, and felt inclined in his
case, to reverse our religious creed and believe in Total Depravity. He
cannot claim from me, nor from any human being, the slightest pity. He has
violated the grave of the dead, and must not complain, if his own life is
made the subject of scathing analysis. Will it bear the light?. All the
talent ever possessed by himself, or anything of his name, bolstered by
wealth and puffed by pedantry, would not be sufficient to create one line,
worthy of Thomas Paine.
By this time, it is to be hoped, that the lecturer, and others of the same
class, will have learned that Thomas Paine is not altogether friendless. It
is not a safe thing to attack his Patriot Name. The man who consents
to do the work of a grave violator, must not expect favor from the People.
His only support will prove, only a broken and rotten reed. At all events, the
person who makes the attack, must look to his own life, and expect to be
treated in the same manner as he treats the dead. Stand forth, calumniator!
Will you submit your life to this scrutiny? You dare not. You can bluster
over dead men's graves, but you fear the living. Yes, you are afraid of
Light, of History, of the Past: well you know why; too well! Behold
the man of courage! He only attacks
childless
dead men!
But Thomas Paine is not childless. He left behind him Common Sense,
the Crisis and the Rights of Man; children that can never die, but will
outlive all Traitors and descendants, to the end of time.
BOOK SIXTH.
ROMANCE OF THE REVOLUTION.
MICHAEL XXX,
I.A TRADITION OF THE TWO WORLDS.
One
dark and stormy night, in the year 1793, a soldier was returning
home
Homeafter the toil and bloodshed of many a well-fought battle; home
to receive his father's blessingHome, to feel the kiss of his bride upon
his lips; home, for the second time in fourteen long years!
It was where the winding road looked forth upon the broad bosom of the
Chesapeake, that we first behold him.
On the summit of a dark grey rock, which arose above the gloomy
waves, he reined his steed. All was dark abovethe canopy of heaven,
one vast and funeral pall, on which the lightning ever and anon, wrote its
fearful hieroglyphbelow, the waves rolled heavily against the shore, their
deep murmur mingling with the thunder-peal.
The same lightning flash that traced its strange characters upon the pall
of a darkened universe, revealed the face and form of the warrior, every
point and outline of his war-steed.
For a moment, and a moment only, that lurid light rushed over the
waves and sky, and then all was night and chaos again.
Let us look upon the warrior by the glare of that lightning flash.
A man of some thirty years; his form massive in the chest, broad in the
shoulders, enveloped in a blue hunting frock faced with fur. From his right
shoulder a heavy cloak falls in thick folds over the form of his steed.
At this moment he lifts the trooper cap from his brow. Bathed in the
lightning glare you behold that high, straight forehead, shadowed by a mass
of short thick curls, and lighted by the soul of his large grey eyes. The
broad cheek bones, fair complexion, darkened into a swarthy brown, by the
toil of fourteen long years, firm lips, and square chin, all indicate a bold and
chivalrous nature.
His grey eye lights up with wild rapture, as he gazes far beyond upon
the Chesapeake, its surface now dark as ink, and now ruffled into one
white sheet of foam. And the noble horse which bears his form, with his
snow-white flanks seared with the marks of many a battle-scar, arches his
neck, tosses his head aloft, and with quivering nostrils and glaring eye,
seems to share the fiery contest of the elements.
It is an impressive picture which we behold; the white horse and his
rider, drawn by the lightning glare on the canvass of a darkened sky.
The rain beats against the warrior's brow, it turns to hail, and scatters its
pearls upon the snowy mane of his steed, among his thickly clustered locks,
yet still he sits uncovered there.
The gleaming eye and heaving chest, betoken a soul absorbed in
memories
of the past.
Yes, he is thinking of fourteen long years of absence from home, years
spent in the charge of battle, or the terror of the forlorn hope, or far away
in the wild woods, where the tomahawk gleams through the green leaves
of old forest trees.
He speaks to his horse, and calls him by name.
Old Legion
!
The horse quivers, starts, as with a thrill of delight, and utters a long and
piercing neigh.
He knows that name.
He has heard it in many a bloody fight; yes, swelling with the roar of
Brandywine, echoing from the mists of Germantown, whispered amid the
thunders of Monmouth; that name has ever been to the brave white horse,
the signal-note of battle.
Fourteen years ago, on this very rock, a boy of sixteen with long curling
hair, and a beardless cheek, reined in the noble white horse which he rode,
and while the moonlight poured over his brow, gave one last look at his
childhood's home, and then went forth to battle.
That white horse has now grown old. The marks of Germantown and
Valley Forge, and Camden, are written in every scar that darkens over
his snowy hide. The boy has sprung into hardy manhood; beard on his
chin, scars on his form, the light of resolution in his full grey eye, a sword
of iron in its iron sheath, hanging by his side.
Only a single year ago the white horse and his rider halted for a moment
on the summit of this rock, a mild summer breeze tossing the mane of the
steed, and playing with the warrior's curls. Then he had just bidden
farewell
to his betrothed, her kiss was yet fresh upon his lips. On his way to
the Indian wars, he resolved to return after the fight was over, and wed his
intended bride.
One year had passed since he beheld her, one year of peril far away
among the Alleghanies, or in the wood-bound meadows of the Miami.
Now covered with scars, his name known as the bravest among the
brave, he was returningHOME.
Old Legion! the souldier speaks to his steed, and in a moment you
see the gallant
war-horse-who
is named in memory of the Legion,
commanded
58
by the Partizan Leespring with a sudden bound from the rock,
and disappear in the shadows of the inland road.
Seven miles away from the Chesapeake, and the soldier would stand
upon the threshhold of his home.
Seven miles of a winding road, that now plunged into the shadows of
thick woods, now crossed some quiet brook, surmounted by a rude bridge,
now ascended yonder steep hill, with rocks crowned by cedars, darkening
on either side. Then came a long and level track with open fields, varied
by the tortuous Virginia fence, stretching away on either side.
While the rain freezing into hail, dashed against his brow, our soldier
spoke cheerily to his steed, and trees, and rocks, and fields, passed rapidly
behind him.
He was thinking of homeof that beautiful girlAlice!
Ah, how the memory of her form came smiling to his soul, through the
darkness, and hail, and rain of that stormy night. Look where he might,
he saw heryes, even as he left her one year ago. In the dark rocks
among the sombre pines, on the pall of the sky, or among the shadows of
the woodlook where he mighther image was there.
And this was the picture that memory with a free, joyous hand, and
colors gathered from the rainbowHopesketched on the canvass of the
past.
A young girl, standing on the rustic porch of her home, at dead of night
her form blooming from girlhood into womanenveloped in the loose
folds of a white gownwhile her bared arm holds the light above her head.
The downward rays impart a mild and softened glow to her face. Saw
you ever hair so dark, so glossy as that which the white 'kerchief lightly
binds? Eyes, so large and dark, so delicately fringed with long tremulous
lashes, as these which now gleam through the darkness of the night? Lips
so red and moist? A cheek so rounded and peach-like in its bloom? A
formneither majestic in its stature, nor queenly in its walkbut warm in
its hues, swelling in its outlines, lovable in its virgin freshness.
So rose the picture of his betrothed, to the imagination of the soldier.
So he beheld her one year agoeven now, closing his eyes in a waking
dream, which the thunder cannot dispel, he seems to hear her parting
words:
Good bye, Michael! Come back from the wars; O, come back soon
may God grant it! Then, Michael, as I have pledged a woman's truth
to you, we will be married!
A tear starts from the soldier's eye-lid. He has seen men fall in battle,
their skulls crushed by the horses' hoofs, and never wept. They were his
friends, his comrades, but his eye was tearless.This game of war hardens
the heart into iron.
But now, as the thought of his young and loving bride steals mildly over
his soul, he feels the tear-drop in his eye.
Dashing through the swollen waters of a brook, Michael the soldier,
begins to ascend the
last hill
. Lookas it darkens above him, look upon
its summit, by the lightning glare. You behold a group of oak treesthree
rugged, ancient formsstanding on the sod near the summit of the hill, their
branches spreading magnificently into the sky.
By the lightning flash Michael beholds the oaks, and knows that his
home is near. For looking from the foot of these old trees, you may behold
that home.
How his heart throbs, as Old Legion dashes up the hill!
In order to conceal his agitation, he talks aloud to his war-horse. Smile
at the hardy soldier if you will, but ere you sneer, learn something of that
strange companionship which binds the warrior and his steed together.
Even as the sunburnt sailor talks to the good old ship which bears him,
even as the hollow eyed student talks to the well-used volumes, which have
been Love and Home to him, in many an hour of poverty and scorn, so
talks the soldier of Lee's Legion to his gallant horse.
SohOld Legion! We've had many a tough time together, but soon
all our trials will be past! Many a tough time, old boyd'ye remember
Germantown? How we came charging down upon them, before the break
of day?
Or Monmouththat awful daywhen the sun killed ten, where the
bayonet and cannon-ball only killed one?
Or Camden, where we fled like whipped dogs? But I led the forlorn
hope, in the attack of Paulus Hook, on footwithout youmy Old
Legion?
Or d'ye remember the fights among the Injins? Mad Anthony Wayne
leading the charge, right into the thickest of the red-skins? Many a battle,
many a fight by day, any fray by night, we've had together, Old Legion
we've shared the last crustslept on the same hard groundhaven't we
old boy? And now we're going homehome to rest and quietness! I'll
settle down, beneath the roof of the old homestead; and as for youthere's
the broad meadow for you to ramble by day, and the clean straw for your
bed by night! I should like to see the man that would dare harness you
to a plough, my brave old war-horseno! no! No one shall ever mount
your back but your old master, orand a grim smile lighted the young
soldier's faceor, perhapsAlice!
As he spokethe rain beating beneath the steel front of his cap, all the
whilehe attained the summit of the hill. All was very dark around, all
was like a pall above, yet therestretching far to the north, over a dimly
defined fieldthe soldier beheld a long straight line of locust trees, their
green leaves crowned with snowy blossoms. Those trees, whose fragrance
imbued the blast which rushed against the soldier's brow, the very rain
which fell upon his cheekthose glorious trees, so luxuriant in foliage and
perfumeoverarched the lane which led toHome!
That home he could not see, for all was dark as chaosbut yonder from
over the level field, afar, there came a single quivering ray of light.
By that lightit was the fireside light of homehis father watched, and
AliceAh! she was there, toiling over some task of home, her thoughts
fixed upon her absent lover. For Alice, you will understand me, was that
most to be pitied of all human creaturesan orphan child. She had been
reared in the homestead of the Meadows; reared and protected from
tenderest
childhood by the old man, even Michael's father.
How the thought that SHE was waiting for him, stirred the fire-coals at
the soldier's heart!
Leaning from his steed, Michael the Soldier of Lee's Legion, unfastened
the rustic gate which divided the lane from the road, and in a momentDo
you hear the sound of the horse's hoofs under the locust trees?
Ah, that fragrance from the snowy flowers, how it speaks Home!
Near and nearer he drew. Now he sees the wicket fence, that surrounds
the old brick mansionnow, the tall poplars that stand about it, like grim
sentinelsand now! There is a thunder peal shaking the very earth, a
lightning flash illumining the universe, and then the clouds roll back, and as
a maiden from her lattice, so looks forth the moon from her window in
the sky.
There it lies, in the calm clear light of the moon. A mansion of dark
brick, surrounded by a wicket fence painted white, with straight poplars
encircling
it on every side.
A whispered word to his horse, and the soldier dashes on!
He reaches the wicket fence, flings the rein on the neck of his steed,
clears the palings at a bound, approaches yonder narrow, old-fashioned
window, and looks in
An old man, in a farmer's dress, with sunburnt face and white hair, sits
alone, leaning his elbow on the oaken table, his cheek upon his hand. Near
him the candle, flinging its beams over the withered face of the old man,
around the rustic furniture of the uncarpeted room.
The old man is alone. Alice is not there. Michael the soldier, gazes
long and earnestly, and gasps for breath. For, in one brief year, his father
sunk into extreme old agehis grey eyes, dim with moisture, his hair,
which was grey, has taken the color of snow, his mouth wrinkled and
fallen in.
Michael felt a dim, vague, yet horrible foreboding cross his heart.
Not daring to cross the threshhold, he gazed for a moment upon a window
on the opposite side of the door. The shutters were closed, but it was
her
room, the chamber of Alice. See slept thereah! He laughed at his fears,
smiled that horrible foreboding to scorn. She slept there, dreaming of him,
her lover, husband. He placed his finger on the latch, his foot upon the
threshhold.
At this moment he felt a hand press his own, a knotted, toil-hardened
hand. He turned and beheld the form of a Negro, clad in coarse
homespun
;
it was one of his father's slaves; his own favorite servant, who had
carried him in his brawny arms when but a child, thirty years ago.
De Lor bress you, Masa Mikel! Dis ole nigga am so glad you am
come home!
A rude greeting, but sincere. Michael wrung the negro's hand, and
uttered
a question with gasping breath:
Aliceshe is well? Alice, I saydo you hear Tonyshe is well?
In very common, but very expressive parlancewhich I hope your critic
will pick to pieces with his claw, even as an aged but eccentric hen picks
chaff from wheatthe old slave showed the whites of his eyes.
Ehah! he exclaimed, with a true African chuckleDo Massa
Mikel ax de old nigga, `Miss Alice well?' Lor! Ef you had only see,
yisserday, singin' on dis berry porch, like a robin in a locus' tree!
Michael did not pause to utter a word, but dashed his hand against the
latch, and crossed the threshhold of home.
At the same moment the old negro leaned his arms upon the banisters
of the porch, bowed his head, and wept aloud.
It was for joy. No doubt. Yes, with the true feeling of one of those
faithful African hearts, which share in every joy and sorrow of the master,
as though it were their own, the negro wept for joy.
Meanwhile, Michael rushed forward, and flung his arms about the old
man's neck.
Father, I am come home! Home for goodhome for life! You
know, some fourteen years ago, I left this place a boy, I came back a man,
a Soldier! A year ago, I left you for my last campaignit is overwe've
beat the Injinsand now I'm goin' to live and die by your side!
The old man looked up, and met the joyous glance of those large grey
eyes, surveyed the high, straight forehead, and the muscular form, and then
silently gathered the hands of his boy within his own.
God bless you, Michael! he said, in a clear, deep voice, yet with a
strong German accent.
But what's the matter, father? You don't seem wellain't you glad
to see me? Look hereI've brought this old sword home as a present for
you. Not very handsome, you'll say, but each of those dents has a story
of its own to tell. You see that deep notch? That was made by the cap
of a Britisher, at Paulus Hook, and thisbut God bless me! Father, you
are sickyou
The old man turned his eyes away, and pressed with a silent intensity
the hands of his son.
Sit down Michael, I want to talk with you.
Michael slid into a huge oaken arm chair; it was placed before the
hearth, and opposite a dark-panelled door, which opened into the next
chamberthe chamber of Alice.
The old man was silent. His head had sunken on his breast: his hands
relaxed their grasp.
Michael gazed upon him with a vague look of surprise, and then his eyes
wandered to the dark-panelled door.
She is asleep, Father?Shall I go to the door and call her, or will you?
Ah, the good girl will be so glad to see me!
Still the old man made no answer.
Ah! I see how it ishe's not wellglad to see me, to be sure, but old
age creeps on him. Thus murmuring, Michael sprang to his feet, seized
the light, and advanced to the dark-panelled door. You see, father, I'll go
myself. It will be such a surprise to her! I'll steal softly to her bed-side,
bend over her pillowha! ha! The first news she will have of my return,
will be my kiss upon her lips!
He placed his fingers on the latch.
The old man raised his head, beheld him, and started to his feet. With
trembling steps, he reached the side of his son.
My son, he cried, invoking the awful name of God, do not enter
that room!
You can see Michael start, his chivalrous face expanding with surprise,
while the light in his hand falls over the wrinkled features of his father.
Those features wear an expression so utterly sad, woe-begone,
horror-stricken
,
that Michael recoils as though a death-bullet had pierced his heart. His
hand, as if palsied, shrinks from the latch of the door.
For a moment there was a pause like death. You can hear the crackling
of the slight fire on the hearththe hard breathing of the old manbut all
beside is terribly still.
Father, what mean you? I tell you, I can face the bloodiest charge of
bayonets that ever mowed a battlefield of its living men, but thisI know
not what to call itthis silence, this mystery, it chills, yes, it
frightens
, me!
Still the old man breathed in hollow tones, marked with a deep guttural
accent, the name of God, and whispered
My son, do not enter that room!
But it is the room of Alice. She is to be my wife to-morrowno! she
is
my wife, plighted and sworn, at this hour!
It is the room of Alice
.
The voice sunk to a whisper, at once deep and pathetic, as he spoke the
last words.
Come, Michael, sit by me; when I have a little more strength, I will
tell you all.
The old man motioned with his right hand, toward a seat, but Michael
stood beside the dark-panelled door, his sun-burnt face grown suddenly pale
as a shroud.
At last, with measured footsteps, he approached the door, grasped the
latch, and pushed it open. The light was in his hand.
Her
room lay open
to his gaze, the chamber of Alice, yet he was afraid tolook.
Do you see him standing on the threshhold, the light extended in one hand,
while the other supports his bowed head, and veils his eyes?
Father, he groaned, her room is before me, but I cannot lookI
stand upon the threshhold, but dare not cross it. Speakand he turned
wildly toward the old manSpeak! I implore yetell me the worst!
The old man stood in the shadows, his hands clasped, his eyes wild and
glassy in their vacant stare, fixed upon the face of his son. No word passed
his lips; the horror painted on his countenance seemed too horrible for
words.
Michael raised his eyes and looked.
It was therethe same as in the olden timethat chamber in which his
mother had once sleptnow the Chamber of Alice.
Behold a small room, with the clean oaken floor, covered by a homespun
carpet; two or three high-backed chairs, placed against the white-washed
walls; a solitary window with a deep frame and snowy curtain.
Holding the light above his head, Michael advanced. In the corner,
opposite the door, stood a bed, encircled by hangings of plain whitethose
hangings carefully closed, descending in easy folds to the floor.
The fearful truth all at once rushed upon the soldier's soul. She was
dead. Her body enveloped in the shroud, lay within those hangings; he
could see the white hands, frozen into the semblance of marble, folded stiffly
over her pulseless bosom. He could see her face,so pale and yet so
beautiful, even in death, and the closed eyelids, the lashes darkening softly
over the cheek, the hair so glossy in its raven blackness, descending gently
along the neck, even to the virgin breast.
The curtains of the bed were closed, but he could see it all!
Afraid to look, and by a look confirm his fancy, he turned aside from the
bed, and gazed toward the window. Here his heart was wrung by another
sight. A plain, old-fashioned bureau, covered with a white cloth, and
surmounted
by a small mirror oval in form, and framed in dark walnut.
That mirror had reflected her face, only a day past. Beside lay the
Bible and Book of Prayer, each bearing on their covers the name of
Alice
sacred memorials of the Dead Girl.
This man Michael was no puling courtier. A rude heart, an unlettered
soul was his. His embrowned hand had grasped the hand of death a
thousand
times. Yet that rude heart was softened by one deep feelingthat
unlettered soul, which had read its lessons of genius in the Book of Battle,
written by an avalanche of swords and bayonets, on the dark cloud of the
battlefieldbowed down and worshipped one emotion. His love for Alice!
Next to his belief in an all-paternal God, he treasured it. Therefore, when
he beheld these memorials of the Dead Girl, he felt his heart contract,
expand
,
writhe, within him. His iron limbs trembled; he tottered, he fell
forward on his kness, his face resting among the curtains of the bed.
57
He dashed the curtains asideholding the light in his quivering hand,
he gazed upon the secret of the bedthe dead body of Alice? No!
The white pillow, unruffled by the pressure of a fingerthe white
coverlet
,
smooth as a bank of drifted snow, lay before him.
Alice was not there.
Father! he groaned, starting to his feet, and grasping the old man by
both handsShe is dead; I know it! Where have you buried her?
The father turned his eyes from the face of his son, but made no answer.
At least, give me some token to remember her! The bracelet which
was my mother'swhich a year ago, I myself clasped on the wrist of
Alice!
Then it was that the old man turned, and with a look that never forsook
the soul of his son until his death hour, gasped four brief words:
Not dead, but
LOST! he said, and turned his face away.
Michael heard the voice, saw the expression of his father's face, snd felt
the reality of his desolation without another word. He could not speak;
there was a choking sensation in his throat, a coldness like death, about
his heart.
In a moment the old man turned again, and in his native German, poured
forth the story of Aliceher broken vows, and flight, and shame!
Only this day she fled, and with a stranger!
The son never asked a question more of his father.
One silent grasp of the old man's hand, and he strode with measured
steps, from the room, from the house. Not once did he look back.
He stood upon the porchthe light of the moon falling upon his face,
with every lineament tightened like a cord of ironthe eyes cold and glassy,
the lips clenched and white.
Here, said he to the old negro, who beheld his changed countenance
with horrorHere is all the gold I have in the world. I earned it by my
sword! Take itI will never touch a coin that comes from this accursed
soil.
He passed on, spoke to Old Legion, leaped into the saddle, and was gone.
The negro heard a wild laugh borne shrilly along the breeze. The old
man who, with his white hairs waving in the moonbeams, came out and
stood upon the porch, looked far down the lane, and beheld the white horse
and his rider. The moon shone from among the rolling clouds with a light
almost like day; the old man beheld every outline of that manly formsaw
his cap of fur and steel, and waving cloak, and iron sword in its iron sheath.
Yet never once did he behold the face of his son turned back toward his
childhood's home.
On and on! Never mind the fence, with its high rail and pointed stakes.
Clear it with a bound, Old Legion! On and on! Never mind the road;
the wood is dark, the branches intermingle above our heads, but we will
dash through the darkness, Old Legion. On, on, on! Never heed the
brook that brawls before us; it is a terrible leap, from the rock which arises
here, to the rock which darkens yonder, but we must leap it, Old Legion!
Soh, my brave old boy! Through the wood again; along this hollow, up
the hillside, over the marsh. Now the thunder rolls, and the lightning
flashes out!
hurrah!
Many a battle we have fought together, but this is
the bravest and the last!
And at last, the blood and sweat, mingling on his white flanks, the
gallant old horse stood on the Rock of the Chesepeake, trembling in every
limb.
Michael looked far along the waters, while the storm came crashing down
again, and, by the lightning glare, beheld a white sail, raking masts, and a
dark hull, careering over the waters. Now, like a mighty bird, diving into
the hollows of the watery hills, she was lost to view. And now, still
like a mighty bird, outspreading her wings, she rose again, borne by the
swell of a tremendous wave, as if to the very clouds.
A very beautiful sight it was to see, even by the light of that lurid flash
this thing, with the long dark hull, the raking masts and the white sail!
She came bounding over the bay; the wind and waves bore her towards
the rock.
In a moment the resolution of Michael was taken. One glance toward
the white sail, one upon the darkened sky, and then he quietly drew his
pistol.
Come, Old Legion,he said, laying his hand upon the mane of the
old horseYou are the only friend I ever trusted, who did not betray me!
The first word he had spoken since the old man whispered
Lost
, in
his ears.
Come, Old Legion, your master is about to leave his native soil forever!
He cannot take you with him. Yonder's the sail that must bear him away
from this accursed spot forever. He cannot take you with him, Old Legion,
but he will do a kind deed for you. No one but Michael ever crossed your
back, nor shall you ever bear another! Your master is about to kill you,
Old Legion!
Nearer drew the white sailnearer and nearer!The sailors on the
deck beheld that strange sight, standing out from the background of the dark
cloudsthe rocks, the white horse and the dismounted soldier, with the
pistol in his hand.
They saw the white horse lay his head against his master's breast, they
heard his long and piercing neigh, as though the old steed felt the battle
trump stir his blood once more.
They heard the report of a pistol; saw a human form spring wildly into
the waves; while the white horse, dropping on his fore-legs, with the blood
streaming from his breast, upon the rock, raised his dying head aloft, and
uttered once more that long and piercing howl.
59
They saw a head rising above the wavesthen all was dark night again.
There was hurrying to and fro upon the vessels deck; a rope was thrown;
voices, hoarse with shouting, mingled with the thunder-peal, and at last, as
if by a miracle, the drowning man was saved.
What would you here? exclaimed a tall, dark-bearded man, whose
form was clad in a strangely mingled costume of sailor and banditWhat
would you here?
As he spoke, he confronted the form of Michael, dripping from head to
foot with spray. The lightning illumined both forms, and showed the
sailors who looked on, two men, worthy to combat with each other.
Come you as a friend or foe? the hand of the dark-bearded man sought
his dirk as he spoke.
The lightning glare showed Michael's face; its every lineament colored
in crimson light. There was no quailing in his bold grey eye, no fear upon
his broad, straight forehead.
Even amid the storm, an involuntary murmur of admiration escaped the
sailors.
As a friend,his voice, deep and hollow, was heard above the war
of the storm. Only bear me from yonder accursed shore!
But sometimes, when out upon the sea, we hoist the Black Flag, with
a Skull and Crossbones prettily painted on its folds. What say you now?
Friend or Foe? Comrade or Spy?
I care not how dark your flag, nor how bloody the murder which ye
do upon the seaall I ask is this: Bear me from yonder shore, and I am
your friend to the death!
And swelling with a sense of his unutterable wrongs, this bravest of the
brave, even Michael of Lee's gallant Legion, extended his hand and grasped
the blood-stained fingers of the Pirate Chief.
Then, the wild hurrah of the pirate-band mingled with the roar of the
thunder, and, as the vessel went quivering over the waters, the red glare of
the lightning revealed the dark-bearded face of the Pirate Chief, the writhing
countenance of the doomed soldier.
Their hands were clasped. It was a Covenant of Blood.
That night, while the Pirate-Ship went bounding over the bay, Michael
flung himself upon the deck, near the door of the Captain's cabin, and slept.
As he slept a dream came over his soul.
Not a dream of the girl who had pressed her kiss upon his lip, and then
betrayed him, not a vision of
Lost Alice
. No! Nor of the grey-haired
father, who stood on the porch, gazing after the form of his son, with his
white hair floating in the moonbeams.
Nor ever of that gallant horse, that white-maned old Legion, `the only
friend he had trusted, that never betrayed him!' No!
But of a battle! Not only of one battle, but a succession of battles, that
seemed to whirl their awful storm of cannon and bayonet and sword, not
merely over one country, but over a world. The heaps of dead men that
Michael saw in his sleep, made the blood curdle in his veins. It seemed
as though the People of a World had died, and lay rotting unburied in the
gorges of mountains, on the gentle slopes of far-extending plains; in the
streets of cities, too, they lay packed in horrible compactness, side by side,
like pebbles on the shore.
Many strange things Michael saw in this, his strange dream; but amid
all, he beheld one face, whose broad, expansive brow, and deep, burning
eyes, seemed to woo his soul. That face was everywhere. Sometimes
amid the grey clouds of battle, smiling calmly, while ten thousand living
men were mowed away by one battle blast. Sometimes by the glare of
burning cities, this face was seen: its calm sublimity of expression,that
beautiful forehead, in which a soul, greater than earth, seemed to make its
home, those dark eyes which gleamed a supernatural fireall shone in
terrible contrast, with the confusion and havoc that encircled it.
That face was everywhere.
And it seemed to Michael as he slept, that it came very near him, and as
these scenes passed rapidly before his eyes, that the face whispered three
words.
These words Michael never forgot; strange words they were, and these
are the scenes which accompanied them.
The first word:
A strange city where domes and towers were invested
with a splendor at once Barbaric and Oriental, with flames whirling about
these domes and towers, while the legions of an invading Host shrank back
from the burning town by tens of thousands, into graves of ice and snow.
The face
was there looking upon the mass of firethe soldiers dying in
piles, with a horrible resignation.
The second word:
He sawbut it would require the eloquence of some
Fiend who delights to picture Murder, and laugh while he fills his horrible
canvass with the records of infernal deeds,yes, it calls for the eloquence
of a fiend to delineate this scene. We cannot do it. We can only say that
Michael saw some peaceful hills and valleys crowded as if by millions of
men. There was no counting the instruments of murder which were
gathered
there; cannon, bayonets, swords, horses, men, all mingled together,
and all doing their destined workMurder. To Michael it seemed as if
these cannons, swords, bayonets, horses, men, murdered all day, and did not
halt in their bloody communion, even when the night came on.
The Face
was there!
Yes, it seemed to Michael, in this his strange dream, that
the Face
was
the cause of it all. For the Kings of the Earth, having (or claiming) a
Divine Commission
to Murder
, each one on his own account, hated
fervently
this Face. Hated zealously its broad forehead and earnest eyes.
Hated it so much, that they assembled a World to cut it into pieces, and
hack its memory from the hearts of men.
Michael in his dream saw
this face
grow black, and sink beneath an
ocean of blood. It rose no more!
Yes, it rose again! When?
The third word
was spoken, it rose again. Michael saw this face
with its awful majesty and unutterable beautychained to a rock, yet
smiling all the while. Smiling, though all manner of unclean beasts and
birds were about ithere a vulture slowly picking those dark eyes;there
a jackal with its polluted paw upon that forehead, so sublime even in this
sad hour.
And it seemed to Michael that amid all the scenes, which he had beheld
in this his terrible dream, that the lastthat glorious face, smiling even
while it was chained to a rock, tortured by jackals and vultures, was most
terrible.
With a start, Michael awoke.
The first gleams of day were in the Eastern sky and over the waters.
His strange, fearful dream was yet upon his soul; those three words seemed
ringing forever in his ears.
As he arose, something bright glittered on the deck at his feet. He
stooped and gathered it in his grasp. It was hismother's bracelet. An
antique thing; some links of gold and a medallion, set with a fragment of
glossy dark hair.
How came it there? upon the Pirate Ship, out on the waves?
Michael pressed it to his lips, and stood absorbed in deep thought.
While thus occupied, the muttered conversation of two sailors, who stood
near him, came indistinctly to his ears. Far be it from me to repeat the
horrid blasphemies, the hideous obscenities of these men, whom long days
and nights of crime, had embruted into savage beasts. Let me at once tell
you that a name which they uttered, coupled with many an oath and jest,
struck like a knell on Michael's ear. Another wordhe listensturns and
gazes on the cabin door.
These words may well turn to ice the blood in his veins.
For as they blaspheme and jest, a laughwild, yet musical, comes
echoing
through the cabin door.
As Michael hears that laugh, he disappears in the darkness of the
companion-way
,
holding the bracelet in his hand.
An hour passedday was abroad upon the watersbut Michael appeared
on deck no more.
In his stead, from the companion-way, there came a stout, muscular
man, clad in the coarsest sailor attire, his face stained with ochre, a
close-fitting
skull-cap drawn over his forehead, even to the eyebrows. A rude
Pirate, this, somewhat manly in the expansion of his chest, no doubt, but
who, in the uncouth shape, before us, would recognize the Hero of the
Legion, the bravest of the brave?
He was leaning over the side of the ship, gazing into the deep waves,
when the door of the Pirate Captain's cabin was opened, and the Captain
appeared. You can see his muscular form, clad in a dress of green, laced
with gold, plumes waving aside from his swarthy brow, his limbs, encased
in boots of soft doe-skin. Altogether, an elegant murderer; an exquisite
Pirate, from head to foot.
The rude sailoror Michael, as you please to call himleaning over the
side of the ship, heard the Pirate Captain approach, heard the light footstep,
which mingled its echoes with the sound of his heavy tread. Light
footstep
?
Yes, for a beautiful woman hung on the Pirate's arm, her form,
clad in the garb of an Eastern Sultana, her darkly-flowing hair relieved by
the gleam of pearls.
As she came along the deck, she looked up tenderly into his face, and
her light laugh ran merrily on the air.
Michael turned, beheld her, and survived the horror of that look!
She
knew him not; the soldier and hero was lost in his uncouth disguise.
It was
Alice
.
Let us now hurry on, over many days of blood and battle, and behold
the Pirate Ship sunk in the ocean, its masts and shrouds devoured by flames,
while the water engulfed its hull.
Three persons alone survived that wreck. You see them, yonder, by
the light of the morning sun, borne by a miserable raft over the gently
swelling waters.
Three persons, who have lived for days or nights without bread or water.
Let us look upon them, and behold in its various shapes the horrors of
famine.
In that wretched form, laid on his back, his hollow cheeks reddened by
the sunbeams, his parched eye-balls upturned to the sky, who would
recognize
the gallantPirate Chief?
By his side crouches a half-clad female form, beautiful even amid horrors
worse than death, although her eyes are fired with unnatural light, her
cheek flushed with the unhealthy redness of fever, her lips burning in their
vivid crimson hues. Starvation is gnawing at her vitals, and yet she is
beautiful; lookhow wavingly her dark hair floats over her snowy
shoulders
!
Is thisAlice?
The third figure, a rude sailor, his face stained with dark red hues, a
skull-cap drawn down to his eyebrows. Brave Michael, of Lee's Legion.
He sits with his elbows resting on his knees, his cheeks supported by his
hands, while his eyes are turned to the uprising sun.
A groan quivers along the still air. It is the last howl of the Pirate
Chief; with that soundhalf-blasphemy, half-prayerhe dies.
His brideso beautiful, even yet amid famine and despaircovers his
lips with kisses, and at last, grasping the sailor by the arm, begs him to
save the life of herhusband!
The sailor turns, tears the cap from his brow; the paint has already
gone from his face.
Alice
and
Michael
confront each other, alone on that miserable raft, a
thousand miles from shore.
Who would dare to paint the agony of her look, the horror of the shrick
which rent her bosom?
Only once she looked upon himthen sunk stiffened and appalled beside
her pirate husband. But a calm smile illumined Michael's face; he towered
erect upon the quivering raft, and drew some bread and a flagon of water
precious as goldfrom the pocket of his coarse sailor jacket.
For you, he said, in that low-toned voice with which he had plighted
his eternal troth to herFor you I have left my native land. For you I
have left my father, alone and desolate in his old age. For younot by
any means the least of all my sufferingsI have killed the good old
war-horse
,
the only friend whom I ever trusted, that did not betrary me. For
you, Alice, I am an outcast, wanderer, exile! Behold my revenge! You
are starvingI feed yougive you meat and drink. Yes, I, Michael, your
plighted husband
bid you live!
He placed the bread and water in her grasp, and then turned with folded
arms to gaze upon the rising sun. Do you see that muscular form,
towering
from the rafthis high, straight forehead, glowing in the light of the
dawning day?
He turned again: there was a dead man at his feet; a dead woman
before his eyes.
There may have been agony at his heart, but his face was unsoftened by
emotion. With his lineaments moulded in iron rigidity, he resumed his
gaze toward the rising sun.
At last, a sail came gleaming into viewthen the hull of a man-of-war
and then, bright and beautiful upon the morning air, fluttered the glorious
emblem of Hope and Promisethe tri-colored
Flag of France
.
Years passed, glorious years, which beheld a World in motion for its
rights and freedom.
There came a day, when the sun beheld a sight like this:A man of
noble presence, whose forehead, broad, and high and straight, shone with
the chivalry of a great soul, stood erect, in the presence of his
executioners
.
Those executioners, his own soldiers, who shed tears as they levelled
their pieces at his heart.
This man of noble presence was guilty of three crimes, for which the
crowned robbers of Europe could never forgive him.
He had risen from the humblest of the people, and became a General, a
Marshal, a Duke.
He was the friend of a great and good man.
In the hour of this great and good man's trial, when all the crowned
robbers, the anointed assassins of Europe, conspired to crush him, this
General, Marshal and Duke refused to desert the great and good man.
For this he was to be shotshot by his own soldiers, who could not
restrain their tears as they gazed in his face.
Let us also go there, gaze upon him, mark each outline of his face and
form, just at the moment when the musquets are levelled at his heart, and
answer the question
Does not this General, Marshal, Duke, now
standing
in presence of his Death's-men, strangely resemble that Michael whom
we have seen on the banks of the Chesapeakethe Hero of Lee's Legion
Bravest of the Brave?
Ere the question can be answered, the Hero waves his hand. Looking
his soldiers fixedly in the face, he exclaims in that voice which they have
so often heard in the thickest of the fight
At my heart, comrades
!
As he falls, bathed in blood, the victim of a Holy Assassination, let
us learn what words were those which brave Michael, long years ago,
heard whispered in his dream, what face was that, which, with its sublime
forehead and earnest eyes, spoke these words? Let us also learn who
was this soldier Michael, of Lee's Legion?
The words? The first, Moscowthe second,
Waterloo
the third,
St. Helena
.
This soldier of Lee's Legion, the bravest of the brave?
MICHAEL NEY.
[18]
[18]
NOTE BY THE AUTHOR.The idea of a Legend on this subject, was first
suggested by an able article, in a late number of the Southern Literary Messenger,
which presents the most plansible reasons, in favor of the identity of Major Michael
Rudolph, of Lee's Legion, with Michael Ney, the Marshal and Hero of France, who
was basely murdered, after the battle of Wartaloo.
In this article, it is distinctly stated that in personal appearance Ney and Rudolph
were strikingly similar, both described as follows:
Five feet eight inches in height
a muscular man though not fatof high, flat forchead, gray eyes, straight eyebrows,
prominent cheek-bones, and fair complexion
.
After a brilliant career in the Revolutionary War, and a campaign under Wayne,
among the Indians, Major Rudolph returned to his home, on the shores of the
Chesapeake
,
after a year's absence, and remained for the night at the residence of a brother,
To quote the exact words of the article.
Here, he listens to a domestic revelation of the most cruel and humiliating character
of such a sort, as to determine not again to return to his family. * * * The next
we hear of him, is an adventurer, about to sail from the Chesapeake, in a small vessel,
laden with tobacco, and destined to St. Domingo, or to a port in France
.
The next intelligence of him, comes from Revolutionary France. He soon
disappears
,
and Ney, a man strikingly similar in appearance and traits of character, rises into
view.
Ney spoke English fluently; was viewed as a foreigner by the French, and called in
derision the Foreign Tobacco Merchant.
In short, the evidence placed before us, in this articlewhich our want of space will
not permit us to quote in fullseems almost conclusive, on the important point, that Ney
and Rudolph were the same man. While on this topic, we may remark, that
Bernadotte
,
the King of Sweden, was a soldier in our Revolution. The reader will of course
understand, that in our Legend above given, we are alone responsible for the details, as
well as all variations from the plain narrative of facts.
Whether true or false, it is a splendid subject for a Picture of the Past: That the
same heroic Legion of Lee, which earned for itself imperishable renown, in the dark
times of Revolution, also ranked among its Iron-Men, the gallant Marshal Ney, the
Bravest of the Brave.
II.THE NINTH HOUR.
The
time was 1778the place, an old-time mansion, among the hills of
Valley Forge.
Yonder, in a comfortable chamber, seated before a table, overspread with
papers, you behold a gentleman of some fifty-six years, attired in black
velvet, with an elegant dress sword by his side, snow-white ruffles on his
wrists and breast. By the glow of the fire, which crackles on the spacious
hearth, you can discern the face of this gentleman, the wide and massive
brow, the marked features, and the clear, deep grey eyes. As he sits erect
in the cushioned arm-chair, you can at a glance perceive that he is a man
of almost giant stature, with muscular limbs and iron chest.
And snow drifts in white masses on yonder hills, which you behold
through the deep silled windows; and the wind, moaning as with a nation's
dirge, howls dismally through the deep ravines.
Still the gentleman, with the calm face and deep grey eyes, sits in silence
there, his features glowing in the light of the hearth-side flame, while a
pleasant smile trembles on his compressed lips.
Altogether, he is a singular man. His appearance impresses us with a
strange awe. We dare not approach him but with uncovered heads. The
papers which overspread the table, impress us with a vague curiosity.
There you behold a letter directed to General the Marquis de La Fayette;
another bears the name of General Anthony Wayne; a third General
Benedict
Arnold; and that large pacquet, with the massive seal, is inscribed with
the wordsTo His Excellency, John Hancock, President of the
Continental
Congress.
This gentleman, sitting alone in the old-fashioned chamber, his form clad
in black velvet, his face glowing in mild light, must be, then, a person of
some consideration, perchance a warrior of high renown?
As you look in mingled wonder and reverence upon his commanding
face, the sound of a heavy footstep is heard, and a grim old soldier, clad in
the hunting shirt of the Revolution, appears in yonder doorway, and
approaches
the gentleman in black velvet.
He lifts the rude cap with bucktail plume from his sunburnt brow, and
accomplishes a rough salute. Then, he speaks in a voice which may have
been rendered hoarse by much shouting in battle, or sleeping dark winter
nights on the uncovered ground.
General, I heer'd you wanted to speak to me, and I am here.
The gentleman in black velvet, raised his clear grey eyes, and a slight
smile disturbed the serenity of his face.
Ah, Sergeant Caleb, I am glad to see you. I want your aid in an
undertaking
of great importance.
Say the word, and Caleb's your man!
Nine miles from the mansion, at four o'clock this afternoon, the `Loyal
Rangers of Valley Forge,' hold their meeting. Their captain, a desperate
man, has prepared a number of important papers for Sir William Howe.
In these papers are recorded the names of all persons within ten miles, who
are friendly to the British cause, or who are willing to supply Sir William
with provisions, together with a minute description of the affairs and
prospects
of the Continental army. At four this afternoon, these papers will be
delivered to an officer of the British army, who is expected from
Philadelphia
in the disguise of a farmer. That officer is now a prisoner near our
headquarters on the Schuylkill, some six miles from this place. You
understand
me, Sergeant Calebyou will assume this disguise, hurry to the
Tory rendezvous, and receive the papers from the hands of the Captain.
As the gentleman spoke, the countenance of the old soldier assumed an
expression of deep chagrin. The corners of his mouth were distorted in
an expression of comical dismay, while his large blue eyes expanding in
his sunburnt face, glared with unmistakable horror.
He had been with Arnold at Quebec, with Washington at Brandywine,
this hardy Sergeant Calebbut to go to the Tory rendezvous in disguise,
was to act the part of a
Spy
, and the robber-captain of the Tories would
put him to death, on the first rope and nearest tree, as a
Spy
!
Therefore the old Sergeant, who had played with death as with a boon
companion, when he came in the shape of a sharp bayonet, or a dull
cannon
ball, feared him when he appeared in the guise of aGibbet!
You are not afraid? said the gentleman. That will be news
indeed
,
for the soldiers! Sergeant Caleb Ringdale afraid!
The old Sergeant quivered from head to foot, as he laid his muscular
hand upon the table, and exclaimed in a voice broken by an emotion not
any the less sincere because it was rude:
Afeer'd? Now Gineral Washington, it isn't kind to say that o' me!
I'm not afeer'd of anythin' in the shape of a white or black human bein',
60
but this tory Cap'in Runnels, is a reg'lar fiend, and that's a fact nobody
can deny!
Do you fear him?
Not a peg! For all he's the bloodiest villain that ever murdered a
man in the name of King Georgefor all he hides himself in the darkest
hollow, in the meanest, old, out-of-the-way farm-house, I don't fear, no
more than I feer'd them ten Britishers that fell on me at Paoli! But do
you see, Gineral, I don't like the idea of goin' as a spy! That's what
cuts an old feller's feelin's! Say the word, and I'll go, just as I am, in my
own proper uniformnot very handsome, yet still the rale Continental
an' tell the Britishers to crack away, and be hanged!
And in the honest excitement of the moment, the old Sergeant brought
his closed hand to bear upon the table, until the papers shook again.
Washington rested his cheek upon his hand, while his face was darkened
by an expression of anxious thought.
You do not wish to go as a spy, and yet there are no other means of
securing these papers.
You can see the old soldier stand confused and puzzled there, wiping the
perspiration from his brow with his bony hand, while Washington turning
his chair, folds his arms, and gazes steadily into the fire.
Is there no man who will undertake this desperate office in my name?
in the name of the cause for which we fight?
And as the words passed his lips, a soft voicealmost as soft and
musical as a woman'suttered this reply, which thrilled the General to
the heart:
There is. I will undertake it, General.
Washington started from his chair.
You! he exclaimed, surveying the intruder from head to foot.
It must be confessed, that the expression of wonder which passed over
the face of the American General, was not without a substantial cause.
There in the glow of the fire, stood a young man, graceful and slender,
almost to womanly beauty, and clad not in the dress of a soldier, but in the
costume of a gentleman of fashion, a coat of dark rich purple velvet, satin
vest, disclosing the proportions of a broad chest and wasp-like waist,
diamond
buckles on the shoes, and cambric ruffles around each delicate hand.
You! exclaimed Washington, surely Ensign Murray, you are
dreaming!
The face of the young man was somewhat peculiar. The skin very pale
and delicate as a woman's. The hair, long and dark brown in color,
waving
in rich masses to the shoulders. The eyes, deep and clearalmost
black, and yet with a shade of blueshone with an expression which you
could not define, and yet it was at once calm, wild and dazzling. Indeed,
gazing on those eyes, or rather into their clear lustre, you could not divest
yourself of the idea that they reflected the light of a strong intellect, at the
same time, an intellect shaken and warped by some peculiar train of
thought.
Yes, General, was the answer of Ensign Murray; at four o'clock,
in the disguise of a British officer, I will enter the den of the Tories and
receive those papers!
Washington took the young man by the hand, and without a word led
him across the room.
Look there! he whispered.
They stood beside a glass door, which opened the view into the next
apartment, the drawing-room of the mansion.
As Ensign Murray looked, his pale yet handsome face was darkened by
an expression of indefinable agony.
There, beside the fire of the next chamber was seated a young girl,
whose hair descended in curling masses along her cheek, until they touched
her neck. A green habit fitting closely to her form, revealed its warm and
blooming proportions. She sat there alone, bending over an embroidery
frame, her dark eyes gleaming with light, as tranquil as the beam of the
evening star, upon the unruffled depths of a mountain lake.
And as her white fingers moved briskly over the flowers, which grew into
life at her touch, she sang a low and murmuring song.
Look there! whispered Washington, and behold your bride!
To-night
your wedding will take place. This very morning I left Valley
Forge, in order to behold your union with this beautiful and virtuous
woman. And yet you talk of going in disguise into the den of robbers,
who hesitate at no deed of cruelty or murder, and this on your
bridal-eve
!
There was a strange expression on the young man's facea sudden
contortion
of those pale, handsome featuresbut in a moment all was calm
again.
General, I will go, he said, and return before sunset!
He stood before the Man of the Army, his slender form swelling as with
the impulse of a heroic resolve.
George, said Washington, in a tone of kind familiarity; you must
not think of this! When your father died in my arms at Trenton, I
promised that I would, to the last breath of life, be a father to his boy. I
will not, cannot, send you on this fearful enterprise!
Look you! cried the old Sergeant, advancingI don't like this
office
of a
Spy
but sooner than the young Ensign here should peril his life
at such an hour, I'll go myself! Jist set me down for that thing, will you?
General! said the Ensign, laying his white hand on the muscular arm
of Washington, and speaking in a deep, deliberate voice, that was strongly
contrasted with his effeminate appearance and slender framedid I
behave
badly at Brandywine?
Never a braver soldier drew sword, than you proved yourself on that
terrible day! Twice with my own arm I had to restrain you from rushing
on to certain death!
At Germantown?
I can speak for him there, Gineral! You'd ought to seen him rushing
up to Chew's house, into the very muzzles of the British! He made
many an old soldier feel foolish, I tell you!
You were the last in the retreat, George, the last and the bravest!
Then can you refuse me this one request? Let me gosecure those
papersand come back crowned with laurels, to wed my bride!
He spoke in a clear deliberate tone, and yet there was a strange fire in
his eye.
Washington hesitated; his gaze surveyed the young man's face, and then
turning away he wrung him by the hand:
On those papers, perchance, the safety of our army depends. Go or
stay as you please. I do not command nor forbid!
With that word he resumed his seat, and bowed his head in the effort to
peruse the documents which were scattered over the table. He bowed his
head very low, and yet there were tears in his eyestears in those eyes
which had never quailed in the hour of battle, tears in the eyes of
Washington
!
The young man turned aside into a dark corner of the room, and covered
his Wedding-Dress with a coarse grey over-coat, that reached from his chin
to his knees. Then he drew on long and coarse boots, over his shoes
gemmed with diamond buckles. A broad-rimmed hat upon his curling
locks, and he stood ready for the work of danger.
General, he said, in that soft musical voiceis there a watch-word
which admitsha, ha!the
British officer
into the Tory farm-house?
Death to Washington
! and a sad smile gleamed over the General's
face.
The name of the British officer whose character I am to assume?
`Captain
Algernon Edam
, of His Majesty's Infantry!'He is now
under guard, near headquarters, at Valley Forge.
Hah! gasped Ensign Murray. Captain Edam!
You know him, then?
I
have
known Captain Edam, answered George Murray, with that
strange smile which invested his face with an expression that was almost
supernatural.
These papers will give you all requisite information. The farm-house
is three miles distant from this place, and nine miles from Valley Forge.
Nine! ejaculated the Ensign, with a sudden start. Ah! he
muttered
in a whisper that would have penetrated your bloodMust that
horrible
number always pursue me? Nine years, nine days! These must
pass, and then I will wed my bridebut such a bride!
Washington heard him murmur, but could not distinguish the words, yet
he saw that pale face flushing with unnatural crimson, while the deep blue
eye glared with wild light.
Again let me entreat you to give up your purpose. Your danger is
enough to appal the stoutest heart! Not only death you dare, but death on
thegibbet!
In the earnestness of his feelings, Washington would have seized him by
the arm, but the Ensign retreated from his grasp, and left the room with
his exclamation:
Farewell, General! Do not fear for me! Believe me, I will before
the setting of yonder sun, attain the object which I so earnestly desire!
In the hall a new trial awaited the young soldier. He was confronted
by a jovial old man, with a corpulent frame, round face and snow-white
hair. It was Squire Musgrave, a fine specimen of the old fashioned
gentleman
andthe father of his bride.
Hah, you young dog! What trick is this? said the old Squire, with
a jovial chuckle; you skulked away from the table just now, proving
yourself a most disloyal traitor to old Madeira! And now I find you in
this disguise! Eh, Georgie! What's in the wind?
Hush! Not a word to 'Bel! exclaimed the Ensign, with a smile on
his lips, and a look of affected mystery in his eyes. Not a word, or
you'll spoil a capital jest!
Thus speaking, he flung himself from the old man, and stood upon the
porch of the mansion. The beautiful country lay there before him, not
lovely as in summer, with green leaves, perfume and flowers, but covered
far up each hill, and down into the shades of each valley, with a mantle of
frozen snow. The trees, their bared limbs upstarting into the deep blue
sky, were glittering with leaves and fruits, sculptured from the ice by the
finger of Winter.
And the rich warm glow of the declining sun was upon it allthe old
mansion, with its dark grey stone and antique porch, the far-extending hills
and winding dales of Valley Forge.
The Ensign stood upon the verge of the porch; he was about to depart
upon his enterprise of untold danger, when
A soft warm hand was laid upon his shoulder; another was placed across
his eyes, and a light laugh thrilled him to the heart.
Oh, you look like the ogre of some goblin story! said a voice which
almost made him relent the stern purpose of that hourIf you would only
look in the glass and see yourself! Ha, ha, ha!
And as the soft hand was lifted from his eyes, George beheld the
beautiful
form and beaming face of hisbride.
Softly, Isabel! Not a word! he whispered laughingly, Or you will
spoil one of the finest jests ever planned!
He pressed his kiss upon her warm ripe lips.
The Last
! he murmured, as that pressure of soul to soul through the
mingling lips, fired every vein.
He darted from the porch, and hurried on his way. Far over the frozen
snow he toiled along, and only once looked back.
With that look of fearful anxiety he beheld his bride, standing on the
porch, her long hair floating from her face, while her merry laugh came
ringing to his ears.
Did you ever in a nightmare dream, chance to behold a dark old
mansion
,
standing utterly alone in the shadows of a dell, encircled by steep
hills, rough with rocks, and sombre with thickly clustered trees? In this
dell noonday is twilight, and twilight is midnight, so darkly frown the
granite rocks, so lowering rise the forest trees.
But this is in the summer time, when there are leaves upon the trees, and
vines among the rocks. In the summer time when the little brook yonder,
winding before the mansion, sings a rippling song in praise of the flowers,
and moss, and birds.
Now it is winter. Yonder, through the tall and leafless oaks, glares the
red flush of the sunset sky. Every tree with its rugged limbs, and stripped
branches, stands up against the western horizon, like a tree of ebony,
painted on a sky of crimson and gold. Winter now! The rocks, the
hill-side, the very ice which covers the brook, is white with a mantle of
snow, that gleams and blushes in the sunset glare.
Still the old mansion rises in sullen gloom, its dark walls tottering as
though about to fall, its shutters closed, its doorway crumbling into fragments.
And like a white veil flung over some ruffian bandit's brow, the steep roof,
covered with wreaths of snow, gleams above the dark grey walls.
Is this old mansion tenanted by anything that wears the shape of man?
As we look, the leaning chimney sends up its column of blue smoke to the
evening sky. Still for all that emblem of fireside comfort, the farm-house
looks like a den for murderers.
Look closely on its shutters and wide door, and you will perceive certain
port-holes, made for the musquet and rifle.
There are footsteps printed on the frozen snow, and yet you hear no
voices, you behold no form of man or beast.
At this hour, when the solemn flush of a winter sunset is upon the
mantle of snow, there comes slowly toiling over the frozen crust, the figure
of a young man clad in a coarse overcoat, with a broad-rimmed hat upon
his brow. That coat gathers around his slender form in heavy folds, and
yet it cannot hide the heavings of his chest. The hat droops low over his
face, and yet cannot conceal the wild glance of those deep blue eyes.
Urging his way along the frozen snow,the shadow of his form thrown
far and black behind himhe stands before the battered door of the
farm-house
,
he lifts the iron knocker, and a sound like a knell breaks on the
still air.
The young man listens eagerly, but no answer greets his summons.
Then turning his face to the evening sky, he stands erect upon the granite
stone before the door, and in a clear voice repeats the words
Death to Washington
!
There is the sound of an unclosing door, the young man is seized by
unknown
hands, and borne along a dark passage into a large and gloomy
place.
It may be a room, it may be a cavern, but all that greets his sight is a
large fire, burning on a wide hearth, and flashing a lurid glare over some
twenty ruffian faces.
A dark, a hideous picture!
A single form distinguished from the others by its height, but wearing the
pistols and knife, common to all, advances and confronts the stranger. The
young man, in that lowering face marked by the traces of many a crime,
recognizes
Black Runnels
, the Tory Chief.
Whence came you?
As he speaks, a strange sound mingles with his wordsthe clicking of
pistols, the clang of knives.
From the headquarters of General Sir William Howe! the young
man answered, in a clear deliberate voice.
Your object here?
The possession of certain papers prepared by Captain Runnels, for Sir
William Howe.
Your name?
Algernon Edam, Captain in his Majesty's infantry! replied the young
man, in the same collected manner.
There was a murmur, a confused sound as of many voices whispering in
chorus, and in a moment the blaze of a large lamp filled that spacious room
with light.
Now look ye, Captain, said the Tory leader, earnestly regarding the
disguised American, we don't doubt as how you are the rale Captain
Edam, but we Loyal Rangers have a way of our own. We never trusts an
individooal afore we tries his spunk. If you are a true Briton, you wont
object to the trial. If so be you chances to prove a Rebel, why, we'll soon
find it out.
The answer of the young man was short and to the point:
Name your trial, and I am ready!
Do you see that keg o' powder thar? We'll attach a slow match to it
a match that'll take three minutes to burn out! You will sit on that
keg!Afore the three minutes is out, we'll return to the house, and see
how you stand the trial! If there's a drop of sweat on your forehead, or
any sign of paleness on your cheek, we will conclude that you are a rebel,
and deserve to die!
The Tories gathered round, gazing in the young man's face with looks
of deep interest.
Pshaw! exclaimed the object of their interest, what need of this
nonsense? I am a British officerbutwhat need of words, I am ready,
and will stand the trial.
Thus speaking, he saw the match applied to the keg, he saw it lighted,
and took his seat. With a confused murmur, the Tories left the room.
Look ye, cried the last of their band, who stood in the doorwayit
was the Captainwe will conceal ourselves, where the blowing up of the
house can do us no injurythat is, in case the worthless old den should
happen to blow up. In two minutes we'll return. Take care o' yourself,
Captain!
The young man was alonealone in that large old room, the light of the
lamp falling over his brow, the keg beneath him, the match slowly burning
near his feet.
Why does he not extinguish the match, and at once put an end to this
fearful danger? Why does he sit there, fixed as a statue, his pale face
wearing its usual calm expression, his deep blue eyes gleaming with their
peculiar light?
Not a motionnot a movement of the hand which holds his watchnot
a tremor of the face!
What are the thoughts of this young man, whom another minute may
precipitate into eternity by a horrible death?
Does he think of the young bride, who even now awaits his coming?
Two minutes have expired. The Tories do not return. Slowly, surely
burns the matchas calm, as fixed as marble, the young man awaits
his fate.
The half-minute is gone, and yet no sign of the bravoes.
At lastO! do not let your eyes wander from his pale, beautiful face, in
this, the moment of his dread extremitythe match emits a sudden flame,
sparkles, crackles, and burns out!
Nine years, nine days! At last, thank God, it is over!
These were his last words, before the powder exploded. He folded his
arms, closed his eyes, and gave his sould to God.
Did that lonely house ascend to heaven, a pyramid of blackening
fragments
,
and smoke and flame, with the corse of the young man torn into
atoms by the explosion?
For a moment he awaited his fateall was silent. Then came the
sound of trampling footsteps; the young man unclosed his eyes, and beheld
the faces of the Tory band.
Game, I vow, game to the last! cried the Tory leader, Runnels
Do ye know we watched ye all the while, from a crack in yonder door?
It was only a trial you know, but a trial that would have made many an
older man than you shiver, turn pale, and cry like a babe!There's no
powder in the kegha, ha! How'd ye feel when the match burnt
out?
Give me the papers, asked the brave young man. Let me hasten
on my way!
O, I don't object to giving you the papers, cried the Tory. But,
afore I do, I like to ask your opinion of this gentleman?
As he spoke, the Tories parted into two divisions; in their centre
appeared
a man of some thirty years, his tall and muscular form clad in
crimson
,
his florid face with powdered hair and light blue eye, ruffled by a
sneering smile.
Captain Edam! exclaimed the disguised American, completely taken
by surpriseI thought you were a prisoner, nine miles away at Valley
Forge?
Yes, Captain Edam, at your service! replied the British officer with
a polite bow.
As he spoke, a burst of hoarse laughter made the old room echo again.
It was well planned, my dear Ensign, but it won't do! exclaimed the
Briton;I was a prisoner, butescaped! You were a British officer, a
moment ago, but now, you are
a Spy
. I presume it is needless to tell
you the fate of a Spy.
It was strange to see the calm smile which broke from the young
Ensign's
lips and eyes.
Death! he replied, in his low musical voice.
Deathaye, death by the rope! shouted the Tory Captain;I
say, Watkins, rig a rope to that beam! We'll show you how to play
tricks on Loyal Rangers.
The rope was attached to the beamthe noose arranged; the Tories
filled with indignation, clustered roundstill the young man stood calm and
smiling there.
Ensign, you have ten minutes to live, said the handsome British
officer. Make your peace. You have been taken as a spy, andha,
ha! must be punished as a spy!
Thank God! said the young man in a whisper, not meant to be
audible, yet they heard it, every Tory in the room.
It seems to me, young man, you're thankful for very small favors!
cried the Tory leader, with a brutal laugh.
The gallant Captain Edam made a signthe Tories trooped through the
door-way.
George Murray was alone with Algernon Edam.
George Murray was palebut not paler than usualhis blue eyes
glaring with deep light, his lip a lip of iron. Algernon Edam was tall and
magnificent in his healthy and robust manhood. There was ill-suppressed
laughter in his light blue eyes.
Do you remember the days of our childhood, George, when we played
61
together on the hills of Valley Forge? Little did we think that a scene
like this would ever come to pass! Here I stand, the
rejected lover
ha,
ha! the British officer! And there stands the
betrothed husband
, the
Rebel Spy! Ha, ha, ha!
These were bitter taunts to pass between a living and a dying man! Yet
there was something in the words and look of Captain Edam that revealed
the cause of all his ill-timed mirthhe was a rejected lover. His
successful
rival stood before him.
No word passed the lips of George, He regarded the elegant Captain
with a calm smile, and coolly asked, as though inquiring the dinner hour
How many minutes before I am to be hung?
You carry it bravely! laughed the Briton; but think of
Isabel
!
The only answer which escaped the lips of George, was a solitary
syllable:
Al
! he said, and turned his smiling face upon the face of his enemy.
That syllable made the Briton tremble from head to foot. It spoke to
himof the happy days of oldof the green hills and pleasant dells of Valley
Forge,of two boys who were sworn friendsof George and Algernon. It
also spoke of a laughing girl, who was the cousin of Algernon, the beloved
of GeorgeIsabel!
For that name was the familiar diminutive which George had often
whispered
in the ears of his boy-friend, flinging his arms about his neck, and
twining his hands in his golden hair.
Al
, don't you remember the day, nine years and nine days ago, when
in the presence of Isabel, you rescued me from a terrible danger?
The words, the tone, the look, melted the heart of the undaunted Briton.
There is a magic in the memory of childhood, irresistible as a voice from
the lips of Death.
I do, George, I do! he cried, and now, I am to be your
executioner
!
To-night, is my wedding night, my friend
But I cannot save you! gasped Edam; his voice now deepened with
the accent of irresistible agonywe are surroundedall hope is vain.
I do not want to be saved, said George, still preserving his quiet
manner; let me be put to death as suddenly and with as little pain as
possible. But I have one request. When I am dead and you are safe in
Philadelphia, write to Washington, and tell him, that I died like a man.
Write toIsabeland tell her'
A large tear rolled down the Ensign's cheek. The Captain struggled
to a seat. There was something unnaturally frightful in the calmness of
the doomed man.
Tell her, thatpure and beautiful as she isGeorge Murray could
never have made her life a life of peace and joy. Tell her that the last
words which he spoke were these`Algernon Edam is noble in heart,
although he has espoused the British cause. Wed him, Isabel, for he loves
youwed him, and my blessing be upon you!'
The Captain,to hide the agony of his feelings, uttered a horrible oath.
Why cannot I aid you to escape? he cried, wildly pacing the room.
You can aid me to escape! slowly uttered the doomed man.
How? Name the method! Quickfor I am yoursyours to the
death!
You can aid me to escape from this horrible dream of life! exclaimed
Murray, lifting his brown hair with his delicate handthis dream which
torments me, which sits upon my soul like a nightmare, which makes me
shudder at the idea of a union with Isabel! O, you may think me strange,
mad!but talk as you will, my friend, I feel happier than I have felt for
years!
While Edam stood horrified by his words, he removed the overcoat and
hat, and stood revealed in his wedding-dress.
I thought that Brandywine would awaken me from this dreamO, how
hard it is to pursue a grave, and feel it glide from your footsteps! It was
a bloody battle, but I lived! Then, in the darkest hour of Germantown, I
saw my death in the mists before me, and leaped to grasp it, but in vain!
Still I lived! The day of my marriage wore on, and there was no resource
but suicide, until Washington informed me of this enterprise. Ah, my dear
friend, give me your hand; I feel very calm, aye, happy!
The Briton, or rather the British officer, (for by birth he was an
American
,)
instantly seized the slender hand, wrung it, and swore by his Maker
that he should not die!
An expression, as strange as it was sudden, darkened the pale face of the
doomed man. His blue eyes emitted wild and deadly light. Do you see
him start forward, his slender and graceful form attired in his
wedding-dress
,
his rich brown hair waving from his shoulders? He seizes Edam
by the wrist.
O, Algernon, were my bitterest enemy beneath my feetone who had
done a wrong too dark for mercy, or revengesooner than sever his heart
with my knife, I would bid him live as I have lived for years!
There is nothing in language to picture the utter horror of his look and tone.
Captain Edam was dumb, but his face reflected the despair of George.
O, Algernon, I beseech you take Isabel, and be happy with her! At
the same time I implore you aid me in my attempt to shake off this
nightmare
life!
Captain Edam sank back on the empty keg, and buried his face in his
hands.
You can see Murray stand there before the fire, contemplating him with
a calm smile.
Hark! they come! cried the British officer, starting to his feet and
drawing his sword. They come to put you to death, but not while I am
alive.
There was the sound of trampling feeta confused murmurthen the
thunder of many rifle shots mingled in one deafening report, broke on the
silence of the hour.
George's countenance fell.
Stand back! shouted Captain Edamapproach this room, and I will
fire! Hark! Do you hear, George? They dispute among themselves!
There is a divisionwe must save you! Do you hear those shouts?
As he spoke, the door opened, and there, on the threshhold, stood a bluff,
hearty figure, attired in the Continental uniform.
The Gineral sent me on your track! exclaimed the hoarse voice of
Sergeant Caleb. The Tories is captured and you are saved, you
dare-devil
of an Ensign! I say, Mister, in the red jacket, won't you give up
your sword?
As the honest veteran received the sword of Captain Edam, George
turned aside and buried his face in his hands, while his whole frame shook
with emotion, with agony.
Foiled again! `
Nine years, nine days!
' I must submitit is Fate!
The ninth hour is near!
Ah! why is death denied to me?
The old clock in the hall smiled in the light, its minute hand pointing to
30, its hour hand to 9.
The wedding guests were assembled. Far over the frozen snow, from
every window, gushed a stream of joyous light.
Grouped in the most spacious apartment of Squire Musgrave's mansion,
the wedding guests presented a sight of some interest.
The light of those tall wax candles was upon their faces.
Washington was there, towering above the heads of other men, his
magnificent
form clad in the blue coat and buff vest, with his sword by his side.
By his side, the high brow and eagle eye of Anthony Wayne. Yonder, a
gallant cavalier, attired in the extreme of fashion, with a mild blue eye, and
clustered locks of sand-hued hairthe chivalrous La Fayette!
And there, standing side by side, were two young men, engaged in
affable
conversation.
One, with a high forehead, deeply indented between the browsthe other,
a man of slender frame, with a delicately-chiselled face, and eyes that seem
to burn you, as he speaks, in that low, soft voice, which wins your soul.
Who, that beholds these young men, calmly conversing together, on this
wedding-night, would dream that one was destined to die by the other's
hand. For the one with the deeply-indented brow is Alexander Hamilton,
the other, with the sculptured face, and magical eyes and voice, is Aaron Burr.
In the centre of the scene stood a group, the objects of every eye.
The Preacher in his dark gown, on one side; the good-humored Squire,
with his jocund face and corpulent form, on the other.
Between them, under that chandelier, which warms their faces with a
mild light, stand the bride and briegroom.
She, in a dress of stainless white satin, which displays the beautiful
outlines
of her bust and waist, and by its short skirt permits you to behold
those small feet, encased in delicate slippers. Her neck, her shoulders,
gleam like alabaster in the light. A single ornamenta cross of diamonds
and goldsuspended from the neck, rises and falls with every pulsation of
her heart. And from the flowing world of her dark hair, which freely
courses from her brow to the shoulders, looks out a face, at once young,
innocent, angelic!
Ever and again, glancing sidelong, she turns her large eyes towards the
bridegroom, while a soft crimson flushes imperceptibly over her face.
The bridegroom is very pale, but calm and sedate. His dark blue eyes
gleaming from the pallor of that delicately chiselled face, return the glance
of his bride with a look at once earnest and indefinable. Is it love?or
love mingled with intense pity? What means that scarce perceptible
quivering
of the nether lip?
The words of the Preacher are said. George presses the husband's kiss
on the lips of his bride. Why does Isabelsurrendering all the graceful
beauty of her waist to the pressure of his armstart and tremble, as she
feels those lips, now hot as with fever, now cold as with death?
At this moment, through the interval made by the parting guests, advances
the form of
Washington
that face, which never yet has been painted by
artist, or described by poet, beaming with a paternal smile, those dark grey
eyes, which shone so fiercely in the hour of battle, now gazing in softened
regard, upon the bridegroom and the bride.
The voice of Washington was heard:
George, when your father breathed his last, in my arms, amid the
horrors
of battleit was at Trentonwith his parting breath, he besought me
to be a father to his son! How can I better fulfil my trust, than by placing
your hand within the hand of a beautiful and innocent woman, and bidding
you be happy together? Shehe turned to the bridegroomis worthy
of a soldier's love. He,turning to the bridehe is a soldier, a little
rash, perchance, but brave as the summer day is long!
He placed their hands together, and kindly looked from face to face.
Every eye was centred upon this interesting group.
Here, Washington, tall and commanding; on one side the bridegroom,
slender, almost effeminate, yet with courage and manhood written on his
face; on the othera beautiful and sinless girl! What words can describe
the last?
At this moment the jocund voice of the father, good-hearted, bluff Squire
Musgrave, was heard. With a jovial smile upon his round and crimson
face, he advanced.
Look ye, George, he said. Now that you're married, you must
conform to a custom in our family. Never a Musgrave was wedded but
the silver goblet and the old wine were brought forth, and a royal bumper
drank to the bride by all the guests. You dont't stand precisely in the
light of a guesteh, George? ha! ha! But you must begin the ceremony!
As he spoke, a servant in livery appeared with a salver, on which was
placed a venerable bottle, dark in the body, red about the neck, and wreathed
in cobwebs. Thirty year old Madeira. By its side a silver goblet, antique
in shape, carved with all manner of fawns and flowers.
In a moment this goblet was filled; from its capacious bowl flashed the
red gleam of rich old wine.
Drink, George! A royal bumper to the health of the bride!
The movement of George were somewhat singular. Every one remarked
the fact. As the bluff old Squire extended the goblet, George reached forth
his hand, fixing his blue eyes, with a strange stare, upon the crimson wine.
Then a shudder shook his frame, and communicated its tremor to the
goblet.
He seized itas with the grasp of despair, or as a soldier precipitated
from a fortress might clutch the naked blade of a sword, to stay his fall
his blue eyes dilating all the while he raised it to his lips.
His face was mirrored, there in the tremulous ripplets of the goblet, when,
as his lip was about to press its brim, his arm slowly straightened outward
from his body, his fingers slowly parted, each one stiffening like a finger
of marble.
The goblet fell to the floor.
George seemed making a violent effort to control his agitation. That lip
pressed between his teeth until a single blood drop came, the eyes wildly
rolling from face to face, the hands nervously extended.Was ever the last
moment of a dying man as terrible as this?
He sank on one kneeslowly, slowly to the floor; he sank as though
the blood were freezing in his veins.
No words can picture the surprise, the horror, the awe of the wedding
guests.
Do you see that circle of faces, all pale as death, with every eye fixed
upon the kneeling? Do you behold the young girl, who faints not nor
falters, in this hour of peril, but, with a face white as the snow, firmly
extends
her hand, and calls her husband tenderly by name?
For a moment all was terribly still.
At last he raised his head. He gazed upon her with eyes unnaturally
dilated, and whispered in a tone that pierced every heart
IsabelI would speak with you alone.
She raised him from the floor, and girding his waist with her arm, led
him toward the next room. Had she been a fine lady she would have
fainted, or shrieked, but, Heaven be blessed, was a Woman. One of those
women whose character is not known, until Adversity, like a holy angel,
reveals its heroic firmness and divine tenderness.
She closed the folding doors after her; the bride and bridegroom were
gone into the next chamber.
For half an hour, in silent awe,not a word spoken, not a sound heard,
but the gasping of deep-drawn breaththe wedding guests waited there,
gazing on the closed folding doors.
It was an half hour of terrible suspense.
As the clock struck nine Washington advanced. I can bear this no
longer, he said, and pushed open the folding doors.
Ere we gaze upon the sight he beheld, let us follow the footsteps of
George and Isabel.
As she led him through the doorway into that large chamber, filled with
antique furniture, and lighted by a single candle, standing before a mirror
on a table of mosaic work, Isabel felt the hand which she grasped, covered
with a clammy moisture like the sweat of death.
Before that large, old-fashioned mirror, in which the light was dimly
reflected
,like
a distant star shining from an intensely dark sky,they sank
down on chairs that were placed near each other, George clinging to the
hand of his bride as to his last hope.
The thing which I feared has come upon me! he gasped, speaking
the pathetic language of SciptureIsabel, place your hand upon my brow,
and hear me. The time alotted to me is short: it rapidly glides away.
And while you listen, do not, ha, ha! do not smile if in the tragedy of my
life the grotesque mingles with the terrible!
One hand with his own, one upon his brow, the brave girl listened. His
words were few and concise:
Many years ago, when we were children, Isabel, on a cold, clear
winter's day, we wandered forth in the cheerless woods, you and I, and
Algernon. My favorite dogyou remember him?was with us? Do
you also remember
Ah, that hollow voice, that unnatural smile! How well did Isabel
remember
.
Suddenly the favoriteold Wolfe, you know he was named after the
brave Generalturned upon me, fixed his teeth in my arm, and lacerated
the flesh to the bone. Algernon struck him down
Isabel felt that brow grow like iron beneath her touch.
It was long before the wound was healed, but the dog, in a few days,
died, raging mad. Now mark you, Isabel, another circumstance.
Perchance
you remember it also? While my wound was most painful, there
came to your father's house an aged woman, who was noted for her skill in
the healing of injuries like this. She was also regarded by the country
people as a witcha corceress! Is it not laughable, Isabel?that a poor
old creature like this, regarded by some as an Indian, by others as a Negro,
should have such a strange influence upon my life? She healed the wound,
but, at the same time, whispered in my ear the popular superstition, that a
person bitten by a rabid dog, would go mad on
the ninth hour of the ninth
day of the ninth year!
Child as I was, I laughed at her words. Time
passed on; days, months, years glided away. Need I tell you how this
popular superstition fastened on my mind until it became a prophecy?
Perchance the poison, communicated by the fang of the dog, was already
working in my veins, perchancebut why multiply words? This awful
fear gradually poisoned my whole existence; it drove me from my books
into the army. I began to thirst for death. I sought him in every battle;
O, how terrible `to long for death that cometh not!' For I was always
haunted by a fearnot merely the fear of going mad, but the fear of the
`ninth day of the ninth year'the fear of dying a death at once horrible
and grotesquedying like a venomous beast, my form torn by convulsions,
my reason crushed, my last breath howling forth a yell of horrible laughter
He paused; you would not have liked to gaze upon his face. You
would rather have faced a charge of bayonets than heard his voice. There
was something horrible, not so much in the stillness of that dimly-lighted
room, nor altogether in the contortions of his face, the fire of his eye, the deep
conviction of his voice, but in the idea,a noble mind, a brave heart, crushed
by a mere superstition! A young life forever darkened by an idle
hallucination
!
An immortal soul tortured by unmeaning words, uttered years
ago, in the dewy childhood time!
Isabel! gasped the wretched bridegroom, in a moment, yonder clock
will strike the hour of nine! At that hour, the end of all this agony will
come! Hideously transformed, I will writhe at your feet!
How acted then, this innocent and guileless girl, who had grown to
bewitching
womanhood amid the hills and dells of Valley Forge?
Hers was not the skill to argue this question in a philosophical manner.
True, she had heard of great minds being haunted all their lives by a
horrible fear. Some, the fear of being buried alivesome, the fear of going
madsome, the fear of dying of loathsome disease.
But it was not her knowledge of these fanciesthese monomanias of the
strong-heartedthat moved her into action at this hour.
It was her woman's heart that whispered to her soul a strange but fixed
resolve.
As the clock strikes nine, you will go mad, she said. This is the
idea that has haunted your life for years. It was this that forced the goblet
from your lips, palsied your hand and dashed the wine to the floor! But
if your reason survives the hour of nine? Then the danger will be over?
Speak George, is it so?
It is, he gasped; but there is no hope
The word had not passed his lips, when she tore one hand from his
grasp, removed the other to his brow. Outspreading her arms, she wound
them round his neck, and buried his face upon her bosom.
The clock began to strike the hour of nine.
Closer she clasped him, convulsively pressing his face to her breastas
to a holy shrineuntil he felt her heart beating against his cheek.
Now, God help me! she prayed, and reaching forth her left hand,
grasped a glass which stood upon the Mosaic table. It was filled with
water, fresh and sparkling, from the brook.
Look! she raises his head, gazes intently in his face. Ah! she winds
her right arm closer about his neck, and with those eyes earnestly, intensely
fixed upon his face, she holds the glass to his lips.
Drink, George, and fear not! If you love me, drink!
Feeble words these, when spoken again, but had you heard her speak,
or but seen the overwhelming love of her young eyes!
A nervous shudder shakes his frame. He shrinks from the glass. But
he sees her eyes, he feels her voice, he extends his hand and drinks.
The clock has struck the last knell of the fatal hour.
He drinks! She, gazing earnestly, with her face and heart fixed on him,
all the while, he drinks.
Now, she whispers, while her warm fingers tremble gently over his
cheeks. Now, George, speak to me! It is past! You love me? You
drank for my sake! For my sake you conquered this fatal idea. Speak,
speakis it past?
He rose from his chairhis face changed, as a cloud seemed to pass
from his breasthe gazed upon her with tearful eyes, and then exclaimed
in a tone that came like music to her soul:
Isabel, more than life you have saved! My reason; you
He could speak no more. His heart was too full. His joy too deep.
So, spreading forth his armsas the horror of years rushed upon his
soulhe fell weeping on her bosom.
That was the sight which the unfolded doors revealed to
Washington
!
62
IV.THE PREACHER-GENERAL.
It
was a beautiful picture, that quaint old country church, with its rustic
steeple and grey walls, nestling there in the centre of a green valley, with
the blue sky above, and a grass-grown grave-yard all around it.
It was indeed a fine old church, that Chapel of St. John, and in the
quietude of the summer noon, when not a cloud marred the surface of the
heavens, not a breeze ruffled the repose of the grave-yard grass. It seemed
like a place where holy men might pray and praise, without an earthly care,
a worldly thought.
The valley itself was beautiful; one of the fairest of the green valleys
of the Old Dominion. A slope of meadow, dotted with trees, a stream of
clear cold water, winding along its verge, under the shadow of grey rocks;
to the east a waving mass of woodland; to the west a chain of rolling hills,
with the blue tops of the Alleghanies seen far away! Was it not a lovely
valley, with the quaint old church, smiling in its lap, like a Pilgrim, who,
having journeyed afar, came here to rest for a while, amid green fields and
swelling hills!
It was a Sabbath noon, in the dark time of the Revolution. Fear was
abroad in the land, yet here, to the good old church, came young and old,
rich and poor, to listen to the words of life, and break the bread of God.
Yonder, under the rude shed, you may see the wagon of the farmer, and
the carriage of the rich man; or looking along this line of trees, you may
behold the saddled horses, waiting for their masters. All is silent without
the church; a deep solemnity rests upon the sabbath hour.
Within! Ah, here is indeed an impressive spectacle. Through the
deep-silled windows pours the noon-day sun, softened by the foliage of trees.
Above is the dark ceiling, supported by heavy rafters; yonder the altar,
with the cross and sacred letters, I. H. S., gleaming in the light; and all
around, you behold the earnest faces of the crowded assemblage.
The prayers have been said, those prayers of the Episcopal church,
which, gathered from the Book of God, flow forever in a fountain of
everlasting
beauty in ten thousand heartsthe prayers have been said, the
hymn-notes have died away, and now every voice is hushed, every face is
stamped with a marble stillness.
A few moments pass, and then behold this picture:
Old men and young maidens are kneeling around the altaryes, the forms
of robust manhood and mature womanhood are prostrate there. Along the
railing, which describes a cresent around the altar, they throng with heads
bent low and hands clasped fervently.
They are about to drink the Wine of the Redeemerto eat the bread
of God.
Is it not a lovely scene? The white hairs of the old men, the brown
tresses of the young girls, the sunburnt visages of those well-formed young
men, the calm faces of the matrons, all touched by the flitting sunbeam.
Look! Amid that throng a dusky negro kneels, his swart visage seen
amid the pale faces of his white brethren.
All is silent in the church. Those who do not come to the altar, kneel
in reverence, and yonder you may see the slaves, clustering beside the
church-porch, with uncovered heads and forms bent in prayer.
All is silent in the church, and the Sacrament begins.
The Preacher stands there, within the railing, with the silver goblet
gleaming in one hand, while the other extends the plate of consecrated
bread.
His tall form, clad in the flowing robes of his office, towers erect, far
above the heads of the kneeling men and women, while his bold
countenance
,
with high brow, and clear dark eyes, strikes you with an impression
of admiration. He is a noble looking man, with an air of majesty, without
pride; intellect, without vanity; devotion, without cant.
Tell me, as he moves along yonder, dispensing the wine and bread, while
his deep, full voice, fills the church with the holy words of the Sacrament
tell me, does he not honor his great office, this Preacher of noble look
and gleaming eyes?
Look! how fair hands are reached forth to grasp the cup, how manly
heads bow low, as the bread of life passes from lip to lip. Not much
whining here, not much strained mockery of devotion, but in every face
you see the tokens of a sincere and honest religion.
The Preacher passes along, bending low, as he places the goblet to the
red lips of yonder maiden, or extends the bread to the white-haired man by
her side. Meanwhile, his sonorous voice fills the church:
And as they were eating
,
Jesus
took bread and blessed it, and
break it, and gave is to his disciples, and said, Take, eat, this is my body
.
And he took the cup, and gave thanks, and gave it to them, saying,
Drink ye all of it, for this is my blood of the New Testament, which is
shed for many, for the remission of sins
.
As you gaze upon the scene, a holy memory seizes upon your soul.
The quiet church, the earnest faces of the spectators, the sunlight
stealing
through the deep-silled windows, over the group of kneeling men and
women, who, in this time of blood and war, have met to celebrate the
Supper of the Lord, the tall Preacher passing before the altar, the goblet
gleaming in his handThis is the scene which is now present with you.
The memory?
Ah, that is of a far-gone day, some seventeen centuries ago, when in the
fragrant chamber of Jerusalem, Jesus looked around with his eyes of eternal
love, and shared the cup and bread with his faithful Eleven, while beloved
John looked silently into his face, and black-browed Judas scowled at his
shoulder. Yes, the Memory seizes upon you now, and you hear his tones,
you see his face, the low deep tones flowing with eternal music, the face
of God-head, with its eyes of unutterable beauty.
Now the Sacrament is over, yet still the men and women are kneeling
there.
The Preacher advances, and stands in front of his people, with the silver
cup in his hand. A slight breeze ruffles the folds of his robes, and tosses
his dark hair back from his brow.
He is about to speak on a subject of deep interest, for his lip is
compressed
,
his brow wears a look of gloom. Every man, woman and child
in that crowded church, listens intently for his first word; the negroes come
crowding around the church-porch; the communicants look up from their
prayers.
The words of the Preacher were uttered in a tone that thrilled every heart:
There is a time to preach, to pray, to fight! He paused, looking from
face to face, with his flashing eyes.
The time to preach is gone, the time to pray is past, the time to fight
has come!
You could see his stature dilate, his eye fire, as he thundered through
the church
the time to fight has come!
The silver goblet shook in his quivering hands. With one impulse the
congregation started to their feet. With the same movement the kneeling
communicants arose. These strange words burned like fire-coals at every
heart.
Yes, thundered the Preacher, Yes, my brethren, when we preach
again, it must be with the sword by our sidewhen we pray, it must be
with the rifle in our hands! I say the time to fight has come! for at this
hour your land is red with innocent blood, poured forth by the hirelings of
the British King. For at this moment the voices of dead men call from the
battlefields, and call to you! They call you forth to the defence of your
homes, your wives and little ones! At this moment, while the noonday
sun falls calmly on your faces, the voices of your brothers in arms pierce
this lonely valley, and bid you seize the rifle, for your country and your
God!
Bold words were these, majestic the bearing of the Pracher, fierce as
flame-coals his look, eloquent his ringing voice!
A deep murmur swelled through the churcha wild, ominous soundand
then all was still again.
My brethren, we have borne this massacre long enough. Now, our
country, our God, our dead brethren call on us. Now, our wives look in
our faces and wonder why we delay to seize the sword, nay, our little ones
appeal to us for protection against the robber and assassin. Come, my
friends, I have preached with you, prayed with youwith you I have eaten
the Saviour's body and drank his blood. Now, by the blessing of God, I
will lead you to battle. Come, in the name of that country which now
bleeds beneath the Invader's feetin the name of the dead who gave their
lives in this holy causein the name of the God who made you, and the
Saviour who redeemed youI say come! To arms! The time to fight
is here!
Did you ever see the faces of a crowd change, like the hues of the ocean
in a storm? Did you ever hear the low, deep, moaning of that ocean, when
the storm is about to break over its bosom?
Then may you have some idea of the wild agitation which ran like
electric fire, through this quaint old Chapel of St. John, as the preacher
stood erect, with the goblet held in his extendnd hand, his brow flushed with
a warm glow, and his eyes gleaming fire.
The time to fight is here, he said, as with a sudden movement he
flung his sacerdotal robe from his form, and stood disclosed before his
congregation
,
arrayed in warrior costume.
Yes, from head to foot, his proud form was clad in the blue uniform of
the Continental host, while the pistols protruded from his belt, and the
sword shone by his side.
At that sight, a murmur arose, a wild hurrah shook the church.
To arms! arose like thunder on the Sabbath air.
And then there was one wild impulse quivering through each manly
breast, as though each heart beat with the same pulsation. They came
rushing forward, those robust forms; they clustered around the altar, eagerly
reaching forth their hands to sign the paper which the Preacher laid upon
the Sacramental table. In that crowd were old men with white hair, and
boys with beardless chins, all moved by the impulse of the hour. The
women, too, were there urging their brothers, their husbands, to sign their
names to the Preacher's muster-roll, and become soldiers for their Country
and their God.
The sunlight fell over the wild array of faces, glowing with emotion, and
revealed the light forms of the women passing through the crowd, while the
Preacher stood alone, with the paper in one hand and his good sword in
the other.
Softly came the summer breeze through the windows; brilliantly in the
sunlight glittered the Cross and the holy lettersI. H. S.
Still the Preacher stood there, that proud flash upon his brow, that deep
satisfactian gleaming from his dark eye.
Now, said he, gazing upon the stout forms which encompassed him
like a wall, now let us pray God's blessing on our swords!'
As one man they knelt.
The Preacher, attired as he was in the blue and buff uniform, knelt in
their midst, clasping his sword in his hand, while his deep voice arose in
prayer to God.
That night, through a road that led between high rocks, three hundred
brave men, mounted on gallant steeds, went forth to join the Army of
Washington.
At their head, riding a grey steed, his tall form clad in the blue and buff
uniform, was their leader, who, with compressed lip and gleaming eye, led
them on to battle.
It was the darkest hour of the battle of Germantown, when a gallant
warrior, clad in the Continental uniform and mounted on a grey steed, was
surrounded by a crowd of British soldiers.
All day long, that American General had gone through the ranks of battle,
at the head of his brave men. Side by side with Washington and Wayne,
he had rushed upon the the British bayonets. One by one, he had seen his
gallant band measure their graves upon the fatal field. Now he was alone,
the last in the dread retreat.
All around was smoke and mist. Chew's house was seen to the east,
looming grandly through the gloom. The American army were in full
retreat
,
while this solitary warrior, mounted on his grey war-horse, looking
from side to side, beheld nothing but scarlet uniforms and British bayonets.
At his back, toward the North, was a high wall, built of massive stone, a
wall the most gallant steed might essay to leap in vain. That warrior's
horse was brave, his blood was full of fire, but he recoiled from that terrible
leap.
The soldier on the grey steed was a prisoner.
The British encircled him, their bayonets pointed at his breast, while his
dark eye moved from face to face.
A soldier advanced to secure the victim; he was a gallant fellow, his
brown hair waving in thick curls around his ruddy face. He advanced,
when the American soldier gazed in his face with a look of deep
compassion
,
and muttered a prayer. The hand of the Briton was extended to grasp
the bridle rein of the grey steed, when the American suddenly drew his
pistol from the holster, and fired.
A moment passedthe smoke cleared away. There, on the moist earth,
bleeding slowly to death, lay the handsome Britonbut the prisoner?
Look yonder to the South! There, through the folds of mist, you may
see the grey horse and his rider. Bullets whistle in the air, but he does
not fall. Still the gallant steed keeps on his career. Right through the
British Army, right through the hail of lead, and the gleam of bayonets,
dashes the grey war-horse, the mist wreathing like a cloak around his
rider's form.
Now he turns, yes, to the North again. The band of soldiers look up
from the corse of their dead comrade, and behold the American soldier
dashing along the road, right in front of their path. They raise their
musquets
they
fire. The American soldier looks back and smiles, and
passes on.
The white cloud receives him into its folds.
Yet lo! As he passes on through smoke and mist, urging his gallant
grey to the top of his speed, he sees once more the glare of red uniforms,
the flashing of British steel. He is surrounded by a band of dragoons,
returning
from the pursuit of Washington's army. Again to the South, brave
soldier! Again to the South, with the pursuing troopers at his horse's
heels. How gallantly he rideslook! You can see his form rising through
the mist; by the light of that pistol flash, you can even see the tossing of
his plume, white as a snow-flake floating in the sun.
Again to the South, through the closely-woven ranks of the British host.
Those soldiers look up in wonder at the strange sightan American officer
dashing bravely through their lines unscathed by bullet or sword.
Now doubling on his pursuers, now near Chew's house, now far away
in the fields, that brave soldier kept on his flight. God and the mist favored
him. At last, after dashing through the British lines, he was riding
Northward
againhis pursuers had lost sight of their victim. He was riding
slowly Northward again; when looking ahead, he beheld a wounded man
stretched on the sod, in the agonies of death.
It was the brave young Briton who had fallen by his shot. A tear was
in the eye of the American soldier as he beheld that pale brow, with its
curling brown hair. Perchance the youth had a wifea sisterin far away
England? Or, maybe, even now a mother wept for his return?
Our Continental soldier dismounted; he laid the head of the dying Briton
on his knee. He moistened his hot lips with water from his flask.
It was a sad yet lovely sight, to see that brave American, in his blue
uniform, kneeling there, with the head of his enemy, the red-coated Briton,
resting on his knee.
Then as the dying man looked up, his foe muttered a prayer for his
passing soul. As that prayer went up to God, up with its accents of
compassion
,
ascended the soul of the British youth.
The American held a dead body in his arms.
One look at the pale face, and he sprang to his steed. He rejoined the
American army some miles above, but never in all his life did the
Preacher-Soldier
forget the last look of the dying Briton.
Another scene from the life of this Preacher-soldier.
It is night around Yorktown. Yonder, through the gloom, you see dim
masses of shadow, creeping along toward the British entrenchments.
Suddenly
all is light, and groans and smoke! Suddenly the Continentals start
up from darkness into the light of the cannon-glare! Suddenly the sky is
traversed by fiery bombs, while the earth shakes with the tread of embattled
legions!
Look yonder! A desperate band of American soldiers, with fixed
bayonets
,
advance along the trenches, and spring up the steep ascent, to the very
muzzles of British cannon. This is the crisis of the fight. Those cannon
spiked, this redoubt carried, and Yorktown is won! Two brave men lead
on these soldiersone, the high-browed Alexander Hamilton, the other the
Preacher-Soldier! A desperate charge, a wild hurrah, the redoubt is won!
And there, standing in the glare of the cannon, on the very summit of
the steep ascent, the flag of stars in one hand, the good sword in the other
the Preacher Soldier shouts to his comrades, and tells them that Yorktown
is won.
He stands there for a moment, and then falls in the trench, his leg
shattered
by a cannon ball.
Bending over him, by the light of the battle-glare, the brave Hamilton
gazes in his pale face, and bending beside the wounded Preacher-Soldier,
pens a few hasty words, announcing to the Continental Congress that
Yorktown
is takenCornwallis a prisonerAmerica a Nation!
And who was this brave man, who, from the altar of God's Church
preached freedom? Who, the last in the retreat of Germantown, escaped
as by a miracle from British bayonets? Who, by a long course of gallant
deeds, wreathed his brow with the Hero's laurel? Who was this brave
man? How name you him,who led on the forlorn hope at Yorktown,
with the starry banner waving over his head!
Ah, he bore the name which our history loves to cherish, which our
literature embalms in her annals, which Religion places among her holiest
lights, burning forevermore by the altar of God!
Pennsylvania is not just to her heroes. She is content to have them do
great deeds, but she suffers them to be crowded out of history. While
North and South, with untiring devotion, glorify their humblest soldiers,
Pennsylvania is content to take but one name from a crowd of patriots, and
blazon that name upon the escutcheon of our glorythe name of Mad
Anthony Wayne.
Now let us do the Iron State some small justice at last. Now let us
select another name of glory from the crowd of heroes. Now let us write
upon the column of her fame, side by side with the name of
Anthony
Wayne
, the name of
Peter Muhlenberg
, the Preacher-General of the
Revolution!
There let them shine foreverthose brother heroes, solemn witnesses,
of the glory of the Land of Pennthere let them shine, the objects of our
reverence and our lovethese two great names
Peter Muhlenberg
and
Anthony Wayne
.
V.TRENTON; OR, THE FOOTSTEP IN THE SNOW.
A TRADITION OF CHRISTMAS NIGHT, 1776.
It
was a dark and dreary night, sixty-nine years ago, when, in an ancient
farm-house, that rises along yonder shore, an old man and his children had
gathered around their Christmas hearth.
It was a lovely picture.
That old man, sitting there on the broad hearth, in the full glow of the
flamehis dame, a fine old matron, by his sidehis children, a band of
red-lipped maidens,some with slender forms, just trembling on the verge
of girlhood,others warming and flushing into the summer morn of
womanhood
!
And the warm glow of the fire was upon the white locks of the
old man, and on the mild face of his wife, and the young bloom of those
fair daughters.
Had you, on that dark nightfor it was dark and coldwhile the
December
sky gloomed above, and the sleet swept over the hills of the
Delaware
drawn near that farm-house window, and looked in upon that
Christmas hearth, and drank in the full beauty of that sceneyou would
confess with me that though this world has many beautiful scenesmuch
of the strangely beautiful in poetryyet there, by that hearth, centred and
brightened and burned that poetry, which is most like Heaven, THE
Poetry
of Home
!
You have all heard the story of the convict, who stood on the gallows,
embruted in crimesteeped to the lips in bloodstood there, mocking at
the preacher's prayer, mocking even the hangman! When, suddenly, as
he stood with the rope about his neckhis head sunka single, burning,
scalding tear rolled down his cheek.
I was thinking, said he, in a broken voice, I was thinking of the
Christmas fire!
Yes, in that moment, when the preached failed to warn, when even the
hangman could not awea thought came over the convict's heart of that
time, when a father and his children, in a far land, gathered around their
Christmas fire.
That thought melted his iron soul.
I care not for your ropes and your gibbets, he said. But now, in
that far landthere, over the watersmy father, my brothers, my sisters,
are sitting around their Christmas fire! They are waiting for me! And I
am herehere upon the scaffold!
Is there not a deep poetry in the scene, that could thus touch a
murderer's
soul, and melt it into tears?
And now, as the old man, his wife, his daughters cluster around their
fire, tell me, why does that old man's head droop slowly down, his eyes fill,
his hands tremble?
63
Ah, there is ONE absent from the Christmas hearth!
He is thinking of the absent onehis manly, brave boy, who has been
gone from the farm-house for a year.
But hark! Even as the thought comes over him, the silence of that
fire-side
is broken by a faint crya faint moan, heard over the wastes of snow
from afar.
The old man grasps a lantern, and, with that young girl by his side, goes
out upon the dark night.
Look thereas following the sound of that moanthey go softly over
the frozen path: how the lantern flashes over their formsover a few
white paces of frozen snowwhile beyond all is
darkness!
Still that moan, so low, so faint, so deep-toned, quivers on the air.
Something arrests the old man's eye, there in the snowthey bend down,
he and his daughterthey gaze upon that sight.
It is a human footstep painted in the snow, painted in blood
.
My child, whispers the old man, tremulously, now pray to Heaven
for Washington! For by this footstep, stamped in blood, I judge that his
army is passing near this place!
Still that moan quivers on the air!
Then the old man, and that young girl, following those footsteps stained
in bloodonetwothreefourlook how the red tokens crimson the
white snow!following those bloody footprints; go on until they reach
that rock, beetling over the river shore.
There the lantern light flashes over the form of a half-naked man,
crouching
down in the snowfreezing and bleeding to death.
The old man looks upon that form, clad in ragged uniform of the
Continental
armythe stiffened fingers grasping the battered musket.
It was his only son.
He called to himthe young girl knelt, andyou may be sure there
were tears in her eyeschafed her brother's handsah, they were stiff and
cold! And when she could not warm them, gathered them to her young
bosom, and wept her tears upon his dying face.
Suddenly that brother raised his headhe extended his hand towards
the river.
Look THERE, FATHER! he said, in his husky voice.
And bending down over the rock, the old man looked far over the
river.
There, under the dark sky, a fleet of boats were tossing amid piles of
floating ice. A fleet of boats bearing men and arms, and extending in
irregular
lines from shore to shore.
And the last boat of the fleetthat boat just leaving the western shore
of the Delaware; the old man saw that too, and saweven through the
darknessyon tall form, half-muffled in a warrior's cloak, with a grey
war-horse
by his side.
Was not that a strange sight to see at dead of night, on a dark river,
under a darker sky?
The old man turned to his dying son to ask the meaning of this
mystery.
Father, gasped the brave boy, tottering to his feet. Father, give
me my muskethelp me onhelp me down to the riverfor to-nightfor
to-night
As that word was on his lipshe fell. He fell, and lay there stiff and
cold. Still on his lips there hung some faintly spoken words.
The old manthat fair girlbent downthey listened to those words
To-night
Washingtonthe Britishto-nightTRENTON!
And with that word gasping on his lipsTrenton! he died!
The old man did not know the meaning of that word until the next
morning
.
Then there was the sound of musketry to the south; then, booming
along the Delaware came the roar of battle.
Then, that old man, with his wife and children, gathered around the body
of that dead boy, knew the meaning of that single word that had trembled
on his lips.
Knew that George Washington had burst like a thunderbolt upon the
British Camp in
Trenton
!
Ah! that was a merry Christmas Party which the British officers kept
in the town of Trenton, seventy years agoalthough it is true, that to
that party there came an uninvited guest, one Mister Washington, his
half-clad
army, and certain bold Jerseymen!
Would that I might linger here, and picture the great deeds of that
morning
,
seventy years ago.
Would that I might linger here upon the holy ground of
Trenton
.
For it is holy ground. For it was here, in the darkest hour of the
Revolution
,
that George Washington made one stout and gallant blow in the name
of that Declaration, which fifty-six bold men had proclaimed in the old
State House of Philadelphia, six months before.
If that State House is the Mecca of Freedom, to which the pilgrims
of all climes may come to worship, then is the battle-ground of Trenton,
the twin-Meccathe Jerusalem of Freedomto which the Children of
Liberty, from every land, may come  look upon the footsteps of the
mighty deadbring their offeringsshed their tears.
December 26th, 1776!
It was a dark night, but the first gleam of morning shone over the form
of George Washington, as he stood beside the Hessian leader, Ralle, who
lay in yonder room wrestling with deathyes, Washington stood there, and
placed the cup of water to his feverish lips, and spoke a prayer for his
passing soul.
It was a dark night, but the gleam of morning shone over you cliff
darkening
above the wintry river, over the frozen snow, where a father, a wife,
a band of children, clustered around the cold form of a dead soldier.
He was clad in rags, but there was a grim smile on his white lipshis
frozen hand still clenched with an iron grasp the broken rifle.
His face, so cold, so pale, was wet with his sister's tears, but his soul had
gone to yonder heaven, there to join the Martyrs of Trenton and of Bunker
Hill.
VI.THE PRINTER BOY AND THE AMBASSADOR.
Genius
in its glorygenius on its eagle-wingsgenius soaring away
there in the skies!
This is a sight we often see!
But Genius in its work-shopGenius in its cellGenius digging away
in the dark mines of povertyToil in the brain, and Toil in the heartthis
is an every day factyet a sight that we do not often see!
Let us for a moment look at the strange contrast betweenIntellect
standing there,
in the sunlight of Fame
, with the shouts of millions ringing
in its earsand Intellect down there, in cold and night-crouching in the
work-shop or the garret; neglectedunpitiedand alone!
Let us for a moment behold two pictures, illustrating
The Great Facts
Intellect in its rags, and Intellect in its Glory.
The first picture has not much in it to strike your fancyhere are no
dim Cathedral aisles, grand with fretted arch and towering with pillars
here are no scenes of nature in her sublimity, when deep lakes bosomed in
colossal cliffs, dawn on your eyeor yet, of nature's repose, when quiet
dells musical with the lull of waterfalls, breaking through the purple twilight
steal gently in dream-glimpses upon your soul!
No! Here is but a picture of plain rude Toilyes, hot, tired, dusty
toil!
The morning sunshine is stealing through the dim panes of an old
windowyes, stealing and struggling through those dim panes, into the
dark recesses of yonder room. It is a strange old roomthe walls cracked
in an hundred places, are hung with cobwebsthe floor, dark as ink, is
stained with dismal black blotchesand all around are scattered the
evidences of some plain workman's craftheaps of paper, little pieces of
antimony are scattered over the floorand there, in the light of the
morning sun, beside that window, stands a young man of some twenty
yearsquite a boyhis coat thrown aside, his faded garments covered
with patches, while his right hand grasps several of those small bits of
antimony.
Why this is but a dull picturea plain, sober, every-day fact.
Yet look again upon that boy standing there, in the full light of the
morning sunthere is meaning in that massive brow, shaded by locks of
dark brown hairthere is meaning in that full grey eye, now dilating and
burning, as that young man stands there alone, alone in the old room.
But what is this grim monster on which the young man leans? This
thing of uncouth shape, built of massy iron, full of springs and screws, and
boltstell us the name of this strange uncouth monster, on which that
young man rests his hand?
Ah! that grim old monster is a terrible thinga horrid Phantom for
dishonest
priests or traitor kings! Yes, that uncouth shape every now and
then, speaks out words that shake the worldfor it is a Printing Press!
And the young man standing there in a rude garb, with the warm
sunshine
streaming over his bold browthat young man standing alone
neglectedunknownis a Printer Boy;yes, an earnest Son of Toil;
thinking deep thoughts there in that old room, with its dusty floor and its
cobweb-hung walls!
Those thoughts will one day shake the world.
Now let us look upon the other picture:
Ah! here is a scene full of Night and Music and Romance!
We stand in a magnificent garden, musical with waterfalls, and yonder,
far through these arcades of towering trees, a massive palace breaks up into
the deep azure of night.
Let us approach that palace, with its thousand windows flashing with
lightshark! how the music of a full band comes stealing along this garden
mingling with the hum of fountainsgathering in one burst up into the
dark concave of Heaven.
Let us enter this palace! Up wide stair-ways where heavy carpets give
no echo to the footfallup wide stair-waysthrough long corridors,
adorned with statuesinto this splendid saloon.
Yes, a splendid saloonyon chandelier flinging a shower of light over
this array of noble lords and beautiful womenon every side the flash of
jewelsthe glitter of embroiderythe soft mild gleam of pearls, rising into
light, with the pulsation of fair bosomsah! this is indeed a splendid
scene!
And yonderfar through the crowd of nobility and beautyyonder,
under folds of purple tapestry, dotted with gold, stands the Throne, and on
that Thronethe King!
That Kingthese courtiersnoble lordsand proud damesare all
awaiting a strange spectacle! The appearance of an Ambassador from an
unknown Republic far over the waters. They are all anxious to look upon
this strange manwhose fame goes before him. Harkto those whispers
it is even said this strange Ambassador of an unknown Republic, has
called down the lightnings from God's eternal sky.
No doubt this Ambassador will be something very uncouth, yet it still
must be plain that he will try to veil his uncouthness in a splendid Court
dress!
The King, the Courtiers, are all on the tip-toe of expectation!
Why does not this Magician from the New Worldthis Chainer of
thunderboltsappear?
Suddenly there is a murmurthe tinselled crowd part on either side
look!he comes: the Magician, the Ambassador!
He comes walking through that lane, whose walls are beautiful women;
is he decked out in a Court dress? Is he abashed by the presence of
the King?
Ah, no! Look therehow the King starts with surprise, as that plain
man comes forward! That plain man with the bold brow, the curling
locks behind his earsand such odious home-made blue stockings upon his
limbs.
Look there, and in that Magicianthat Chainer of the Lightnings
behold
the Printer Boy of the dusty room; stout-hearted, true-souled,
common-sense
Benjamin Franklin
!
And shall we leave these two pictures, without looking at the deep moral
they inculcate?
Without the slightest disrespect to the professions called learned, I stand
here to-night, to confess that the great Truth of Franklin's life is the
sanctity of Toil!
Yes, that your true Nobleman of God's creation, is not your lawyer,
digging
away among musty parchments, not even your white cravatted divine
but this man, who clad in the coarse garments of Toil, comes out from
the work-shop and stands with the noon-day sun upon his brow, not
ashamed to own himself a
Mechanic
!
Ah! my friends, there is a world of meaning in these pictures! They
speak to your hearts nowthey will speak to the heart of Universal Man
forever!
Here
,
the unknown Printer Boy standing at his labor, neglected,
unknown
;
clad in a patched garb, with the laborer's sweat upon his brow
There
,
the
Man
whom nations are proud to claim as their own,
standing
as the Ambassador of a Free Peoplestanding as a
Prophet of the
Rights of Man
unawed, unabashed, in the
Presence of Royalty and
Gold
!
Benjamin Franklin, in his brown coat and blue stockings, mocking to
shame the pomp of these Courtiersthe glittering robes of yonder King!
VII.THE REST OF THE PILGRIM.
Like
the Pilgrim of the olden time, who having journeyed through many
lands, gathering new memories from every shrine and fresher hopes from
every altar, ascends the summit of the last hill, and bending on his staff,
surveys afar the holiest place of all, I have reached after much joy and
toil the end of my wanderings, and in the distance behold gleaming into
light, the Jerusalem of my soul.
That Jerusalem the Altar of the American Past, the Sepulchre of the
American Dead.
I have been a Pilgrim in holy ground. On the sod of the battle-field,
where every flower blooms more beautiful from the oblation of heroic blood,
poured forth upon the hallowed soilin old mansions where the rent walls
and blood-stained threshhold bear memory of the ancient timeamid the
shadows of the Hall of Independence, where the warm heart may see the
Signers walk againin the dark glen where the yell of slaughter once arose,
and every rock received its bloody offeringSuch have been the holy
places of my Pilgrimage into the American Past.
And as the Pilgrim of the far-gone ages, resting on the last hill, stood after
all his wanderings only in sight of the great temple of all his hopes, so does
the Pilgrim of the battle-field, rich as he is with the relics of the Past, stand
after all but on the threshhold of his hallowed work.
For this book of the Revolution, stored with Legends of the Past, gathered
from aged lips and renowned battle-fields, speaking in the language of the
iron time of Washington and his heroes, is but a page in the traditionary
history of our land. Much I have written, but a volume ten times as large
as this remains yet to be written.
[19]
[19]
In the new series of the Legends of the Revolution, now in press, the deeds of
the heroes whom I have been forced to omit in these pages, will be illustrated.
Marion
the hero of the South,
Kirkwood
of Delaware, and
Allen McLane
, that
fearless
partizan, whose courage and chivalry remind us of the Knights of old, will be
pourtrayed with all the enthusiasm which their names excite. The life of
Washington
,
too, in all its phases of contrast, interest, grandeur, will be delineated in a series
of Legends, extending from his cradle to his grave.
This second volume, entitled the
Washington Legends
, will be published in
September next.
In this place, it may be as well to inform the reader, that another work by the
title of Washington and his Generals, has been published by New York
book-sellers
,
its title and whole pages of discription pilfered from mine.
I have but uncovered the sealed spring
of Revolutionary Legend, scarcely dipped my scallop shell into its wild, yet
deep and tranquil waters.
On this Rock of Wissahikon I pause in my pilgrimage, and write these
words to my reader. This Rock of Wissahikon which rises on the side
of a steep hill, amid thick woodsa craggy altar on whose summit
worshipped
long ago, the Priests of a forgotten faith. Around me branch the
treesglorious monuments of three hundred yearsfresh with the verdure
of June. Between their leaves the sky smiles on me, dimpled only by a
floating cloud. Far below, the stream flashes and sings between its
mountain banks. Looking down a vista of trees and moss and flowers, I
behold a vision of forest homes, grouped by the waters. You that love to
lap yourself in June, and drink its odors, and feel its blessed air upon your
brows, and recline on its rocks covered with vines, musical with birds and
bees, should come hither. It is an altar for the Soul.
As I sit upon this rockthe paper on my knee, the birds, the stream, the
sky, the leaves, all ministering blessings to my soula strange throng of
fancies crowd tumultuously on me.
What was the name of the Race who peopled these cliffs, and roved
these woods two thousand years ago! Were they but brute barbarians, or
a people civilized with all that is noble in science or art, hallowed by the
knowledge of all that is true and beautiful in Religion? Where are their
monuments; the wrecks of City and Altar? O, that this rock could speak,
and tell to me the history of the long-forgotten People, who dwelt in this
land before the rude Indian!
Tell us, ye Ages, what mysterious tie connects the history of the red
men of the north, with the voluptuous children of the south? Speak, ye
Centuries, and reveal to us the mystic message of these monuments of the
Past, scattered over the hills and prairies of our northern America? The
mounds of the west, the fortifications rising ruggedly from the rank grass,
the deep-walled foundations of a city in Wiskonsana city that has been
a wreck for a thousand yearswhat is their Revelation? What word have
they of the mysterious bye-gone time?
Are there no Legends of the Lost Nations of America?
As I start back, awed and wondering from the fancies that crowd upon
me, there rushes on my sight a vision at once sublime and beautiful!
It is the vision of a land washed by the waters of the Atlantic and Pacific,
beautiful with vallies of fruit and flowers, grand with its snow-white peak
of Orizaba, magnificent with its citiesreared in a strange yet gorgeous
architectureamong which sits supreme, the Capitol of Montezuma! A
gorgeous vision! It swells on my sight with its altars of bloody sacrifice,
rising above the sea of roofs, with its clear deep lakes set in frames of
flowers, and the volcanic mountains hemming it in a magic circle, their
pillars
of snow and fire supporting the blue dome of the sky!
Crowd your wonders of the old world into one panorama, pile Babylon
on Palmyra, and crown them both with Rome, and yet you cannot match
the luxury, the magnificence, the splendor that dazzles, and the mystery
that bewilders, of this strange land.
The tamest word in its history is a Romancethe wildest dreams of
Romance
,
hollow and meaningless, compared with its plainest fact.
And the name of the vision that breaks upon me is
Mexico
.
Behold three lines of its history in the course of six hundred years!
Six hundred years ago a barbarous horde from the far north of America,
the tribes of the Aztec people, precipitated themselves on this beautiful
valley
,
conquered the race who dwelt there, and swelled into the civilized
Empire
of
Montezuma
.
Three hundred years ago, a wandering adventure who came from an
unknown land, with a band of white men clad in iron at his backonly six
hundred homeless menoverturned the splendid dominion of Montezuma,
and founded the Empire of
Cortes
.
Now in the year eighteen-hundred and forty-seven, even while I write,
the white race of North America, the children of the Revolution and
countrymen
of Washington, are thronging the vallies, darkening the mountains
of this land, bearing in their front amid a tide of sword and bayonet the
Banner of the Stars, which they have determined to plant on the Hall of
Montezuma and Cortez, thus establishing in the valley of Mexico, a new
dominionTHE EMPIRE OF FREEDOM.
Shall we not write the traditions of this land? Shall we not follow the
Banner of the Stars from the bloody heighth of Bunker Hill, from the
meadow of Brandywine, to the snow-clad heighth of Orizaba and the
golden city of
[20]
[20]
Aztec name of the city of Mexico.
Tenochtitlan?
Yes, we will do it; the beautiful traditions of that land speak to us in a
voice that we may not disregard. In one work, we will combine the
tradition
,
the history, the battles and the religions of this wonderful land. We
will traverse its three Eras, gathering a wild excitement as we go. First,
the Era of the Aztec Invasion, six hundred years ago. Then the Era of
Cortez, three hundred years back into time. Last of all, the Era of
Freedom
,
when the bloody fields of Palo Alto, Resaca, the three days fight of
Monterey, the terrible contest of Buena Vista, the seige of Vera Cruz and
glorious rout of Cerro Gordo, made new leaves in our history and linked
with Cortez and Montezuma, the names of Scott and Taylor!
To you, reader, who perused with deep sympathy, the Legends of the
Revolution, let us present the traditions of another scene;
the Legends
of Mexico
.
Let me tell you, how the idea of writing the legends of the golden and
bloody Land, first dawned upon me.
One day, not long ago, as I sat in my room, my table strewn with the
manuscript of Washington and his Generals, there appeared on the
threshhold
a young man, clad in a plain military undress, his pale face, scarred
forehead and fiery eye, denoting the ravages of the battle and the fever.
He advanced, greeted me by name, and I soon knew him as one of the
disbanded volunteers of Mexico.
64
I must confess that he was a magnificent looking young man. Six feet
high, his figure light, agile, and muscular, his head placed proudly on his
shouldersdespite the withered cheek and scarred browhe was a noble
man for the eyes to behold.
In short plain words, he told me his story, which was afterwards
corroborated
by others who knew the stranger. But a year ago he had left his
home, in one of the dear vallies of the west, left a mother and sister, joined
the army of Taylor, shared in the perils of Palo Alto, Resaca and
Monterey
.
You should have seen his lip quiver, his pale cheek glow, his full
eye flash, as he spoke of the terrible storming of the Bishop's Palace. It
made the blood run cold, to hear him talk of the sworn comrade of his
heart, whose skull was peeled off, by an escoppette ball, as they advanced
side by side along the Plaza of Monterey.
Altogether the history of this young man, the story of his life from the
hour when he kissed farewell on his sister's lips, and beheld his mother's
white hairs gleaming from the threshhold of Home, until the moment when
disbanded with the other volunteers, he lay fevered and dying in the
Hospital
of New Orleans, affected me with every varying interest; I felt my
heart swell, my eyes fill with tears.
At last, I ventured to ask him how he knew my name
I came, said the soldier, mentioning my name with an emphasis, that
made my heart boundI came from the field of Monterey, to thank you
for myself and my comrades!
Thank me?
Your works have cheered the weariness of many a sleepless night.
Gathered round our watch-fire before the battle of Monterey, one of our
number seated on a cannon, would read, while the others listened. Yes, in
the Courier we read your Legends of the Revolution! Believe me, sir,
those things made our hearts feel warmthey nerved our arms for the
battle
!
When we read of the old times of our Flag, we swore in our hearts,
never to disgrace it!
As the young soldier spoke, he placed in my hand a small knife,a very
toy of a thingand a volume of blotted manuscript.
This knife I took from the vest of my dead comrade in the plaza of
Monterey. Take it, sir, as a mark of gratitude from a soldier, whose lonely
hours have been cheered by your Legends. This Manuscript contains the
record of my wanderingsroughly writtenyet the facts of the battles and
marches are there. Accept these tokens, the knife and the bookthey are
all I have to give!
As the brave fellow spoke, his voice grew tremulous; there was a tear
in his eye.
Shall I confess it? As I glanced from the papers on my table
newspapers
among others containing the foulest libels on my works, ever penned
by the animalcul of the Pressto the pale face of the young soldier, I felt
my heart bound with a joy unfelt before. Far more precious to my heart,
than the praise of all the critics in the world, was that scarred soldier's tear.
Rather dwell enshrined in one honest heart like his, than enjoy the
praise of Critics, Reviewers, and all other Pigmies of the pen, whose good
opinion can be bought even as you purchase peddler's wares.
I will confess, and confess frankly, that the knife, the journal of that
soldier
of Monterey, are worth more to me than a ribbon or a title bestowed
by the hands of the proudest monarch that ever lived.
From the rough heart-warm sketches of that journal, I have constructed
the basis of my
Legends of Mexico
.
[21]
[21]
The reader will of course understand, that at the time this article in conclusion
of Washington and his Generals was written, the previous pages of the work had been
published some months. This notice is necessary, to free the author from an
imputation
which would otherwise be made, of plagiarizing from his own works.
Do not charge me with the folly of egotism. I have journeyed far and
long with you, my reader, and never once obtruded the Author on your
sight. But at the same time that I frankly confess my thorough contempt
of the whole race of mercenary critics, whose praise I have once or twice
been so unfortunate as to receivea praise more to be dreaded than their
slanderI must also state that the spontaneous tribute from the scarred
soldier
of Monterey, spoke to my inmost heart. It showed me that my labors
were not altogether valueless; it showed more a high and holy truth, that
the memories of the Old Revolution are still with us, in the hearts of our
People, binding millions in one great bond of brotherhood, and nerving the
arms of American freemen in far distant lands, amid the horrors of savage
battles.
MayI whose greatest fault has ever been, that I could not mould
myself
to the humors of a tinselled aristocracy, nor worship empty pomps and
emptier skulls, though garnished with big names and hired praisefrankly
make the record on this page, that I am proud of the unbought approbation
of that battered soldier of Monterey?
You should have heard him talk of the scenes he had witnessed, in the
strange land of Mexico.
In the battle where a few American freemen contended against the brave
hordes of the southern land. Among the mountains, whose shadows still
shelter the remnants of the Aztec People. Amid the ruins of gorgeous
cities, whose strange architecture stamped with the traces of a thousand
years, tells of a long lost civilization, whose wierd hieroglyphics are big
with History that no human eye may read; whose rainbow vegetation,
blossoming amid monument and pyramid, adorns the wreck which it cannot
savewhose solemn temples, mysterious with God and Symbol, speak of
a Religion once the barbarous Hope of millions, and now forgotten in that
awful silence, brooding over the past ages, like the serence and pathless sky
above the summit of Chimborazo!
Such had been the course of his wanderings; and wherever he turned,
he discovered the broken links of the great chain which connects the stern
Indian of the rugged North, with those children of the blossoming South,
the dwellers in the land of Mexico and Peru!
And now reader, as on this Rock of Wissahikon I write these farewell
words, while the supernatural beauty of this place is all about me, imbuing
the air as with an angel presence, permit me to hope that we do not part
forever. For the Pilgrim of the battle-fields of America will wander forth
again, and gather new relics from the Sepulchre of the Past. When next
we wander forth with staff and scallop shell, our pilgrimage will tend to
Mount Vernon; from that shrine of our history we will bring you fresh
stores of tradition, and from the grave of the American Chieftain, pour new
light upon the glorious career of the brother-heroes
Washington and his
Generals
.
George Lippard,
Wissahikon
.
June
30, 1847.
Stereotyped by
R. P. MOGRIDGEPHILAD'A.Head Quarters, Robinson's House
,
Sept'r 22d, 1780.
Permit Mr. John Anderson to pass the Guards to the White Plains, or below
if he chooses. He being on Public Business by my Direction.
B.
Arnold
, M. Gen.Rocky-Hill
,
Sept., 10th, 1783.
I have learned since I have been at this place, that you are at
Bordentown
.
Whether for the sake of retirement or economy, I know not. Be
it for either, for both, or whatever it may, if you will come to this place,
and partake with me, I shall be exceedingly happy to see you.
Your presence may remind congress of your past services to this
country
;
and if it is in my power to impress them, command my best exertions
with freedom, as they will be rendered cheerfully by one, who entertains a
lively sense of the importance of your works, and who, with much pleasure
subscribes himself,
Your sincere friend,
G. WASHINGTON.